What if Theresa May and the Conservatives are purposefully sabotaging Brexit so they can get an awful deal - using that to justify their ideologically driven dream of slashing public services? 
Add this to the revelations in tomorrow's Telegraph & no-deal Brexit makes Britain nearly ONE TRILLION pounds poorer. Feel that sovereignty.  
The Spanish government sends thousands of people to stop the #Catalonia referendum, but nothing to Galicia? #ArdeGalicia #QuemanGalicia 
Kirkuk, where Kurdish Peshmerga have held oil fields after routing ISIS jointly with Iraqi forces. Kurds held independence referendum in Sep  
There's a minority of real nut jobs who will be happy to chew off their own arms to Brexit ... but they are a minority ...  
Yup, Scotland voted decisively against Brexit and we are not budging. Sadly we're left watching this farcical tragedy and can't stop it. 
May heads for Brussels after Brexit talks deadlock  
Due to #Brexit, #Ophelia will not enter Northern Ireland until the British Gov. puts forward a suitable solution on cross-border travel. 
So US said that Kurdish referendum would be distraction from coalition anti-#ISIS; but is silent on #Iraq using US-trained units on Kurds? 
Conservatives are making a right mess of the Brexit negotiations.But if came down to these 3 options,Which would you prefer? 
We've got plenty of Bollocks to brexit stickers coming. But what other stickers would you like to see?  
"The apparent resilience of FDI flows shortly after Brexit was an illusion..." Daily Telegraph today  
Why don't we stop telling ourselves that there is no alternative to being hit by a juggernaut, and get off this Brexit road? 
Spare a thought for those of us who have no escape route and therefore at Brexit will lose our ability to say "f*** you, I'm off".  
Garbage. May hid during the referendum. Corbyn was only person honest enough to admit EU needed reform, but campaign message was 100% Remain 
"Catalonia proves the EU is undemocratic & will always side with the powerful" says Cat Boyd, who didn't vote in the EU referendum #bbcsp 
Vaguely recall something about the EU begging us for a deal as we'll have the whip hand or something  
Brexit: a failure to understand - when it comes to a "no deal" Brexit, the media haven't got a clue ...   #Brexit.  
No deal, means, No Brexit.  
Either they haven't analysed the effects of Brexit or they are so bad they are refusing to publish the findings. Take your pick. #StopBrexit 
Let's not do #BREXIT then. Let's turn around before we lose more £bns. A mistake's a mistake. #StopBREXIT please, we don't want it anymore. 
I liked a @YouTube video  Rage Against The Brexit Machine - Jacob Rees Moog. 
It isn't a result of Brexit, origins seem well before EURef. But they say, had we known all this, there shouldn't have been a EURef at all. 
Feel they’re scaring us w/no-deal Brexit so when they pull back we’ll be so relieved we forget Brexit itself is still a rly rly shit idea 
As part of the Brexit talks all hurricanes will now be exported to the South 
Jesus. The reality of Brexit is really hitting home. #Ophelia 
NEW Keir Starmer: No deal on Brexit is not an option  
Don't know how to break it to him that the Commonwealth isn't a trading block & the world has moved on since colonial days, but there you go 
Actually Ian it’s the Telegraph two weeks late on an ONS revisions story. This time nothing to do with Brexit  
Rather worse. (Our international trade position is hanging by thread, and that's even before this and without Brexit.) Perfect storm coming. 
No deal, surely will mean No Brexit.Hallelujah.  
I suggest we either cancel #Brexit or put it to another vote as last time we voted based on lies, we are now better informed #Skypapers @LBC 
My son and husband are leaving. Both exceptional contributors to UK. Brexit will destroy this country. The people who deny it are ignorant.  
Not really. Hardly anyone gave a shit about the EU until Cameron put party before country and announced the referendum. pic.twitter.com/gw5ojhykTy 
And the US, which couldn't stop the Kurdistan referendum, was equally powerless to halt this operation.  
A soft Brexit will make it easier, not harder, to carry out Labour's manifesto promises, writes @IanMurrayMP 
Interesting from EP's pre-Art50 Brexit study. Those telling me EU will fold to get any money back should read.1/  
My take on how a no deal #Brexit vote could, against all the odds, put Labour back in government.  
My @guardian column: Why is Hammond hated? For daring to look at the Brexit small print   
This would be the same EU that said during the Catalan referendum violence that it doesn't interfere in domestic matters... @JuliaHB1 
UK has no reserves to protect against damage from brexit. Time to #stopbrexit @johnmcdonnellMP 
We need to grow more food, post Brexit. Simple. Who's going to pick it? 
Cancel Brexit. This is no longer anything remotely approaching a drill. Trading the economic well being of a generation for the fairy gold of some nebulous sovereignty is self harm on a national scale  
Forget #Brexit worries - Ireland's just about to join Iceland... #StormOphelia 
There's a clear choice now on Brexit; competence and humanism vs mania and racism - Starmer flawless in this interview IMO  
He is part of the "global elite", Ben. He and his billionaire buddies bought Brexit for a laugh.  
WE NOW GO LIVE TO BREXIT  
Why bother merely “talking” Britain down when our Brexit obsessed clowns in this country are running it into the ground?  
If you think the UK right didn’t use tools like that during #brexit and #indyref you’re out of your goddamned mind. 
I was a farmer once, son. Then someone persuaded me to vote for Brexit.  
"Foreign direct investment into UK has collapsed from a net £120bn before brexit to net outflow of £25bn this year" 
I am a @UKLabour voter. .@jeremycorbyn's position was "REMAIN & REFORM". Blame for #Brexit is entirely with @Conservatives. They own it. 
Give minister acknowledges food security issue post Brexit, whilst failing to understand how farming works and the long lead times it needs  
Brexit is a runaway train and the Brexiters have got a death grip on the dead man's handle. #StopBrexit 
“The depreciation of sterling since the Brexit vote has meant that the cost of importing components has gone up”  
As Brexit was bankrolled and led in part by those wanting to escape the tax avoidance rules, let’s ensure they can’t  
'This is why we’re taking David Davis to court over Brexit'  
A sensible Brexit deal wld be an existential threat to the Eurocrats because it wld demonstrate that Europe has alternatives to the EU. 
Jaysus isn't meteorology a great aul thing! It must have heard about Brexit do you reckon?! #WhatUtterNonsenseIsThis 
On #BrexitPM position is "no deal is better than a bad deal."Labour’s ="A bad deal is better than no deal.”#Itsanegotiationstupid 
The chancellor’s Brexit gaffes have led two pro-EU ministers to come out in favour of a change at the Treasury  
BBC news spreading lies that Brexit means more expensive food. Food prices shot UP when we joined Common Market. World food cheaper than EU. 
UK is £490bn poorer than previously thought so actually we can't afford Brexit anyway.  
Here's the thing. Brexit ought not to happen and it probably won't, but this Tory govt will first have to fall. 
'The apparent resilience of FDI flows immediately after Brexit was an illusion'  
The figures here (ONS data) in Mon Tel are simply staggering and suggests UK position going into Brexit talks much weaker than was thought.  
Why a 'no-deal' scenario could be the best outcome from Brexit negotiations' | via @telegraph 
INDEPENDENT DIGITAL: Equality laws at risk after Brexit, watchdog warns #tomorrowspaperstoday 
FINANCIAL TIMES: May presses Merkel to end Brexit impasse as EU position hardens #skypapers 
On 11 Dec MPs debate a proposed referendum on the Brexit negotiations outcome.But would money, lies and Big Data win again?#brexitref2 
A record number of Britons are regretting Brexit  
Christ, that Hard Brexit Border is working rather well already.  
Italy (Lombardy, Veneto) - Lorien pollParticipate in indipendence referendum?Yes - 16%Probably - 26%Abstain - 43%Undecided - 15% 
A Corbynite Britain would be a worse calamity than a no-deal Brexit - The Telegraph  
Brexit uncertainty threatens to create miles of traffic jams around Britain's ports  
Hard/ No deal Brexit is Tory right equivalent of Maoist  revolution. Nativist, nihilist jingoism before which economy and society torched 
We can just eat cats, dogs and harvest organ meat from the poor if no Brexit deal 
UK ambassador advises Eire to prepare for disastrous "hard Brexit"! There is no such thing as soft Brexit. #Article50 is economic illiteracy 
A no deal Brexit would be a catastrophic act of self harm that no responsible Govt could contemplate. #cliffedge 
Tomorrow's Brexit spin today - keep an eye on the anti-Labour "news" machine this week  
Anyone wanting proof Brexit is doomed need look no further than the endorsement of the worst minister to hold Cabinet office in recent times  
Hillary Clinton claims Brexit was won on a 'big lie'  
I know it is a tough choice, but who is the best equipped to do any job relating to #Brexit: Please RT for greater sample. 
We’ll be publishing analysis of what a “no deal” Brexit would mean for prices in the shops on Tuesday... WARNING: will include facts  
NO #Brexit DEAL? Shall we tell Davis #WTO has no rules on where to land UK planes or how to move folks across borders? #stopbrexit #remain 
LOL at New Labour types who warn Brexit will harm the economy but somehow are ok with John McDonnell taking over the Treasury. 
Any Brexit fans gonna admit #Brexshit is slipping away from them? 
Just a reminder that Young Labour's vote supporting ending free movement after Brexit is reiterating Labour's actual manifesto pledge  
Hot off the press! Link to an updated version of the extensive and comprehensive  #Brexit fact-base.  
She's huffing and puffing again but she'll vote for Brexit every time   
Heseltine: Abandoning Brexit is the best thing for the UK!  
My position on Brexit is clear, thanks. And I will not be playing politics with peoples' jobs because of an internal party dispute. Clueless  
I wish Brexit was like the #SixChairChallenge... "bring us back" - "okay." #xfactor 
Yet another British business taking a hit from #Brexit @costcutter 1st loss in 30yrs £30m profit to £65m loss @AArmstrong_says reports 
whole thing about Brexit is never that things will close down because of it, but that things will close anyway and nothing will replace them  
UK is a special country and will thrive no matter what outcome of Brexit negotiations are...deal or no deal we will succeed. That’s our way  
Are MPs right to think that by amending EU (Withdrawal) Bill they can block no-deal (or bad-deal) Brexit? Some thoughts in this thread.  
Quiet. Listen.Hear that? In the distance.That's the death knell for the EU you hear, creeping this way.#Brexit is timely & correct.  
In #Brexit news, there's this which is horrifying, for several complicated reasons  
Anyone else mildly alarmed at Sainsbury’s claim today that food prices could rise 22% if no Brexit deal? People starving? No, OK then. 
PP Catalan leader: "no agreed referendum will be allowed in a new Spanish Constitutional reform"#CatalanReferendum 
76% of Welsh not prepared to lose a penny over Brexit. @WalesForEurope 
Brexit is more than a cloud. Brexit is like a cancer eating away at the economic fabric of Britain. It's time to #StopBrexit 
New name for no-deal Brexit to clarify that the choice is not between a deal and the status quo. Semi-final 1. Semi 2 in replies. 
So there is a cross-party bid to stop the cliff edge Brexit fruit loops tanking the economy.  
The headline should read: Puerto Rico's sole representative in congress lies and misrepresents the results of a mostly boycotted referendum  
UK farmers to ‘grow more’ post-Brexit.  We’ll take back control of the weather & develop crops that pick themselves.  
our country is on brink of mass treachory by all MP's in westminster as they have no guts to support the result of Brexit SHAME N THEM ALL 
Punish UK? Juncker's punishing EUROPE: Nigel Farage savages EU's lose-lose Brexit strategy  
Hey @Nigel_Farage, not only did you win the Brexit but you beat hillary too! Who knew? :) Cheers mate!  
Sainsbury's chairman David Tyler told the Sunday Times that a no-deal #Brexit could result in a 22% tariff on all EU food bought by Britain. 
Why is Hammond hated? For daring to look at the Brexit small print | Matthew d’Ancona  
Why would  remain voters  'rally round' brexit? With every day that passes it becomes clearer, we were right.  Tiny majority based on lies. 
How to negotiate your own Brexit, a simple guide.  
If @GladiatorsTV did #Brexit... *so* much more fun! #TheLastLeg 
#stopbrexithour EU trolls are out in force tonight .... so pleased we're leaving. Many thanks Gina Miller for enshrining Brexit in UK Law 
a) She attracted more votes than Trumpb) Truth abt Russian manipulation in US is coming outc) Putin was also giving helping hand to Brexit 
We need a united government here in the UK. Cabinet ministers now attempting to scupper Brexit must be removed from office and replaced by people who are dedicated to delivering the will of the people. 
****Breaking****: Brexitania, the post-Brexit replacement for the royal yacht Britannia, spotted on sea trials. (Photo via @AP) 
One way or the other I suspect we will need a full public inquiry into Brexit and govt handling of it #StopBrexitHour 
A record number of Britons are regretting Brexit  
Triggering Article 127 will in my view need approval of MPs and I don't think they will give it - so Brexit unravels #StopBrexitHour 
The Conservatives are clear on Brexit you say? Christ. You must be snorting the pure stuff at Tory youth HQ.  
'Someone defend Britain!' BBC anchor hits out as anti-Brexit Europhile panel mocks UK  
We have best civil service in world and though v few (none I ever met) believes Brexit good idea they're working hard to make best of it  
Ireland should prepare for No Deal Brexit, advises our man in Dublin: via @isme_ie 
Codswallop. Tories called referendum to resolve splits in Tory party. Now split further than they were & tanking talks. This 100% Tory mess.  
Nigel Farage is part of the global conspiracy that wants Brexit as part of a plan to destabilize Western democracy in favour of kleptocracy.  
Mrs.Clinton calls #Brexit a 'Big Lie'. No Hillary,that was YOUR campaign. #WhatHappened  
Soft Brexit looking increasingly likely. But it'll soon be seen for what it is: A retrograde step, a much poorer 'deal' than one we have now  
Don't think Labour forced the Conservatives to:1. Call a referendum without a plan for if the result was Leave2. Invoke Article 50 without pre-negotiations 3. Call an election wasting months of potential negotiating timeCorrect me if I've missed something 
As the lies & broken promises turn to dust, the country re-thinks on Brexit. Still time to stop it.#StopBrexitHour 
Only time Govt listens on Brexit is if they're taken to court. If you can't listen, you can't lead.#StopBrexitHour 
Scottish independence becomes a more distant dream—52% of Scots oppose holding a referendum within five years 
Opinion: A no deal Brexit is unlikely, but the UK government would be irresponsible not to prepare for it.  
John, mate. That first tweet about 'no deal' Brexit going wrong was solid. Stop there. You don't need to engage in unicorn-trading too.  
Brexit is turning out to be everything the scaremongers threatened our Scottish Independence would be....but worse... 
HA! Failing Grayling who TRASHED the CJS as Justice SecretaryWho is NOW back in Cabinet !Says UK will have to grow more food post #Brexit 
#StopBrexitHour what a day for the #Remain cause at the #12RegionalRallies, proud to have been a part of it #Brexit #StopBrexit 
I recommend coopting "take back control" to our side since clear now that Brexit will mean massive loss of sovereignty #StopBrexitHour 
The 50 Brexit Impact Assessments clearly contain extremely damaging information regarding the future of the UK post Brexit. Why else hide? 
People used to poke fun at Jeremy Corbyn for having an allotment. Now the Brexit strategy appears to be grow your own. Dig for victory!  
Why are we taking all this BS, a lot of short memories peeps! #Brexit  
.There's a Brexit emergency & Theresa May is sending.....David Davis........ . 
It seems to have escaped the Marr programme’s notice that scuppering the govt’s #Brexit negotiations is now Labour’s key political mission  
I've never met an experienced negotiator with anything but contempt for the UK govt's approach to Brexit  
Mississippi last held a referendum in 2001, on whether to switch to a different state flag. Result was 64% to keep their Confederate emblem. 
Grayling says if there's no Brexit deal we will just grow more food. Who's going to pick it? Not enough agricultural workers this year! 
I left school aged 11 and was already a fully grown man. Now there are boys wearing dresses and girls growing beards. Very tough alpha males need to take back control. Hard Brexit needed 
A 52% majority you cannot even change the rules of a golf club! #Brexit is NO DEMOCRACY! #remain #StopBrexit #StopBrexitHour 
52% of Scots oppose holding an independence referendum within five years, according to one poll  
#Brexit must not shut door on unskilled EU workers, retailers warn. 
Neither applies to Brexit. If we fail to do a deal within A50 time limits, we’re far worse off. EU knows this. 7/  
Some Brexiteers in the Conservative Party fear the referendum will be betrayed  
A definition of Brexit. Imagine a shopkeeper who tells all the people closest to his shop, & whom he trades with most, that he hates them. 
Sick of Leave twats going unchallenged on BBC when they spout bogus arguments that rely on listeners having no understanding of Brexit. 1/x  
Don't be fooled; practical European leaders like Hungary's foreign minister know a 'No Deal' scenario hurts the EU more than the UK. #Brexit  
"UK farmers will 'grow more food' if no Brexit deal". Grayling shows, again, he is not the brightest tool in the box  
How about a cross-party Stop Brexit completely.  
We're doomed. Here's another sexed up dossier on how we are only 45 minutes away from Brexit armageddon. The lack of evidence speaks volumes  
DUP Urges Appeaser Theresa to ‘Rein In’ Divisive, Anti-Brexit Hammond  
Grow for Brexit: Chris Grayling suggests UK farmers could boost food production to prevent 'no deal' price hikes  
Far-right succeed in achieving Swiss burqa referendum  
Islands of Remain in the Brexit Sea -  
Food rationing queue 1947. Coming to a post-Brexit High Street near you.  #history #stopbrexit #NoDealBrexit 
“The European Parliament needs to come to its senses. The important thing is not the Divorce settlement. It is how we treat the future. That’s the important issue of Brexit. Not punishment, not resentment.” @AndersVistisen #Brexit  
#Brexit Morning noon & night non stop  about Brexit & Donald Trump.!! He’s the President  and we voted leave EU. Stop boring us to    
Labour says it will join Conservatives to block 'no deal' Brexit(John McDonnell was brilliant on #Marr ) 
David Davis would do the country a great service to resign and tell us honestly what he now thinks of Brexit  
The Govt triggered Brexit scandalously & stupidly prematurely.   But with a HoC vote. Surely they could not leave w/ no deal w/out a vote. 
You are seriously messed up matey. A referendum the Tories called with a campaign run by Tory MPs, yet it is Jeremy Corbyn's fault.  
At the end of yet another complicated week of Brexit where no deal loomed large, I tried to summarise things. Hope it helps.  
Based on turn out & motivation at #savethe8th public meetings this far ahead of referendum, prepare for 'Brexit' type shock of the elites. 
Iraq conflict: Kurdish leaders refuse to reject referendum result  
At least there are still some people out there willing to defend those brave enough to tell the truth about Brexit. #StopBrexit 
A shame in spite of winning popular vote she's not in the White House. She understands what is fact &what is fantasy & spin regarding Brexit  
Brexit inflation will cost lower-income households £300 next year  
Parliament will unite to stop a no deal Brexit, warns Labour  
So many Tory MPs putting their party & careers before country @MailOnline austerity coming @UKLabour must oppose there's no jobs 1st #Brexit  
#Labour admit today they would accept any #Brexit deal offered by the #EU, however punishing. Great negotiating.  
“Brexit means Brexit” & “Brexit for the many not for the few” This country is at the mercy of meaningless ideological bullshit. 
“Whichever way you voted in the referendum, the whole country wants to make a success of leaving the European Union. So together let us take the road to a better future & build a country that truly works for everyone.” - @Theresa_May#Brexit  #ImWithMay #WorkingForEverone 
Hillary Clinton claims Brexit was won on a 'big lie'  
I don't see why everyone is mocking this when it's the kind of skill that will be crucial for survival in post-Brexit Britain.  
Brexit decision must be reversed: my letter to @Bournemouthecho #StopBrexit 
Just ask yourself, does #Brexit help or hinder?   
Europeans I spoke to all universally thought #Brexit was mad, bad and sad. But they all also moving on without us. What a waste of the UK  
Brexit latest: Redundant car workers to he redeployed as farm labourers. Derilict Nissan site to be ploughed up for crops.  
More mass protests aiming to end Brexit. It's time the MPs woke up and acknowledged that Brexit is a big mistake. Time to #StopBrexit 
Don't worry about Brexit's impact on UK food prices. John Redwood's been touring supermarkets... 
The government is unable to deliver the Unicorn Brexit the deluded Brexiteers promised.  Therefore “Remain” should be the default option. 
Brexit advocates preparing British public for food shortages if (when) EU talks collapse. Next week: cannibalism — is it really so bad?  
Transport Secretary Grayling: 'No deal' Brexit 'could turn M20 into lorry park'  
One remarkable features of Brexit negotiations is fact that 27 EU member states have shown more unity than 29 people around UK Cabinet table 
No deal Brexit is economic suicide and was not on the ballot paper. 
Brexit warning: Labour plotting to PAY the EU to keep UK under rule of Brussels' courts  
BREXIT: You’ve got to love those anonymous sources who give us the exact quotes we need without having to question their motives or agenda.  
Tense Standoff Over CAT Independence Referendum.Since when did EUR governments prevent their citizens from voting? 
Completely disagree with those MPs trying to block a 'no deal' Brexit. We should stand firm & proudly talk our great country up for a change 
This is crucial.Means MPs can reject *any* deal bad for the UK.MPs move to block May from signing ‘no deal’ Brexit  
- KRG to hand oilfields but Baghdad should pay KRG employees salaries in full- referendum won't be nullified but will be freezed for a year 
Switzerland to hold referendum on banning the burqa  
I'm not saying the Tories are taking us backwards, but @ShippersUnbound books on Brexit & Election 2017 are in Amazon's Tudor History Chart.  
Yes we are! We all get LOADS of money from trying to undermine Brexit. I'm typing this on a gold computer with gold keys. It's wonderful! 
Unfotunately Keir, you voted FOR an unamended A50 bill that only gives you a choice between accepting a Brexit deal or leaving without one  
The Conservatives have a problem they don't want to name, says @stephenkb. It's called Brexit:  
BREAKING: Chris Grayling Unveils Radical New #Brexit Strategy  
.@StephenGethins calls on Tory UK Government to reveal their secret report on the impact of Brexit on Scotland.  
I don't think so. From brexit to fracking he's out of step. It's the media who give him a platform. 
EU 'spreading Soviet-style propaganda and disinformation' to undermine UK Brexit support  
DELIVERING BREXIT IS SIMPLE - BECAUSE EU MEMBERSHIP IS ILLEGALAll Theresa May has to do is declare the 6 Treaties null and void  
Did your #Referendum ballot paper include the No Deal option?If not, how come the Govt think they can go for the option with zero votes?  
Currency traders are starting to get concerned about Brexit and Theresa May's future  
People who voted Leave were not thick. They were mostly deceived.People who STILL back Brexit are, by definition, thick.Or worse, racist. 
#BREAKINGNechirvan #Barzani: Referendum result will not be canceled in any condition. 
OOH: Hillary obliquely connects Brexit and Trump victory with "fabricated, false information."  
Chris Grayling says we can grow all our own food. So, come on, Brexiters, get digging!Hurrah for Brexit! Boo to foreign food!   
When will Hillary Clinton stop whining about losing her election and complaining about Brexit? It’s getting boring now! 
There are hundreds of reasons to stop Brexit. Here are 24 of the key ones, illustrated by @albawhitewolf (aka the now infamous EU Supergirl) 
UK universities need clarity on #Brexit research now, says @aberdeenuni v-c Ian Diamond 
."Brexit is a complete game changer, leading the way to higher costs. It’s a huge, SELF-INFLICTED problem". 
I've been out to the local park this morning planting cucumbers. Come on everyone let's dig for Brexit!  
The Conservatives are making a right mess of the Brexit negotiations and probably won't get any deal. But if it came down to these three options, which would you prefer? 
If food really does go up 22% post Brexit perhaps we'll need a leader that has an allotment 
What the grim reality of a ‘bad-tempered’ Brexit means  
The Tory government won't release their secret Brexit analysis but here's what we know a 'no deal' Brexit will mean.  
No further Brexit talks yet scheduled as negotiations hit deadlock  
75% of the voting public now believe Brexit must be achieved. 
So Grayling's no-deal Brexit plan is basically just the plot of The Good Life.  
Siri, what colour is Brexit  
A “jobs first” Brexit: one where the jobs are first to leave the UK.#StopBrexit 
PUK and KDP reject demands to cancel referendum result 
UK imports 40% of its food - that's a lot of digging #Brexit  
Any MPs threatening to block 'no deal Brexit' must have the negotiating skills of a bag of turnips. 1/2 
Without a supermajority, the Brexit ref was ALWAYS going to divide the country. It would take a two thirds concensus to close Pandora's box  
This is no longer just about Brexit. Our entire democracy is under threat. MPs gave us a vote, leave won. That must be implemented . 
Thanks @HillaryClinton for expressing the anti Brexit case so clearly 
BREAKING: Iraqi Kurdistan region rejects Iraqi government's call to cancel independence referendum result 
Richard Tice - "The economy is doing much better than people give it credit for. We need leaders in the Cabinet to sell the story." #Brexit  
Keir Starmer: Don't call Leavers thick!Remainers: OK. If they can name one practical, tangible benefit of Brexit, we'll call 'em Einstein. 
Why the 'no deal' Brexit strategy will never work  
No.You and your boss, Blair, fucked UKAnd guess what? You're not fucking Brexit.Get it:Democracy won. Suck it up, cupcake! You lost  
Let’s be clear. All those MPs who move to deny us a no deal Brexit are enduring the UK has to beg the EU for a deal. They are traitors. 
#BREAKING#KDP and #PUK agreed; Referendum results will not be cancelled. #Peshmerga united against any threats on #Kirkuk. 
Hillary Clinton claims Brexit was won on a 'big lie'  
So....some twat on the news wants us to revert back to this and all will be well Please note, this only applies to non rich folks.. #Brexit pic.twitter.com/YNNRbbni4J 
After #Brexit, we must be bold & act to deliver a more united Europe. #EUfightback 
There will not be any unilateral negotiation with Baghdad by either PUK or KDP. If there be any negotiation with Baghdad it will be a joint delegation representing all Kurdistan parties. KDP/PUK reject any demands to nullify the referendum results. Refuse preconditions 
Yesterday I joined campaigners fighting a hard Tory Brexit. Read more here:  
The UK economy is about to tank over Brexit and Liam Fox wants to give the Queen a luxury yacht.  
We will work with anyone to secure a decent deal and prevent a no deal Brexit.  
How the hell is Brexit still even a thing? It's like ordering a seafood platter for a table when half the people have an allergy. 
'To Hell with the Will of the People!’ – Four out of Five Sky News Panellists Oppose BrexitImagine our shock.  
REMOANERS: Cross-party group of MPs comes together to block No Deal Brexit. This weakens UK's negotiating stance!  
Get a grip. There is no "jobs first" #Brexit.Stop playing games, ditch the ideology, and do your job please  
Agree with @Keir_Starmer: Parliament must have meaningful vote on Brexit deal/no deal & we will vote against no deal  
With the denial going on in UK politics right now, how refreshing to hear Hillary Clinton speak some home truths abt Russia, Brexit & Trump 
The latest What the Fatah!!  Thanks to @NewsWorldIN @haivri @BadIdeasVs #brexit #india 
10) many of you Brexit supporters are self sufficient, secure & think you won't be affected.Brexit at any cost, for other people. 
How badly will Brexit affect Scotland? They know, but won’t tell you.  
UK will stay in EU because the Tories are botching Brexit talks, says @mattzarb  via @HuffPostUKPol 
Stop fannying around, #Labour! Stick your nose out of the Westminster bubble, Brexit is collapsing...start shouting NO BREXIT - NOW!  
5) Davis & Fox championed Brexit trade freedom whilst having no clue whatsoever how international trade worked. 
'No deal' on #Brexit would paralyse trade. If you want to understand why, read this leading article from @thetimes. 
3) whatever happened in the campaigns, this is the reality.There is no £350 M, #Brexit will cost far more than our membership 
Fianna Fáil's electronic Brexit border will transfer responsibility for checks onto farmers and businesses, increasing regulation and costs.  
Quite right. So does #UKIP. DUP want Theresa May to sack Hammond if he doesn’t back Brexit  
Brexit proves that the Tories are dangerous idiots who care only about their petty little party and don't give a damn about the country 
EU negotiations @UKLabour style  #Brexit  
Lab are for & against the single market and now even for & against leaving the EU. They're also for & against making new Brexit positions... 
Hillary Clinton claims Brexit was won on a ‘big lie’  
As MPs move to block Theresa May from signing a no deal Brexit would you rather end up with no deal even if it means crashing out of the EU? 
Brexit is failing because it's being negotiated in the interests of the Conservative Party, says @stephenkb 
DUP: Theresa May must tell the Chancellor to change course on Brexit or be sacked  
Time for MP's from all parties to work together to stop no deal Brexit disaster  
“Post-Brexit trade outside of the Customs Union could see a nightmare scenario” Read the report:  
Absolute rubbish from Sillars no way is Corbyn's Labour to the left of the SNP #austerity #trident #Brexit #wales 
NEWS FLASH: @SebDance MEP will give a key note at the #ReInventingEurope youth conference about #Brexit & the Future of Europe. We hope to see you all next Sat. 21 Oct in Bruges @collegeofeurope! Register now   
Labour says it will join Conservatives to block 'no deal' Brexit  
WATCH | Keir Starmer blasted for Labour's pledge to vote against Brexit if deal doesn't give exact same benefits as Single Market m'ship.  
John McDonnell's intervention is comical. "Labour should lead Brexit". Labour don't even know if Labour have a policy on the EU!  
I wonder who those that currently blame the EU for everything think are going to be taking the blame post #brexit 
UK parliament will block 'no deal' Brexit, opposition party says  
We deserve to be told the truth about Brexit before it is too late. Good luck to @JolyonMaugham and the @GoodLawProject #StopBrexit 
“We do have to prepare for all contingencies,” including walking away if progress isn't made on trade, says Brexit Minister @WalkerWorcester 
I'm just going to leave this here for those of you who still think we can strong-arm the EU via No Deal Brexit#Marr 
The Free Market is failing Tories couldn't negotiate with the EU they should stand aside #Brexit #marr 
Everyone should see Hillary Clinton take down Brexit and Donald Trump in 90 seconds  
Brexit negotiations are a game of chicken between a juggernaut and a mini. The UK is the mini. My @IndyVoices column  
#bbcsp  Why Britain has difficulties in working out its position is that neither kind of #Brexit works for Britain 
#Brexit minister Robin Walker coming across as calm, sensible & reasonable - as always - on @daily_politics regarding #Brexit negotiations  
John Major should be in prison for treason he allegedly allowed the Barcelona Declaration to go ahead The Muslimification of Europe.#Brexit  
Yesterday's East of England #StopBrexit rally was great! Help us to fight #Brexit by donating to our crowdfunder  
What the grim reality of a ‘bad-tempered’ Brexit means  
How are the EU expected to understand what the British Brexit position is when the British government doesn't even know what their position is. #bbcsp 
Shadow Brexit Secretary @Keir_Starmer confirms Labour would look to vote down a 'no deal' Brexit.  
Unless Brexit gets fucked Britain is fucked. Zealots, ideologues, cowardly MPs and far right media the only ones keeping the fuckery alive 
A number of MPs state respect for the referendum then want a "deal" that virtually mirrors a remain position undermining UK negotiations... 
Government "negligent in the extreme" for conducting "absolutely no planning & preparation" for no-deal #Brexit, says Henry Bolton #Paterson 
Whoops. Nicky Morgan appears to have outed Amber Rudd as a plotter against Brexit and briefer against Cabinet colleagues.  
Guardian: Hillary Admits Brexit Vote Set Stage for US election Defeat  
RUBBISH: Hillary Clinton thinks Brexit will be a massive disadvantage to Britain.  
on No Deal Brexit, Grayling also said no way flights would be grounded if our EU aviation deals lapsed, because of Spanish holiday industry 
John McDonnell on #Marr and Keir Starmer on  giving very strong performances - clearly #Labour now is party to negotiate #Brexit 
It's all PC bullshit son. My granddaughter claims to be a non-binary gender neutral pansexual feminist who wants an exit from Brexit. These kids just need a wallop and a stretch of National Service. I'm ex-forces myself! 
'Brexit gave people permission to be racist' - Doreen Lawrence speaks to The New European:  
How Brexit could be stopped – a step-by-step guide. My Sunday article for @IndyVoices  
John McDonnell is right. As the country holds its head in collective shame at Tory Brexit incompetence & arrogance, Labour steps up... #Marr 
Great by @NickCohen4on the religious anger of Brexit  
Who would you believe on the consequences of no Brexit deal for aviation - Grayling & Co or our country's pilots? I'd listen to the pilots  
Shadow Brexit Secretary @Keir_Starmer confirms @UKLabour would look to vote down a 'no deal' Brexit.  
It's lucky Britain is already so perfect that all the energy we're spending debating Brexit isn't distracting us from solving other problems 
Do you ever wonder exactly how #brexit persuaded people to vote against their own interest? This brilliant thread will show you how.  
Can we please put @Keir_Starmer in charge of #Brexit talks right now?  
Hillary Clinton says EU leave campaign fed voters lies #Brexit  
Keir Starmer..."you look behind the catchphrases and there's nothing there". Perfect description of the Govt. EU Brexit negs.  
And btw farmers will be front line of the getting fucked brigade in a no deal Brexit. Tariffs on agricultural products are punishing. 
‘To Hell with the Will of the People!’ – Four out of Five Sky News Panellists Oppose Brexit 
This notion that, because Brexit won a referendum, anyone who criticises it is denying democracy is beyond ridiculous.  
Cross party support for amendment to EU Withdrawal Bill that would require Parliament to vote on final terms of #Brexit deal  
The Brexit you were promised vs the Brexit you’re going to get.#Marr 
Chris Grayling says a no deal Brexit will mainly be bad for the EU and "Britain will succeed whatever happens"  
Despite Brexit, Scotland will remain open, internationalist and outward looking, says @NicolaSturgeon.@ScotNational 
Chris Grayling claims everyone knew Brexit talks would be “long” and “difficult” #Marr 
The public are running out of patience with insolent Remainers who drum up fake Brexit anxiety  via @telegraphnews 
Chris Grayling says everyone thought Brexit talks would be "long and difficult". Liam Fox said "one of the easiest in human history". #marr 
Chris Grayling says a no-deal Brexit would be “bad for the European Union,” but repeatedly refuses to say it would be bad for the UK. #marr 
"This was always going to be a long+difficult negotiation" says Grayling - patently not what he & others said before the Brexit vote #Marr 
Each week, the pro Brexit Sunday Times rejoices in the way it sold pride to its readers but delivered humiliation.  
Am not sure why McDonnell thinks Labour could veto a ‘no deal’ Brexit. That’s the default, doesn’t need a vote. It’s a deal plt has to back. 
"I worry for our country," @johnmcdonnellMP says if Tories can't get #Brexit deal they should let Labour do it  #marr 
Mcdonnell confirms my Long Read story: shad Chancellor - Asset managers/investors coming to him for Brexit assurance arent getting from Govt 
RT Imagine this clown negotiating #Brexit to think she's a candidate for Tory leader #Marr #Bbcsp  #Paterson 
Good to see responsible MPs from all parties working together to try to ensure U.K. avoids no deal #Brexit disaster  
A no deal Brexit "will be a very big disadvantage to Britain" says @HillaryClinton #marr 
So #marr is having a pop at @johnmcdonnellMP because the Tories refuse to release the government's brexit legal advice. Go figure. 
Sainsbury's boss quoted on @MarrShow warning that Brexit will lead to a significant increase in food prices. #Brexitchaos 
“To Hell with the Will of the People!” – Four out of Five Sky News Panellists Oppose Brexit #FairAndBalancedCoverage 
Man Booker prize 2017: from Abraham Lincoln to Brexit Britain  
Horror show. This week's @thesundaytimes cartoon. #Hammond #May #Brexit  
Great to see @TiceRichard on Marr discussing #Brexit: 'No deal is far better than a bad deal.' 
The craziness of putting aside £60m for #NoDeal ...#Brexit #StopBrexitHour #MayDUP #StopBrexit #DavidDavis #Remain #Brexitshambles #4EU 
We know the EU knows what Brexit means, including for the UK, because they've *published a study*.  /19 
Sainsbury's boss: food prices will rise significantly after hard Brexit. A key reason why the poor will suffer most 
#Marr The grim reality of a no-deal #Brexit - and some #Brexiteer ministers actually want this! 
9 women can't make a baby in a month. No matter the resources, it's too late to competently organise no-deal Brexit. 
Please read this thread and ask yourself, why is the government keeping secret information that could help us all plan for Brexit?  
“Democrats are held to account. The Brexit right never is.” Me in the Observer  
And there's a stream of 'good news stories' from Liam Fox. It makes you wonder: Good Brexit stories good, bad Brexit stories bad? /5 
HAMMOND: DUP tell Theresa May the Chancellor needs to back Brexit or his position becomes 'untenable'. About time! 
And Govt released an impact assessment on Brexit before the Referendum. If it was the right thing to do then, how can it be wrong now? /4 
Spot on. If Brexit is a success, it will cause rush for the exit. That is why they are so determined to ensure it's a mess.  
Want a fun time in your Mentions? Remind people that Corbyn threw the Brexit referendum  
It's Michel Barnier, not the Eurosceptics, who's driving us towards the hard-Brexit abyss  >  Mail On Sunday  >   
Cross party group of MPs move to block May from signing ‘no deal’ Brexit. Crashing out on WTO is not an option!  
EU 'spreading Soviet-style propaganda and disinformation' to undermine UK Brexit support  
You'd never know a thing about how strong anti Brexit is Bit of a media shut down  
Switzerland to hold burka ban referendum after 100,000 demand vote  
READ: @Keir_Starmer warns about the threat of a 'no deal' Brexit in today's Observer / @guardian  
Two-thirds of public think David Davis & Tory Brexit negotiations are going badly - doubling in 6 months. #BrexitShambles #Marr #ToriesOut 
MPs move to block Theresa May from signing ‘no deal’ Brexit  
So replace Hammond with 'non-divisive' Gove if you want. Changes nothing. Brexit will fail through abundance of reality, not want of faith. 
"True democratic politicians are responsible for their words. The Brexit right never is" - @NickCohen4 on the eurosceptic propaganda machine 
Two in three people think the Brexit negotiations are going badly  
DUP flexes its muscles over Brexit - paying £1billion does not buy silent complicity!  
‘The religious insistence that supporting Brexit is a matter of faith, not reason’ @NickCohen4 
To understand Brexit's implications, take a look at the nuclear industry  
"at the end of all this if I’m not satisfied, to say no..and to hope that no might delay Brexit or prevent Brexit"  
A weird consensus breaks out. Here's Jack Straw arguing for a Referendum on the Final Deal...  
A record number of Britons are regretting Brexit, poll shows  
What the grim reality of a ‘bad-tempered’ Brexit means  
Calculated drop in tax revenue if there is a Brexit No-Deal with EU is £60bn. Not trivial, it is catastrophic for UK #BrexitShambles #Marr 
Theresa May failing to inform public of 'very serious' threat of no deal Brexit  
Tensions have been on the rise since Kurds held a referendum on secession last month, which Iraq called illegal  
EU 'spreading Soviet-style propaganda and disinformation' to undermine UK Brexit support  #EU #Brexit 
Alternatively, she could just be expressing an opinion that Brexit is a bad idea.  
Speaking in Wales, Hillary Clinton says children are being given "short shrift" in Brexit process  
The way to end uncertainty is to immediately stop Brexit.  
Why can’t democrats make 2018 both a referendum on Trump and a chance for new party politics, policies?  
The offer the U.S. made to Barzani in exchange for dropping the referendum  
BIAFRANS IN USA PROTESTED FR BIAFRA #REFERENDUM N AGNST d KILLING..IN CAPITOL WASHINGTON DC  
Wolfgang Tillmans, Pro-EU anti-Brexit Poster Campaign, 2016  
Here's me being pro-#Brexit **and** anti-Trump, pro-Hillary, on Independence Day, #Scot24 day, June 24 2016 
The Brexit Diet:To lose weight chop off your arms and legs. #stopbrexit 
good times. Here's how a patriot campaigned for #Brexit - stumbling across this made me smile :)  
Brexit: to crash and burn - the media is beginning to look at the fallout of a "no deal" ...  #Brexit.  
90 Catalan Committees in Defence of the Referendum represented at the first gathering, grassroots organizing further steps  
This is down to Capitalism. Brexit is a side show. Any suffering Lies firmly at the doorstep of Corporate greedy corrupt capitalism 
So, one good reason for voting #Brexit -- anyone? 
Thousands march to protest Brexit as rallies held across the UK  via @MetroUK #stopbrexit #12RegionalRallies 
Well said Sarah.I'm looking forward to the day Brexit is overturned & Farage fulfills his promise to leave the UK (forever?)#StopBrexit 
Brexit update: Stop talking the country down, meaning stop telling the truth, it's turning people against Brexit. See, I've corrected that. 
This is why we’re taking David Davis to court over Brexit  Believe me don’t trust them! 
Criticising Brexit to become ‘hate crime’ after movement gains religious status  via @newsthump 
What the grim reality of a ‘bad-tempered’ Brexit means  
MPs move to block Theresa May from signing ‘no deal’ Brexit  AT LAST!! 
By criticising Brexit, Hilary Clinton advocates denying democracy and sovereignty - Americans would rightly never accept this for the US. 
Works on about 90% of Brexit-supporters on Twitter - because they're mostly not real anyway   
'Brexit downturn would have knock-on impact on UK security & force military to rethink ambitious spending projects'  
Elements of the Tory party fought for years for Brexit. Now Brexit will spell the death of the Tory party. Funny how the universe works. 
New anti-Brexit party hopes to capture UK politics centre ground  via @FT 
Nerves fray as the #Brexit clock counts down, negotiations stall and the possibility of a no deal scenario grows  
This puts Govt in a real pickle as DUP & 10 Tory MPs gang up against no-deal.Another step along path to stop Brexit 
Catalonia independence referendum: Spain's bad handling is a lesson for the world - The Washington Post  
And so it begins, the re-partition of Yemen: Southern Yemen leader announces independence referendum, new parliament  
Suddenly it seems OK to suggest that Brexit, just possibly, might be a terrible idea!The tide is turning.#StopBrexit 
Real possibility of the Tory Party collapsing in next few yearswith perfect storm of #Brexit, failing public services & falling membership 
So 4 different versions of a Labour Brexit on show tomorrow! Which one should we believe?  
MPs move to block Theresa May from signing ‘no deal’ Brexit  
Why Tory Brexit spells Anarchy in the UK by our chief political commentator @iainmacwhirter A must read in tomorrow's paper 
Very pleased to speak at the London anti-Brexit rally in Whitehall. Many thanks to the organisers #bollockstobrexit 
The public are running out of patience with insolent Remainers who drum up fake #Brexit anxiety  
Fact that cannot be stated enough: Jeremy Corbyn is far more to blame for Brexit than Theresa May. No Jezza, no Brexit.  
A record number of Britons are regretting Brexit, poll shows   
55p a min Universal Credit phone line. Local A&Es closed to, well, As & Es. Dementia Tax. No deal on Brexit. This Tory Govt is trolling us.  
The people save the people. Meeting of 90 referendum defense committees in Sabadell to organize the resistance in front Spanish repression  
Senior DUP figures are "deeply concerned about Philip Hammond's behaviour" over Brexit  
Easy to be bogged down in the negativity, despair & division of Brexit.Then there's a day like today; of hope & optimism for our country   
2014, Indyref. Currency? Defence? EU? Welfare?Brexit: They know what will happen but no one is to know. It is a secret. Arrogance extreme. 
Public running out of patience with insolent Remainers who drum up fake Brexit anxiety.>Daley nails it. 
Best bit in new #Bladerunner set in 2049 is when the Brits are still arguing about Brexit. 
PM’s former security adviser warns of Brexit defence cuts  
Pro-EU group in legal threat over Govt's 'secret' Brexit studies  
'He should be tried for TREASON' Hartley-Brewer SAVAGES Hammond's assault on Brexit  
SO PROUD: Thousands march to protest Brexit as rallies held across the UK / #Brexit #Toxic   via @MetroUK 
'What happened in Catalonia will happen to us!’ Katie Hopkins FEARS Brexit uproar   
Hillary Clinton says children are suffering as a result of Brexit MIND YOUR OWN BUSINESS 
Brexit opponents say they'll sue Britain's government if it fails to release secret reports  
Jeremy Corbyn: Govt failing in Brexit negotiations and risking 'UK jobs meltdown'  #Coop100 
It's now clear that there's no prospect of a #brexit deal that works for the UK. Let's just cancel it and get back to being GREAT BRITAIN 
Our #StopBrexit rally was top story on this evening's @BBCLookEast news!  #12RegionalRallies #Brexit 
Scottish voters give UK Gvt the worst Brexit rating.  
Palace fans are buzzing hahahaha. Can't wait for Clark to snap Zaha propa brexit tackle. 
Today #FFArdFheis17 voted for reintroduction of border controls. A republican party? #Brexit 
There's a "very strong" case to hold another Brexit referendum, Jack Straw says  
Bollocks to brexit stickers. Flying out. Must be the will of the people....  100% profit to remain on this product 
...Britain may well be from Brexit uncertainty. However, yes, you morons who go "haha! U sold stocks when Trump elected!" I shifted.... 
orange and banana featured in the 2005 Wako draft referendum.  
Apparently some people voted for brexit "because they have nothing to lose". They really don't know what is coming. 
Brexit destroying the Tories. Lost reputation for sound economics, lost majority, and publicly tearing themselves apart. Was it worth it? 
Anti-Brexit protesters at Monument say people have 'changed their minds' on leaving the EU 
People say it couldn't happen here, but hate is a virulent disease. It did happen here. Never forget....#Brexit has opened a pandoras box.  
A reminder that Jacob Rees-Mogg says he'll flee Britain if Brexit is reversed - . Yet another upside to stopping it. 
#Brexit: Denmark tells EU nationals in UK to relocate to Scandinavia to help deal with labour shortage.  
Very irritating and extraordinarily unhelpful to have within our midst a fifth column actively undermining the intention of Brexit, clearly expressed by the people at our referendum vote in June 2016. I'm WATCHING the Conservatives to determine how they'll deal with this threat. 
Dear Super @albawhitewolf Thanks for your fantastic work in the campaign to #StopBrexit .Vital if a referendum on the final deal/no deal.  
Just watching this week's Panorama on the hate explosion from the #Brexit vote. It's truly shocking. I don't know my country anymore... 
How Theresa May is being ‘shepherded’ to a HARD BREXIT by a multibillionaire Dubai-based New Zealand fund manager: 
'We can go INSTANTLY' British diesel-importer DESTROYS politicians Brexit delay 'NONSENSE'  
Gerard Pique being booed and whistled by Atletico fans for saying there should be a referendum in Catalonia. That's it. 
As Sam Neill recently posted, "BREXIT, simplified".  
London Regional Rally today. Who knew stopping brexit could be such fun?! #StopBrexit #12RegionalRallies @No10Vigil 
A hard Brexit would cost about £11,500 per British worker by 2030, bank says  
A record number of Britons are regretting Brexit, poll shows  
Please read this thread! Vital for UK future. Brexit means Brexit not PESCO!  
My interview with @BBCHARDtalk on developments following Kurdistan's referendum - and a way forward.  
.Brexit = Independent Scotland?"Support for independence could surge in the event of a no-deal or hard Brexit". 
The North voted against #Brexit. Solution is special status for the North to remain in EU . #FFArdFeis17 vote for fantasy border controls. 
#Brexit gallows humour alive and kicking... via @Shareaholic 
"For the many, not the few" is fast becoming the next "Brexit means Brexit". Utterly meaningless in a Brexit context.  
No-deal Brexit ‘to trigger a new vote on Union’, says Scotland’s leading EU expert  
Rum from Barbados, wine from New Zealand, bananas from Grenada, oranges from South Africa, timber products from Canada, investment from Australia and Singapore, vegetables from Kenya, gold from Ghana, tea from Sri Lanka, an open market to India... What's NOT to like about Brexit? 
Micheal Martin: Brexit makes hard Irish border 'inevitable'  
The idea this private school educated former financier is not part of the elite is one of the biggest #Brexit lies  
Mr @JunckerEU student-friendly explanation of #brexit bill: you are all in a bar ordering 28 beers & suddenly one leaves without paying 
Anti-Brexit campaigners can draw inspiration from this -  #StopBrexit 
This article in the non existent academic brain drain caused by Brexit is hilarious   
“Poll finds public support for Brexit has hit a new low”47% say it is a bad idea, only 42% still supporting leave 
High proportion of things going badly wrong in Britain today have Nigel Lawson as cheerleader or originator - in case of Brexit, both  
Face of Brexit homegrown: Farage, Rees-Mogg, Johnson, Fox. But its real puppeteers are global money bosses & tax exiles like Legatum hedgie 
Hundreds turn out for Cambridge anti-Brexit rally #StopBrexit #12RegionalRallies 
Does the #FFArdFeis17 vote against #RepealThe8th mean that if FF win an election before a referendum there'll be no referendum? Ah lads? 
Matt has a way Britain can sort the Brexit bill...  
A bank has made a devastating prediction about what a ‘no deal’ Brexit will do to the UK [VIDEO]  
The only thing worth noting about the Brexit impact study is that if it were anything approaching good news - they'd leak it or publish it. 
Legatum, The Cobden Centre, The European Research Group, the engine room of the Brexit coup; Ukip & Leave.EU were the bilge.  
Yes, voters misled during EU referendum by “the most deceitful and mendacious campaign in British political history”  
Theresa May failing to inform public of 'very serious' threat of no deal Brexit  
Switzerland to hold burka ban referendum after 100,000 demand vote  
EU would like to damage UK economically as punishment for Brexit. This is not the act of friend.  
Good luck!! This is why we’re taking David Davis to court over Brexit  #SmartNews 
The EU has *published* its assessment of what Brexit means. DExEU says it would harm the national interest even to *admit we've done one*.  
"It's not Brexit, it's Wrexit"#StopBrexit #RallyForEurope #Cambridge 
The Tories & Brexit are both transparent failures @jeremycorbyn. Demand release of Brexit studies to #StopBrexit 
London Regional Rally today. Who knew stopping brexit could be such fun?! #StopBrexit #12RegionalRallies @No10Vigil 
Scotland isn't allowed to know the potential impact of Brexit - might upset people - this is unbelievable from any Government.  
With Pete North in pub in Bristol- what now with Brexit?  
#Brexit will make BMW's Oxford plant unviable for exports, so it's looking at China as a production centre.#Remain 
Voters beginning to work out that Govt will fail on Brexit. When will Government get real about lack of destination & inability to negotiate  
Standing up for the rights of all our European friends, family & neighbours whose lives are in Brexit turmoil #StopBrexit #12RegionalRallies 
The most intense pressure from Brexit may be on the agency enforcing immigration and customs controls  
This is bad news. The PM tried to to play down potential job loses as a result of Brexit when I raised it. We need an #exitfrombrexit 
This is purest BS. The EU know what the impact of no deal Brexit will be. The only people being kept in the dark are UK voters.  
Tories trashing Brexit.Trashing the economy.Eroding workers rights.Trashing workers pay. Destroying NHS & Education.Why vote Tory?  
"Brexit mucks you up" in Nottingham with faux Boris #12RegionalRalies #stopBrexit 
Hillary Clinton: Brexit vote was precursor to US election defeat  
It's hard for me to say but please help me on this. #Refugees #DonaldTrump #Brexit  
BMW will build e-minis in China because "Brexit will also make the [Oxford] plant unviable for exports".  
Milano has many strong points in support of its candidacy to host EMA in its post-Brexit transition #EMA2Milano 
EU officials in Soviet-style 'disinformation campaign' to damage Brexit, Tory MPs claim 
It's committed Remainer Sir Jeremy Heywood who's really in charge of Brexit, says @toryboypierce 
During #Brexit debate I & other Economists4Remain predicted stagflation would be result of Leave vote. Gove said “tired of experts.” Now...  
#Cambridge student speaking against #Brexit at #12RegionalRallies. I'm here because of the contribution #EU people make to the #NHS. 
If EU immigrants work Brexiters say they are stealing jobs.If they don't they say they are scrounging.The logic of bigotry.#Brexit 
She is, our Anne has ambition, not just for Brexit, but to work with others to collapse the whole rotten system!  
Strong x-party speeches at EU rally in Edinburgh today w @joannaccherry calling for immediate release of #Brexit impact on #Scotland reports 
What patriot would flee his country if things don't go his way! Like Farage, Rees-Mogg is no patriot!#Brexit frauds 
Lots of the people who defend the OBFA were climbing over each other to applaud Barcelona's stance on the Catalan referendum. Hypocrisy? 
Secret Brexit report being withheld to prevent 'reactionary assumptions'  or in other words would prove independence is best economic option 
In context: a "no deal" Brexit could cost the state more than the schools, policing, fire service and counter-terrorism budgets combined.  
In 60 seconds: Jeremy Corbyn warns Britain could be on the verge of an "economic disaster" if Tory infighting over Brexit continues  
Clearest sign yet public opinion turning against Brexit now reality becomes clear and Leave claims fall apart  
Sold Out in Hamburg tonight @mojo_club for the first night of the Euro tour. On stage at 9pm. Fuck Brexit  
With @DavidMundellDCT being on the UK’s Board of Trade, he would also no doubt be privy to the analysis on impact of Brexit on Scotland. 
Brexit project is directing Britain towards immeasurable problems, time also for Labour to recognise this reality.  
The assist for that goal was so Hard Brexit it just told Michail Antonio to go back to where he came from 
If @RuthDavidsonMSP’s self-proclaimed clout is to be believed, she would no doubt be privy to the analysis on impact of Brexit on Scotland. 
"We'll negotiate loads of great trade deals after Brexit" - country that got outsmarted by a bus 
Hillary Clinton: Brexit vote was precursor to US election defeat  
3 out of 4 panelists on @SkyNews discussion show 'The Pledge' arguing #Brexit should be scrapped by MPs or put to a second referendum. Wow. 
Bristol Remain Rally - Brexit is not the will of the people. It's the will of billionaires + the far right + the DM which repeated the lies  
Do ask any Momentum delegates from your CLP why they voted against Brexit motions in conference priority ballot. CLPs need to discuss this. 
#stopbrexit #12RegionalRallies Conservative Libdem Labour  all against Brexit  
New anti-Brexit party hopes to capture UK politics centre ground  
#StopBrexit London rally @maryhoneyball making the case that there is no upside to #Brexit We are not taking back control We have a duty to stop this! @euromove @Euromove_poplar 
Brexit blamed for 260 job losses as UK food supplier Southern Salads collapses into administration #StopBrexit 
So Jezza says that a no-deal Brexit would cause great economic damage to the UK. And he as PM wouldn't I s'pose! Dear Pot, yours Kettle! 
.Another searing but true assessment of Brexit Britain from @IrishTimes 
The human side of the #Brexit story #inlimbo, denied a vote in a country we call home, more than 15 months of uncertainty #StopBrexit 
Rees-Mogg: Brexit is ‘Agincourt, Crecy. We win all of these things.’ We lost the 100 Years’ War and became a second-rate European power. 
How Brexit could be stopped – a step-by-step guide. My Sunday article for @IndyVoices 
#thinkagain #StopBrexit Edinburgh. This Constituency, this City, this Country did not vote for Brexit.  
Nicola Sturgeon: Despite Brexit, Scotland will remain open, internationalist and outward looking 
Tory Remainers should be wary of doing Michel Barnier's dirty work for him by fighting Brexit, warns @asabenn 
BREXIT: We blame our opposition for our own failures because our readers don’t want news from the real world.  
It's time for @DavidDavisMP to come clean & publish the analysis of the impact of #Brexit on #Scotland. 
EU officials in Soviet-style 'disinformation campaign' to damage Brexit, Tory MPs claim  #premium 
EU officials are engaged in a Soviet-style disinformation campaign designed to damage public support for Brexit  
Hillary Clinton against Brexit proves absolutely and conclusively that we're on the right track.  
My cartoon Saturday@TheTimes. Nature Notes: Toucan't #Brexit #DavidDavis #MichelBarnier 
Hillary Clinton is part of the global elite that want to overturn Brexit. We will resist. 
Brexit is about imposing hardships on majority to benefit small minority. In short,its supporters who aren't stupid are shameless charlatans 
This readers letter in the Telegraph is excellent. It clarifies Brexit negotiations in a clear and sensible way, better than any politician.  
Britain's top civil servant is a die-hard Remainer with close links to the Europhile elite  #Brexit 
Brilliant. Govt being held to account by the Law. We need far more of this. #Brexit  
17m voted Leave coz the political class had stopped listening to them. Those agitating for a 2nd referendum are helpfully proving that point 
Switzerland to Hold Referendum on Nationwide Burqa Ban - Breitbart  via @BreitbartNews 
Southern Yemen leader sees independence referendum soon  
A record number of Britons are regretting Brexit  
Post-Brexit we will have to trade goods to standards set by EU but have no influence in the setting of them. #LosingControl #BrexitShambles 
Ruth Davidson, Mundell, ScotTories MPs almost certainly privy to Brexit analysis and destructive impact on Scotland. Where is media on this?  
Rejecting Brexit has fuck all to do with "the warm glow of self-righteousness" and EVERYTHING to with trying to SAVE THE BLOODY COUNTRY.  
David De Gea could have prevented Brexit using only his feet. 
"I'd would be becoming if some European statesmen now insulting threatening and insulting us could occasionally remember 1940" #Brexit  
The UK economy is about to tank over Brexit and Liam Fox wants to give the Queen a luxury yacht  
You can’t put jobs & economy first if you support Brexit.  
BMW's discussions about making the Mini in China show Brexit pressures are building  
‘The forecast growth in China would exceed the Mini’s plant in Oxford, #Brexit will also make the UK plant unviable for exports’  
It is already too late for a no-deal Brexit  
Why aren't people more angry about the devastating impact #Brexit will have on the NHS? 
Yes, the appalling attitude in Brussels towards Britain leaving the EU has exposed the true nature of the #EU bullies so that leaving is now inevitable and reversing #Brexit impossible.  
"Freedom has no price" I was told by a leaver who couldn't name a single freedom they would benefit from post-Brexit. #BrexitShambles 
EU boss Jean-Claude Juncker sparks fury by thanking Britain for WW2 but demanding huge Brexit divorce bill anyway  
This is why we’re taking David Davis to court over Brexit | @MollyMEP 
This is why Murdoch, Dacre et al used their positions to push Brexit.We must #StopBrexit for the sake of our country & esp to #SaveTheNHS 
PM, Home Sec, Chancellor, Sec of State all believe Brexit will be bad for UK. Why this path? Certainly not in national interest! #StopBrexit 
Brits who fight Brexit are the real patriots.  @plegrain  
I originally thought it unlikely we could stop #Brexit, then I thought it was 50/50, now I’m more & more convinced we will end this lunacy! 
ANY version of Brexit will hurt the economy Mr Corbyn.Give the PEOPLE the tools to stop it. Please! 
Theresa May failing to inform public of 'very serious' threat of no deal Brexit  
The Tories' chaotic version of Brexit would turn our country into a deregulated tax haven. Labour will put jobs & our economy first #Coop100 
Jean-Claude Juncker is not only spiteful in his attitude towards Brexit he also just makes frankly bizarre comments 
Things that have declined most in popularity in 2017:: #Brexit: #DonaldTrump 
EU is a machinery designed to excel in negs like Brexit. I'm afraid UK doesn't know jaws are closing w scoping 1/2  
The most cynical part of the right wing has had the plan for a #Brexit tax haven for many years, but of course they can't shout that out. 
"Will Scotland be shafted by Brexit? Will it be fine? I might know. I might not. I won't even tell you if I know."  
British people were denied a referendum on Maastricht, Nice & Lisbon treaties. Major, Blair, Brown & Cameron should all be held to account for treason.#Brexit 
Brexit Impact Assessments need releasing now.UK needs to know what Brexit will do to industries,communities & economy #ReleaseTheReports 
As some1 who voted Tory most of his life until EUref, for me it's no contest. The country comes first, & Brexit & Tories can go to hell. 
Remember the Good Old Days? When Davis was a champion of transparency? Before he joined the Brexit Stasi?  
This is absurd. They won't tell anyone what the effects of Brexit will be, but  are demanding we support them?? 
DExEU says that even acknowledging there is a study showing the effects of Brexit on Yorkshire would prejudice the national interest!  
We are outside Woolwich Arsenal DLR station today until 1pm talking to people about the impact of Brexit on the NHS. @euromove #Rally4Europe 
Finally, a defence of the most defamed person in all this Brexit malarkey  
.@JGForsyth tells May lock up cabinet in Chequers until they agree Brexit position. Suspect one of them would use lead piping in the library 
."The bar on “sufficient progress” in the Irish strand of the Brexit talks has NOT been crossed.". 
Majority would now vote Remain. Everyone agrees May is incompetent. We need to have that 2nd Referendum  
Brexit means a brighter future with more jobs, trade, and funding for health, education and social care | Tim Clark  
Pete is correct on this. Society, physical, and economic security are fragile. Brexit risks these things.  
A record number of Britons are regretting Brexit, poll shows  
Remember the dire warning of Remainers? Immediate recession- wrong. Rising unemployment- wrong. Pack of lies #Brexit  
Brexit was simply the result of a Tory power struggle.African saying: When elephants fight, it's the grass that suffers.We're all trampled 
friends basically see Brexit as a direct result of Boris Johnson & Cameron's continuing school-based psychodrama. (They mostly hate BJ.) 2/2 
RELEASE THE BREXIT IMPACT STUDIES SO BOTH CITIZENS AND POLITICIANS CAN BE INFORMED!Until then it’s pure fantasy! 
How Theresa May is being ‘shepherded’ to a HARD BREXIT by a multi-billionaire Dubai-based New Zealand fund manager:  
The govt is concealing the #Brexit impact reports for one reason alone - to hide the disastrous effects of Brexit from the British people. 
Two Arch Remainers meet for lunch so they can discuss how to derail Brexit. 
Is anyone else fed up with the inept management of the Brexit process by May? Why don’t we JUST LEAVE?  
The EU do not seek a "negotiation" with the UK over #Brexit. They seek a humiliating extortion and our gutless lot are playing along with it 
'We owe you NO money' Tory Brexiteer @johnredwood snaps at Juncker & tells UK to stand 'firm' in Brexit talks  
Little known fact: Tories explicitly said referendum was advisory  
Part of the post Brexit planning ministers ought to be doing is for huge expansion of NHS when the £350m a week becomes available 
Once you speak of the "Will of the People" you portray political opponents as either enemies of the people, or as outside the people#Brexit 
This is Deal or No Deal, Tory style. The prize is a cliff-edge Brexit | Marina Hyde  
While Hollywood stars lectured us on climate change, refugees, Brexit and everything else we now know the main man was a sexual predator. 
Brexit Secretary David Davis won't say whether a study of the impact on Scotland, Wales and Northern Ireland even exists. #BrexitShambles 
Foodbanks wages going backwards NHS Crisis as Tories plan £100M Golden Royal Brexit Yacht to fight EU “Enemy”  
If no-deal Brexit happens you’ll find very few people admitting to having voted Brexit in five years time. Such will be the backlash. 
Start your weekend in a healthy #Brexit fury with the new #Remainiacs podcast with @IanDunt & guest @sturdyAlex 
Will you overturn the rigged EU referendum that left millions unable to vote? No? I thought not.  
A “No Deal” Brexit is looking ever more likely and more attractive  
Macron and Merkel face rebellion from countries fed up with them blocking Brexit, MEP says  
Thread in which a Brexiter wishes remain had won, because he hates remainers pointing out that Brexit is going badly.  
If you fancy a bit of chat about Brexit, socialism & democracy, this is worth a listen. Me being interviewed by @StevenEdginton for YouTube 
BOMBSHELL Report!Veselnitskaya, Goldstone & Agalarova Traveled from NYC to UK For Brexit Then Back to NYC! 
Remain had its Dunkirk moment when art50 was triggered. But in true British spirit, we've endured. As brexit fails, I'm again a proud Brit X 
According to a former aide to David Davis, @Number10gov analysis shows Scotland will be worst hit by Brexit.  
No-deal Brexit  - terrible idea - #stopbrexit- get out today & protest #12RegionalRallies around the country 
There is no such thing as a jobs first Brexit. Brexit doesn’t work for the many. You know that, I’m sure. Still you spin these lies.  
Despite legal challenge, #DavidDavis keeps #Brexit impact studies secret. What dire consequences is he hiding? 
After centuries of fighting for independence it’s sad that the details of the post #brexit border is dictated by a foreign empire#Irexit 
Today's #StopBrexit Regional Rallies Let's keep the campaign rolling!#Brexit #Remain 
The government can't dupe the EU about the impact of #Brexit on the UK, but it can hide the truth from the British people.#StopBrexit 
Do you not think there’s something a bit odd about Brexit advocates threatening to leave and become immigrants elsewhere if it’s reversed? 
Labour flags up Brexit poll suggesting public regrets decision  
Rob thinks that by comically exaggerating the very real dangers of Brexit he can negate them. Don't be Rob.  
Brexit threatens the port of Dover with massive traffic jams  
Macron and Merkel face rebellion from countries fed up with them blocking Brexit, MEP says  
To repeat: Britain is not a racist nor a fascist country. We demonstrate this to the world by stopping "brexit", and doing so right now 
Brexit the Movie: “Very disturbing” – Michel Barnier, European Commission. “You’ll never take back control again” -   
'We owe you NO money' Redwood snaps at Juncker & tells UK to stand 'firm' in Brexit talks  
Philip Hammond and George Osborne 'plotting to sabotage Brexit' over a lobster dinner  
Philip Hammond already regretting referring to EU as “the enemy” in Brexit negotiations causing major divisions with Europe! #BrexitShambles 
Brexit does not have the support of the public anymore and it will be damaging to the economy. Stop this disgraceful coup now! #StopBrexit 
Support for Brexit at all-time low. Damage expected to NHS, economy and global standing.  
My bit on the Tories' week in Brexit  
Does he worry about Brexit? Refuse to chase sticks? Welcome to the first generation of snowflake dogs (FREE): 
Brexit will destroy Tory party chances of ever winning again, former chief of staff to Brexit Secretary warns  
Post-2010 recession is only recession in UK history without proper recovery. Yet country willing to apply massive economic shock of #brexit 
Whatever way you look at it £8.5bn between 27 is small beer compared to the £120bn we borrowed in 1 month to pay for Brexit.  #BrexitRef2 
No-deal Brexit ‘to trigger a new vote on Union’ 
119k signatures! Commons debate approaching! Lets keep the final deal referendum petition rolling! #Brexit 
Brexit: Do we suppose Lord (“no cliff”) Lawson can still read stuff like this in his French country cottage ? It’s from Murdoch’s Times  
The biggest obstacle to Brexit is not the EU but the Quisling MPs in our government.  
Philip Hammond and George Osborne schemed against Brexit over lobster. Both obnoxious, odious toads!  
@johnredwood Most people now support remain.69% of Brexit leave voters are not that bothered anyway. pic.twitter.com/xaYl8B6J1l 
The EU just warned us Brexit talks were deadlocked. So Brexiteers are trying to commission a special boat  
Reasonable, democratic British people have given Brexiteers a chance. They blew it. Opinion now turning agin Brexit 
In years to come, whole University faculties will be devoted to the study of @realDonaldTrump and the absurd Brexit era of UK history. 
Juncker has insisted the UK will "have to pay" if Brexit negotiations are to move forward. Are we being held hostage by the EU?  
Leave Director admitted the Brexit referendum was won by lying to the public.  
Thatcherite economist Minford argues #Brexit is good for the poor; I beg to differ. This is why #Lexit Corbynistas are tragically wrong on Brexit  
No-deal Brexit: it's already too late  
Brexit is not about Britain's "independence." It is about re-unifying the UK. It's about bringing Scotland to heel. 
UK refuses to confirm or deny existence of report which shows devastating impact of Brexit on Scotland  
PLEASE SIGN - Petition: No referendum on the final deal for the UK to remain in the European Union.  
New anti-Brexit party hopes to capture UK politics centre ground  
And by the way, David Cameron needs to come out of hiding and say - loud and clear - what a bloody balls up he made of Brexit referendum  
Hate crimes spike after Brexit #1yrago  
Yep. Blaming Brexit (and Trump) on the "uneducated masses" ignores that the elites are the ones responsible for them.  
Brexit: the war on words - torture of the English language ...  #Brexit.  
There is absolute zero chance of me supporting Brexit. I am pro Eu. I am British. I am European. I would be a proud citizen of US of Europe  
Nice summary of our UK politicians stance on Brexit in the FT - what a mess....  
This Brexit thing is going swimmingly  
7. OKIKE (God) will only bless Nigeria as one if all nations in it agree to be one.#referendum #justice#FreeBiafra@Europarl_EN @UN 
Brexit and its implications for the UK financial services industry  
Forget Brexit for a mo. Sooth the soul with 04:45 of about the best damn Blues guitar playing the world'll ever hear  
Conservative MPs are providing the only effective opposition to #brexit  via @FT 
#RenameBrexit #StopBrexit German Bourse bigwig thinks Brexit will fail 
EU leaders refuse to open Brexit transition talks at this month’s summit  via @FT 
Heart fucking bleeds for leavers "oh, it's all going a bit shit after all "Talk to an EU migrant about the real Brexit you helped bring.  
Support for Brexit is falling,Trump's approval rate is the lowest in history. Populism losing ground to sanity.  
As a British EU negotiator, I can tell you that Brexit is going to be far worse than anyone could have guessed  
Strangest part of #Brexit is how many lunatics would usher in chaos for the UK rather than saying "actually we got this a bit wrong"  
Guardian front page, Saturday 14 October 2017: Brexit row breaks into war of words  
Brexit is failing because it's being negotiated in the interests of the Conservative Party  
Brexiteers threatening to leave UK when Brexit is reversed...even more reason to then. 
Great tool to see if your MP has asked for the Brexit impact studies to be released.If not, ask why not, here  
42%. In a country where most newspapers can't report the truth about the negotiations & the real impact of Brexit hasn't arrived yet.  
Essentially the case for #Brexit still unfortunately appears to be limited to "you lost, get over it"  
How many of the probably 60,000+ Leave voters stranded abroad bc of the collapse of Monarch Airlines due to Brexit would vote Leave again? 
#ALSEN could be seen as a referendum because of #Impeach45’s handy work today. Good thing we got something for that! #TheBeat #DigDoug 
Just under £53k in just over 24 hoursGovt need publish secret Brexit impact studies, no secrets in a democracy.  
UPDATE: More campaigns added re Gov's #Brexit impact studies and EU citizenship. Sign up people! #StopBrexit 
Here is what negotiating from a position of weakness looks like. #ToriesOut #Brexit  
I imagine her defence of Brexit will be as compelling as the one she offered for charging benefit claimants 55p/minute for helpline calls  
'if PM lacks power & auth to negotiate Brexit with her own ministers, what possible chance of her reaching any kind of entente with #EU27?' 
Should #Remainers apologise for blaming hate crime on #Brexit? @IainDale discusses with @Emmabarnett on #AftertheNews 
By this time next year Brexit will be Brextinct 
Brexit is dying right before everyone's eyes.Meanwhile, the gammon-faced white men who wanted it are dying too.Everything to play for. 
Just three words, but three words full of hope and anticipation. Brexit will fail. #StopBrexit 
This says much about today’s rights-based campaigning organisations: Justice organised a “Brexit debate” with 5 Remainers.  
Team Sinn Fein in Brussels this week fighting to protect us from the lunacy of brexit  
Hey EnglandHow's your Brexit going?Have you got a Bus ready for this one?  
Things are getting desperate.@YouGov shows move towards #Remain.This #Brexit thing ain't working.#BritCommonSense 
Nothing to do with Brexit at all, of course.....  
Leave has already lost 10%. And the real pain hasnt even started yet!☞ Support for Brexit has hit a new low  
Assange's law states, "If he (and his boss Vladimir) are for it, then it's really really really bad (#Calexit & @DrJillStein & #Brexit)."  
Klopp on Coutinho: “I read a lot about Barcelona in the last few days but it was all about the referendum. Nothing about football." 
Oh, what is the point tweeting about Brexit?Anyone with a mind knows how it is going, without commentary.And the mindless don't care. 
EU president Juncker says Brexit will take much longer than initially thought  
UK's Nat Health Service, already under budget squeeze, experiencing severe doctor shortage as record number of EU nationals leave bc Brexit  
There will be no domino effect @JunckerEU - except perhaps in Scotland (during whose referendum no mention was made of other EU regions).  
Brussels is not my enemy, France is not my enemy, Germany is not my enemy, Poland is not my enemy, the EU27 is not my enemy.... Brexit is...  
.@PMBarzani has a point. Whatever the wisdom & timing of the recent Kirdish referendum, one thing Iraq does not need is another war.  
How Theresa May is being ‘shepherded’ to a hard Brexit by a multibillionaire Dubai-based New Zealand fund manager:  
 TONIGHT’S POLL!  What should we rename Brexit to make it more appealing? Tweet us using the hashtag #renamebrexit 
Brexit now appears to be, and is being articulated as, pure damage limitation. WHY is UKGov pressing ahead regardless? #StopBrexit 
Trade minister admits Brexit ‘doom-mongers’ like himself were wrong 
Brexit: A big step back in a fast-paced world puts us behind the front-runners for a long, long time. 
You’ve got to hand it to @JunckerEU. He’s been the greatest asset to the Leave cause from day 1. He’s why 75% now want Brexit achieved. 
This is Deal or No Deal, Tory style. The prize is a cliff-edge Brexit | Marina Hyde  
Steve Baker has been given responsibility for #Brexit “contingency planning”. Baker is a true believer.  
The Brexiters are desperate. Backed into a corner with absurdity of Brexit they lash out. These are the last acts of Leave. #StopBrexit 
The Myth of Benefit Tourism: #LeaveLies #StopBrexit #Brexit  
Its not everyday you get a retweet from an Undertone! Thanks @MickeyUndertone - let’s Teenage Kick Brexit into the long grass! #StopBrexit 
He sold Kurds for his own destiny, postponing Referendum would have mean to hold Elections in #KRG....#KDP did it again.  
If you support Brexit, these morons are your allies. Let that sink in.  
Hard Brexit2 Hard 2 BrexitHard and Brexit: London DriftThe Hard and the BrexitHard 5Hard & Brexit 6Brexit 7The Hardest of the Brexit 
Absolutely! The UKIP electoral threat brought the Referendum, and its revival will bring Brexit. 
Who's to blame for Brexit deadlock?, via @CapX.Clue: not us.UK has spelt out clear vision, but EU is foot-dragging 
And Scottish part of the poll had a 72% negative, 12% positive view of Brexit. We're not even onto the tough part of negotiations yet.  
Much of the support for #Brexit is not directly linked to economics, and is clearly driven by deep and powerful emotions /2 
‘Fire Hammond for Trying to Sabotage Brexit,’ Demands Senior Tory  
Increasing evidence that #Brexit bubble has burst - not that it ever inflated in Scotland....    
Whatever one's stance on Brexit, one must surely wonder what the fuck the 21% who think it's going well are smoking.  
Dear BrexitersIf you have 5 mins in-between banging on about fishing and blue passports, give this watch. Your Brexit jeopardises so much.  
This Tillerson offer to Barzani 48 hours before referendum was too good to reject  
.Australian politicians say "trade deals with IE or EU 'higher on everyone’s agenda' since Brexit"Empire 0.0. 
Bad ideas can be pursued with professionalism and civility. Brexit is a bad idea done badly. 
Yes, it was just a slip of the tongue, but that's what Brexit does:It's turned the EU into our economic competitors. 
Desperation personified: Brexit may not happen as 'older generation' of Leave voters are dying, says Richard Branson  
Brexit opponents say they'll sue Britain's government if it fails to release secret reports  
Welsh Sec visited a firm he said could benefit from #Brexit but its co-founder said leaving the EU is a "bad move"  
Brexit is the saddest point in a lifetime.The EU is my home, the UK is my home, we are all inextricably linked and so much better together  
It becomes clearer day by day that the Tories are not fit to negotiate Brexit & in fact are actively looking for a no deal. #NoConfidence 
119k signatures! The Commons debate approaching! Lets keep the final deal referendum petition rolling! #Brexit 
Same old guff on why govt refuses to release #Brexit impact studies. This time it's Scotland. #50SecretStudies 
David Davis refuses to reveal if regional Brexit study exists  
."% of British voters who come to realize Brexit represents a REAL THREAT to their jobs & incomes can only grow" 
Australia can be an example for Britain post-Brexit, says High Commissioner  via @CPSthinktank 
"The UK, post Brexit, will be more globally engaged and focused on addressing the great global challenges than ever before"-  Priti Patel.  
Brexit Elite can’t deliver what they promised. They have no mandate for what they are doing. Time for #BrexitRef2 
“The government is turning lives upside down by callously playing hardball over Brexit" says @CarolineLucas 
So, the tories are unleashing their Brexit attack poodle. Clueless. Absolutely clueless. #PhilipHammond #NoConfidence 
Starmer Admits Public Clueless as to Labour’s Brexit Policy  
Secret Brexit studies must be released   
Austerity destroyed lives,Brexit will make it look like a picnic but it’s politically inexpedient to oppose it.  Our ideology comes first. 
If May was really serious about Brexit, she would have sacked Hammond and Rudd long ago! 
If you don’t oppose Brexit & call for a 2nd referendum, you must think the ensuing chaos is a price worth paying to get into power. 
To all Peasants out there When a Government give you a Referendum Please would you do as your told And Give them the answer they wanted 
spent today with group of diplomats on Brexit/ Irish question. Outcome: it's like Jerusalem or Brussel Vilvoorde. It just can't be solved. 
I am ashamed of what this government is doing. We need to stop Brexit. The EU is not an enemy, the Tory government is though. 
Labour flags up Brexit poll suggesting public regrets decision  
Switzerland to Hold Referendum on Nationwide Burqa Ban  
Buyer’s remorse among leave voters, as YouGov poll says UK regrets EU Referendum decision!  
Prepare for a no-deal Brexit, say people whose only job is to make a deal on Brexit #NoConfidence 
Blogged: No-deal Brexit: it's already too late  
The Govt must publish all info it holds on the damage #Brexit will cause the UK  
Philip Hammond has apologised for his choice of words, but was he right that the EU is now the UK's 'enemy' when it comes to Brexit talks?  
Brexidiots' Brexit is slipping away from them... 18 months to go!       
Even the Express seems to think Davis should release the secret Brexit papers!  
#BforBrexitComic Number 1.  #Brexit #BrexitReality #BrexitShambles @Pabloite @pauloCanning @bobfrombrockley @EmporersNewC @DavidHughesEU @AvaSantina @Big_Headers @GlasgowAlbum @ComiskeyNathan @EagerElephant @andrewtipler 
My bit on the week in Tory Brexit  
With people looking at the financial aspects of Brexit? I say they're selfish.Money means nothing compared to sovereignty, sorry. 
I paid a lot of money for a book but the bookseller won't let me read it. Outrageous eh? I want to know what's in the 50 Brexit assessments. 
Not outraged about the Tories’ £100m ‘Royal Brexit Yacht’?Lk harderGREAT POST by @EvolvePolitics via 
 “Poll finds public support for Brexit has hit a new low” 
"Morally, the Irish premier would be justified in doing everything in his power to block, delay & veto Brexit" 
Today the Chancellor @PhilipHammondUK called the EU our "Enemy".Rhetoric, confusion & verbal attacks will not get UK a good Brexit deal.  
"We really have to have a final deal" in Brexit talks, RBS Chairman Howard Davies says  
Welsh Secretary @AlunCairns visited a firm he said could benefit from #Brexit......but its co-founder said leaving the EU is a "bad move"  
Switzerland to hold referendum on banning burqas - govt  
I'm speaking in Nottingham on behalf of Labour Against Brexit @Labour4EU - join us! #stopbrexit 
I respect your opinionMine is #referendum Let the people decide if they want to restructure or exit Nigeria#BiafraReferendum #Biafra 
No nation can destabilise a union with strong foundation built on justice.#Brexit didn't destabilise #EUNigeria has faulty foundation. 
Strange that MEPs griping about Brexit bill haven't offered to forgo their parachute payments when they leave in 2019. 
Hammond says he regrets calling EU negotiators 'the enemy' - He should, but reflects the #Brexit mindset  
What amazes me is that the pro Brexit vote hasn't collapsed further given the unfolding disaster that is post referendum Britain.  
When the SNP told us that the referendum was a joyous occasion, they lied.Please take a couple of minutes to read. 
Thanks @FifeMigrants for important but harrowing accounts of human cost of Brexit. Scotland is your home. Please stay.   
.@vickyford MP accused me of seeking a cliff edge Brexit for my "own political gain". If so, why would I write this?  
Philip Hammond arrives for Brexit talks with his EU counterparts.  
The £350m #NHS bus was a ruthlessly cynical attempt to distract from the real goal of the #Brexit right to dismantle the #NHS. 
Jean-Claude Juncker has insisted the UK will "have to pay" if Brexit negotiations are to progress to trade talks  
Liam Fox says there’ll be loads of trade deals waiting for us post-Brexit. Also said UK-EU deal would be ‘one of easiest in history’ Expert? 
Problem is Hammond's surrounded by inadequates who won't ever get to lead us into Second World War and so promote Brexit as next best thing  
.@PhilipHammondUK Shame on you. Calling Brussels "enemy” in order to settle Tory  infighting - Brexit in a nutshell  
.@Telegraph cartoon - I think I got away with it...#juncker #Brexit  
YouGov polling shows clear majority now think decision to leave EU was wrong.We need to have a ratification referendum.#Brexit  
What Kazuo Ishiguro knows about Brexit 
in case she thought she got away with it- Theresa May said she doesn’t think having no Brexit plan costly mistake  
City could benefit from Brexit says @DrGerardLyons 
Great @euromove petition: the Govt has conducted over 50 Brexit Impact Studies - it's time they made them public  
50 #Brexit docs are being kept secret. £42,000 has been raised in a matter of hours to force Gov to hand them over.  
Philip Hammond's foolish remarks calling the EU "the enemy" will not unblock Brexit negotiations - @Peter_Dowd 
latest observation from Jean-Claude Juncker on Brexit. 'Thanks for the war... but now you have to pay up' I presume it was after lunch 
Hammond having to apologise for being too jingoistic re Brexit about 8hrs after being accused of being too wet re Brexit is *mad* 
Er - but a minority only voted to go in (43%) in 75. Referendum in 2016 became a legal following vote in you know that building in London  
Organizers in Catalonia used unconventional tactics to organize a referendum in the face of a heavy crackdown.  
Pro-EU group in legal threat over Govt's 'secret' Brexit studies  
Brexit is becoming a battle for Britain's political soul. My latest blog just up:  
.@NicolaSturgeon answers questions at #arcticcircle2017 - inc Scotland's role in arctic region, & effects of #Brexit  
Switzerland announces referendum on whether to ban the burka  
Poll: Was Britain right or wrong to vote for Brexit?August 2016Yes 46%No 42%October 2017Yes 42%No 47% pic.twitter.com/yT9Z4UbH02 
At least 17,000 Britons sought the citizenship of another EU member state in the year after the Brexit vote  
Exports are booming, but Brexit's looming.  
So the same people who told us we had to say exactly what an indy Scotland would look like now refuse to show us the impact of Brexit?!  
The UK is largely its own enemy in the Brexit talks.  
Brexit Department refuses to say if it has analysed impact of EU withdrawal on Scotland  
Some of your Brexit-supporting colleagues would see nothing wrong with describing the EU as "the enemy" given the way the talks are going.  
I swear so much that now when I type ‘shot’ my phone tries to autocorrect it to ‘shit’.I blame Brexit. 
Brexit will only benefit the super rich #tory donors. It will help the tories crush middle classes like it crushed working classes in 1980s 
We will work with our friends and partners in the EU on a mutually beneficial Brexit deal #noenemieshere (2/2). 
#StopBrexit It isn't rocket science, you don't need to be @ProfBrianCox to know that Brexit is bad for our health and economic wellbeing.  
This poll shows that #Brexit is not now the will of the people. The public mood has changed, something Remain MPs said they were waiting for  
The smart money is now on Brexit never happening. Obviously the smart people have never been remotely supportive of it. 
"But it was all right, everything was all right, the struggle was finished. He had won the victory over himself. He loved Brexit"  
The Brexit war on Hammond continues  
By the time UK repairs itself those who voted for Brexit will be dead, and the young that didn't will inherit a UK they no longer love. 
Tom Brake: It is clearly in the public interest to know what government experts think Brexit will look like  
Have noted as a proEU MEP only ever get asked to speak to commercial UK TV never BBC with its pro Brexit bias sadly! 
Philip Hammond must be sacked over Brexit ‘sabotage’, says Nigel Lawson  
If you’re not outraged about Tories’ £100m ‘Royal Brexit Yacht’, you’re not looking hard enough  via @EvolvePolitics 
Hi, I’m Clippy! It looks like you’re having trouble negotiating your Brexit. Do you need help leaving the European Union?  
I've now had a response to my FOI asking DExEU for impact analysis of Brexit on Yorkshire. Refuses to "confirm or deny" it holds info 
I see Philip Hammond has given an interview on the Brexit negotiations.  
Those who drove Brexit had been touting it for over a decade, yet had no actual plan for it–kinda like GOP with Obamacare  
I am pleased to learn that @SteveBakerHW has been given responsibility for “contingency planning” on Brexit. A very competent Minister. 
The idea that good socialists should support Brexit is quite possibly the most bonkers idea since giving Liam Fox a job in government 
Civil servants don't need to search their souls, they need political direction beyond the facile vacuity of "Brexit means Brexit".  
It apparently shows that Scotland will be worst hit by Brexit ... and they're not releasing it.  
Chancellor Philip Hammond has referred to Brussels as "the enemy" in Brexit negotiations 
Senior Leavers demand Cabinet summit to decide Brexit end state once and for all. Column for tomorrow's @theipaper: 
The missing element from Tory post-mortem: the damage that even a successful Brexit does to their re-election hopes:  
Exclusive: Chancellor Philip Hammond describes Europeans as ”the enemy” in Brexit talks. More on @skynews 
Trump’s campaign vs ObamaCare is like Brexit : rich or ideological rightwingers cry “Liberty” to rob the poorest   
Delighted to be on @bbcradioulster Inside Politics this evening commenting on current state of play for #Brexit border issues #BeSeenBeHeard 
Philip Hammond calls Europe 'the enemy' in Brexit talks  
Latest poll shows highest negative/least positive public opinion on UK Brexit negotiations is in Scotland: 72% vs 12% via @YouGov  
"They have to pay" - @JunckerEU says the UK's Brexit bill is like paying your share at after work drinks.  
If you’re not outraged about the Tories’ £100m ‘Royal Brexit Yacht’, you’re not looking hard enough 
Breathtaking hypocrisy. Here's @DavidDavisMP, before his department refused to release the secret Brexit studies (). 
On Thursday evening Sinn Féin is holding a conference on Brexit in the Crowne Plaza Hotel Dundalk at 8pm. The crisis around Brexit deepens  
Nerves fray as the #Brexit clock counts down, negotiations stall and the possibility of a no deal scenario grows  
Important #Brexit update: UK Fusion Research chief says leaving #Euratom is "existential threat" to nuclear industry 
The UK should never have let the EU get away with being both judge and jury for Brexit  My piece on the Brexit talks. 
Entertainingly astute on Brexit talks by @SirSocks, but I don't think UK ever "accepted" EU27 staged approach  
Some more evidence of the welcome shift in public's mood against Brexit.  
Can you believe Brexiteers are still peddling the myth that there's been no economic effect since the Brexit vote?  
Philip Hammond says criticism over Brexit comments 'absurd'  
"No Deal" with the EU might well be the best outcome for Britain - but it's vital we start preparing now  #Brexit 
MPs must ensure amendments to Repeal Bill respect the result of the referendum and enable the UK to #TakeBackControl 
Brexit talks in deadlock with the EU and Withdrawal Bill delayed for a week. It's going well isn't it. 
Brexit cannot be done well via Article 50. Two years not enough. Nor by a government pretending complex problems only need easy solutions. 
MPs should not feel obliged to back Brexit, says John Bercow  
Having paid hundreds of ££Billions NET contributions into EU coffers the EU says we owe them MOAR. Don’t pay them a penny more post Brexit! 
Brexit could be done well - but it would take up to a decade and would have to be done incrementally.  45 years cannot be reversed easily. 
Hard #Brexit with no trade deal 'wld cost UK economy £400bn by 2030', says study. “Project fear” was #BrexitReality 
David Davis refuses to reveal if regional Brexit study exists because it might damage the economy 
If this Govt gave a damn about the will of the people, it'd heed petitions like this. Its record is not great on Brexit, but please sign it.  
Either that, or Brexit was a total nonsense built on lies and support for it becomes more brittle with each passing day. But, sure, "coup".  
Excellent comment by @davidallengreen making some sensible points on how Brexit *could* be made to work 
Iraq mobilising forces against #Kurdistan was going to happen with or without holding a referendum. In fact this is why we seek independence 
When #Baghdad Criminalizes Referendum,Rejects Dialogue,Mobilizes Troops & Not Ready For Negotiation; How Can We Be Partners & Live Together? 
Dear Brexit voters, the quickest way to stop Brexit backsliding by Lab and Cons is to give UKIP a five point bounce in the polls #justsaying 
New poll shows Wales ‘not willing to pay’ for Brexit  
Brexit is a cult.You cannot reason with a cult.  
Labour flags up Brexit poll suggesting public regrets decision | Politics | The Guardian  
Breaking: Chancellor describes accusations that he is talking down the economy over Brexit as "bizarre" and "absurd". 
Good news!UK now has the brilliant @SteveBakerHW asMinister for No Brexit Deal is better than a bad deal.  
Instead of strengthening other Exits, #Brexit has weakened them. FN buries "Frexit" #oops 
"A textbook example of failed strategic thinking"  Certainly hard to find anyone who thinks govt is nailing Brexit. 
The report was said to show that Scotland and the northeast of England will lose out most from Brexit  
Brits always pay what we owe but no there shouldn't be a vengeful #brexit bill, and #Juncker must end his threats and filibustering 
Labour flags up Brexit poll which suggests public regret decision  
Obvious if you think, but seldom so clearly articulated. cannot do no deal #Brexit. Not enough by @FlipChartRick  
Voted Brexit & cant stand EU but this stupid & divisive 'enemy of the people' stuff is so depressing. @JuliaHB1 should withdraw & apologise. 
.@mrjamesob pulls apart the Daily Mail's latest Brexit "saboteur" front page in just 90 seconds.  
Don't worry, Ken, most professionals and higher rate tax payers from the EU, like me, are making plans to leave UK. Enjoy Brexit!  
Good, frank discussion w/@michaelgove, UK Sec of State for Environment, Food & Rural Affairs. Talked Brexit & increased US-UK ag trade.  
Those thinking the leave EU vote was wrong take biggest lead yet in YouGov’s Brexit Tracker  via @MSmithsonPB 
Brexit with no deal: unlikely to happen deliberately, but it could do so by accident—May’s weakness slows talks down 
The UK DID NOT vote for a hard Brexit. On a five point scale it voted 'Not sure'!Rabid Tories have no mandate 
Poll finds support for #Brexit has hit a new low  
Today @WorldBank I will say Britain will be more globally engaged post-Brexit that ever before 
Next Thursday myself @GerryAdamsSF & @ImeldaMunster will be talking #Brexit & the future of the EU in Dundalk Co. Louth. Bí ann! (please RT)  
Tomorrow at 2 pm the East will rally against #Brexit in Market Square, Cambridge. Join us!  #StopBrexit 
Is this what you voted Brexit for, seriously is it, less money for NHS and social care, now you have to own it #BrexitTheNHS #BritishDream 
Philip Hammond admits Brexit 'no deal' will mean less money for NHS and social care  
If you believe in Britain you don't threaten to desert it like a petulant child if you don't get your Brexit ice cream. 
Britain must pay EU budget liabilities estimated up to £47 billion to avoid a Brexit cliff edge, Juncker says  
Farage & Rees-Mogg now both promising to leave Britain if Brexit fails. Odd. Remind me - who are the saboteurs and traitors again? 
Sorry Leavers - It's time to recognise the truth – a trade deal with India means concessions on immigration #Brexit 
UK refuses to confirm or deny existence of report which shows devastating impact of Brexit on Scotland #scotref 
Ex-Australian PM @TonyAbbottMHR tells @UnHerd abt Commonwealth meeting that greeted #Brexit with spontaneous cheers  
Poll finds support for Brexit has hit a new low 
#Leave people aren't tweeting THIS poll. Pretty much in line with #JohnCurtice 's findings. #Brexit h/t @WeNeedEU 
'Thanks for the war Britain - but now you MUST PAY!' Juncker brands Brexit 'SERIOUS issue'  
So how's Brexit going so far? (via @barkercartoons)  
Philip Hammond is being attacked for telling the truth about Brexit, writes @georgeeaton. 
READ: @thetimes leader piece in full - the Govt must publish #Brexit impact assessment reports on our economy. RT if you agree:  
.@JunckerEU uses  round analogy to explain UK’s financial commitments or so-called  #Brexit bill - “They have to pay” he says. @SkyNews 
Full English #Brexit 58. I missed my flight home. This in no way has affected my light and fluffy demeanour. Pls RT.  
The fundamental premise of Brexit is that a UK government would run the UK better than the EU.There are two errors in this premise:1/3 
Govt must come clean and publish its prepared assessments of the impact of Brexit on each sector of economy (£)  
Faint-hearted politicians have no place in negotiating #Brexit:  by @TheBluetrot via @CityAM 
I joined 120+ colleagues to call on David Davis to publish secret Brexit Impact Studies this week.  What is this Government so afraid of?  
Proud to be one of the cross party signatories to #EUwithdrawalbill child #refugeerights amendment #Brexit  
Performances say KDBStats say AgueroBrexit says Kane  
There are plenty of reasons for the EU to give Theresa May nothing at next week's summit  
And it comes as @JolyonMaugham and @MollyMEP threaten legal action unless DExEU publish economic analysis of Brexit in 14 days 
The advocate in me feels sorry for those defending Brexit: tough to make bricks without straw. What else do they have but rhetoric and fury? 
DExEU won't say in response to my FOI if it has analysed regional impact of Brexit because doing so could trigger a "reactionary" response 
Yes, for some reason not often discussed by media.Any tariffs #EU impose on UK after #Brexit will be reciprocated & will hurt EU more as they export more to UK.If Germany wants to keep car workers employed, they should discuss a Free Trade Deal or pay for access to UK market.  
David Davis replaced as Brexit negotiator by two short planks 
The scandal of #Brexit is that Murdoch and the other tax-dodging press barons have far more power over us than the EU.#StopBrexit 
A No Deal Brexit wouldn't be "fine", it would be disastrous. Here are just some of the consequences if the UK crashes out of Europe:  
City Could ‘Benefit’ From Brexit - Report Claims  
.@NicolaSturgeon says Brexit will impact Scottish research, upon which #ScotArctic renewable energy engagement depends. #ArcticCircle2017 
Theresa May needs a ‘coalition of the sane’ to stave off Brexit calamity | Simon Jenkins  
While David Davis is busy hiding studies on the impact of Brexit, sign our petition to keep us in the Single Market  
Climate change denier calls for sacking of Brexit skeptic  
Russell Howard: 'Scandinavians are interested in #Brexit - just don't talk about Shreddies' 
Brexit divisions return as CBI boss throws weight behind Hammond  
Juncker on Brexit bill: "If you order 28 beers and suddenly some colleagues leave, it’s ok but they have to pay"  
The plan to force the Government to reveal its secret Brexit forecasts  Thanks @jolyonMaugham @MollyMEP 
Despicable and at the same time absurd. The tide of Brexit McCarthyism rises as Brexit itself sinks into disarray:  
No-deal Brexit: it’s already too late  
Lawyers will issue judicial review proceedings if David Davis fails to release 50 studies of Brexit effect on industry #ReleaseTheReports 
Brexit wrangle over citizens’ rights is nonsense, says Juncker  
This @timesredbox graph. Public opinion on Brexit is all over the place. Looks like an Etch-a-Sketch exploded.  
Why won't David Davis release 50 #Brexit impact assessments? @GoodLawProject wants answers - via courts if necessary 
An expert takes apart Nigel Lawson on Brexit, gold and the WTO  
Dear @jeremycorbyn On #Brexit you say you voted Remain last time and would do so again.Good news.Please would you do that in Parliament?  
Like Chernobyl, always several steps behind.The EU is a great idea that needs reforms. #Brexit was the first signal, #Catalonia is next. 
That's why the EU is doomed.Your idea of the EU as a "polo club" doesn't work in the 21st Century.Brexit is just the first step of your fall 
New report says that Children's rights embedded in #EU legislation are at risk from #Brexit. @theSNP WM team will work to highlight this 
118k signatures! Let's get as many as possible before the petition for a final deal referendum is debated.#Brexit 
Nottingham, tomorrow, love to meet you as we march peacefully for our EU Citizens rights & Stop Brexit. #StopBrexit 
Yesterday at 1st Board of Trade meeting, Liam Fox had positive discussions with Dr Fox, after hearing expert by Liam Fox on impact of Brexit  
I debated @ChukaUmunna on @GMB. Chuka making the same nonsense as usual about Brexit and the pound:  
In Bucharest for talks with President @KlausIohannis on the Leaders’ Agenda, October #EUCO and #Brexit.  
Just 42% of voters now say Britain was right to vote for Brexit — the lowest level recorded since the referendum.  
One thing to remember: If the UK really wants a no-deal Brexit, they could have that tomorrow. Just stop paying into EU funds... 
The Sun is still asking "who is Arlene Foster?" - and wrongly claiming she wants a "soft Brexit"  
6. To Lords, top Brexit official at Office of Nuclear Regulation (which will take on EU safeguarding powers): timetable "highly challenging"  
Brexit with no deal is unlikely to happen deliberately, but it could do so by accident  
New YouGov poll finds support for Brexit is at its lowest point since the EU referendum.  
Nicola Sturgeon has little to offer except a second unwanted referendumRead here:  
Jean-Claude Juncker says Brexit may take longer than first thought. Isn't it time politicians looked seriously at how to #StopBrexit? 
Tories’ Brexit looks like a huge own goal. Promising the impossible, moving right, and publicly divided, they are damaging UK plc. 
"They have to pay. They have to pay." Has anyone told Jean-Claude that No Deal means No Brexit Bill?  
Pro-EU and anti-Brexit Labour... capturing very pro-EU youth. As Brexit hits NHS and working class & distaste for neoliberal plans rise... 
No 'appetite' for a second referendum, instead the people will continue to swallow the lies and take all that Brexit brings as bad medicine! 
Trouble ahead? A majority of every demographic and regional group @YouGov looks at believes that the #Brexit negotiations are going badly.  
Productive meeting with @ScotLINK talking #Brexit & environment. Clear there will be no watering down of standards. Period. @UKGovScotland 
So how is Brexit going today? Well it's not even lunchtime and Juncker has already mentioned the War. 
TUCKER v PARTRIDGE! The great big Brexit grudge match! It. Is. On.More at 2pm – plus a message from next week's guest editor, @Aiannucci. 
The Govt is withholding vital Brexit info. @MollyMEP to take legal action if they continue to hide #50SecretStudies 
I warned people Theresa May would betray the Brexit movement, she is lying about the EU just as she lied on immigration.  
Fresh figures from @YouGov suggest almost two-thirds of the public now think the Brexit negotiations are going badly.  
We ambushed @nick_clegg at the station & asked him why he wants to stop #Brexit. Hear the full thing on #Brexitcast:  
Crikey: 64% of public now think the negotiations are going badly. Growing awareness that Brexit on terms it was promised won't be delivered  
Time to publish the #BrexitReports @DExEUgov - David Davis faces legal threat over secret reports on Brexit impact  
Every time a Brexiter opens their mouth, the lunacy of Brexit is laid bare, and its credibility diminishes. Keep them talking.  
YouGov poll of British public in The Times of London today. The penny is dropping. #brexit  
'Conservatives are actually calling for more borrowing, more taxes, more debt' we're going to pay for their #Brexit 
Lab Admits Public Clueless as to Lab's Brexit Policy“There was no one who understood what Lab believes on Brexit”. 
Detail from today's YouGov Brexit tracker shows that women by some margin most likely to think leaving EU wrong.  
The government should publish its Brexit impact assessments right away  
Remember that woman who wrote to Michael Fish and told him she worried a hurricane was coming and he laughed and said it wasn't.#Brexit 
EU president Juncker says Brexit will take much longer than initially thought  
Conservative behaviour, on homelessness, Brexit etc, seems entirely in line with theirs. 
Our Green MEP (@MollyMEP) has launched legal action against the gov't for hiding it's Brexit impact studies  
Sky News understands British nuclear industry is preparing for 'no deal' Brexit scenario by relocating some nuclear materials around Europe 
Opponents of Brexit said they would sue the British government if it fails to release internal reports  
Spanish police used excessive force against protesters during #Catalonia's disputed referendum, according to Human Rights Watch pic.twitter.com/ijiUhI3tPH 
Ministers are forced to halt flagship Brexit bill as Tory backlash looms with over THREE HUNDRED amendments tabled  
Crazy. Whitehall looking for 2000 extra staff to cope with #Brexit workload. Such a waste of resources/time/effort. #StopBrexit 
So that anti-Semitism and mysoginy and harrasment stuff. We just turn a blind eye to that. It's just Brexit that matters. 
Great news. I was worried that, with Brexit about trash our economy, we wouldn’t be able afford a new royal yacht. 
.@JunckerEU on #Brexit "Process will take longer than initially thought. Will not be able to move to the 2nd stage of negotiations yet"  
As Brexit death throes become more apparent, just watch how MPs start to find their consciences. Spineless lot! 
Criticise Trump: licences revoked.Criticise Brexit: trial for treason.1 of 3 
Brexit talks delayed, EU withdrawal bill on hold, and Tory MPs in open mutiny against their own chancellor.  
.@RGuerrina on gendered impact of #Brexit, the treatment of women's voices on Brexit & importance of feminist approaches to #EuropeanStudies 
Scary post-Brexit future for us all.Attempts to avert recession could mean a bonfire of workers' rights & trading standards #BrexitShambles 
YouGov/Times  - how well/badly government doing with Brexit negotiationsWell 21%=Badly 64% +3 
"There are many opportunities ahead for Northern Ireland when we implement Brexit." Watch our supporter Theresa Villiers on @bbcquestiontime 
1 in 10 children at risk of losing cross-border family law protections as a result of #Brexit. Read our new report:  
Jacob Rees-Mogg urges Philip Hammond to 'rise' to Brexit challenge amid calls for Chancellor to be sacked 
#Brexit: Everyone seems too stubborn to say we made a mistake, let’s stop the bus and reverse. Read @Jon_Danzig:  
Good on @MollyMEP - proud that @TheGreenParty has always been a Remain party. #Brexit #DavidDavis 
It's clear that triggering Article 50 was the most stupid of events when this country had no understanding of the dangers of #Brexit  
Needs to be a Ratification or Remain referendum, not just a Hobson's Choice referendum. #Brexit  
Madrid defends police actions during the Catalan referendum as "proportionate," but Human Rights Watch disagrees  
HMG cannot keep hiding the #brexit impact reports. #brexitwontwork#stopbrexit via @bpolitics 
It's worth pointing out that the EXIT talks are the easy part of Brexit. It's the FUTURE RELATIONSHIP talks that have unicorns in them. 
The delusions that lie at the heart of the Corbynistas exposed. They think THEY should “negotiate” Brexit.  
Apparently there's billions for #Brexit @Conservatives 
Starmer: Brexit talks must progressLabour MEPs: vote *against* progressLabour Brexit policy in 'development'... 
EXCL Former Tory minister urges government to publish Brexit impact studies 
There is 'no appetite' for a #Brexit that isn't going to deliver on all the promises / lies it claimed it would. There must be a 2nd #EURef 
Boris Johnson: It’s time Brussels moved Brexit talks along  
Starmer Admits Public Clueless as to Labour's Brexit Policy  
.Brexit Corbyn supports itWM power grab from Holyrood Corbyn supports itTrident Corbyn supports itCorbyn is not our friend Scotland 
Interesting @YouGov data. 47% think Brexit was wrong decision vs 42% right decision. 64% think Govt handling Brexit badly (inc 54% Leavers)  
Philip Hammond ‘must be sacked for not supporting Brexit’ – Tory right  
Richard Branson's SHOCK Brexit plan: Wait for Leave voters to DIE then rejoin the EU  
'But Brexit isn’t keeping Malaysians awake. The fact is that they don’t need Britain any more'  
Brexit may not happen because the people who voted for it keep dying, Richard Branson says  
Brexit: 'The last time someone had said “It will be all over by Christmas” was in 1914.'  
'EU needs to be FLEXIBLE!' Businesses demand compromise from Brussels for Brexit deal  
'We reject Juncker’s vision' Danish MEP blasts EU chief saying Denmark could follow Brexit  
TUSK CAVES IN: EU prepares for UK trade talk as member states panic at Brexit deadlock  
Brexit talks at deadlock | 74% of Brits say no deal better than bad deal  
Missed this yesterday. Good point @GuidoFawkes: Starmer wants Brexit talks to move on; Labour MEPs voted against  
It is extraordinary how #Brexit has descended into a head-banging, buck-passing, dissembling, game-playing mess given what is at stake. 
David Davis faces legal threat over secret reports on Brexit impact  
Leading article in @thetimes today - it's time to come clean and publish the Brexit impact assessments @DavidDavisMP  
EU to offer May an olive branch in deadlocked #Brexit negotiations next week  
Wrong to Leave EU takes its biggest lead yet, 5 points, in YouGov's Referendum trackerWrong 47%Right 42%  
Quelle surprise. 63% of registered voters did not back Brexit but PM has not found one word to address their concerns - so far @GavinBarwell @NSoames 
So brexit supporters want Hammond sacked because he won't spend money on things they dismiss as "project fear" and say won't happen. 
Another sign public opinion is turning against Brexit now the reality of how damaging it is becomes clearer  
Brexiteer attacks on Hammond for being too "gloomy"'about Brexit reminiscent of criticism of Alistair Darling before the financial crisis. 
Very good Times leader on the secret Brexit impact papers  
The @UKLabour position on #Brexit is to leave the EU incl. Single Market after a ‘transition’. Just as hard as the Tories.  
Par for the course that UK govt undertakes Impact Studies a year AFTER holding referendum. Criminally incompetent  
Brexit was not the voice of the working class nor of the uneducated – it was of the squeezed middle  
David Davis faces legal challenge over refusal to publish 50 Brexit impact assessments.  
Good point. Trump & Brexit have literally sent people nuts.  
Encompassing the death of Brexit: capital offence. Off to the Tower.  
£ for Brexit... or £ for NHS...?Which side are you on?  
Could someone not just fill in an IR1 for the Brexit Vote so we can investigate,call it off,and consider it a near miss. 
#JeremyCorbyn says he would vote remain in a second EU referendum  
Government in chaos as Brexit negotiations hit brick wall and Repeal Bill delayed. Keep up the pressure  
Nope- EU citizens have been bringing in more £ than they cost -ie paying their way & adding more for rest of us. Brexit hurts finances & NHS 
I'll be on @BBCWorldatOne to discuss our attempt to force Government to release its secret Brexit studies. 
'Gloomy' Philip Hammond must STOP blocking Brexit, says Nigel Lawson and business chiefs  
Will #Brexit open new opportunities? Theresa Villiers says Brexit will "open up opportunities" for the UK #bbcqtRETWEET & VOTE #yourvoice 
Oh, fancy that.Brexit: EU 'to prepare' for future trade talks with UK  
Secret state? The Legatum Institute . Very interesting. But very sinister hard brexit group.  
If the Brexit reports showed unicorns prancing through sunlit uplands, would the Govt still keep them a secret?() 
Deluded John Redwood on TV claiming pound wasn't affected by #Brexit vote and inflation hasn't risen. #OutOfTouchWithReality 
SHOCK: Labour have come out today in the race to be the biggest party of Brexit hypocrites since the Conservatives. 
Here's what will happen if all flights are grounded on the first day of Brexit  
Calls for sacking so-called traitor  Hammond are diversions from reality of Brexit negotiations where EU 27 are more united than UK Cabinet 
Why do we need to find money for a post Brexit economy? According to wooden tops like you, Brexit will be a roaring success.  
Extraordinary that @BBCr4today chooses to interview two utterly marginal eurosceptic MEPs about #Brexit trade talks. Why not one pro one anti? Balance? 
The Remainers’ immigration claim was the most audacious lie of the referendum writes @JonathanArnott 
Countdown:  Brexit: 532 days, 16 hours, 51 minutes, 53 seconds 
Thanks to all the crowdfunders who got us started, but it's just the beginning: @TRobinsonNewEra —  | #UK #brexit  
David Davis faces legal threat over secret reports on Brexit impact  
@Nigel_Farage the far right is now openly racist, Nigel you and ukip opened pandora box of racism in uk, this is directly because of brexit 
Three quarters of Brits would prefer a ‘no deal’ Brexit to a bad deal  
MPs should not feel obliged to back Brexit, says John Bercow  
My @Telegraph article on the importance of language education for post-Brexit Britain:  
Disturbed by the BBC website's analysis of a 'no-deal' Brexit scenario. They make it sound like a minor inconvenience, easy to handle. 
Very interesting - attempt to force disclosure of Brexit papers by means of a Kennedy common law/A10 JR application  
You appear to be lavishing in the lack of #Brexit progress David. Personally I'm delighted to as it'll ultimately mean bouncing into WTO   
“No agreement on aviation which means that planes can’t fly” - @Keir_Starmer says a no deal Brexit would be “catastrophic” for the UK  
Corbyn says he would vote remain in a second referendum -Then why does he say he couldn’t implement manifesto in EU?  
Brexitggedon on @GMB in a mo. Talking high stakes, big dangers. Quitters didn’t sell it as it is in the referendum 
"Philip Hammond admits Brexit 'no deal' will mean less money for NHS and social care"  
Currency traders are starting to get concerned about Brexit and Theresa May's future  
Brexit vote creates surge in EU citizenship applications  
A leaflet of a pledge by the "liberal" democrats for a referendum on the EU. Not really difficult to understand. 
Kurdish referendum inspires statehood for Iraq’s Sunnis too @AlMonitor  
@TomTugendhat you haven’t signed the letter asking for release of Brexit impact reports?How can you/we judge without seeing them? 
Former UK Negotiator to the EU Steve Bullock says "The circle can't be squared" on Irish border issue in #Brexit negotiations #wakeuptomoney 
Watch: Treacherous deceitful @Keir_Starmer EMBARRASSED on Newsnight as public fail to define Labour’s Brexit view  
JPMorgan’s Jamie Dimon eyes Paris for post-Brexit job moves  
Brexit ground zero - no chance of success.  #Brexit  
Hard #Brexit or any Brexit for that matter is going to cost Brits money from their pocket & they’ll have less NHS & other services #juststop 
'India & EU are important trading partners and even after Brexit, EU will remain India’s largest trading partner'  
Brexit: EU 'to prepare' for future trade talks with UK  
Our government is in disarray over Brexit but that doesn't change the fact that the EU is a 28 man oligarchy. 
The Mail at its most disingenuous, saboteur is a word used first by them to stoke hatred and division. #Brexit  
Brexit is a Conservative issue. You own it. You caused it. You ruined it. Forever on your watch.bigger than  poll tax.We'll not forget 
The case for #Remain grows stronger every day #Brexit  
1/ Amazed how much of my life is can now treated as "history".  The Wall.  The Gulf War.  The referendum.  Maybe even 9/11.  I'm old. 
Ministers haggle over 2,000 new staff as Brexit tests civil service  
It's either Brexit or the NHS for Britain. We can't have it all... 
Irish fears of hard Brexit rise as EU-UK talks hit ‘disturbing’ impasse  
The Occupy Democrats Daily Wrap-up:  #brexit 
"I will to my dying day be grateful to Obama" for turning Britian to liberty & Brexit -- @Nigel_Farage #LibertyNation 
Brexit opponents say they will sue the government if it doesn't release internal reports on leaving the EU  
No such thing as an ‘illegal referendum’. Referendum is a democratic right, & nations should not be punished by acts of war or aggression.  
If this doesn't wake you up nothing will; we're a 21st century European country, not some ancient serfdom. 
A Eurocrat known as MichelSaid Brexit talks aren't going wellTho May tries to mask itWe're in a handbasketWhose end destination is hell. 
"Everybody in that hall in Glasgow supports independence so it is not controversial" @MrJohnNicolson on #indyref2 date after Brexit details  
Pound nosedives as Barnier announces 'deadlock' in Brexit talks  
Who needs a reporter or correspondent when we have #choochoo to summarise the Brexit negotiations, just for you dear #bbctw viewer 
"The exodus of trades people, #NHS staff & tech workers shows potential damage of extreme #Brexit" says @vincecable 
From Europe? We in brexit now big fella loooooool where their visa at?  
A hard Brexit is totally incompatible with what's left of the Good Friday Agreement. No amount of lip service can disguise that. #bbcqt 
Because what he's saying is in the best interests of the country. Rather than pretending to stick to a monumentally self-destructive Brexit. 
Aarti Shankar: Michel Barnier wants to make progress on Brexit, but the EU has to let him #premium 
Comparing #brexit to the Titanic disaster is extremely tasteless. Nobody would link Scottish Independence  to Pan Am flight 103 would they?  
If this is true why not have a referendum to confirm it? Clearly because you are scared the outcome would not be favourable to you #bbcqt 
The Good Law Project are crowdsourcing funds to sue the government to release the Brexit reports.  via @CrowdJustice 
The EU doesn't want Brexit.  It will stall at every opportunity, expecting that it will eventually be overturned.  How they've always worked  
Philip Hammond Says Any Money Set Aside For A No-Deal Brexit Is Money Taken From The NHS  
The wheels on the #Brexit Bus are coming off - time to up the pressure to push it of the cliff!  #StopBrexit 
"More optimistic forecasts". @johnredwood will you be joining our campaign demanding @DExEUgov publish Brexit economic impact studies?  
Brexit may not happen because the people who voted for it keep dying, Richard Branson says  
The @Conservatives are "negotiating". You had a majority in Government to trigger #Article50. #Brexit belongs to you. It's wreckless. #bbcqt 
."Opponents of Brexit [will] sue the govt if it fails to release internal reports into the impact of leaving EU". 
Serious Question: What possible "opportunity" does Brexit give the UK? #BBCQT 
"Emphatically, to be cut off entirely from..the EU on trade was not what the British people wanted in the referendum  
.@mrjonathanlynn says he knows that Brexit will be a disaster because of the lack of organisation within the UK government #bbcqt 
A referendum on the **TERMS** of #Brexit is not a re-run of the 2016 referendum. It’s a totally different question. #BBCQT 
.@JohnODowdSF says that the Brexit meetings with the UK government that he attended were "ludicrous" #bbcqt 
Owen Smith voted against triggering #Art50 - if anyone’s frustrating the process of Brexit it’s him and Labour #bbcqt 
Liam Gallagher is the most sensible voice on Brexit  
It's worth mentioning that when millionaire MPs like Theresa Villiers say Brexit is brilliant, they literally have nothing to lose. #bbcqt 
completely agree. Makes me mad seeing this money being diverted to the brexit fund when it's needed in the NHS 
#bbcqt  Everyone else thinks Brexit is bonkers...Stop it before its too late!  
Brexit has caused this. I am neither embarrassed nor ashamed to be British. However I am fucking disgusted with those who have caused this.  
.@JohnODowdSF says that Brexit will be a disaster for the island of Ireland #bbcqt 
Theresa Villiers espousing the virtues of independence after #Brexit - we agree entirely, time for Brexit from Ireland!!  #bbcqt #UnityRef 
.@mrjonathanlynn says that Brexit is a "looming disaster", whilst the referendum campaign was "meaningless" #bbcqt 
Theresa Villiers MP saying in a subtle way that Brexit will "Take back control" on immigration.It's MISLEADING. UK HAS control! #BBCQT 
Thank you @JolyonMaugham. You have our complete support. Brexit impacts all our lives, we all need know the content of the impact studies   
#newsnight Worth pointing out that David Davis agreed the sequencing of #Brexit talks at the first meeting. Bit rich to complain now 
What’s Labour’s position on Brexit? We asked some punters on Oxford Street – here's what @Keir_Starmer made of their responses #newsnight 
Shadow DexEU Sec @Keir_Starmer tells #newsnight today's Brexit talks were a "serious failure"  
Talking over the Tories' Brexit disaster, which is like a Quentin Tarantino film meets a Wes Craven film, tomorrow (Friday) on BBC1, 7.10am 
I'd love to know who controls the terminology on Brexit. At the minute we're getting 'Bad deal or no deal'. In that 'no' stands for disaster 
Finally, a Brexit outcome all British people can rally around.  
500 plus people at National Transport Awards. Asked for show of hands optimistic or pessimistic re Brexit. Around 15-85. Same most sectors 
If Withdrawal Bill not on statute book in time: no basis for 10,000s of laws, no way of implementing Brexit agreement, legal pandemonium.  
Today #Iraqi PM Abadi dropping his pre-condition for KRG to cancel # Kurdistan Referendum results is good news to defuse tention. Good news. 
.@kathylienfx discusses #Brexit and BoE and what this means for GBP/USD.  
*this*? Again?? On day #eu says #brexit plans aren’t developed enough, ministers have been in talks about...a yacht. Of course  
This is now concerning.Bill needs to be an Act well before Brexit day.Legally catastrophic if not on statute book in good time.  
Friday’s GUARDIAN: “Chaos as EU talks deadlocked and Commons Brexit bill stalls” #bbcpapers #tomorrowspaperstoday 
The point I have made for days. Does Gov really think EU27 has not done their own economic assessments of #brexit impact? Pure pretence  
The gov is sitting on 57 reports on what Brexit means for the economy. It is time to publish them. @thetimes leader 
Many people suspected all along that the EU was a racket, mainly interested in grabbing our cash. The Brexit talks suggest they were right. 
But we'll have #Brexit!#IMF 
This week we found out that Brexit will-Halve income for farmers -destroy 1/3 of uk trade -ground flights to EU& it's only Thursday 
Brexit talks are deadlocked. Let's unlock them by walking away.  
.@MollyMEP & @JolyonMaugham threaten govt with legal action unless they publish Brexit impact assessment papers  
I was worried about Brexit but it looks like the government have everything under control now.  
Dimon Says JPMorgan May Move 60 Jobs to Paris Post-Brexit: FT...... where they will trade bitcoin? 
Oh thank God. I was starting to worry the Government didn't have a Brexit plan.  
#HardBrexit is NoDeal#Brexit is failing because it's being negotiated in the interests of the Conservative Party  
Voting for Brexit may not have been stupid.We didn't know the facts.Now we know the facts.Continuing to support it, is.#StopBrexit 
You couldn't imagine any Brexit when helping Osborne to try & prevent it.I can't imagine how you're not in jail. 
#FinTech must-read Value of fintech (PDF ) #london #brexit  
Deadlock over UK's Brexit bill, says EU's Michel Barnier...yes there is? I wonder why that is Mr #Barnier...won't we do exactly what u say? 
Ministers in talks about commissioning new Royal Yacht Britannia for post-Brexit Britain #premium 
‘I would definitely vote remain in a 2nd referendum, knowing full well I’m so passionately anti-EU, I’ll block calls for a 2nd referendum’  
Masrour Barzani: US opposition to referendum emboldened Baghdad for #KurdistanBlockade 
She would have walked away. Why won't you @theresa_may? #Brexit #WalkAwayMay 
One of the tragedies of the Brexit ultras is that the revolution they are paving the way for is Corbyn’s, not their’s.  
Fair play to Corbyn. He's changed his mind and would now vote Remain in a future EU referendum.  
Warring EU factions who want Britain GONE: Bloc set for epic power struggle after Brexit.  
What a knob.... 
Threatening NoDeal as a #brexit negotiating strategy is like threatening to shoot yourself if you don't get your way 
Brilliant letter from @heidi_mp to PM exposes shambles on transition. Never mind Brexit, this is about basic competence. (via @Open_Britain) 
RT if you think #JacobReesMogg should be in the Cabinet. #Article50 #Brexit #bbcqt #bbcdp #Conservatives #LBCLIVE #skypapers 
QUENTIN LETTS on a dire Prime Minister's Questions"Mr Hammond sat at the witness table with such morbidity that any nearby undertaker would have whipped out a tape measure to take his dimensions."Put that man out of his misery!#Brexit via @MailOnline 
"Collapse in European nurses" over Brexit part of "lethal cocktail" facing NHS this winter:  
.2000 new staff to add to 1500 already recruited for Brexit? Erm - No thanksLet's Fund Our NHS Instead.  via @FT 
Hard Brexit will ‘cost £400 billion, wipe 18% off GDP and cause a deep recession!  via @MetroUK 
The complexity of #Brexit negotiations lie within the EU not wanting a viable solution, such is their worry about the UK succeeding outside.  
Hostile Tory rebels force No 10 to delay Brexit bill  300 amendments, 53 clauses, repeal bit not fit for purpose 
Philip Hammond faces £900 million black hole in his budget thanks to Brexit 
The Electoral Commission faces possible legal action over its decision to drop an investigation into Vote Leave's Brexit campaign spending  
Boris Johnson tells EU:"We're looking for some urgency from our friends and partners, time to put a bit of a tiger in the tank and get this thing done!"Sounds Grrrrreeeat!Let's get this #Brexit thing done!Sooner the better... 
Brexit without an EU deal would be a "disaster," Wales' first minister says  
Brexit is the EU elite's fault. (Superb piece by Jan Stuller.)  
If there's anyone left alive to say it, I predict the term "Oh dear, you've made a right Brexit of this" will be in common use by 2030. 
Higher fuel prices & handling costs abroad played a large part in Monarch’s collapse. Brexit’s effect on pound having real impact on lives. 
Barnier's body language reveals futility and deadlock at Brexit talks  
You may have your brexit but YOU MAY NOT have my rights as an EU citizen.  
Brexit won't move while Mogg thinks we still own Europe Victorian attitude to poor people And woman 
MPs should not feel obliged to back Brexit, says John Bercow  
Yes, latest OECD models suggest that negative effect on EU economies of a hard Brexit is tiny - so EU not worried   
Good old Tories no more brexit talks Weak leader weak partyLetting Britain down 
Brexit without an EU deal would be a "disaster," @fmwales Carwyn Jones tells Bloomberg  
Bercow says MPs absolutely have the right to vote down Brexit.He needs to stop meddling and respect the will of the people!  
Brexit: Three Quarters of Brits Say No Deal is Better Than a BAD Deal!  Get on with it!       #fo2eu 
NEW: Brexit bill delayed as whips deal with Tory rebels (13 amendments). Starmer says bill "not fit for purpose" >  
FTSE 100 reaches record close after pound slips on #Brexit fears  
.@MaajidNawaz says a perculiar situation could emerge whereby hard Brexiteers & Remainers may become allies over the Brexit deal #ThePledge 
John Bercow says MPs have 'right' to try and block Brexit  via @HuffPostUKPol 
David Davis should announce UK withdrawal from the negotiations unless the EU consents to trade talks #Brexit 
Sir Keir Capitulator calls for an emergency round of Brexit talks. Oh dear, he couldn't negotiate his way out of a paper bag.  
Corbyn says he would vote remain in a second EU referendum but “There isn’t going to be another referendum” 
Decisive #brexit progress is possible next 2 months, with #uk political will. Succeed with shared solutions  
Jeremy Corbyn: "The government seems to have reached deadlock at every stage [of Brexit negotiations]."  
It was an advisory referendum.  We are a Parliamentary democracy.   And it would not be Second but Third.  Or actually first on the terms.  
If Barnier's "disturbing deadlock" lasts, would staying in EU seem better than a no-deal Brexit? Me for @IndyVoices 
A 58 year old advertising slogan to sell 3 star petrol to put in your Ford Anglia. Very apt metaphor for Brexit.  
BMW's discussions about making the Mini in China show Brexit pressures are building  
Davis shd announce UK w/drawal fm Brexit negotiations unless EU Council consents to trade talks.,via @BrexitCentral 
Get your 'Bollocks to Brexit' stickers now. 100% of profits on this item go to fund @No10Vigil remain events 
Britain you moron. Just reverse Brexit, nobody wants it, those that do have made it clear as to their true intentions. Keep us together! 
Michel Barnier says Brexit talks should not progress amid 'very disturbing' deadlock - David Davis says "significant progress" has been made  
2/ We spent couple of days with Iranian Kurds near Iran border. They r inspired by recent independence referendum in Iraq Kurdistan. @akhbar 
Madrid defends police actions during the Catalan referendum as "proportionate," but Human Rights Watch disagrees  
A vision of Britain's post-Brexit future?  
President Barzani Thanks #PDKI Leader Hijri for Supporting the Independence Referendum #twitterkurds 
Being in the EU enables us to grow fast, says @_ConcreteCanvas as @AlunCairns visits to promote post-Brexit trade 
EU Brexit negotiator says he is confident ‘decisive progress’ can be made in next two months  
If Brexit is reversed Jacob Rees-Mogg says he'll flee the country -  - more reasons to #StopBrexit! 
No deal Brexit means 22% tariff on food from EU under WTO rules, we currently pay 0%. Huge affect on inflation & Brit's standard of living. 
Brexit: a deadlock in negotiations.  
*@Keir_Starmer walks into the negotiation room*"I'm here to negotiate a brexit deal, and I'm not leaving until I accept your terms!" 
David Davis says don’t worry about Brexit because “I have a cunning plan” 
Pound jumps versus dollar on report UK may get 2-year Brexit extension  
Whether read as foolish, sinister or both this is a really disturbing - but all too plausible - insight into what is driving Brexit policy  
#Brexit is failing because it's being negotiated in the interests of the Conservative Party  #NoConfidence 
Whereas Osborne faked doom & gloom pre-EU referendum, Remoaner Hammond naturally oozes pessimism & lack of vision. 
On-site @HRW investigation confirms Spanish police used excessive force on protesters during Catalonia referendum.  
BREAK: EU to halt Brexit talks after saying UK has not made 'sufficient progress' on withdrawal terms - My piece:  
A tweet so riddled with nonsense,  non-sequiturs, denial, ignorance & internal contradiction it could be brexit itself.  
Good to see an educated Spaniard leaving the old brexit hypocrite in the dust!  
Couldn't agree more. Please publish the #brexit impact assessments immediately - or was your tweet just a load of hot air? 
Jeremy Corbyn says he would vote remain in a second EU referendum  
Friends! Terrifying!Clearly, Brexit will inflict almost as much damage upon the British economy as Our Millennium Bug did in January 2000.  
I'm coming to the point of 'Do it then.  Hard Brexit away and see how you like them apples.'I'm so sick of Brexiter bullshit. 
Thanks so much for your confirmation that you will be publishing the Brexit impact reports proto 
When should we hold the informed EU referendum, which Remain will easily win? 
Jeremy Corbyn says he would vote remain in a second EU referendum  
Phone call this evening with PM @theresa_may to discuss the October #EUCO. #Brexit 
 #BREXIT TRAITOR #PhilipHammond a Political WORM trying to DESTROY BREXIT! @theresa_may SACK HIM!  #BBC #SKY #TORY 
#NigelLawson is perfectly entitled to express #Brexit views but please remember one crucial thing about him. HE. LIVES. IN FRANCE. Thank you 
Remember this @theresa_may @PhilipHammondUK @DamianGreen now bloody get on with it WE #VOTED for #BREXIT do as you are TOLD! #BBC #SKY #TORY 
Tory austerity + Hard Brexit = Total disaster for public services and the wider economy. 
But's it's simply untrue that the 2016 Brexit vote can't be reversed. I'm not willing to be driven off a cliff. Join @libdems to stop Brexit  
"MPs have the right to attempt to block Brexit, rather than feeling obliged to vote in line with referendum result" 
Merkel: We'll conduct Brexit talks to minimize damage to Germany  
Council of Europe calls for an investigation into Spain’s police violence on referendum day.  
Some of the best threaders on Brexit - @EmporersNewC @WomaninHavana @Sime0nStylites @GuitarMoog - create brilliant, reasoned pieces. 
Corbyn has facilitated Brexit every step of the way. Not to be trusted imo.  
Does a first class honours degree in Chemical Engineering qualify? I voted Brexit after 4 months research. Not some half baked social ideal. 
Why are we told to “believe in” Brexit? Give us facts, data, cogent arguments, tangible benefits if you want support. If not,  #StopBrexit! 
Jeremy Corbyn would vote Remain again if there was an 'EU referendum' now. 
Dear Nigel Lawson, it's not fanatical to oppose No Deal Brexit.  But stop dying your hair dear. You look like a housewife from Hendon. 
Jeremy Corbyn would vote remain in a second #EU referendum - criticises Govt’s lack of progress #NoConfidence 
There is absolutely no reason why ALL MPs shouldn't be asking, "What is in the 50 Brexit Impact Assessments". We deserve the right to know?  
Join @BestForBritain's campaign to get your MP to join the 120 MPs demanding the Govt release its Brexit reports  
You think a random opinion poll is a mandate? We had a General Election on June 8th where Hard Brexit mandate was blown away. All the best.  
#ForBritain  For Brexit - For British Law enforcing British Values, For an NHS free and fair  For Education not Indoctrination #ForBritain 
Sally Potter's new film is a "nightmarish farce" about Brexit  
By stating that it doesn't want to revoke Article 50 Notification, the govt is admitting that it can be revoked.#StopBrexit #Brexit  
Intiatuve to put pressure on MPs to get govt to publish the Brexit impact assessments  
Congratulations to former UK negotiator at EU @GuitarMoog on 10k followers.Should have many more for his first-rate commentary on Brexit.  
#ECJ could have final say on #Brexit deal. All the more reason to stop messing around with these clowns & WALK!  #BBC 
Giving effect to “direct effect” in the #Brexit negotiations  
The Commons will debate the final deal referendum. Lets's keep the signatures rolling in. Please RT. #Brexit 
In #GE2017 many Leavers voted Corbyn as he said respected #Brexit vote & leaving Single Market. Now flipped on both. He took you for a ride.  
SCUMBAG #Bercow says #MPs absolutely have the right to vote down #Brexit. He needs to stop meddling and respect the will of the people! #BBC 
This from @stephenkb is right. Brexit's failing because it's being negotiated in the interests of the Tory Party  
.@NadineDorries tells @IainDale Michael Gove should replace Philip Hammond as Chancellor because he's passionately committed to Brexit @LBC 
Parliament is going to debate the petition “Hold a referendum on the final #Brexit deal” on 11 December 2017. Lobby your MP to support it! 
There's an obvious Brexit settlement but Conservative interests won't allow it - sharp analysis from @stephenkb.  
We must call it what the Lancet called it - 'Failed Brexit'No deal is total failure; failed promises, failed negotiations, failed country. 
"It's time to put a tiger in the tank" - Boris Johnson on #Brexit deadlock 
We don't need #Brexit, we need independence from the tax-dodging billionaire press barons peddling Brexit. #StopBrexit #Remain 
Now a no-deal #Brexit seems a serious possibility, we could end up staying in the EU after all, says @JohnRentoul 
Hard Brexit to cost £400bn by 2030. That's more than £350m a week that could be spent on the NHS.Put that on a bus. 
They say the EU is undemocratic. The EU has far more safeguards against the abuse of political power than the UK. #Brexit #LeaveLies 
I keep saying it: NHS will be the price we all pay for Brexit. Remember that when we all pay for private Health Insurance, co pay etc 
Many other aspects of Brexit are increasingly recognised: complexity, damage to economy etc. But the no-deal car-buying metaphor has stuck. 
.@ChukaUmunna on #LBC: #Brexit in the terms it was sold the British people is proving to be impossible 
.@ChukaUmunna on #LBC: We were told the #Brexit process would be easy, but it's transpiring to be incredibly difficult 
David Davis set to reveal state of Brexit negotiations, but is reportedly torn between 14 or 15   emojis. 
UPDATED: Trump's campaign manager under #TrumpRussia investigation AND #Brexit investigation too. 
I'll be debating the day's news with @NickFerrariLBC & @CarolineFlintMP on @AfterTheNewsITV at 10.40pm tonight on @ITV. Brexit may pop up... 
Disastrous but unsurprising poll. Extremely common for people to think of Brexit like buying a car: no deal means status quo.  
Whoomp - there it is. Every pound spent on prepping Brexit farce "is a pound we can't spend on NHS". #BrexitOrNHS 
I’m hoping one day there will be ‘a Nuremberg’ for Brexit.  
My next 'Full English Brexit' public meeting is at the Harper Suite, Bedford Corn Exchange, Mon Oct 16, 7pm. Everyone welcome. 
May's proposals for Brexit are contradictory, confused, + risk taking the UK off a cliff. We must stay in the Single Market + Customs Union.  
Bannon & Mercer's Cambridge Analytica is under #TrumpRussia investigation & for #Brexit too via @carolecadwalla  
Alastair Campbell: We may leave Brussels, but when it comes to defence, thanks to Brexit we’re becoming Belgium -  
FTSE 100 index has closed at a record high of 7,556.24 due in part to drop in the pound caused by concerns over state of Brexit negotiations 
Boris Johnson urges #EU to "put a tiger in the tank" and get on with next stage of #Brexit negotiations. Yes, EU clearly the problem. Dolt.. 
Very interesting take on the state of the Brexit talks  
As it stands, Jeremy Corbyn is the only party leader with a Brexit strategy designed to win an election afterwards:  
Hard Brexit means less jobs and not enough skilled people to@full the ones we have. Brexit is a joke. #brexitRef2 
Charlie Elphicke: Ensuring we are Ready on Day One for any Brexit scenario is the smart thing to do  
Brexit is going to be a body blow to the NHS  
Well said lads. How can a group fundraising for one side in the referendum be presented as impartial experts? This whole thing is a sham.  
NKorea declared #Crimea’14 “referendum” fully complied w/ notion of int law.Wait, did someone wonder who supplied them w/ rocket engine?  
Sheesh, Brexit looks so complicated. I'm glad we have our top guys on it. 
“We have to stop Brexit before Christmas”, @MollyMEP has said. @india_bourke reports:  
Three Quarters of Brits Back Clean Brexit over Accepting a Bad Deal  
Expect to hear more and more of this. It's not the reality of Brexit that's the problem. It's the people pointing it out. 
#mayhem took all her cabinet to ITALY to give a speech about #brexit why? Where's the outrage? costs estimated at several hundred thousand 
Who is at fault over the Deadlock over UK's #Brexit bill? @MichelBarnier RETWEET & VOTE #yourvoice 
Not British? Don't dare to post on Brexit Broadcasting Conservatives website  
Petra De Sutter (BE): “Applying article 155 is the worst option, a possible solution is to reform the Constitution and allow a referendum” 
"There will be no downside to Brexit," says @DavidDavisMP. So why not publish the #BrexitReports then, like @DavidLammy &others have asked? 
BBC puts FOUR TIMES as many Remainers as Brexit fans on its political shows - The Sun  
Which court is the ball in now? #brexit  
The EU’s chief negotiator says Brexit negotiations are in "deadlock," and doesn't recommend moving to next phase 
Brexit is failing because it's being negotiated in the interests of the Conservative Party  
British politics. Absolutely losing it. Hammond is Chancellor and looks at the economy. Soubry is vaguely pro-EU. #brexit  
Lord Lawson has already been proved wrong on climate change, wrong, too, on Brexit. Hammond has to stay now.  
When #Brexit goes "tits up".Remember.The #Labour Party was falling over backwards to vote for it. 
Just a quick reminder that by 16 October your old pound coins will not be legal tender, and your new ones will be worthless. #Brexit  
If Spain doesn't accept a referendum result in Gibraltar with a majority of 99%, how can anybody expect them ever to see democratic reason? 
'We’re not throwing ANYTHING away!' @LeaveMnsLeave Business Ambassador blasts Remainer for Brexit pessimism  
Jeremy Corbyn says he would vote remain in a second EU referendum  
Against stiff competition, this must be the daftest official announcement yet on Brexit, from @tradegovuk. 
Madrid defends police actions during the Catalan referendum as "proportionate," but Human Rights Watch disagrees  
Loose Canon: Still puzzled by Brexit? Take yourself off to Blakenall Heath.  
Views of ex SAS author Chris Ryan on Brexit, in the Times, which I have to say seem surprising  
'No deal' should be re-termed 'catastrophic deal' to make the reality hit home perhaps. #Brexit  
Important debate on #Brexit referendum will be on December 11. #StopBrexit  
UK exports to non-EU must jump 60% to make up lost EU-trade in case of hard Brexit. UK also losing scores of EU negotiated free trade deals. 
Let's recall what @theresa_may said on LBC - "there won't be a second referendum...on 29th March 2019, we come out of the European Union"  
@Rachael_Swindon @UKDemockery As Davis, Fox and Boris continue their Brexit preparations it's little wonder Barnier despairs  
There is no such thing as ‘tariff free access’. Corbyn is seeking to mislead us here. He’s lying to us. He thinks we are idiots. #brexit  
Brexit bill failure shows PM is being held hostage by fanatics - my piece for @LabourList 
John Redwood has called for more Brexit optimism. @mrjamesob's response was both ruthless and very, very funny  
Jeremy Corbyn and Keir Starmer are calling for talks to urgently resume over Brexit. He warns a lot of jobs are at risk with 'No Deal'.  
Mr Hammond: you really need to start planning and budgeting for Brexit!   
"The people have spoken" All further democracy regarding #Brexit is henceforth abolished!  
Brexit'll all be over by Christmas.  
Please sign if you haven't already - leavers & remainers need to know truth about Government's Brexit impact studies  
Brexit  talks: "Today is a serious failure to hit a very important deadline" says @Keir_Starmer 
Jeremy Corbyn: I would vote to remain in the EU if there was a second referendum 
The amount of time currently devoted to Brexit in German politics is minimal. UK pundits would notice this if they read German newspapers  
Effective 'chart of shame' installation by @gameoldgirl @MigrationUK showing tabloids' migration-related headlines pre Brexit vote  
Brexit is good news for Britain, America and the special relationship - EFT Adviser @OwenPaterson on @CapX  
Corbyn wants to deny us our democratic right to vote on a final Brexit deal. This is unacceptable. We must have a final vote on Brexit.  
Jeremy Corbyn says he voted Remain in the EU referendum and would do so if it were held again  
Brexit failing because it's being negotiated in the interests of Tory Party  A handful of Tories determining our fate 
He should have been inserting democratic controls into the Brexit process in the repeal bill. Instead, he's turning his back on it. 
Corbyn basically ruling out a second referendum is a disaster. You can't make progress on this without Labour support. 
If government thinks Kenyans are united, let them call for a secession referendum. They will be shocked. Cruel marriage #NasaOnTrack 
For the avoidance of doubt:.@jeremycorbyn is not to blame for #Brexit. It belongs to .@David_Cameron & the .@Conservatives. Their mess. 
Corbyn doesn’t believe in nukes or Brexit...but he’s supporting them anyway. So, what’s the point of voting Corbyn?  
Latest Brexit sabotage scare from Hammond. The European Skies arrangement includes a number of non-EU countries. We can be members too.  
Now a no-deal Brexit could happen, we might end up staying in the EU  
What if the Tories are handling the Brexit negotiations so shambolically because they actually want to end up with no deal at the end?  
I'm live in Barcelona where thousands have come out to a unity rally protesting Catalonia independence referendum  
In the light of today's statement by @MichelBarnier @theSNP Westminster leader @IanBlackfordMP #PMQ yesterday was particularly apt #brexit  
This is excellent from @stephenkb Brexit is now about the preoccupations of Tory elite, not leave voters  
Time to bring the Government down, then, @jeremycorbyn. We're with you all the way. #Brexit must be stopped! #ForTheMany 
Brexit is failing because it's being negotiated in the interests of the Conservative Party, says @stephenkb 
JC seems wholly uninterested in practical challenges of Brexit, which is a trait more common in true believer leavers than (ex)remainers. 
Freedom leads to prosperity #Brexit 
Labour's deluded bid to stop a 'no deal' Brexit would leave Britain at the EU's mercy #premium 
It's more than 15 months since the Brexit vote. Is it really too much to ask that our politicians understand the *absolute basics* by now? 
It's worth pointing out that difficult items in the Brexit talks are Tory preoccupations, not Leave voters' ones:  
Forget all the #Brexit bad news. Support the British economy this Christmas ! #BuyBritishDay  what items can you find that we can share? 
Latest Brexit fiasco. 'Talks deadlocked, Davis says widen Barniers' negotiating powers'. No, tell them we just left, and then how it works. 
Translation: Liz Truss now thinks her career would benefit from backing Brexit.  
Brexiters preparing for civil war, in the event of Brexit not being delivered.  
MPs to debate second referendum on Scottish independence next month, after demand from tens of thousands of voters.  
Brexit has made the UK the sick man of Europe once more, writes @georgeeaton.  
11th Dec, parliamentary debate on a 2nd brexit referendum. Come, bring a flag, make your voice heard. You are the people. Remain is our will  
Brexit is the greatest thing to ever happen to the EU project. No country will be dumb enough to vote to leave again.  
Pound falls as Barnier confirms "disturbing" Brexit "deadlock"  
PM thinks it's time for a futile gesture in the Brexit talks. Would raise the whole tone of the war with Brussels  
However hard Brexit is wealthy people will be able to live where they like. It's those who actually have work to contribute who won't  
An anti-Brexit superhero is surely the most @IanDunt thing ever 
Great news that talks with EU are 'deadlocked'; now let's get on with preparing 4 Brexit without wasting taxpayers' money on bailing out EU. 
When faced with the realities of #BRexit ...  
How? You could vote to reject a deal but, if there is no deal, there's nothing to vote against. Or do you mean vote to overturn referendum?  
I’ve updated Parliament on how our £250m funding ensures government depts can start spending to prepare for Brexit  
Theresa May declares open warfare on her own Chancellor as any pretence at unity crumbles #Brexit 
Catastrophic financial cost of Brexit 'revealed' in new study  via @MetroUK 
#Brexit could be resolved in a trice.Just cancel the whole charade and admit it was a stupid idea dreamt up by xenophobes.Done 
.@ChukaUmunna: With the talks in deadlock, the Government needs to rethink their plans for a destructive Brexit  
READ: @Keir_Starmer's letter to David Davis calling for an additional emergency round of talks with EU negotiators to end #Brexit deadlock  
My cartoon Thursday @TheTimes...... #TheresaMay aka Dr Dolittle faces both ways on #Brexit and #Remain 
It’s vital we retain barrier-free access to the dynamic EU workforce after Brexit. Read more on my immigration plan  
Labour's Keir Starmer calls on David Davis to hold 'emergency talks' to break the Brexit deadlock 
Sir @Keir_Starmer is such an asset for @UKLabour. He was just on @BBCRadio4 now showing calm & common sense on Brexit. Tories losing plot. 
I don't remember Osborne and Carney warning us about this before the referendum.   via 
MPs have "the right" to vote against Brexit, says John Bercow. 
The EU just warned Brexit negotiations are completely deadlocked  ............ just as the EU planned. 
‘Go ahead EU - make our day!'74% of Britons believe no deal on Brexit is better than a bad deal.Not surprising as we are leaving a corrupt, dysfunctional & obsolete protectionist regime.Sooner we are out, the better...#Brexit 
I don't mean to be rude but the UK would suffering from the disastrous impact of Brexit long after Nigel Lawson is in the ground 
'Brussels running SCARED!' EU terrified of Tory Brexiteer @BorisJohnson taking over Brexit from  @theresa_may 
NEW: @Keir_Starmer writes to David Davis calling for additional emergency round of talks to break the Brexit deadlock.  
“The conservative party is treating my country like a joke,” British MEP @SebDance on state of #Brexit negotiations.via @lars_scho 
I’m “fanatical” in putting our country’s interests first & foremost - #Brexit deal with economy & our children’s future at its heart 
The close encounter between Larry just visible and Palmerston this morning in Downing St but as in the Brexit negotiations know one knows what the hell is going on or who’s telling the truth, what’s needed is Leadership which May falls v short on. Cats parted with no deal !!  
“Are we really going to say [..] two generations of people don't matter?" Labour MEP @SebDance on the ramifications of #Brexit.  
"The EU has yet again shown that it is obstructing Brexit negotiations," says @JLongworthLML 
LAWSON: Unhelpful Chancellor Hammond "very close" to Brexit sabotage, should be reshuffled.  
“The Remain cause is not dead. This is not inevitable,” Labour MEP @SebDance told our reporter @lars_scho. #Brexit  
It’s clear the Tories have failed to prepare for Brexit talks. That could mean a ‘no deal’ Brexit. Here's the facts.  
Spanish police beat & injured peaceful protesters over Catalonia referendum- need investigation. New @hrw report  
Keir Starmer writes to David Davis demanding emergency Brexit talks to try & reach agreement before next week’s EU Council meeting  
Today’s only good news from Government Palmerston seen here this morning in Downing St avoiding Larry who was standing guard on the steps of No10, as in Brexit no headway ! The ball is in Larry court   
'Now a no-deal Brexit seems a serious possibility, we could end up staying in the EU after all'  
Today on #bbcdp Nigel Lawson has called @Anna_Soubry a 'fanatic' and Philip Hammond a 'saboteur'. This the language of Brexit. 
Bizarre of BBC Daily Politics to avoid asking the new UKIP leader a single question about his views on the state of the Brexit process. 
Remember Remainers anytime you embrace #annasoubry to the cause, she thinks the Daily Mail a responsible newspaper. #Brexit 
Nigel Lawson on @daily_politics: Philip Hammond's actions on Brexit are "very close to sabotage", calls Anna Soubry "a fanatic" #bbcdp 
Brexit is an opportunity for UK firms, says eBay boss. Rob Hattrell says that companies using the online trading platform have seen their exports grow since the EU referendum.  
What????!!!  : Bercow: MPs have the right to try and delay or prevent Brexit  
Thursday Morning Briefing- NAFTA discussions continue- #Brexit talks stall- Delta refuses to pay CSeries tariff 
.@albawhitewolf i cannot thank you enough for resisting & giving a voice to #remain & #resist the cliff edge #brexit policy of the #tory gvt 
Does seeing Nigel Lawson on TV still make you want to throw something or is it just me? Pro brexit, climate changer denier - what's to like? 
This was the moment when Michel Barnier said there was deadlock in Brexit talks  
Message to Brexiteers: When in a hole, stop digging... How to Stop Brexit (And Make Britain Great Again) is out now.  
Dear @theresa_may, the 48% demand on behalf of the 100% that you publish the Brexit impact assessment. We deserve to be told the truth. 
Nigel Lawson the man who lives in France yet promotes Brexit and trading outside EU as preferred option #bbcdp What’s that about? 
And the OBR say the tax take has ALREADY fallen by £900 million because of Brexit  
Meetings between Legatum and government ministers and DExEU officials. Thanks @JXB101. #Brexit  
Nigel Lawson on @daily_politics: Philip Hammond's actions on Brexit are "very close to sabotage", calls Anna Soubry "an extremist" #bbcdp 
Respect to Lord Lawson on the #BBCDP for calling Anna Soubry what she is "a fanatic" about the EU, and sabotaging the Brexit process. 
Nigel Lawson says that what Hammond is doing is 'complete sabotage' & that Anna Soubry is a 'complete fanatic'. Well said. #Brexit #bbcdp 
.@richardbranson's #Brexit strategy: Wait for Leave voters to die, then rejoin EU.  
Millions of UK & EU citizens at risk of being thrown under the Brexit bus ... @BritishinEurope responds to round 5 press conference. 
Pound falls for first time in 4 days after Michel Barnier speaks of deadlock on Brexit bill  
The war on Brexit is a war on democracy  @AmberRuddHR @PhilipHammondUK@DamianGreen @JustineGreening @theresa_may 
So you want the numbers rigged to make you feel optimistic about the Brexit car-wreck you've created? 
SkyNews poll : ‘Go ahead EU - make our day!' More Britons want no deal than bad Brexit deal, says poll  
Yes, they only got the Referendum Act through precisely because it was not legally binding and so no minimum turnout or majority required. 
IDS as lead hardBrexiteer puts brave face on slow Brexit negotiations by claims held up by German elections but raises BATNA UK WTO no deal 
Legatum a tax-haven based 'charity' plugging hard #Brexit & advising the government  
Farming industry's own advisory body says farmers' incomes will be halved if Tories fail to get a post-Brexit EU trade deal #BrexitShambles 
If UK does escape (hard) #brexit @MikeH_PR will deserve some kind of medal for his work on exposing Russian bots. An almost infinite task 
MPs should not feel obliged to back Brexit, says John Bercow  
The state of Brexit. I don't like the facts, give me some new ones.  
The EU’s chief negotiator says Brexit negotiations are in "deadlock," and doesn't recommend moving to next phase  
Nick Clegg's wife on the #BBCDP actively trying to undermine the UK's #Brexit negotiations.Which I'm willing to bet is exactly what the #BBC called her on to do! 
Tory backbenchers will probably never recognise it, but Michel Barnier is actually the UK's best hope in Brexit talks.  
The 50 Brexit impact assessments  must be published immediately. The People have a right to know what Brexit really means.  
I don't want this to be a 'Mike effect'. I want more people to challenge & question these fake Brexit supporting accounts.  
Here's what happened to the pound after Michel Barnier said Brexit talks were deadlocked  
David Davis, seen here ordering a taxi to get him out of this Brexit press conference asap  
Just look at this. One of the brexity 95%: a #brexit account that seemed plausible but turned out to be yet another fake.  
"We need to break the deadlock... then can make progress fairly swiftly on other matters" - @MichelBarnier  #Brexit  
STALEMATE: Brexit Bill talks are 'in deadlock' and it's 'very disturbing', Michel Barnier tells David Davis.  
Michel Barnier, Europe's chief Brexit negotiator, gave his opinion on a 'no deal' situation in a press conference with David Davis today  
"No deal would be a very bad deal" - EU's chief #Brexit negotiator @MichelBarnier  
There have been no negotiations on financial settlement for Brexit, Michel Barnier says  
Christ alive. The faking of 'professional' support for Brexit is relentless. Now we need to know what this lying fake account changed to.  
"Do you believe in fairies? If you believe," Peter shouted at them, "clap your hands! Don't let Brexit die!"  
you're all very snarky but who among you could have seen foreseen that brexit would be complicated 
Christian Adams sees parallels in the recantations of the Cabinet over the Brexit vote - political cartoon gallery  
Help us to #StopBrexit! Support our crowdfunder for the East of England rally against #Brexit this Saturday  
"Disturbing deadlock" over Britain's financial contributions - EU's chief #Brexit negotiator @MichelBarnier  
The EU just warned Brexit negotiations are completely deadlocked  
The time and energy spent by EU27 and COM on Brexit could be refocused on positive initiatives 36/ 
Pound drops as Barnier says Brexit talks have reached a very disturbing state of deadlock    
John Bercow's right!I sense slowly more MPs are shifting against Brexit as public mood shifts against Brexit 
Leader of the House refuses to make time available for a debate to allow Ministers to set out the cost to taxpayers of #Brexit. Shameful! 
Look at what happened to the pound when Michel Barnier said Brexit talks were deadlocked  
Barnier in Brief: No EU divorce, Ireland or citizens' deal and no Brexit trade talks. Other than that it's going swimmingly #UKeffed 
Friends! Good question!Why won't that tiny handful of 17,410,742 bigots now admit that Brexit is a disaster, and trust Our Nicky instead?  
EU's chief Brexit negotiator: not able to propose to European Council that discussions should begin on UK's future relationship with the EU 
BREAKING: Brexit talks have reached a deadlock, EU's Michel Barnier says  
There is no question of EU making concessions over Brexit divorce arrangements  - Barnier 
. @MichelBarnier says that he will not be able to recommend #EUCO next week that sufficient progress has been made #Brexit 
Pleasure as with all Brexiteers! - Vital the transition backslide on Brexit stopped so fishing, coastal communities & Britain can boom  
Brexit may not happen because the people who voted for it keep dying, Richard Branson says  
NEWS! Iceberg insists it can thrive on its own after winning referendum to leave Antarctica  
Live: #news conference after 5th round of Brexit talks  
Delighted that MPs will debate a Ratification Referendum - democracy means people having a real say on their future  
"We worked constructively. We clarified certain points. Without making massive steps forward" @MichelBarnier #Brexit  
Since @MichelBarnier& @DavidDavisMP have come up short, hopes for Brexit now rest on a superhero ...  
Our @Adamstoon1 @EveningStandard sees parallels in the recantations of the Cabinet over the Brexit vote  
#Brexit news conference delayed slightly by the presence of an anti-Brexit self-proclaimed superhero from Sheffield. She’s just been removed  
This is EU Supergirl who is sitting in front row of Brexit talks press conference in Brussels  
Madeleine Kay, dressed as supergirl,  campaigning for #EU during #Brexit press conference. Security not sure what to do.  
It's now 16 months since Putin won the Brexit vote & I've not seen 1 bit of evidence that it will improve life for the average UK citizen 
BETRAYAL: John Bercow says MPs have the right to delay and prevent Brexit.   
'EU NEEDS A DEAL' Rolls-Royce chief warns Brussels they HAVE to strike Brexit agreement  
MPs should not feel obliged to back Brexit, says John Bercow  Speaker stating UK Constitution so hardly a surprise! 
The Tories have stripped 18 - 21s of housing benefit & will further ruin the economy with Brexit, which young folk voted against. They care not one jot for young people!  
MPs could ignore the referendum to stop Brexit, says Bercow: Speaker argues Parliament 'can do what it wants'  
The Sun have a "story" about Brexit coverage on #marr. No fair person would regard their figures accurate. Here's BBC response they omitted: 
Looking into the consequences of Brexit  
The key task for every Brexiteer right now is to force PM to set a hard end date for her "transition". Without one Brexit is hypothetical. 
Commons Speaker..has said MPs have the right to attempt to block Brexit using the parl process.This is significant!  
UN expert @AlfreddeZayas suggestion of new Spain-approved, binding Catalan independence referendum within 30 days monitored by the @UN and @CarterCenter is the ONLY thing I, for one, would accept in lieu of DI. 
Myth: #Brexit is inevitable. Truth: We are a sovereign nation. If we want to stay in the EU, we can.Article50 is ours, we can revoke it. 
At least we can be thankful the British electorate took away May’s majority #brexit 
2nd referendum is the last chance of UK not being out in the cold for a decade or more, warns @MollyMEP  #StopBrexit 
NEWS! Government claims Brexit Impact Studies are unavailable to public as they were ‘eaten by dog’  
#Brexit is about opening the #NHS to US private business.#Brexit is betraying Britain. 
Rees-Mogg tells German newspaper: "We can live without a deal."Daresay he can.Most of us can't. And most of us don't want #Brexit at all. 
#Brexit is weakening our economy, our alliances and our union. #Brexit is betraying Britain! 
BOOM: Brexit London still number one in the world for attracting business and talent. Someone tell the Remoaners!  
The Elite's hatred of Brexit is really a hatred of mass democracy.At @spikedonline, O'Neill gets it 100% correct 
EXCLUSIVE: #TheresaMay is unable to release reports on #Brexit due to the offensive language they contain.  
Read my article in @CapXBrexit is good news for Britain, America and the special relationship  
Bercow says MPs absolutely have the right to vote down Brexit. He needs to stop meddling and respect the will of the people!  
My Q to minister of women to confirm that current EU  protection of pregnant women not to have to work night shifts continues after Brexit 
Let's not forget that a no deal Brexit means a collapse in our cancer treatment (radiotherapy)  & diagnosis pathways (from PET scans used to ensure right Tx for lymphatic spread & other uses such as cardiology)  
'Man who encouraged the nation to vote for a complete shitshow fears complete shitshow' #Brexit 
#Brexit keeps on giving. #Leavers each of you are personally are to blame for NHS staff shortages. #ProjectReality 
MPs should not feel obliged to back Brexit, says John Bercow  Opinion, not fact that MPs must vote through Brexit 
But the chief exec of the NHS said this week Ministers have not asked him to prepare the Health Service for a no deal #Brexit  
John Bercow insists MPs have the 'right' to try and prevent Brexit. It should be their duty to stop Brexit! 
The Treasury has a dreadful record on Brexit. It backed the losing side & made very wrong forecasts for 2016-17. It still exudes pessimism. 
MPs should not feel obliged to back Brexit, says John Bercow  
John Bercow insists MPs have the 'right' to try and prevent Brexit  
BREAKING | UK Parliament to debate on holding a second referendum on Scottish Independence on 13 November 2017.#ScotRef 
'EU need a deal' Rolls-Royce chief warns Brussels chiefs - they HAVE to accept Brexit deal  
UN Independent Expert @Alfreddezayas has just called for a new binding referendum on Catalan independence under the auspices of the @UN and @CarterCenter "so everyone can vote". 
DUP would prefer if experts refrain from giving their informed opinion about #Brexit if it contradicts theirs.  
We view Brexit as a springboard of opportunity, there is no 'cliff-edge' - says @TiceRichard on @SkyNews 
I voted remain out of prudence rather than Europhilia, fearing Brexit would turn into a disaster, a distraction and a poison. Vindication! 
The first Amazon review of Nick Clegg’s 'How To Stop Brexit' is in:  
Question for any politician with children or grandchildren: How do you look them in the eye? #Brexit 
Press conference by @MichelBarnier and @DavidDavisMP following 5th round of #Brexit talks today @ 12:15pm (CET):   
If Brexit Impact Studies were positive they would be splashed all over The Daily Mail. They aren't & so they haven't.  Public deserve 2 see  
The call for “positive thinking” is increasingly being used by politicians and journalists to shut down proper discussion of Brexit. 1/? 
"Où est la balle?""Wait, I thought you had it?"#brexit negotiations stall as David Davis and Michel Barnier lose the plot, I mean ball   
The chancellor should have a Brexit Budget now irrespective of the state of  EU negotiations 
There is no jobs-first Brexit. This is nonsense  
Letters: Hammond’s refusal to plan for a ‘no deal’ Brexit is a dereliction of duty - The Telegraph  
jeremy Corbyn WILL Vote Against A 'No Deal' Brexit, Labour Says.  via @HuffPostUKPol 
"WE NOW GO LIVE TO BREXIT"  
The note of @SP_European MSPs meeting with @MichelBarnier has now been published. Read it here  #brexit 
Brexit Secretary David Davis to sum up the state of Brexit negotiations - expect a sugar coating or blame game. In what will be the biggest upheaval in UK trade, the Tories have moved virtually no distance #BrexitShambles 
I have a question for @theresa_may: why do you hate Brexit so much?!   
Comprehensive curtain-raiser from @FT's @alexebarker ahead of Davis-Barnier #Brexit press conference at 11am (GMT). 
Stepping back, one remarkable thing about Brexit is how 27  member states are significantly more united than the 22 members of UK cabinet. 
Sky Data pollWhich comes closer to your views regarding Brexit:Any deal is better than no deal 26%No deal is better than a bad deal 74% 
"Brexit offers a golden opportunity for Britain. As long as nobody gets ill"  
Each step in Brexit process,it was up to the PM to ask: is this in the best interests of the country? She lost sight of that many steps ago. 
My favourite bit of Brexit is probably the casting of Rupert Murdoch, Viscount Rothermere & the owners of the actual Ritz as anti-elite. 
Hard Brexit with no trade deal 'would cost UK economy £400bn by 2030', says study - The Independent  
5/ All other parties either oppose Brexit or want relationship similar to Swiss/Norway. There is clearly a parliamentary majority for that.. 
4/ Labour's position is clear: a no-deal outcome is ruled out. May should offer a cross-party parliamentary body to negotiate Brexit 
Blair MacDougal here complaining about Brexit. Irony overload  
Alan Bennett on @BBCr4today. Clearly not a fan of #Brexit. He belongs to a growing majority! 
Listening to wonderful Alan Bennett on #r4today saying Brexit has made him ashamed to be English. He's not alone...! 
PM to nurse: "There's no magic money tree."PM about preparing for mad, no-deal Brexit: "Where money needs to be spent, it will be spent." 
Brexit damaging NHS:*EU staff leaving*Fallen £ hits NHS buying*Cross-border care*Weaker economy*EMA leaving*EU health research collabs 
Compulsory organ donation scheme hailed as a way to pay for Brexit 
'No deal is BEST deal!' Richard Tice urges Government to LEAVE Brexit table  
Do we have a PM who doesn’t even believe in her own government’s Brexit position?  
Exposing the BBC’s blatant bias:Jacob Rees-Mogg blasts BBC’s 'deep-seated anti-Brexit bias’ amid 'pro-EU' coverage  
Police used excessive force in Catalonia. Hold independent investigation into violence during referendum 
Well this was so completely unpredictable it’s impossible to blame DUP for not seeing it.... #brexit  
READ | ECJ could have final say on Brexit deal. All the more reason to stop messing around with these clowns & WALK! 
Breaking News: Detailed accurate update on UK Brexit plans in today’s @Daily_Record #scoop 
As I recall, Charlie was a Remainer. So every credit to him for engaging in the opportunities of Brexit so constructively now.  
Brexit elite that lied there'd be £350m a week for the NHS is now whinging Philip Hammond won't spend £££££s on, ooops, expensive Brexit! 
Belfast's Brexit Ready is at the Titanic Experience. Yup. And check that bakery name below ...  
A hard Brexit would cost about £11,500 per British worker by 2030, bank says  
When the Daily Mail starts running headlines like these,this hapless Tory Govt must know it's days are numbered.#Brexit#NHS#cutsENOUGH! 
If Brits have to pay for their healthcare in Europe post-Brexit in event of no deal, so should EU citizens here. 
The Government just admitted Brexit could ground all flights. There go all my 'up in the air' jokes.  
Nope, it was all fixed overnight. Trump has resigned, May has shown humility, John McDonnell has learned a new facial expression, Rees-Mogg changed a nappy, there’s to be a 2nd ref on brexit, Texas has banned guns, and Twitter has admitted having 280 characters was a really stup 
PM must not let hard Brexit no deal fringe MPs drive policy. Any hard Brexit mandate lost on June 8. No mandate for no deal Brexit. #R4Today 
Bank of America Merrill Lynch advances its Brexit plan as bank rents huge Paris office  
A 'No Deal' on brexit wd be a "worst case" says boss of British Exporters Association @BBCr4today 
My cartoon - Theresa May’s cabinet finalises its #Brexit plan#r4Today 
Brexit is a huge opportunity for Britain. Acting now we can be ready on day one to forge ahead on day two 
I can answer that one Mick. Most MPs oppose Brexit and all of the intelligent and competent people in parliament are Remainers.  
It is not only as a europhile but also as a britophile that one can recognize #brexit is a very sorry affair. 
Are you joining one of the Pro EU / Anti #Brexit Regional Rallies at 1400 on Sat 14 Oct? Details below.Please RT  
A bad-tempered Brexit is a risky move for universities 
Brexit no deal would be 'devastating for Northern Ireland peace process' #stopbrexit#brexitwontwork 
Brexit is a self-imposed economic straitjacket that will cripple the UK. We don't have to do it. #StopBrexitNow 
Dutch bank (Rabobank) predicts economic disaster from any form of Brexit  
"steep drop in EU nationals registering as nurses since the Brexit vote" We are killing our NHS#brexitwontwork 
UK economy performed very much better over the years we were in the EU than it did before we joined.  Revert to low growth if we #Brexit ?  
A picture's worth a 1,000 words. This is what Mrs May really believes' and why the Brexit 'negotiations' are going nowhere. Just leave!  
.Hard Brexit AND Soft Brexit - BOTH will cause a UK-wide recessionHow about #NoBrexit AND #NoRecession instead?. 
#LeaveEu Go WTO NOW ........BREXIT STITCH UP: European Court of Justice will be able to SCRAP final deal, MPs warned  
'I've changed my mind' Conservative frontbencher admits she would now vote for Brexit  
‘MPs will vote down YOUR Brexit choice’ John Bercow admits ministers could block EU split. Odious little Twerp!  
Jacob Rees-Mogg blasts BBC’s 'deep-seated anti-Brexit bias’ amid 'pro-EU' coverage claims  
If you are a British MP claiming Brexit is now “unstoppable,” & know you are lying & that lie leads to the union breaking apart, 1/  
Average farm profits to tumble by 50% after Brexit..feel very sorry for the Remainer farmers many of whom will have to stop. 
Brexit means Brexit - and we're going to make a success of it. Says Germany's Economics Minister (). 
Our politicians are not fit for purpose. ‘How remain-voting Tories responded to new referendum question ? 
The Government just admitted Brexit could ground all flights  
The harsh reality of #Brexit becomes clearer every day. Nearly every recent poll shows a majority against leaving the EU.  
Brexiters will be celebrating talented EU migrant musicians are leaving. #Brexit means a small minded narrowing view of the world.  
We deserve the truth. The small band of extremists still banging drum of Brexit at any cost must lose all influence for sake of UK.  
Brexit talks are at a standstill, warn diplomats  
Denmark wants to lure workers trapped in a Brexit limbo  
NHS funding cut, food prices rocket, customs chaos, lives ruined & reputation in tatters. Where are leavers with the positives of Brexit? 
 - there's nothing quite like the hypocrisy of a god-botherer. 
Simon Kuper: Can Southeast Asia save Brexit?  
Good to see my ol buddy @liamgallagher makin a whole lotta sense on #Brexit. Why don't we just call the whole ******* thing off? #StopBrexit 
So have the bloody referendum then. Call his bluff  
U.K. government is interested in joining NAFTA, or whatever it becomes, Brexit leader says  
The HSSD Community Referendum Task Force convened again tonight and had another productive meeting. #ServingTogether 
WTF is "enhanced equivalence"?#Brexit  
I added my Brit vote to HP referendum on this question. No-one wants him to go near the Queen, thank you very much.  
Fagin's Brexit referendum song, from Oliver Twist  
Brexit would never have been good, but it didn't have to be this bad. Cracking as ever from @ottocrat  
Brexit: David Davis and Michel Barnier to sum up state of talks  
Ireland: EU membership referendum, RED C poll:Full time students:Remain: 99%Leave/Other answers: 1%#Brexit 
Dublin taxman questions ‘virtual’ frontier after Brexit  via @FT 
Europe will be big Brexit winner, says German economics minister  via @FT 
It’s absurd: every Washington DC tax driver wants to talk Brexit, and is bemused by our decision to leave. They can see it: why can’t we? 
Catalonia’s health minister: “more than 1000 documented injuries from police brutality during referendum”  
BBC News - Scottish firms voice fears over Brexit  
The Government just admitted Brexit could ground all flights  
The answer surely lies with the Labour Party. It needs to engage with Brexit instead of ignoring and finally begin to narrate drastic consequences of No Deal. 
Americans are waking up to this. When will the UK (and UK journalists) realise the Brexit/Trump nexus is the scandal of our era?  
Mercer Bannon Trump Brexit: Russia Probe Now Investigating Cambridge Analytica, Trump’s ‘Psychographic’ Data Gurus  
The culture secretary said the EU referendum was binding – it wasn’t – Channel 4 News at last the truth is outing  
Ireland is saying the UK's hopes for a streamlined, 'virtual' border after Brexit are unrealistic  
Right, this Brexit/no deal idiocy is out of hand. UKGov is off the rails and spiralling. Friends & family need to stage an intervention 1/ 
Great night talking Brexit at Bocking Village Hall. Brexit voters are seriously unimpressed with establishment backsliding. 
Brexit has no mandate. It doesn’t have to happen. Art50 can be reversed. There will be no Brexit. 
May: let’s have TRUTH. Publish the government studies on Brexit effects. Tell us if you’d now vote Leave. What Did lawyers say re Art50? 
Today I encountered my first Brexit prepper. Somebody seriously discussing stocking up on canned food in case of disruption to supplies 
U.K. government is interested in joining NAFTA, or whatever it becomes, Brexit leader says  
Lord Owen: Brexit is now the political centre ground  
"UK brexited a brexit Brexit, and so it never had a chance." 
Brexit Britain could benefit from "no deal" with the EU as it would maximise the advantages of independence  
Another day, another split. Tory chaos paralysing Brexit process. Economy at risk as Ministers fight each other.  
Banzai Brexit seems most appropriate if one looks at the current state of UK government planning  
Referendum repression: Spanish police have now filed criminal complaints against the Mayor of Barcelona @AdaColau, the president of the parliament, the head of the Catalan police, the president of Catalonia @KRLS, and the VP @junqueras  
If there's no deal on Brexit re EU workers, just in our place, we will lose a third of our staff..and it's hard enough to fill positions now 
Am told kids already refer to bad things as ‘a bit brexit’. 
It's a verb. To Brexit:  
It already has. If I described someone's beliefs/politics/values/attitudes to you as "a bit Brexit" you'd know exactly what I meant. 
We are exhausting all possible adjectives for Brexit, until we get to the point when 'Brexit' itself becomes an adjective.  
'No deal is BEST deal!' Proud Brexiteer @TiceRichard  urges Government to LEAVE Brexit table  #ForBritain  
Brexit is damn serious. Many of us have diverted our lives to fight it. But imagine now another crisis. A crash. A conflict. An epidemic. 
“We will defeat anyone that seeks to occupy our lands” — Kurdish Peshmerga commander tells #Rudaw as post-referendum tensions increase.  
Arlene Foster may be the only thing standing between us and a hard Brexit. Politics is completely unhinged now.  
Every Brexiteer in govt should have to publish their vision of Brexit Britain with full explanation of how exactly it will work.#newsnight 
MESSAGE to the #PM @theresa_may please remember YOUR own Words & get on with #BREXIT!  #Conservative #Tory #BBC #SKY 
#Referendum is the only legal way.Let every region go home and decide.#BiafraReferendum #Biafra  
Admit it Brexit is going to bankrupt Britain?  
Given Trump and Brexit, I no longer recognise the merit of universal suffrage. There is now a very strong case for a stupidity threshold. 
Why do sacked Remoaner MPs bleat on about Brexit being bad idea - almost as if they don't trust the electorate & want to put the UK down.  
"According to the World Bank [#Brexit] no-deal would see a 50% reduction in Britain's trade with goods with the EU"   
Brexit: DUP fear 'disaster' no-deal border implications, @PeterAdamSmith reports  
This is RLLY serious. The #LifeScience sector is one of the jewels in our economic crown.  Brexit need not - and must not - damage it.  
BREAKING: Sally Jones 'dead' - White Widow ISIS recruiter 'killed by drone in Syria' 
The EU elite assumes Theresa May will take any Brexit deal. She must shatter their illusion  
The Government just admitted Brexit could ground all flights  
No Brexit deal is not just better than a bad deal — it could be the best deal, says @JLongworthLML @LeaveMnsLeave 
Liz Truss discusses Brexit with the confidence and grace of an ostrich walking a tightrope.  
The EU aren't messing Britain about over brexit. The EU is like  
Noel Edmunds to head up Brexit negotiations armed with 28 red boxes 
Independent Office for Budget Responsibility: govt has £900 million black hole thanks to Brexit #ProjectReality 
The govt is taking advice from Legatum, a think tank whose parent company specialises in disaster capitalism. A no deal #Brexit suits them. 
Brexit uncertainty threatens to create miles of traffic jams around Britain's ports  
9/ But isn’t this - #brexit, Trump, all about people who lack empathy? Isn’t that the divide? 
The Government's own forecasters says #Brexit has already cost the Treasury £900 million in lower tax receipts  
Steve Bell on the budget and Brexit preparations – political cartoon gallery in Putney  
There will be no area in the UK, no social or age group that isn’t adversely affected by Brexit.Join the rallies  
#Leave voters have been deceived on the cost of #brexit .    It’s wasting money, not bringing it in for the #NHS or anything else. 
If no deal Brexit happens, with regret I'll be leaving the UK for good.Hong Kong, Spain, it doesn't matter even if I can't be a doctor. 
Anticipated Brexit economic damage hasn’t happened says #LizTruss. So higher food and fuel prices are just imaginary 
Legally, we can ditch Brexit any time we like. That's an option if the public want it. May knows it. 
The govt continues to act in the style of a gang threatening to kill the hostages. #StopBrexit #Brexit  
Pleased to have worked with @SeemaMalhotra1 and 120+ colleagues to demand @DavidDavisMP publishes @DExUKgov Brexit economic impact studies  
One day, when there's a new president, and UK returns to EU, Trump and Brexit will be warnings for progressives never to be complacent again  
I feel like Liam Gallagher's views on Brexit are more coherent than that of the Prime Minister. There's something I never thought I'd say.  
Why does the Legatum Institute, a Caymans-controlled pro Brexit "think tank", have so much access to David Davis's dept? Details from DexEu:  
Why Brexit, in one line. Spot on by @DanielJHannan in ‘What’s Next’. 
BREAKING:#TrumpRussia probe investigating #CambridgeAnalytica.Mercer's #BigData firm also probed for #Brexit ! 
There's a "very strong" case to hold another Brexit referendum, Jack Straw says  
The simple Brexit truth  
Opportunity to erase the #Brexit  stain; history will show 'the will of the people' was nothing more than a right-wing gerrymandered lie.  
There’s no point planning for a no deal Brexit – if we crash out of the EU, it would be no less than absolute chaos  
My take on the Kurdistan referendum, results show complex opinions on path forward #Iraq @SadaJournal @CarnegieEndow 
Lord Owen - "The centre ground is with #Brexit. This is very hard for the elite to understand."  
Here’s how ONE MILLION illegal migrants will stay in the UK, and the government can’t stop them!  via @Your Brexit 
Never been more ashamed of my country than today, when our PM refused to guarantee that EU nationals could stay in UK after Brexit 
Tate & Lyle, part of American Sugar Refining Inc, supports Brexit to avoid EU tariffs.It supports the Tories.David Davis was a director.  
Transition period #Brexit 
Absolutely, knowing you are against Brexit is first class external validation !  
Cambridge Analytica under investigation in US for their role in 2016 elections. In UK being investigated for Brexit  
If Clegg surfed Twitter it wouldn't take him long to discover deep-rooted anger about uncontrolled  immigration. That's why Brexit is here.  
The negative economic impact of the Brexit result is undoubtedly now being felt  
Above & beyond everything just the sheer level of stupid required to still be supporting Brexit given all that we know makes my brain ache  
Michael Gove's failed Brexit coup. By @Peston 
Only tweeted about Brexit about 33 times today. Beginning to be in control of my rage then. 
BREXIT PUNISHMENT: EU citizens in UK to get FREE healthcare - but Brits abroad PAY  
Is it just me or are the Brits increasingly weird?-What if Brexit is like a...giraffe!-A wh..-We could eat leaves from high trees! 
Perhaps @Anna_Soubry should have read the booklet (sent out by her own government at huge cost to taxpayers) setting out the case to remain in the EU. It clearly states that voting for #Brexit means leaving the Single Market & the Customs Union. 
Brexit uncertainty is affecting Britain's economy, Philip Hammond says  
Great Guardian article by @MollyMEP demolishing Brexiteers trade lies. UK urgently needs referendum on final deal.  
Justice Secretary Liz Truss has said that she WOULD vote for #Brexit in another referendum.  
Actually I’m beginning to think that the unique quality of Brexit is that it’s shit for the many AND the few. 
Gove launched a Brexit coup at yesterday's Cabinet, but failed to take back control  
Bonkers this debate is happening 7 months after the UK triggered Article 50 & 17 months after the country voted for Brexit.  
The EU elite assumes Theresa May will take any Brexit deal. She must shatter their illusion - The Telegraph  
May’s two-year Brexit transition, where the U.K. would trade ‘on current terms’ with the EU, is a legal minefield 
Blow for Theresa May as Jeremy Corbyn says Labour would vote against 'no deal' Brexit - PoliticsHome  
Breaking the Law for Brexit!   Sign the new website ! 
Why is the government keeping parliament and the public in the dark about the Brexit impact studies? We need to know the facts.  
James O’Brien has a fact for you: The four most senior members of the government think Brexit will be bad for the UK  
.The Tory Walls Are Falling DownFalling DownFalling DownThe Tory Walls Are Falling DownBad Bad Brexit. 
Britain accepts EU must share oversight of "clearing" after Brexit, Philip Hammond says  
We take things like press freedom, peace, and reasonable equality, for granted. So we vote Trump & Brexit for lolz. The future is not lolz.  
This is what active abstentionism looks like… #SFMPs working in Brussels, Dublin, Belfast, & London to fight Brexit & deliver for the people  
Construction bosses say they're already feeling Brexit impact  
Catalonia leader condemns Spain’s police and says referendum must be resolved politically   
Dominic Cummings: The "brain behind Brexit" fears that it's already turning into a disaster.   
How did the EU, if at all, respond to the Catalonian Referendum?  
‘NO LONGER TENABLE’ Farage calls for Damian Green sacking over claim Brexit vote was WRONG  
Let's get real: the elite hatred for #Brexit is really a hatred for people power. By Brendan O'Neill  
Not since Brexit  
Quite. And given most people didn't vote for hard Brexit May strives for, still less a cliff-edge, it's not democratic even on its own terms  
."A "no-deal" Brexit would be "devastating" for the peace process in the north, a former taoiseach has said". 
EU citizens' uncertain Brexit status 'intolerable' - CBI boss  
We’re working to protect equality & human rights during Brexit - @EHRCChair at #EUWithdrawalBill briefing tonight, chaired by @MariaMillerUK 
Sinn Féin came together today at the EU Parliament. As the seven MP's joined the MEP team to launch a diplomatic offensive against Brexit.  
Why not test this view? Publish the fifty studies then let's measure the robustness of people's views when faced with facts rather than lies 
Brexit will bring “huge benefits” to Britain’s farmers and fishermen, proudly declares @scottmann4NC at our Brexit rally in Manchester!   
A blindly defiant PM, Mogg & handful of backbench loons will be only ppl left who think #brexit will actually happen.The end game has begun 
Wow. This is what happens when Political parties feed voters BS. Britain could get *very* unstable in coming years #brexit  
Theresa May insists "there is no second referendum" on Brexit  
Poll by @SkyData suggests 74% of people think no Brexit deal is better than a bad deal while 26% think any deal would be better than no deal 
This is the chaos we will have if all flights are grounded on the first day of Brexit  
#Brexit never shot anyone. IRA killers hiding in Republic of Ireland shot people. Take that plank out of your eye. 
Philip Hammond denies refusing to budget for Brexit 'no deal' - Dave Brown - political cartoon gallery in Putney  
Hoping once again to wake up tomorrow to discover that #Brexit was nothing but a very bad dream. Very bad. 
Labour Will Vote Against A 'No Deal' Brexit If Theresa May Returns Empty Handed From Brussels  
'I've changed my mind'Conservative frontbencher @trussliz  admits she would now vote for Brexit   Respect2uLiz 
Iraq orders arrest of Kurdistan officials who conducted independence referendum despite being declared illegal  
Beats me how anyone can think it's worth wasting 1 more second on the madness that is #Brexit. Total insanity. #StopBrexitNow @theresa_may 
Amid all this talk of a 'no deal' Brexit, Labour comes out firmly to warn it would vote against.  
A real danger of no-deal Brexit, like Trump, is that privileged, insulated people are a bit thrilled by it.  
How utterly cretinous to pretend #PMQs is the only time Brexit can be discussed. Another wealthy man uninterested in #UniversalCredit chaos. 
Theresa May’s weakness at home is slowing down the Brexit talks  
Over 120 MPs accuse Government of keeping everyone 'in the dark' on Brexit  
Blow for Theresa May as Jeremy Corbyn says Labour would vote against 'no deal' Brexit  
Germany's economics minister predicted that a new 'spirit of revival' after Brexit would benefit the whole of the EU  
If we had a referendum to ask which we should keep, the Queen or the FM, I'm fairly sure Nicola would be clearing her desk.  
The Brexit bonuses just keep on coming don't they? Give me one good reason why I shouldn't call Brexshiters stupid, just one? Tick rock.  
All those voters that chose Labour over Tories in election weren't voting for Tory Light. They don't want a Brexit deal, but a cancellation!  
.@mikehookemmep “Theresa May finally admits UK fisheries are on the table for Brexit discussions”  
Brexit. Destroying a sector in which we are genuinely world class. Wasting money. Tearing up the cultural fabric of the country we love. 
Philip Hammond is the only Tory politician telling the truth about Brexit  
Back in February an orchestra announced it was leaving the country because of Brexit.  
Labour MP @heidi_mp accuses @theresa_may of "ramping up" no deal Brexit rhetoric because she fears "right-wing rabid elements" in her party  
Please help us, we've got a no-deal Brexit because we accidentally believed a bus.  
UK trade deficit widens as weak pound fails to boost exports  Brexit is not working 
I'm selling this house. No more information available. You can't see it before you buy, but trust me, it's good.Bit like #Brexit really   
Tories gave up on being party of good finance with Brexit. Their project of huge economic self-harm makes everything else seem small change. 
Quit the Single Market & how do we attract foreign investment? Answer, low tax, low regulation, low welfare. Right wing Tory heaven!#Brexit 
But I'm grateful for chance to revisit this, written months before the referendum, aged fairly well I think.  
And see link here, Villiers & Johnson both saying Brexit wd have no impact at all on border. Yet another Leave lie:  
Architect of Vote Leave admits Brexit is turning into a calamity #StopBrexit   
'We were lied to': voters who have changed their mind on Brexit  It's not just Leavers who have changed their minds 
You can't vote on a no-deal deal because there would be no deal to vote on.Good to see Labour's finally wrapped it's head around Brexit.  
Total chaos in Government over #Brexit with successive Ministers contradicting each other about no deal contingency planning #Brexitshambles 
With 120 MPs I've written to @DavidDavisMP asking him to publish the economic impact studies of leaving the EU. #Brexit #EdinburghSouthWest 
'We can't leave it to the last moment!' - Iain Duncan Smith on Hammond's Brexit spending plans  
Everyone, no matter how pro #Brexit knows that #nodeal is economic suicide, except Russian Agent #farage#StopStupid #StopBrexit 
A result (sort of).House of Commons Petitions Committee has agreed to a debate on “Hold a referendum on the final Brexit deal.” 11/12/17  
Boris and Gove are the guardians of Brexit's delivery - sidelining them would look like Brexit betrayal | @asabenn 
May has a choice: The ruination of the country by going ahead with Brexit or ruination of the Tories by stopping it.  
Do you think that Brexit will affect the UK commitments on climate change as part of the Paris Agreement? #Brexit #climatechange #COP21 
So it's "theoretically conceivable" that flights could be grounded after brexit... It's "theoretically conceivable" that aliens will invade. 
Funny, #Leave campaign said #Brexit would SAVE money (which wld all go to the #NHS).Turns out it costs a fortune... 
The worry now is that this lack of concern is turning into abject contempt. Try squaring a no deal Brexit with a solution for N.Ireland. 
So what will the cost of Brexit be? What has it cost us so far? Nobody knows - and we're not going to be told. This has to change NOW! 
Now that I sit and think about things, I really can't believe how disgracefully overlooked Northern Ireland has been in relation to Brexit. 
Can we now pull the plug on #Brexit which will is a far greater fiasco than #gardenbridge? Need a govt that governs & doesn't ruin economy. 
Brexit means Brexit & failure means failure. May was bequeathed disaster & worsened it w/ every option she had. Ppl like Green enabled it. 
FB is down but dw your uncle is still angry about brexit, your school friends are still pregnant and cats are still funny #facebookdown 
How The Spanish Police Got Trolled By A Bunch Of Farmers In The Days After The Catalan Referendum  via @BuzzFeedNews 
Bbc reporting ‘victory for brexiters’ over funding for no deal rather than ‘chancellor says Uk flights could be grounded’. Once more journalism focusing on #brexit theatre over detail 
Sorry, leaving SM/CU, shafting ROI, picking long/pointless rows on ECJ/EU cits is not 'making best Brexit', and you now own the disaster too  
Tories now so weak they can't spare David Davis for Brexit negotiations in Brussels in case they're defeated at home  
GRAPHIC: European political-economic structure (before Brexit)  
Engaging meetings with MEP's, Commisioner Hogans cabinet & Brexit Steering group throughout the day. Pressed all on special status for North  
This needs to be retweeted and reretweeted and rereretweeted until EVERYONE knows that #Brexit is nothing but a right wing Tory decision.  
Delighted to be here at @UCC for the exhibition launch marking the 45th anniversary of the 1972 referendum to join the EEC.Looks great   
Do not let politicians get away with saying “will of the people”.*IF* we Brexit, & it goes horribly wrong, make sure they take the blame! 
Border Communities Against Brexit officially awarded European Citizens Prize in EP this evening. Great endorsement of their campaign!  
If Parliament voted against the final deal we Brexit with No Deal anyway so this is makes zero sense as a position. Art 50 is time limited  
This shouldn’t be a big ask: MPs, forget about your career ambitions & political tribalism for a moment & vote for the country, end #Brexit! 
Post-Brexit flights, a worst-case scenarioAnywhere you like in Europe so long as it's Gibraltar, Belgrade or Moscow 
They would have worked this out months ago if they read my #Brexit Briefings : 
Kurdistan supreme political council met & discussed latest developments.Reiterated, implementing referendum results thru dialogue,Iraq should stop collective punitive measures which affects people & IDPs.Iraq must stop threats of using force.  
Labour might as well be promising a “dolphin first brexit” for all the sense “jobs first brexit” actually makes. 
Joining NAFTA could be one of the biggest post-Brexit trade deals we do, says economist @andrew_lilico 
And for his brilliantly vacuous synthesis of drivel & deceit this month's Brexshit Prize goes to @johnmcdonnellMP. #StopBrexit #Brexit  
Brexit is like been on the Titanic,The Captain is saying there are plenty of life boats so don't panic!But only for first class tickets 
Not just 4 most senior gov ministers who know brexit against UK interests 479 MPs thought so too. Most still in parl. #stopbrexit #RevokeA50 
“no deal” cannot be an option – talking to Bloomberg @business #brexit  
UK will spend what is needed to prepare for Brexit - No 10  
Why the tetchiness about the Brexit billions? Whispers of a 'robust' discussion on the issue at Cabinet yday  
There are hundreds of EU funded improvement projects, like this one in #Margate, all over the country. But you’d never know it. #Brexit  
P. Hammond admits no deal Brexit will mean less money for NHS and social care - definitely not £350m extra per week  
V important and welcome. Lab will vote against no deal - no majority in Parliament for no deal Brexit. Reversibility of Article 50 now key  
So see Brexit talks as a nursery course, of a kind.  Hard real stuff comes afterwards.  And if we can't do a Brexit deal, then...well. 
Something I've been meaning to ask you all.Has anyone got any ideas on #Brexit ?Because Theresa May has told me she's got fuck all! 
Pity you support #Brexit as much as the most ardent Tory Brexiteers. @johnmcdonnellMP 
Yes, John. Stick some empty political rhetoric in front of the word "Brexit". That'll help the poison go down better.  
A jobs-first Brexit is like a books-first library closure. Our party needs to stop sloganeering and start telling people the truth.  
£12.5bn fund manager tells the @Telegraph why Brexit doesn't worry him  
bae: come overme: can't, I'm busy cutting up cyclists and giving ill-informed opinions on Brexitbae: my parents aren't homeme:  
If this is what EU27 are like in A50 talks, under principle of "sincere cooperation", imagine what the post-Brexit trade talks will be like. 
#LordsQs Is govt preparing British farmers for the flood of competing products in wake of no deal on #Brexit? asks @SarahLudford 
Europe will be big Brexit winner, says German economics minister  
Wake up, hope for progress in Brexit talks, see the British government refusing to guarantee your rights, go to sleep, repeat.  
Conservative MP and culture secretary Karen Bradley said twice this morning that the EU referendum was "binding". It may be politically inevitable, but the vote itself wasn't legally binding. Channel 4's @FactCheck team takes a look. 
NEW Blow for Theresa May as Jeremy Corbyn says Labour would vote against 'no deal' Brexit  
'We were lied to': voters who have changed their mind on Brexit  
This is nonsense, can't have vote on 'no deal Brexit'. Potentially could vote to accept deal (if there is one) or reject it (& move to WTO).  
It’s because Corbyn wants Brexit. He’s always wanted Brexit. Brexit will give him the opportunity to build a ‘socialist paradise’  
Govt should publish findings of analysis on the impact of Brexit on different sectors immediately, why are they keeping us in the dark?  
Proud to have signed this important open letter on Brexit. We can't play roulette with our economy.  
Just been confirmed in Commons: UK staying in Common Fisheries Policy during 'transition period'. Brexit is being betrayed. 
Mrs May refuses to say whether she would vote leave or remain in a referendum.  This being the case she is not fit to lead us out of the EU. 
The PM said, “To deliver Brexit, you must believe in Brexit”. That’s why we need a new PM!  
Legatum, aiming to use Brexit to crash UK economy then their billionaire backers buy the assets up on the cheap.  Ain't Brexit just grand? 
Predictable that #brexit from CFP not as simple as #Brexiteers portrayed:  
You can make the SNP Government listen and stop a second referendum by giving us your support - sign up here:  
The idea that the Tory right are fanatically pushing hard #Brexit in the interests of ordinary people, is mind blowingly stupid.#StopBrexit 
If you want a low-tax, low-welfare, low-regulation paradise for the rich, then back #Brexit, otherwise fight it!#StopBrexit #Remain 
“These Brexit-hating car companies think they’re *so* clever, but they’re not fooling me. Not Wally Walsham of Tatworth, no sir.”  
'We're leaving!' May blasts Lib Dem in PMQs saying Brexit Britain will quit fishery policy  
I make no bones about it. With #Trump, #Brexit and inequality rising like flood water, I am afraid for our futures.  
Many have yet to grasp that to end austerity quickly, save the #NHS and protect the welfare state then #Brexit must be stopped.#StopBrexit 
Is the UK heading for ‘hard’ Brexit just because it’s easiest?Me from year ago today, at @FTHolds up quite well. 
I see Ian MacLeod Distillers are to reopen Rosebank Distillery in Falkirk. I guess they don't share Nicola Sturgeon's jaundiced view of the Brexit future. 
Will there be another Brexit referendum? Jack Straw thinks so  
Very pleased to support @DavidLammy & @SeemaMalhotra1 demanding to see the Government's #brexit impact studies. Time ministers come clean.  
Corbyn has so many open goals in PMQ's over Brexit.  He chooses not to take them. Why? Because sadly he supports Brexit.  
Corbyn’s Trappist unwillingness to hold May to account over Brexit is a total betrayal of the young #PMQs 
Or wanting it to happen even tho a post Brexit economy would not be able to fund Labour manifesto plans   
Liam Gallagher is the most sensible voice on Brexit  
Mike Russell tells @CommonsScotAffs Brexit is "bound to end in tears"; "as a process it's already mired in tears, as far as we're concerned"  
Our Irish MEPs and @BCABforEU, winners of the European Citizen's Prize 2017, don't let Brussels forget about border communities #Brexit  
This is NOT what Conservative voters want. Please get on with Brexit, and delivering low taxes, agility, fast growth and tough justice  
Border Communities against Brexit hold protest outside the European Parliament along with SF MPs&MEPs. Before the award ceremony tonight.  
BLOG: An Important Milestone: UK & EU cooperation on UK's transition in the WTO as it leaves EU #Brexit Read more:  
#Spain has slammed the door 18 times to #Catalonia’s referendum bid  #CatalanReferendum #Dialogue 
I've no skin in the Brexit game, retired, EU passport & a way out, but many trapped by Brexit still want it, despite the obvious damage? 
Slogans are all they have. Not a single fact supports Brexit.  
India and the UK are each other's 3rd largest investors, but only respectively 18th and 20th trading partners. After Brexit that can change.  
At what point will politicians stop trying to describe Brexit using slogans?  
Treasury won't even use their time to draw up plans for a clean Brexit  
***NEW VIDEO***A CABINET OF KNAVES  They are intend to ensure Brexit never happens. Let's call them out! Please RT 
We're not just committed to Brexit.We'll work with European leaders to bring the entire EU project down.#CrushtheEU 
For EU citizens, every day since Brexit is Groundhog Day  
Hammond admits Brexit 'no deal' will mean less money for NHS and social care  
All of this predicted before and during referendum campaign and in turn dismissed by man himself as scaremongering  
There’s no point planning for a no deal Brexit – if we crash out of the EU, it would be no less than absolute chaos 
It was a pleasure to talk to students from across #Gibraltar today about my work as their MEP & the #Brexit talks.   
Alex Salmond talked  during the last referendum about Scotland creating the most politically aware electorate. What he actually meant was the most politically brainwashed and compliant electorate.  
Barnier does have boss retorts. Remember 'go whistle' v 'clock ticking'? Now May's 'ball in your court' gets 'Brexit is not a game'. Burn.  
Labour will vote against a 'no deal Brexit'. No majority for no deal in Parliament. Makes issue of whether Article 50 is reversible crucial  
Listen @theresa_may, mad Brexiters don't care how much damage #Brexit causes. But it is your duty to protect the country from harm. #No 
Remainers are asking Leavers - Have you changed your mind about Brexit? Be sure to clicka da linky & tell them ! 
SHIFT: Brexit is now the new political centre ground, according to Lord Owen. Now Britain just needs it delivered! 
This is basically @David_Cameron calling referendums on electoral reform, indyref and then...Brexit  
Try the poll after Brexit. The incentive to remain won't be as strong when members have to fill a budgetary hole once the cash cow departs.  
What does this even mean? Who loses their job first in a jobs-first Brexit?  
Those Brexit parallels  
Sinn FéinMP Chris Hazzard talking live as the Sinn Féin MP, MEP team engage in a diplomatic offensive around Brexit.  
EU youth orchestra to quit UK for Italy over Brexit  
Is it me, or does it seem like Brexit is about to bust? 
Armando Iannucci announces Malcolm Tucker and Alan Partridge Brexit debate  
Err ... No mate. It's not the Brexit "jitters" that are hurting the economy, it's Brexit. 
Welcome & important announcement from @UKLabour. We would vote against no #Brexit deal. Makes question of #Article50 reversibility key. 
Good god, I'm tired of Brexit. It's so soul-crushingly dull. I can't even bring myself to find an entertaining slant to this tweet. 
Liz Truss on R4 giving me hope that I'm not as thick as I thought; her explanations on how our economy is doing well is painful. 
From Brexit novels to coming of age stories, here's what you need to know about this year's Man Booker shortlist  
On R4 Wato  Brexit convert, Liz Truss(Hammond’s No 2) says U.K. economy doing well, suggests she understands brief as badly as she did MoJ 
UK-EU flights grounded from Brexit day? Chancellor says "possibly"Top tour operator: "the public will be in uproar" 
Illegal immigrants should be deported. No ifs. No buts. RT if you agree. #bbcqt #bbcdp #DailyMail #LBCLIVE #Brexit #Conservatives #PMQs 
'Brexit is the new centre ground!' Peer blasts elite saying they can’t accept EU 'failure'  
We gave @NormanMcCann's tweet about @shaneduffy as a post-Brexit border guard some thought. Ain't no one getting through.  
Jeremy Corbyn spokesman reveals Labour would vote against a 'no deal' Brexit in the Commons. Hard to see how the Govt would get it through. 
Spain takes first step toward ending Catalan autonomy after disputed referendum  pic.twitter.com/FpRAAIszHo 
Businesses won’t invest till they know UK-EU deal post-Brexit. Neither Lab/Con is offering any clarity about our long-term relationship. 
Hammond should be sacked he is making no preparation for "no deal brexit because he wants the Fake Brexit 2019 (still members of everything) 
'Theresa May just refused to back Brexit for the fourth time in 24 hours' - @IanBlackfordMP 
The government just admitted how bad a hard Brexit would be for the NHS  
WATCH | @BernardJenkin calls on the Treasury to release the funds needed to prepare for a 'No Deal' Brexit. It's common sense to do so!  
Bears repeating: #brexit has basically poured sugar in tank of government. Now have politicians carrying out a policy they know will harm people.  
Theresa May won't say how she'd vote now on #Brexit. Jeremy Corbyn's Spokesman won't say how the Labour leader would vote either 
MUST-WATCH: @heidi_mp brilliantly slaps down Theresa May's hard Brexit plans as running scared of her own party. Pls RT:  
Hurrah! I did a TV debate against Liz in the referendum. I'd like to think the pro-Brexit case I made has helped to change her mind :-)  
Brexit ‘no deal’ would be a total disaster for our world leading UK aviation sector. Nearly a million aviation employees & more than 250 million passengers per annum would be devastated. Government must avert a catastrophic crisis of confidence.  
Let's get signature numbers on the final deal referendum petition growing faster! Please RT. #Brexit #StopBrexit 
The Government just admitted Brexit could ground all flights  
I look forward to the day when all of SNP ministers walk out, mid PM Questions, having announced the referendum result to be yes.  
PM says we will stay in the Common Fisheries Policy during Brexit transition period, contradicting demands from Michael Gove #PMQs 
Great that @Number10gov confirms gov allocation of £250m for Brexit prep & UK is leaving the single market & customs union in 2019. #PMQs 
Can we spend the money on a second #brexit referendum instead?  
Theresa May is asked the @IainDale question on whether she'd vote for Brexit now. Looks like she's had some time to think about the answer.  
HammondGreenRuddFallonStill fighting the referendum.Still usurping the will of British people.71% now want exit.  
Oh Lordy. As Brexit implodes looks like even Tim Martin has realised it's a total disaster @EUflagmafia #StopBrexit 
"We will leave the EU in March 2019" - Theresa May is confident that there will be no #Brexit negotiations extension #PMQs 
If the EU doesn't want to play ball, Britain needs to get ready for a clean Brexit  
ALL 7 Sinn Féin MPs & Martina Anderson MEP arriving at European Parliament in Brussels for intensive round of meetings relating to Brexit.  
Theresa May says she wants final Brexit deal concluded by March 2019 and negotiations will not continue beyond then #PMQs 
"The lady could not be more wrong" - PM fires back after Labour MP says she's "running scared" over #Brexit #PMQS  
May so unimpressed with Heidi Alexander question on Brexit she nearly throws all her notes away  
Philip Hammond says 'No Deal' could mean losing air travel to Europe.We need to see those Brexit Impact Reports! #BrexitShambles #StopBrexit 
Finally some #Brexit honesty!  Money for 'no deal'  would need to be diverted from health & education  EU. 
It should not be left to the SNP to - week in week out - hold the UK Government to account on Brexit. Where are you Labour? #PMQs 
PM @theresa_may is asked how she would vote in a second EU referendum. Here's her response #PMQs #Brexit  
I can't take @jeremycorbyn seriously on tackling inequality when he endorses a Brexit that'll make it worse. It's his elephant in the room. 
Understand EU27 officials postponed meeting today to review progress in this week’s #Brexit talks because progress less than expected 
Theresa May still won't say how she'd vote in a referendum. Does she back her own Government's approach to Brexit or not? #PMQs 
Managing Director of David Nieper: I don't have a problem with 'no deal' Brexit  
"There is no second referendum," Theresa May says at #PMQs when pressed on her Brexit views  
#Kurdistan Region Prime Minister Nechirvan Barzani received German Ambassador to Iraq Cyril Nann and discussed post-referendum developments  
.@IanBlackfordMP asking the question that @jeremycorbyn (who clearly wants Brexit) should have asked. #PMQs 
Remainer May still won’t say she’d vote for her Brexit policy in a 2nd referendum. Knows she’s inflicting harm 
i in the i: why is Brexit the only contest in which the defeated are expected to pretend to be happy about it:  
No PMQ question on Brexit from Corbyn. Astonishing. 
"Lead or leave" Corbyn tells May after shrewdly ignoring the "which way would you vote on Brexit now" row #PMQs 
Staggering, even for Corbyn. Six Qs to make May wince on her Brexit doubts, and he didn’t mention once. Clearly also terrified by it #PMQs 
Iraqi court orders arrest of Kurdistan electoral commission members who supervised referendum  
Asked how she would vote on Brexit now, PM says she would do as before, despite “Cock Everything Up” not being on the ballot paper. 
We are entering a critical test of British democracy. Are we REALLY going to allow Putin & co to steal our democracy with their "brexit" ? 
Liz Truss on #bbcdp, another tory drip promoted way above her level, totally clueless on preps for Brexit, god help us, this isn't funny. 
Hammond's reluctance to fund No Deal contingency plans proves he wants to sabotage Brexit.RT if you agree he has to go! #PMQs #HammondOut 
History will not be kind to you Mr Mogg; your self-portrayal as an English patriot is nothing less than an echo of Oswald Mosley. 
BREAKING: Iraqi court issues an arrest warrant for the organizers of Kurdistan referendum - @AlArabiya_Eng 
BREAKING: Iraqi court orders arrest of the organisers of Kurdish region indepedence referendum 
The UK trade deficit hit a record high in August  - so the Brexit devaluation not helping exports 
.@mrjamesob has a fact for you: the four most senior members of the Government all think Brexit is against the interests of the country.  
British Airline Passengers Assoc.: "It is utter madness for anyone to think that a Brexit ‘no deal’ would be anything but a total disaster." 
Over 120 MPs demand David Davis publishes assessments on effects of Brexit on UK economy & living standards. #ReleaseTheReports #StopBrexit 
UK and EU set out post-Brexit proposals for global trading arrangements in a joint letter to @wto  
The European Union and United Kingdom engage with @wto members on certain issues arising from UK withdrawal. #Brexit  
I just bumped into #DavidDavis and the #Brexit negotiation team in the #EuropeanParliament  #StopBrexit #EWRC #DayoftheGirl SUPERGIRL 
Top lines from Chancellor:1. Planes could theoretically stop flying on Brexit day, if no deal2. EU should get round table on future trade 
Liz Truss talks with the same knowledge of Brexit as a 14 year old Jacob Rees Mogg talking about girls from a council estate. #r4today 
how exciting to think that a No Deal Brexit will lead us to a scrapping of  few remnants of ethical dignity as we scrabble for despot crumbs 
"Dear Sir, Your question to the PM on Brexit was totally out of order and an intrusion of privacy. I am reporting you & LBC to Ofcom"[claps] 
No-deal is political disaster porn for Brexit extremists  
The right-wing press has been whipping up hate against migrants for years. 2013 article by @IanDunt #Brexit #Remain 
. @M_AndersonSF greets the Magnificent 7 at the EU Parliament, Brussels. As the 7 Sinn Féin MP's embark on an intensive 2 day Brexit lobby.  
NEWS! New report claims Old MacDonald will no longer have a farm after Brexit  
Oh what a surprise. From 350 million a week for the NHS, to every penny spent on #Brexit means less for the NHS. 
Please call for Brexit Impact Studies, which taxpayers funded, to be published  
If Brexit is all about parliamentary sovereignty then stop bypassing Parliament and publish the impact assessments today @DavidDavisMP 
Govt have ignored Parliamentary Questions & FOI requests. Keeping Parliament & the public in the dark on Brexit economic impact unacceptable  
Brexit doesn't work for the any, let alone the many. 
British government runs out of adjectives to describe Brexit  
Taxpayers' money funded 50 Brexit economic impact assessments. Absolute scandal Govnt are refusing to publish so Parliament & public can see  
Labour stands ready to take charge of the negotiations and deliver a jobs-first Brexit deal that works for the many, not the few. 
More chaos in Government as Chancellor warns a No deal Brexit could lead to suspended UK-EU air travel the day after PM said No deal is fine 
Simply reckless. Any competent  government would be planning for every outcome They made exactly the same mistake during the referendum  
Most corrupt government in history holds a corrupt referendum to see off UKIP threat. It fails. We pay. Cameron & Osborne get lucrative jobs 
You might have a point if as soon as sterling collapsed after the referendum the Barclay Brothers didn't buy up loads of London real estate and Murdoch didn't bid for Sky. Establishment elite on the Leave side were out to make a quick buck off the backs of the 99% as well 
No, Kate, most of us are trying to stop the unravelling of the Good Friday Agreement,  a post-Brexit downturn, and the rise of sectarianism  
Theresa May: more confident about our prospects in a nuclear war than in the Brexit negotiations  
Xenophobia directed against EU27 nationals must be made as unacceptable as racism - which it is a form of.  #StopBrexit #Brexit 
Have we not used up all the normal adjectives yet? When are we onto jejune Brexit, splenetic Brexit etc?  
It's a pity that you @johnredwood deceived the British public by claiming we would hold most of the cards in any negotiations. #Brexit  
No Brexit deal is not just better than a bad deal — it could be the best deal, writes @JLongworthLML 
Brexit impact assessments of damaging effects on jobs & living standards aren't being released by the Tories. #ReleaseTheReports #StopBrexit 
Glad to have had the chance to sign this letter, demanding that the Government publishes its studies into the economic impact of Brexit.  
Angus MP who couldn’t decide on Brexit accuses SNP MEPs of trying to block it  
And now we go live to Brexit  
“Been in an accident that wasn’t your fault?”Yep... Brexit. 
Former Lib Dem leader @Nick_Clegg tells @EmmaBarnett why Europeans are not to blame for lack of progress on Brexit negotiations #5liveDaily 
Philip Hammond can't say what the benefits of Brexit will be. Not even one. Select committee live now  
Government should come clean and be honest about the real cost and impact of Brexit by making their economic impact studies public. 
.@theresa_may, you need to shape up fast. You cruelly slaughtered @andrealeadsom, claiming belief in Brexit. Don’t you dare let us down now.  
This leaves the obvious question of why they are still pushing ahead with a hard Brexit programme they have admitted would be disastrous. 
Thread: After years of pandering to the Tory right, the government is now admitting a hard Brexit is bad for the UK.  
Today's PMQs: Woman who secretly thinks Brexit is awful v Man who secretly thinks it's great. Swap party leaderships? 
Estonian parliament debated #Catalonia yesterday, condemned Spanish police violence during the referendum  
A total non-story and the @Independent is hysterical. We heard all this bollocks before the referendum. They really must think we’re idiots.  
Arrggh. There are three issues on the table. Try solving them, then EU will talk trade. Stop prevaricating! #Brexit  
might just check how brexit is going*opens door to reveal combine harvester chewing through pile of screeching penguins*oh 
The government just admitted how bad a hard Brexit would be for the NHS  
Not publishing #Brexit impact assessments keeps public and MPs in dark more than EU, which will have own analysis. 
Britain are 17 months away from #Brexit day, and there still hasn't been a single mention of any #avaition deal between UK & EU. 
The Government just admitted Brexit could ground all flights  
BELIEVE in Brexit? What? Like it's a religion? UK being trashed by cult propaganda by a zealot who would desert his followers as they sank.  
Grateful to Amanda McMillan & @GLA_Airport for input to & hosting launch of new @scotgov report on #Brexit & business  
Peter North campaigned for #Brexit on grounds of control & sovereignty. He is, like most leavers, a hateful xenophobe #Thingsnotonthebus 
NEWS! Theresa May searching for best Brexit deal on market comparison sites  
#BREAKING: Flights between EU and UK could be suspended on day of Brexit, Philip Hammond admits #premium 
Who says? 80 percent of electorate voted for parties backing brexit and Parliament overwhelmingly voted for Article 50 
The tories will wait until economic and social conditions are so bad, before pulling Brexit in the national interest. Either that or ref2 
Theresa Maybe? PM refuses to say how she'd vote in another Brexit referendum  
Clever wording from Hammond, but it's irresponsible not to be preparing for a hard Brexit, at least to some extent  
If you needed evidence that everyone including the PM, knows Brexit is a terrible idea and simply the result of a Tory civil war. This is it  
"Brexit will shake Britain out of laziness, An end to migrant influx will give homegrown talent a chance to shine" 
Brexit fears. @Feorlean unveils business report with @GLA_Airport Amanda McMillan. 
Liam Gallagher absolutely nailing what hundreds of politicians in the UK and further afield couldn't on #Brexit  
Chancellor Philip Hammond very wrong not to put money aside for a no deal scenario. We need to show EU how tough we are! #Brexit #Budget2018 
"There will be a referendum!" - Angus Robertson, at #SNP17 "On Thursday 20 September 2018!" - Peter A Bell, at every opportunity.#ScotRef 
Hammond says “no deal” Brexit could theoretically lead to suspension of air travel between EU and UK -  
Tate and Lyle is strongly in favour of #Brexit, to avoid EU tariffs on non-EU sugar cane.David Davis is a former director of Tate and Lyle.  
Hammond admits spending billions on ‘no deal’ Brexit will be cash not available “for NHS or social care" 
Arrived in Brussels with SF MPs for full day of meetings on Brexit and the implications it will have on Ireland. @M_AndersonSF 
That visit by Martin McGuinness marked the turning point in EU prioritising Ireland in #Brexit negotiations. Lots of work still to do.  
My 1st guest today on @bbc5live is...  roll pls: @nick_clegg -he's going to tell us how to stop Brexit. Lend us your ears 10am #5livedaily 
Ireland topping the agenda again in Brussels. At hearing organised by local authorities outlining threats of #Brexit to Irish border region.  
As @theresa_may flounders on Brexit, the country turns to Tucker and Partridge for some sanity, via @Aiannucci  
Theresa May says she can't guarantee the rights of EU citizens if there's no Brexit deal. Why are they still treated like bargaining chips?  
Dear Leave Voter.Whilst I agree with you that brexit will happen, I will never be on your side 
Brexit affects us all & we should all know its impacts. To ensure scrutiny & effective opposition, Labour statement please @Keir_Starmer 
Once again: North reveals the face of Brexit.  
Brexit will be a betrayal of the UK’s fight for equality | Claude Moraes  
Simon Gordon explains why Brexit should cut queues at Dover, not create them | @BrexitCentral 
Robertson: “There will be a referendum on Scottish independence.” 
*Brexit Explained*  
Hoping to question academic & legal witnesses re complexities of #Withdrawalbill, devolution & upholding #EU citizens rights #Brexit  
Explaining why a 'no deal' Brexit immediately (in March 2019) disrupts some UK roles in EU science- as Commission announced last week.  
There Is No Brexit Dividend #BrexitInFiveWords 
Nothing exposes the intellectual void of Brexit more than your Northern Irish border problem. You’ve been dealing with this for 50 years ... 
I'll spell it out. Anyone who now believes that Theresa May and her cabinet will deliver ANYTHING like a meaningful #Brexit is deluded. 
With news of a 50% loss of income for farmer's after #brexit. How will that affect Scottish farmer's? @ScotTories @RuthDavidsonMSP 
"No cash in Budget for 'no-deal' Brexit" says Phillip - UK isn't prepared at all for leaving the EU! Hammond  
They have a duty to work in the interests of the United Kingdom - #brexit is not in any shape or form in those interests. 
NEWS! Prepare for a no-deal Brexit, say people whose only job is to make a deal on Brexit  
Daily Briefing:- Markets relieved at Catalan fudge- May dodges Brexit question- Italy law could hurt 5-Star party 
People who want brexit.1: millionaires trying to avoid the new EU 2019 anti tax evasion laws (the real reason for brexit)2: the racists & the fascists3: Bloody minded people refusing to admit they made a mistake4: the MSM brainwashed who still believe the red bus#exitbrexit 
‘No deal’ Brexit plan suspiciously similar to Middle Ages  
Record widening trade deficit shows we have a government ill-prepared for the global trading economy post-Brexit - @BarryGardiner 
Govnt are keeping Parliament and the public in the dark about the economic impact of Brexit. What are they hiding?  
Chancellor Phillip Hammond reportedly "overjoyed" that Brexit may soon lead to the £ being equal to the € as he's not confident with sums. 
"Do be quiet I'm winning Brexit over here!  
I believed in Brexit until I was about seven, then I worked out it was just my dad dressing up as David Davis.  
Today I have sent a letter to @DavidDavisMP with @SeemaMalhotra1 and over 120 MPs demanding to see @DExEUgov Brexit economic impact studies  
Let's keep up the pressure! Tag your MP and RT now! More than 120 MPs demand Gov't publish Brexit impact studies. 
Lord David Owen - a breath of spring air talking good sense on politics and BREXIT - to BBC'S Today's John Humphrys 
This completely ignores the young remain vote. Young ppl will be most affected by Brexit, yet most voted against it. 
My speech from #SNP17 on the tampon tax - if UK Gov can't deal with tampons and VAT, how the hell are they going to get us through Brexit?  
Should Taxpayers' money be spent on preparing for a "no-deal" Brexit? No cash in Budget for 'no-deal' Brexit-Hammond  
The facts haven't changed but the costs & consequences of Brexit become more apparent daily. I am proud to have voted Remain & would again. 
Anyone who voted remain but now says they'd vote differently is a liar, daft or a xenophobe. Brexit is ALREADY a disaster for the UK  
The Musicians Union @WeAreTheMU says #Brexit “threatens the cultural fabric of our great nation”:   via @labourlist 
Brexit impact assessments - Thought to show long lasting damage to the UK are being kept from the public by Davis.   
NEWS! Hopes raised of second referendum after Theresa May categorically rules it out  
May again refuses a referendum on the facts, because the hardliners pushing her from behind know they would lose. - Brexit must be stopped. 
Lord Owen: "The centre ground is with Brexit. This is very hard for the elite to understand." Top man. 
"#Brexit talks being held up by absent British negotiating team"5m people depend on you.More professionalism now!  
The Government knows #Brexit will be a disaster - but won't tell the public. WHY? #StopBrexit @Conservatives 
Brexit is like a mental narcotic. It takes previously interesting people and turns them into babbling idiots.  
I take the old fashioned view that if Parliament puts something to a referendum it should abide by the result and make best of it.  
A strong anti Brexit opposition party is what we need to put the brakes on and get us out of this position. This means you @UKLabour 
Where were all these anti-poverty anti-racist campaigners before Brexit got them worrying their holidays on Amalifi coast might get dearer? 
WE NOW GO LIVE TO BREXIT  
MPs must act with urgency in national interest: British parliament must reassert its sovereignty and reverse Brexit  
New slogan: "Forward to Brexit! Let's give ourselves a proper hammering!"  
It must be painful sitting on that fence Anna it is about time you & other MPS put country before Party &  opposed this damaging Brexit 
Known knowns. Brexit will be bad. Known unknowns. 50 Brexit impact assessments. Unknown unknowns. The Govt truly has no clue, no plan. 
It's a good idea when we have a referendum to support the result.As a UK MP you should respect democracy not thwart it at every junction. 
2/2 Brexit ideologists  should do the same. On June 8 people rejected their no deal #HardBrexit. 
"Prepare for the worst on Brexit" - oh yes I remember that Tory slogan  painted on the side of a bus and driven across Britain.  
It's one thing to ask us to work together to make the best of Brexit, but don't expect us to pretend we think this is best course for the UK 
Public money has funded these #Brexit impact assessments. Outrageous the Government is keeping them secret   
British PM May refuses to say how she would vote in another Brexit referendum  
The Tories lost their majority in June because of the stance on Brexit. Leaving EU a vote loser  
have we considered just not doing brexit. i'm gonna toss this idea out there & hope it floats its way to No. 10 
IF Brexit happens, it’s the end of the UK.  
Tory #Remainers won't speak out against #Brexit because they're putting their own jobs before the country and its citizens. Disgusting. 
120 MPs call on David Davis to 'come clean' about Brexit impact on the economy  
Karen Bradley on BBC news refuses to commit on whether she thinks #Brexit is now the right thing to do. Blames the electorate. 
Very reassuring the PM won't commit to vote for Brexit in the inevitable referendum on 'her' deal. No sensible person would do so. 
Why do Brexiteers want everyone to now agree Brexit is a good idea -almost as if they don't trust their judgment & need external validation 
How can anyone trust the Tories with #Brexit? May’s Deputy says UK would have been better off voting Remain  
Nigel Farage: "This Is The Clearest Proof Yet That The Great Brexit Betrayal Is Under Way"  
We've reached the bit where temporarily honest politicians, from the PM down, get a kicking for refusing to lie about Brexit, haven't we? 
PM won't confirm if she'd vote for #Brexit. Let's have a Vote on the Deal, then she'll be forced to make up her mind. #exitfrombrexit 
In Hammond, Rudd and Green the Cabinet is top-heavy with ardent Remainers. Without a PM who is firm and decisive for Brexit that's untenable 
Some days you have ask yourself "What would the government be doing if they weren't doing #brexit"? 
'MPs urge David Davis to publish Brexit impact assessments.' Even if they don't publish I suggest someone actually reads them  
It is Chancellor's duty to make contingency plans for all economic risks. Hammond refusing to do so as part of his anti-Brexit push. Get rid 
This morning the Culture Secretary joined the PM in refusing to say how she would vote in a 2nd EU referendum@piersmorgan @susannareid100 
OMG!!!!Theresa May doesn’t believe in Brexit!!Commander in Chief The deliverer!!Couldn’t deliver a fckn pizza 
It is clear now that #UKIP is the only party that can be trusted with #Brexit.  
I don’t want to get your hopes up about having another referendum, but Theresa May has said we’re definitely not having one. 
PM refuses to say she'd vote leave. Chancellor won't budget for 'no deal' & 1st Sec of State says this. Gov't can't be trusted with #Brexit!  
Transporting freight to Europe isn't frictionless  - Brexit can actually cut the queues writes Simon Gordon  
“Farm incomes may halve after Brexit”I didn’t see that written on the side of any tractors.  
Cos it’s a terrible idea with consequences far worse than Brexit?   
UK Brexit negotiation team responsible for big holes in schedule by not being available for meetings #BrexitShambles #r4today #ToryShambles 
This day last year the late Martin McGuinness put Ireland @ top of #Brexit agenda in Brussels. 2day our 7 MPs join our MEPs to continue work  
Cameron called a referendum and May triggered Article 50 way too early. Catastrophically bad judgements. #r4today 
This is , in a nutshell, the core #Brexit problem - the belief in the British right wing establishment that the world revolves round them.  
Mrs May's second in command, Damian Green, told Newsnight "it would have been" better had the country voted Remain. So why support #Brexit? 
The new Government White Papers underline just how far from ready we are for a #Brexit no deal  
Do you really think the voters in maj of Labour constituencies that voted Brexit did it to get Corbyn’s independent Socialist UK? 
Brexit is a chance to unlock politics. Britain will be a better place to live. #Brexit  
Petition: Leave the EU immediately  46,380 Signatures for the #Brexit we voted for RETWEET 
Fake self-styled Eurosceptic Philip Hammond wrecked our defences at the MOD, was a useless Foreign Secretary & now he's wrecking Brexit. 
Anti-Brexit Spreadsheet Phil's refusal to make prudent preparations for leaving the EU without a 'deal' is grossly irresponsible. 
Lose-lose May: Discussing a Remain PM pursuing a Brexit she doesn’t believe in on @GMB in a mo with @piersmorgan @susannareid100 @IainDale 
OMFG!!!!Theresa May doesn’t believe in Brexit!!The commander in chief!!!Rat wing media speechless..Disaster the abyss looms!!!  
British driver 'knocks down and kills migrant blocking road in Calais'  via @MetroUK 
#honestpoll Now it seems we may be facing "no deal" #brexit, how would you vote? Please #retweet to increase sample size. Result snt 2 PM. 
Why is she pursuing a Hard Brexit if she’s still not sure Brexit is a good idea in the first place?  
EU: Majority in all member states sampled so far want to remain part of the EU - no Brexit domino effect. #Brexit #EuropeanUnion 
Greece, EU membership referendum, Pew poll:Remain: 65%Leave: 35%#Brexit 
Sweden, EU membership referendum, Pew poll:Remain: 78%Leave: 22%#Brexit 
A MUST READ: EU publishes all the lies we have been sold by the press about the EU since 1992. #Euromyths #Brexit RT 
RT if you agree #Brexit  
No cash in Budget for 'no-deal' Brexit, says Hammond  
Brexit really is the most embarrassing exposure of the British political class since Suez.UK politics needs a full overhaul one it's over. 
Think @georgesoros is a bogeyman for the @GOP? The Hungarian gov't is holding a national referendum to condemn him.  
Only a Conservative government will deliver #Brexit!  
BC voters must be confused, seeing as @BCLiberals MLAs all supported a PR referendum during their clone speech, yet now all oppose. #bcpoli 
Referendum passes!!! Thanks Reedsburg! #Reedsburgpride #FutureofReedsburgSchools 
Former .@UKIP leader Nigel Farage tweeted: "How can Theresa May negotiate Brexit without believing in it?"  
Britain could join NAFTA if it fails to get Brexit trade deal: Telegraph newspaper   
I voted for #Brexit, but have no problem with the PM having voted Remain. Probably most unifying position for UK is a Remain PM delivering Leave. Theresa May won't say if she'd vote for Brexit now 
'The hero of Sputnik’s reporting was Julian Assange, the founder of Wikileaks, who suddenly turned into a Spain expert right before the referendum'  
Don’t blame 1st Sec of State @DamianGreen, for #Brexit. He didn’t want it but someone’s gotta do it. Our report:  
You know the country's gone to shit when Liam Gallagher is more cogent on Brexit than the Government pursuing it.  
"@jamieoliver, who threatened to pack his bags if we voted #Brexit, still hasn't left yet": @TRobinsonNewEra —  #UK 
Thanks to all MPs holding the gov to account. #stopbrexit #revokeA50 If IAs showed brexit was truly ‘great’ they’d have leaked these by now.  
Release the secret IAs! May must have read them. If brexit is so ‘glorious’ she’d vote to leave second time round. #stopbrexit #RevokeA50 
.@DamianGreen, @theresa_may & so many MPs on both sides know that Brexit is madness.When will they put our country before their parties?  
You can start by tackling the ethnic injustice brought about by Brexit Mrs May @theresa_may. Fix what you broke right here on your doorstep 
In a Brexit-induced desperation, British ministers are thinking of climbing aboard the sinking ship that is NAFTA.  
Super #EU heroes stand up for #europe and fight #brexit & populism  Amazing trip to #brussels for the #EWRC thanks to #europeancommission 
Brexit impacts us all and we all have the right to know what that means. @theresa_may & co hold no higher rights. Thank you @SeemaMalhotra1 
Sums up why govt is making a complete hash of Brexit process, preparations & negotiations: they are mostly remainers who don’t want to leave  
And if those studies confirm brexit will be bad for UK any minister continuing in that knowledge to pursue brexit IS guilty of misconduct in office. 
Guess he didn't spend the night of the referendum biting his nails... scared for his country... like I did!#CDNPOLI #CPC #LPC #NDP #GPC 
Farm incomes may halve after Brexit, says report  
120 MPs call on David Davis to 'come clean' about Brexit impact on the economy 
This is how dire Brexit is:Theresa May wouldn’t vote for it:And she’s in charge of negotiations.. 
Jaw-dropping moment Mr Juncker urges critics of EU to 'COMPROMISE'Without even a hint of irony he urges "People who struggle with compromises struggle with democracy and struggle with Europe.”So glad we're leaving #EU#Brexit 
120 MPs sign letter to David Davis demanding govt publish Brexit impact assessments  
... shake all this out: Labour will move to a position where you get say £350m+ /week for NHS but only with a Labour soft Brexit. 
Perhaps forgetting the jobs that will be lost due to #Brexit and the near £2Trillion debt he has helped accrue. #UKGov 
The epitaph to Brexit:Fuck Sake!  
Ambassador Omar Hilale: Referendum Option in #Sahara is Definitely Buried.#MAECI #Morocco 
They're like naughty schoolboys, thinking #Brexit is a wheeze, safe in the knowledge they are financially cushioned.  
1) No deal on #brexit is becoming more real. No deal means no #citizensrights as Theresa May admitted today on @LBC 
It is also a double dereliction of duty to UK citizens in EU:1. Deny many of them vote in referendum2. Remove their rightsDisgraceful. 
Buy 100, 200 or 1,000 Bollocks to Brexit stickers. Profits to remain. Parties, Festivals, planting & wind up leavers  
top psephologists Curtice & Ford confirm net GE17 traffic for Conservatives vs Lab re Brexit: no net Leave gain, significant net Remain loss  
Theresa May refusing to answer questions about secret advice that says Brexit can be stopped  
I am one of the signatories of this letter calling for publication of the Brexit impact studies.  
The public & MPs have a right to know what the Brexit impact assessments say. They should be  published immediately.  
Alongside @DavidLammy we have written, alongside 120 MPs, to @DavidDavisMP asking to publish the impact studies on leaving the EU. #Brexit  
May is now a liability:not only to her party, but also to conservatism generally, to Brexit, and to the country.She has to go. 
.The Future of Brexit Britain is that there won't be a Britain anymore ¯\_(ツ)_/¯.  
It’s interesting watching this prog about the significant rise in hate crime post brexit, yet we can’t say brexit has racist roots #panorama 
Pls RT: My letter with @DavidLammy signed by 120+ MPs << MPs urge @DavidDavisMP to publish Brexit impact assessments  
Even the Prime Minister isn’t convinced by the government’s approach to Brexit... 
"You can only deliver Brexit if you believe in Brexit."So @theresa_may Were you lying then or are you lying now? 
Do follow @MatthewOToole2, who recently exited @Number10gov and is telling some more welcome home truths on Brexit #stopbrexit 
Parliament, the sleeping giant, it must not allow this apparent Brexit deception to go any further, time to lead the scrutiny of the debacle  
All Remainer @Labour and @Conservatives MPs need to stand up and shout the truth: “Brexit is a terrible idea!”Stop flapping and be honest.  
The woman prepared to deliver  #Brexit  at any cost doesn't know if she would vote for it.....more evidence of a dysfunctional government  
If Brexit is such a golden opportunity, why are we being kept in the dark?  
This is where we are. Brexit Britain.  
Amazing how irrelevant Corbyn has been to the Brexit debate. With a strong leader of the oppo, the whole thing would be dead in the water 
Surely if UK is on the verge of historic rupture with EU all known facts must be made public & considered in weighing up the Brexit outcome  
Lets face it, May's seen sector by sector reports on effect of Brexit that everyone else can't, so no wonder she won't say she'd vote leave.  
Spare us the faux outrage. PM backed Remain like nearly half the country. But she respects the referendum result and is delivering Brexit. 
Wow. Even @theresa_may doesn’t know if she’d support #Brexit in another referendum 
120 MPs demand to see secret Government Brexit impact studies. Slowly but surely Parliament is waking up #StopBrexit 
.@Conservatives are going to ruin this country & make life hard(er) for all but the rich. We need to bring them down before they do. #Brexit 
Today I cancelled a bronchoscopy because on further discussion, & with new information, the risks outweighed the benefits. Bit like Brexit. 
What’s the chances of @paulmasonnews & @OwenJones84 asking Jeremy Corbyn if he would vote for Brexit if there was a referendum today. 
Theresa May refuses to endorse Brexit on LBC so i thought Daily Express will demand she resign, who do they attack?  
16 months post referendum & we're still #BargainingChip despite numerous Gov declarations of wanting to guarantee rights. #peopleB4politics 
Together with over 120 colleagues, I've urged David Davis to publish #Brexit impact assessments @guardian  
The Guardian front page, Wednesday 11.10.17: May dodges question on Brexit vote  
If the Secret Brexit impact assessment was good David Davis wouldn't be keeping it secret. #bbcnews  
Someone ask @jeremycorbyn the same question @BBCNews @SkyNews @itvnews @CNN @guardian @theipaper @Channel4News @Brexit  
Wednesday's THE TIMES: "Hammond refuses to budget for hard Brexit" #tomorrowspaperstoday #bbcpapers 
CONTROVERSIAL TAKE: I get why it's fun to ask Theresa May if she'd vote for Brexit now but it's just irrelevant, isn't it. Why do it. 
In the face of the EU’s petulance, we must start preparing for a ‘no deal’ Brexit says @thesun 
MPs urge David Davis to publish Brexit impact assessments  
Mrs May doesn't know how she would vote if Referendum was held again. I do: She would vote Remain again! Brexit is leaderless & rudderless! 
Any Brexit plan put to HoC by May will fail. Therefore May not negotiating with real authority. Grands Écoles eat this stuff for breakfast 
A third of young people feel that Brexit is messing with their mental health. @neweuropeans#StopBrexit 
Brussels lays down EU lawEU27 Nations NOT ALLOWED talks on UK trade without Brussels say so!Well that's what happens when Nations surrender their Sovereignty to Brussels.So EU27 MUST ask Brussels permission BEFORE participating in Global trade.#Brexit 
#BREAKING : Officially, Catalan Government has just signed declaration of independence after an over 94% Yes vote in the Referendum 
Exclusive: what Theresa May really thinks about Brexit shown in leaked recording  
What a bitter, nasty, xenophobic country we've become. Fuck this shit, it's absolutely shameful. Hang your heads, brexit-wankers.  
PM refused to say how she'd vote if there was a Brexit vote now: 35% of Tory members think she wants to stay in EU  
Farmers' incomes "will be cut in half" by hard Brexit, study finds  
IEBC has been asked to initiate referendum for creation of  Democratic Republic of Kenya and Central Republic of Kenyan. If Kibor can divorce, why not us? 
#KRG @PMBarzani & #German Amb in Iraq @GermanyInKRI discussed post-Referendum period, regional & international reactions & need for dialogue  
More than a third of young people believe that Brexit has impacted their mental health #MentalHealthAwarenessDay  
Britain is once again blamed by EU over Brexit talks, this time for taking a midweek break  
She is entirely right to avoid being divisive. She is seeking to unite the country, not to perpetuate referendum divisions. @Conservatives 
ROMANIA: Four-Times Married Adulteress Kim Davis Tours With Liberty Counsel To Back Anti-Gay Referendum -  
Tomorrow at PMQs: the woman who secretly thinks Brexit's terrible versus the man who secretly thinks it's great 
WATCH: Jacob Rees-Mogg destroys the CUSTOM UNION argument in just 90 seconds  via @Your Brexit 
"I'm going to get a bit technical about this Iain...." EU citizens living here might be totally stuffed because of my party's Brexit chaos.  
Theresa May admits 'we don't know' impact of no-deal Brexit on EU citizens  
Me in Guardian tomorrow on the curious creed of Brexit's eager cliff-jumpers  
What links Trump, Brexit, debacle in Catalonia is embrace of ignorance, incompetence as guiding political values. It's astounding. 
#CatalonianReferendum Looks like the EU have got a bigger problem than UK #Brexit.  
Brexit talks are facing a point of no return in December – and now the UK has plans for emergency ‘no-deal’ spending  
PUGDEMONT GOES BACK #Referendum #Spanien #Katalonien #Puigdemont 
In case you missed it,Theresa May said she doesn’t think having no plan for #Brexit is costly mistake  #MayonLBC 
Theresa May unable to reassure an EU citizen who has lived in the UK for 31 years that they'll be allowed to stay if there's no Brexit deal  
Today I learned the 2014 indy white paper was "irrelevant" because after a yes vote other stuff might have happened and other parties would no longer "report to London"But also, unlike brexit, at least people knew what they were voting for in indyref 
PMQs tomorrow now huge. PM needs to explain why she thinks Brexit has to happen and will succeed or it could all unravel for her petty fast. 
May says she'd weigh up evidence on Brexit again, she shouldn't deny that right to the British people - @JoSwinson 
Liam Gallagher on Brexit  
And OUT of ECJ too @theresa_may ? Otherwise it wont be Brexit, will it?  
The Homa Bay Town MP asks @IEBCKenya to get ready for a referendum on secession.  
When the person who has seen all the reports won’t commit to Brexit, it is quite clearly not in the best interests of the UK to leave.  
Nigel Oxenden born today in 1895. Won a MC & bar, intro'd surfing to the UK.If he was alive Brexit would be fine.But he isn't, so it won't  
Hard Brexit now means 'no deal'? It uses to just mean leaving SM. Soubry & other Tory remainer MPs need to stop talking and start voting  
Two awful things from May in recent days; ECJ climb down and dithery non-answer about whether she believes in Brexit. Support may ebb away. 
Off to #skypapers to talk about Brexit like  
Maybot adopts radio silence over Brexit | John Crace  
"We're not having another referendum and that's absolutely crucial. We're not having another referendum! We are going to deliver on the vote of the British people & we're going to deliver Brexit. 29th March 2019 we come out of the European Union." @Theresa_May #MayOnLBC 
TM hints that EU citizens in case of a no deal Brexit would lose their rights. NO DEAL has got to mean: REMAIN.   
All-purpose Brexit thread.1. Well. 
‘We’re going NOWHERE!’ Finance CEO praises Brexit Britain and SNUBS EU alternatives  
This is Jimmy. Jimmy is a foot soldier for the Brexit cult. He believed all the Leave lies. People like Jimmy now dictate British politics.  
Britain could join NAFTA if Brexit trade deal fails: Telegraph newspaper  
Brexit 2016: As easy as falling off a logBrexit 2017: A purging whirlwind that will smite the impure and cleanse the nation with holy fire 
No Brexit deal is not just better than a bad deal — it could be the best deal - The Telegraph  
.@Nigel_Farage lets rip at Theresa May after she refused to say whether she’d vote for Brexit in a second referendum  
"We are not having another referendum...we are going to deliver Brexit...29th March 2019 - we come out of the European Union" @theresa_may 
.Oooh - VERY BIG PROBLEM "Farmers’ incomes will be HALVED if May fails to get post-Brexit trade deal with EU". 
Keir Starmer on Tory Brexit: "There is nothing patriotic about joy riding our economy off a cliff!" 
Theresa May’s ‘no deal’ Brexit plan shows why we need Welsh independence  
Says a party that pursued #Brexit despite Bombardier stating it was in company's interests to stay in EU. Where was the focus on jobs then?  
Does May agree with her own govt's Brexit policy?Also: Does Corbyn agree with *his* party's Brexit policy?#thestateofBritishpolitics 
Unacceptable. The Tories' chaotic handling of Brexit means no deal is a real risk. @Theresa_May must guarantee EU migrants' rights now. 
The real reason why we have #Brexit@Anna_Soubry @nickreeves9876 @TheNewEuropean @UKLabour @LibDems #StopBrexit 
How can @Theresa_May negotiate Brexit without believing in it?  
Proof of utter chaos at heart of disastrous dysfunctional Tory #Brexit negotiations revealed by skilful @IainDale 
Theresa May refuses to say if she would vote for Brexit in fresh poll  
Minister @simoncoveney explains how #budget18 measures will help us keep #working4irl increasing support for #brexit & @Irish_Aid priorities 
LBC: "If there were a referendum tomorrow, would you vote Leave?"Theresa May: "..."My sketch:  
Theresa May refuses to say how she would vote in fresh Brexit poll - video  
No Brexit deal is not just better than a bad deal — it could be the best deal  via @telegraphnews 
WATCH | Theresa May still won't say she would vote for Brexit. Madness! We need a leader who believes in Britain. 
Incredible. Theresa May still won't say what way she'd vote in another referendum  
Book idea: This, but with brexit.That's not my Brexit, its trade isn't free enough.  
David Jones MP - "The govt has to publish its position paper, showing what we will do if no deal is struck." #Brexit  
On a bonfire stacked up by Ukip that the Tories are now setting alight with a matchstick handed to them by a Brexit-enabling opposition. 6/ 
Next up: Brexit. PM can’t say she’d vote for it now. And all I think is - she’s read the reports we’re not allowed to see. And that’s that 
You have to forgive the treasury for being slow in that regard. It had assumed that setting aside billions for Brexit was 'project fear'.  
Theresa May appears to not actually believe in Brexit #FarageOnLBC 
Theresa May refuses to guarantee migrants' rights if there's no Brexit deal  
Tories offer of settled status counts for nothing & explains why both EU & UK migrants have a right to feel nervous. #brexit  
The PM has got 17 hours until #PMQs to figure out if she would support the government's main policy if there was a second referendum.  
Hey @theresa_may, I know how I'd vote if there were another Brexit referendum today, tomorrow or any day of the year. #BrexitForever 
Brussels warns Brexit talks heading for point of no return  
Trump threatens to kill NAFTA. That's the same NAFTA the UK government says it would consider joining in case of a no deal Brexit...  
Theresa May doesn't tell LBC how she'd vote if there was another referendum on the EU. That's because she doesn't want Brexit. As soon as public opinion starts to shift away from respecting the result, watch the Conservatives bin the whole thing off 
All-round idiot Digby Jones hopes there'll be a Brexit benefit in "100 years time"  
LIVE: The PM still refuses to say she’d vote Leave. This undermines everything she says about Brexit.  
Top Brexit campaigner admits the UK is looking at a ten-year recession  
These are the 18 Labour MEPs who voted against moving #Brexit negotiations onto the next stage.  
WATCH | Catalan leader says he intends to respect referendum & seek independent Catalonia! How will Spain respond? 
Why is ANYBODY surprised that #TheresaMay has refused to state she would vote for Brexit now? She’s a Remainer - a faux Brexiteer 
Catalonia referendum: Now Spanish NAVY arrives in Barcelona ahead of historic declaration #CataloniaIndependence 
Kind Mr Dacre has thrown a ball!Brexit the dog is chasing it!Look the ball has gone over the cliffAnd #Brexit is following it!Oh dear... 
Labour don't want to put any frontbencher up to say how he or she would vote if Brexit vote was today. They share @theresa_may's Remainers' discomfort 
.Is there any end to what she 'doesn't know'?"May 'doesn't know' if EU citizens [can] stay in a no-deal Brexit". 
Crafty Puigdemont says referendum means WILL be Catalan independence but DELAYS implementation- seeks DIALOGUE with Spain. Ball with Madrid 
This is insane. The woman in charge of Brexit can't bring herself to say whether she thinks it is a good idea.  
Catalonian president @KRLS goes the Slovenian route and announces that the independence referendum has passed and then pushes to "temporarily suspend" it for negotiations, potentially changing the definition of the statue quo. 
It's ghastly for EU migrants here and UK migrants in EU that PM could not give guarantees about their future residency rights if we get a no-deal Brexit - which looks a very real possibility 
Theresa May was asked three times by @IainDale if she'd vote for Brexit if there was a referendum today. This is her response.  
Puigdemont summary: suspending referendum outcome "for weeks" and asking for EU mediation, but EU already said it won't mediate. 
MORE: Puigdemont calls on the parliament to suspend results of October 1 referendum to allow for mediation and dialogue 
It's NOT happening: #Catalonia president #Puigdemont fails short of declaring independence, suspends referendum result and asks for dialog.  
Carles #Puigdemont just declared #Catalonia independent as a response to recent referendum in which 90% of the voters backed #independence. 
Tory MP Sir Bill Cash has demanded answers from Remainers within the Labour Party attempting to thwart #Brexit negotiations.  
Jubilee has no idea that for Uhuru to be President unopposed will require a national referendum.  @Asamoh_ 
Catalonia held a referendum on Oct 1 and has won the right to become a state. The ballot boxes said yes to independence. 
Theresa May refused THREE TIMES in interview with @IainDale to say whether she would vote for Brexit if there was a referendum today. FFS.  
President @KRLS: "We asked for dialogue to agree on a referendum up to 18 times and in all possible formats" 
So EU negotiators now know that the UK Prime Minister refuses to publicly support Brexit. It's not just extraordinary, it's unsustainable.  
I believe in Democracy... That's why I'm not accepting a gerrymandered referendum #Brexshit 
The PM refused to say if she'd back Brexit if it was rerun today. Four times. No wonder negotiations a mess. She has to go @montie 
I stand with democracy. Always. Never diktat. A people's decision in a referendum is forever final. That's why I respect the outcomes of referenda in:BermudaGibraltarThe FalklandsScotlandAll of which resulted in a majority of their voters deciding to remain British. 
European politics: the gift that keeps on giving! Brexit, Wilders, Orban, Macron-Le Pen, Merkel-AfD, now Catalonia, & Renzi-Grillo to come 
Brexit means Remain, according to Mrs May. She should delete her account  
"I want to really thank everyone" who made referendum possible - Catalan President Carles Puigdemont  #10Oct 
Puigdemont starts by defending referendum and voters who "overcame fear" and "unforgettable" Spanish police violence  
 Catalan President: "It's time to talk about the results of the Oct 1 referendum and this is what we will do" #Catalonia 
President @KRLS: "On October 1, Catalonia held a referendum on self-determination in extreme circumstances" 
The only red tape they want to burn protects consumers & workers. #Brexit will drown business in admin and Red Tape. #BrexitRef2 #StopBrexit 
Brexit will look so bad in 18 months time even Farage will vote Remain... 
President @KRLS: "What I will explain today is not regarding a personal decision. It is about the results of the #referendum" 
Catalan leader addresses regional parliament for first time since referendum (WATCH LIVE)  
another day of Brexit whackamole. Start No Deal plan, to assuage backbench fears/strengthen hand -EU citizens wonder if they should plan too 
PM who is negotiating #Brexit would again vote #REMAINThis is truly amazing.How can we have confidence in her when she's still a #REMAINER 
PM's heart not obviously for Brexit. "How would I vote in a vote now against a different background?... I am being open and honest with you. What I did last time was I looked at everything and came to a judgement. And I would do exactly the same this time round". @LBC 
Theresa May refused three times to say whether she would vote for Brexit if there was a referendum today  #MayOnLBC 
MAY REFUSES TO SAY SHE'D VOTE FOR BREXIT  
To be clear: no-deal Brexit doesn't just mean legal limbo for 150,000 EU NHS/care workers, but collapse of radiotherapy. Do. Not. Do. It.  
I wonder what your followers think Brexit is even about now.You admitted it wasn't about controlling immigration  
‘We’re going NOWHERE!’ Finance CEO praises Brexit Britain and SNUBS EU alternatives  
Theresa May, the Prime Minister who campaigned on her desire to bring about Brexit, will not say that she now would vote Leave. Farcical. 
Brexit Britain should adopt unilateral free trade, like Hong Kong, Singapore & New Zealand >  
Brexit: Dutch nationals living in Britain will be allowed dual citizenship.  
#MayonLBC Theresa May couldn’t say she would now vote Brexit in an EU referendum today - even after EU’s behaviour. May might need to go! 
The PM clearly does not believe in Brexit, which explains dither, delay and such a lack of leadership. @IainDale #MayOnLBC 
“The trucks are returning empty” - Die Zeit, in German, on how #Brexit is *already* impacting supply chains.  
PM reveals she still is a remainer to @IainDale - no more credibility than David Cameron to lead us through Brexit. #UKIP #MayOnLBC @UKIP 
Sturgeon condemns EU for its silence over the police violence that marred the referendum on Catalonian independence.  
And after being asked 100's of times, the PM still cannot explain a single benefit of #Brexit. #StopBrexit#MayOnLBC 
Ken Clarke on Brexit: ‘I’ve never seen anything as mad or chaotic as this’  
With only 18 months of talks left, David Davis’ Brexit department seems to be working part-time - @ThomasBrake 
PM reveals she doesn't know how she'd vote in a new EU referendum. "I’d come to a judgement". Very honest, but will horrify Brexiteers #LBC 
Tee-hee @IainDale question on @LBC to May - how would you vote now in a referendum? The Remainer who is a Brexit PM dodges the answer, obvs 
Theresa May finds it impossible to say that she'd vote leave if there was another referendum. She'd "weigh up the evidence" #MayOnLBC 
I think a ‘no deal’ brexit is unlikely, because it’s just daft - here is a leavers view on what it might look like  
Iain wants know why Brexit talks have been cancelled tomorrow, the Prime Minister stutters... 
Oh boy. May can't guarantee EU citizens living in the UK will be able to stay in a no-deal Brexit. "We don’t know what’s going to happen.” 
Brexit will be a big kick up the a** for lazy Britons, says Ramsay  
11 new SFF books arriving today: Electric women, witches battling Brexit, and a new verse in A Song of Ice and Fire.  
Why hasn't anyone in the Tory party got the balls to stick their head above the parapet and call out the lunacy of crashing on with #brexit? 
#Corbyn  by supporting Brexit and its ensuing Mega Austerity is enabling the destruction of Public Services & set the Country back 30 years.  
EU lawmakers give tentative nod to Brexit clearing law that could clobber Britain  
The NHS has not been asked to plan for a no deal Brexit, bosses have admitted.  Slightly worrying.  
"Happy birthday" to us! 53 years ago, RVC was created by a district-wide referendum on October 10, 1964. Time flies!  
I'm starting to think that the best outcome in the Brexit talks is for there to be no deal. 
Translation: no need for no deal if we can only follow Terms of Refernce for Art50 negotiatns we agreed together. Stop being silly. #Brexit  
Catalonia's President to address region's parliament following "Yes" vote in a referendum on independence from Spain  
Today I saw a Russia Today video about Catalonian referendum boosting "Texas independence movement". Clearly a trend now. Via @jarmokoponen 
ICYMI: Scandinavia's advice for Brexit? "Don’t build the border station too small, you need plenty of space”  
Fuck @D66. Red het referendum!  
The rest of the world may be having a growth spurt but the UK is not - entirely because of Brexit uncertainty and confusion #brexitshambless 
“The Treasury have been singularly silent on what the nature of a post-Brexit economic policy would look like” - @JLongworthLML 
Brexit talks to discuss Northern Ireland and Irish border - best way to solve this issue is by remaining in the EU!  
Catalan parliament discusses independence referendum - live  
There was NEVER, EVER, a call for an early indyref2. It was ALWAYS supposed to be once we knew what Brexit looked like. You were there no? 
Brexit: Dutch nationals living in Britain will be allowed dual citizenship  
Twitter users ATTACK the BBC for normalising acid attacks, paedophiles, and ‘marrying your cousin’  via @Your Brexit 
It's always #Brexit threat or problem never bonus nor opportunity because @FT reports  world as it is & being optimistic can't change that 
'Having a implementation period of 2 years means we forego the implementation of the economic benefits of Brexit' @JLongworthLML @LordsEUCom 
Good exchange w #German Amb Cyril Nunn @GermanyInKRI on political developments & Post-Referendum era emphasizing #KRG commitment to Dialogue 
Brexit trade talks have been pushed back. But Brussels looks to be softening the tone on Britain's EU departure 
Full #Brexit SI (Parts 1&2) now available in one Virtual Issue & #openaccess until the end of the year  please RT! 
Theresa May announces Leyland Daf to build next generation Brexit-fighter in Preston 
Former Home Office immigration official David Wood: "I don’t think that under the current resources the challenge of Brexit can be met" 
I think even I must be in denial about the dangers of Brexit. Because if I wasn't, I don't think I'd be able to function day to day. 
"Friends we are the party of independence" @NicolaSturgeon  "...the case for independence does not depend on Brexit" #SNP17 
Sturgeon says she still has a mandate for a Scottish independence referendum given the Brexit negotiations 
Further max respect to Nicola Sturgeon for saying that the case for Scottish independence does not depend on Brexit.  #SNP17 
3 decisions taken at Westminster against Scotland's interests:1 No oil fund2 After financial crash = austerity3 Hard Brexit#SNP17 
Sturgeon: Scotland should have the right to choose future when the terms of Brexit are clear. We have a mandate to give people that choice  
Nicola Sturgeon says the EU should have condemned the violence of the Spanish authorities during the referendum in Catalonia. #SNP17 
Catalan President Carles Puigdemont is already in Parliament. At 6pm, he is due to reveal his plans after independence referendum result 
Scottish Government to meet cost of EU nationals working in public services if fee imposed after Brexit 
As @1000cuts says, the hard Brexit Conservative right are the Tories' answer to Militant Tendency. 
Michel Barnier's warning: 'Brexit is not a game'  
Not only do I love @NicolaSturgeon for her stance on #Brexit & #indyref2, but she's got a GSOH! 
As history gets rewritten, crucial to recall that in the Ref voters were *repeatedly* assured that Brexit would be quick, easy and positive  
BREXIT: Some people just want to watch the world burn…  
5. "In my opinion, the only real alternative to a "hard Brexit" is "no Brexit"." Is that what he means?/ends 
Scottish Conservative Party  Conference vs SNP Conference...“There is no appetite for a second Independence referendum” they say..  
EU warning on science over 'no deal' Brexit. UK scientists could be booted out of Horizon 2020 projects.  
After Brexit, we are going to miss @MichelBarnier's "It is only your time you're wasting" head teacher stuff. 
For Belfast, ‘America First’ Amounts to ‘Northern Ireland Last’: Brexit warning for UK in Bombardier/Boeing tale.  
“..and there shall be a referendum on Scottish independence.” - @AngusRobertson We like that. #snp17 #GameOn 
Angus Robertson: “There are 1,300 and some days until the next Scottish parliamentary election. And there will also be a referendum on Scottish independence.” #SNP17 
Angus Robertson "There will also be a referendum on independence" #SNP17 
Huge applause as @AngusRobertson confirms that there will be a 2nd referendum on Scottish Independence #StandingOvation #SNP17 
Brexit talks being held up by absent British negotiating team, EU says They can't even be bothered to turn up FFS 
We have made some mistakes in our approach to Brexit; but the prophecies of disaster are absurd.  
Catalonia has asked to negotiate a referendum 20 times in recent years (as 80% of citizens want). 
"Brexit is not a game, dont forget that", @MichelBarnier’s replies to “Is the ball in your court?" pic.twitter.com/lfiMjkPaqm 
No @MichelBarnier, #Brexit is no game. You would also do well to remember that. Do a deal if you want, but we are leaving whatever. #UKIP 
Those of us who wish to remain EU citizens call on you to help us get a referendum on the final deal (or no deal) so we can #Remain  
WATCH @MichelBarnier tells us "Brexit is not a game" when @adamfleming asks him if the ball is in the EU's court. 
EU Council President Donald Tusk says he hopes for sufficient progress to have been made for Brexit trade talks to move on in December 
Read this and weep. The grim reality of Brexit is based on EU myths, many of them pernicious lies. Decades of smears won the referendum  
Dear @UKLabour,Do you still believe there is a way to deliver a "successful" Brexit?If not, why are you still supporting it? 
EU27 is not working on "no deal" scenario. We negotiate in good faith and hope for "sufficient progress" by December. #Brexit 
"#Brexit is not a game" — Michel Barnier responds to Theresa May's comments about "the ball" being in the EU's court  
The govt is taking #Brexit advice from Legatum whose parent company is a practitioner of disaster capitalism  
WATCH Finger-Wagging Barnier: "Brexit is Not a Game"  
Petition is now at 344,505 - please sign it 'give the public and parliament more say on new laws over brexit  
"Is the ball in your court?" @MichelBarnier returns to microphone: "Brexit is not a game, dont forget that":  
.@GordonRamsay has said a curb on EU migrant labour could have a positive effect on the restaurant industry and create more opportunities for British workers.#Brexit   
NEW SERIES. Following the success of #maxwellselection. Maxwell's Brexit. #maxwellsbrexit 
Alan Partridge interviews Malcolm Tucker about Brexit in next week’s Big Issue  
EU'S BARNIER: Brexit is not a game. Let's get on with negotiating a trade deal then!  
We used to build fantastic trading relationships across the EU.Now we’re building lorry parks to deal with Brexit customs chaos.FFS.  
UK ministers 'deeply pessimistic' about Brexit talks progress - so are we!  
‘If the UK Government can’t deal with tampons & periods, how the hell are they going to deal with Brexit?’ The fantastic @alisonthewliss  
Corbyn calls for Labour to lead Brexit. Such LOONY sound bites damage our negotiating power and should be illegal.  
"Council of Europe calls for an investigation into Spain’s police violence on referendum day" #Democracia 
&, at risk of becoming a broken record, this AGAIN illustrates how Brexit anti-immigration line is classist AF. Professional migrants = OK  
Have you changed your mind about Brexit?  Regardless of how you voted in the ref, please complete @guardian survey. 
Folks in the Netherlands gathered enough signatures to have a referendum to block the government from spying on its citizens 
This is why Brexit is vital.Exports to EU are DOWN 12 %.Exports to the rest of world are UP 39%.  
European Union's Chief Brexit Negotiator Michel Barnier has warned Britain that leaving the EU is "not a game" 
Brexit will become toxic says Heseltine 
WHAT?!? "Scotland Office 'forgot to tell' Scottish ministers about Brexit Bill white paper":  
As we've been saying for months. You can stop Brexit. So now let's campaign to do so.  
You know what really impacted the lives of ethnic minorities - a racist xenophobic bigoted Brexit campaign led by Farage & Johnson.  
Thoughts by me in response to yesterday’s @tradegovuk White Paper on Trade Defence Instruments post Brexit.  
Well said @Nigel_Farage. No justification to keep the environmentally disastrous CFP. Keeping CFP would demonstrate a total Brexit sell out.  
FCA rules out Brexit bonfire of regs - rule taker not makers. Such a shame as UK were involved in drafting best ones  
Voters presumed that any costs in Labour manifesto would not fall on them. Echoes of Brexit in that respect. 
A Brexit 'no deal' is @theresa_may's despearate attempt to take back control of her party says @ClaireHanna  
 Poll: Will Brexit lead to the recession? Please retweet after the vote. #StopBrexit 
Leave campaign 2016: Brexit will open up new vistas of opportunityLeave campaign 2017: Brexit will harden our youth in the fire of poverty 
I was behind Corbyn until he decided to prioritise taking SNP seats in Scotland instead of Tory ones. That and his Brexit/Trident stance. 
As Brexit unravels/job losses mount its champions should be blamed. But I suspect certain media will re-direct this anger towards Brussels. 
“Brexit is not a game” @MichelBarnier tells me and @Stone_SkyNews when we ask if the ball is now in his court #Brexit #balls 
Yes. We now see the folly of Corbyn's 3 line whip support for May's unamended A50 bill. We need a "Stop Brexit"choice, which he was against.  
Britain could join NAFTA if it fails to get Brexit trade deal: Telegraph newspaper  
This by @chrisgreybrexit is spot on. The only way to avoid this fate is for May’s government to collapse. #BREXIT  
Am chuffed to say my book Patronising Bastards - attacking our political elite - has overtaken Clegg's anti-Brexit rant in Amazon chart. 
Britain could join trans-Atlantic trade alliance bigger than the EU if there is no deal on Brexit' | via @telegraph 
#clegg Nick Clegg plugging his new book, How To Stop Brexit!! Traitor he destroyed the Lib Dems. Cleggy  one of the worst politicians ever.  
Will Brexit mean exit for your top talent? KPMG's Punam Birly shares how to retain your people:  #BrexitNavigator 
Brexit has become all about the politicians. It should be about getting Britain out as quickly as possible. 
Theresa May tells the EU that the 'ball is in their court' over Brexit by KAL - political cartoon gallery in Putney  
Jeremy Corbyn savages hapless Theresa May after she admits the Tories are preparing for a no-deal Brexit  
Brexiters & Remainers - it is worth reading this thread. A word of warning from a Brexiter on the ramifications of a "no deal" Brexit.   
Britain Ready for #EU No DealThe World wants to trade with usWorld Trade Organisation rules will work just fine...#Brexit  
Monarch last week, BAE this week.. amongst others. Nothing at all to do with Brexit they will say as it all begins to slide down the pan.  
If you’re gonna tackle racism the way you’re currently tackling the Brexit negotiations then please leave it alone @theresa_may 
Former Brexit Minister @DavidJonesMP’s warning  to the British government: We must prepare and make public plans for a ‘no deal’ scenario! 
UK aviation sector would be devastated by a Brexit ‘no deal'. The entire industry has said that we have to see evidence of the post-Brexit plan for aviation now if we are to avert a catastrophic crisis of confidence.  
EU lawmakers give tentative nod to Brexit clearing law that could clobber Britain  
I’m pretty sure people voted for Brexit, largely, because they thought they / UK would be BETTER off - not WORSE off.They’ve been mugged.  
Assuming this is what the #WillOfThePeople demands & #May is pursuing #Brexit to fulfil this 'will', if we won't get all we must #StopBrexit 
Brexit extremists will destroy our country for their obsession:  
Wouldn't it be great to have a week on #bbcdp discussing Brexit with a panel of Welsh, N Irish and Scots pols on, to get diff perspective  
Nobel Prize winning economist Richard Thaler says 'Brexit is a perfect example of irrational behaviour' & need 2nd referendum! #StopBrexit 
Live picture of Jeremy Corbyn accusing the government of wasting 15 months being indecisive over Brexit.  
BBC Daily Politics: "Is there any Brexit deal you can support?" Nick Clegg: "No." 
Farmers' income to drop 50% after Brexit says Agriculture and Horticulture Development Board if UK goes for open borders to agro-industry oligarchs to dump food here. So will farmers put up motorway posters saying No Brexit?  @stephenkb @Hugodixon @BBCFarmingToday @Simon_Nixon 
#Corbyn has to step up and say No Brexit or his Messiah trip will come to a juddering halt! #Labour 
Reading that post by Pete North that everyone's sharing, I see we've now progressed to the Calvin's Dad theory of Brexit.  
If there's no proper Brexit, the Tories face Exit:  
UK farmers risk seeing their incomes halve after Brexit  
If Brexit means Brexit we must be free from the European Court. It is not 'pragmatic' to remain in the EU.  
I have written abt Brexit Bolshevism. This may be its founding text. NB: its vision of no deal brexit rings true  
Have you changed your mind about Brexit?  
Stay angry and fight Brexit. Article 50 can be withdrawn, Brexit can be stopped -  
Christian Adams on Theresa May's warning that there may be no deal on Brexit – political cartoon gallery in Putney  
'No deal' Brexit would be disaster for Tories but they deserve no sympathy. Referendum was about their selfishness but we'll pay. #bbcdp 
By popular demand, get your 'Bollocks to Brexit' stickers now in rolls of 1,000 with profits to remain  
Armando Iannucci announces Malcolm Tucker and Alan Partridge Brexit debate  
Please do a cross over with Partridge as the pro Brexit person   
PM spoke of a 'new dynamic' in #Brexit talks, but annoyed some Leave supporters as UK may accept some ECJ and EU rules in transition period  
By accident or design, a no deal Brexit is getting closer. My latest blog just up:  
Lynn, idea for a series - Brexit Debate featuring I, Alan Partridge and Malcom Tucker  
2 mtgs; 1 on rare diseases, other on energy. 2 more areas affected by Brexit. No deal threatens access to medicines and energy supplies. 
#Brexit, eh? Ruining everything...  
I don't care how nice you are, what your reasoning was or if we're related. If you voted for Brexit, I think you're an idiot. 
Police are ready to arrest Catalonia's president if he declares independence, sources say  
Britain 'could join Nafta trade alliance with US, Canada and Mexico post-Brexit if no deal with EU' #premium  
Tory minister says Catalonia referendum illegal. So were actions of Nelson Mandela, Mahatma Ghandi, Suffragettes, George Washington,... 
Catalonia firefighters form human shield to protect referendum voters from riot police  
#BREAKING Tory minister speaking on Catalan referendum. “I’ve got a holiday home in Mallorca so I’ve got some understanding of the issues here.” 
This thread is from a Leave campaigner now outlining the economic disaster of Brexit. It's terrifying.  
Our politicians are failing us horribly, our political order is bankrupt, our democracy has been polluted. Brexit has exposed it all. 
This has now appeared on the Commission website. Clearly they're analysing a "no deal" Brexit & it disrupts science:  
Here's Minford in The Big Issue spinning giant porkies to poor people about how Brexit will improve their lives. Calls himself a professor.  
UK trade deficit at record high after pound slump fails to help export performance - #Brexit isn’t working!  
I echo this sentiment...#Brexit's a triumph of delusion over reason.  
The "end state of Brexit" to Brexiteers is increasingly like what "achieving Communism in 20 years" was for the Soviets 
I'm Guest Editor of next week's @BigIssue . Featuring a 4-page debate between Alan Partridge and Malcolm Tucker on Brexit. #BigIssue 
Depressing read: how Brexit is being supported by foreign investors waiting to swoop on cheap assets after it wrecks UK economy.  
Correct. So our democracy has to be taken back, reformed, made fit for purpose. Its not fit now: Brexit has exposed a farce version of it.  
Populist Leader Praises Brexit in Latest Austria Televised Debate Before Sunday Election  
May is working with the Eurocrats to deny us Brexit. New YouTube on the way  
torn between anxiety about brexit and anxiety about the planet's future and anxiety about star wars space penguins 
But but - muh Brexit apocalypse   
Quite a few of the #Brexit prep (on infrastructure/regulatory capacity) that ppl think the UK needs to do for no-deal it needs to do anyways 
11am #WestminsterHall debate: Impact of the Catalan independence referendum on the EU. Moved by @HywelPlaid. Watch  
The most important Brexit speech last week wasn't given by Theresa May  
You really should read - and pass on - this booklet from @AlynSmithMEP. Really. #Brexit #ScotlandinEurope 
Poll: Are Theresa May and the Tories making a mess of #Brexit?(vote and then RT to increase the poll size) 
Legendary British chef Gordon Ramsay backs Brexit and mocks Jamie Oliver for his Remoaner whinging. Brilliant! 
Did you know you can fully customise your plane in Bomber Crew?Out October 19th, wishlist now:  #brexit  
Brexit risks leaving the soft fruit and veg industry to decay. Simon Watkins analyses the likely impact:  
Philip Hammond understands extreme difficulties of #Brexit. He needs support from moderate Tories against vocal Brexit hardliners 
EU set to delay transition talks in fresh blow to Theresa May's Brexit plan  
Brexit poses threat to London’s role as global markets hub  
Theresa May piles pressure on Brussels by revealing detailed plans for walking away with 'no deal' on Brexit 
Enough signatures collected for referendum on new Dutch 'big brother' data law  
The SNP hate the UK so much that one of their MSPs is unhappy that financial services companies are not leaving the UK because of Brexit.  
Let's not go mad here. "Mid tier Brexit blogger with tendency to wild exaggeration and insulting everybody".  
We must follow the referendum result or some thugs will cause trouble, is not an argument to be made to defend democracy.  
Britain reaps benefits of a cheaper pound as tourist numbers hit record 23.1m and spending surges by £872m. #Brexit  
Jaw-dropping. Brexit will lead to a catastrophic 10 year depression, but it's ok because it'll weed out hipsters.  
Philippot: Les Patriotes want Frexit France to follow Brexit Britain back into the world  
President @masoud_barzani #German Ambassador in #Iraq & @GermanyInKRI discussed post-Referendum approach & stressed deescalation & dialogue.  
Alan Partridge and Malcolm Tucker teaming up for Brexit would be the dream  
At last. An upside to Brexit. 
Gordon Ramsay looking forward to end of migrant 'influx' - Brexit will be a big kick up the a** for lazy Britons  
Can I have Alan Partridge and Malcolm Tucker discussing Brexit between them? 
30.  So unless the EU27 shift (unlikely) or UK accepts Brexit in name only (also unlikely) no easy way to see how a deal can happen./ends 
Leading Leaver writes: ‘we are looking at a ten year recession’ But says he’d vote for Brexit all over again.   
Theresa May & the Tories have totally messed up Brexit with bad policies, negotiations & preparation!! #BrexitShambles #StopBrexit 
Prepare for no-deal Brexit, Theresa May warns Britain  
Brexit 6 months ago: ‘I can’t believe they’re not planning for no deal!’ Narrative now: ‘I can’t believe they’re planning for no deal!’ 
I have good news later for those asking for Alan Partridge on Brexit 
23. UK is admitting it will need two years (at least) for it to be prepared for hard Brexit. 
22. The failure of the UK to prepare for Brexit is the reason why UK now wants transition phase of "around two years". 
Smart.SNP economy minister attacks banks for 'not threatening to leave' UK after Brexit' | via @telegraph 
The British columnists complaining about press bias were seemingly fully in favour of it during Scotland’s independence referendum in 2014. 
UK to hold referendum on whether or not to carry on pretending May knows what she's doing 
My God, it's actually a v competent article by @BBC on trade after Brexit - based on analysis (not he-said she-said)  
Britain has a strong Brexit hand. Planning for no deal helps the Government play it  
"No deal" Brexit plan is called “Project BATNA”, “Best Alternative To a Negotiated Agreement”, says Nick Watt, Newsnight, via @paulwaugh 
Gordon Ramsay: Brexit will be a "kick up the arse" for lazy British workers  
Nicola Sturgeon is focusing on education and childcare policy to avoid rows about Brexit and Scottish independence  
Theresa May piles pressure on Brussels by revealing plans for 'no deal' on Brexit  
The fact that the Leader of the Opposition is not pointing out Brexit consequences on a daily basis is to his shame. Unforgivable 
The trouble with repeated Tory calls for an "imaginative solution" on Brexit is that they're always hoping someone else will imagine it. 
I believe there is a connection between Rees-Mogg and a sophisticated, well-funded Twitter disinfo operation promoting JRM & hard Brexit  
Financial commitments are ultimately a political issue. There are far deeper, possibly irreconcilable, holes in UK’s Brexit plans. A list: 
Today all the hard Brexit boffins are accepting we will not be ready to leave in March 2019 and will need a transition under EU rules.  
Scot Tories arrogance is staggering; Brexit car crash & pampering rich elites while punishing those on low incomes  
As Brexit gets more dire, it's increasingly annoying that Jeremy has to play bad cop, bad cop with Theresa. 
A Leave campaigner explains why Theresa May and the Brexit Fundamentalists are taking us on a road to unimaginable catastrophe.  
.@Keir_Starmer, if it looks like 'no deal', you & .@jeremycorbyn must work for cross party consensus to stop #Brexit & bring the Gvnt down.  
Theresa May refuses to deny she has legal advice that Brexit can be stopped. "We do not comment on gvmnt legal advice”. #StopBrexit #r4today 
Big problem with Brexit is everyone's waiting for someone else to find a rabbit in the hat. No-one's looking and there ain't one anyway. 
To say Brexit is held up as the "will of the people" it's curious that they're so desperate to withhold key information from "the people".  
Delighted PM @theresa_may moving in a softer Brexit direction & sounding more conciliatory but UK must go further to avoid no deal outcome  
Doomsayer ruining Brexit by thinking about it  
Brexiteer expectation: Passport to Pimlico Post-Brexit reality: Mad Max 2 
£19.43 charge to bring a $25 kids bag in from the US. How much worse could trade be after #Brexit?  
The united front bench team. Today's @thetimes cartoon. #Brexit #Tories  
Have you noticed all the nutters support Brexit? pic.twitter.com/2uHLi2vpoV 
That’s what Brexit was always about - for those behind the campaign.  
Why should Scots support a second EU referendum on the Brexit deal? We didn’t vote for it to happen & our vote was ignored then. Why bother? 
“Full steam ahead. The iceberg will soon get out of our way.” - the captain of the Titanic takes over Brexit negotiations. 
A German industry group becomes the second to warn against a hard Brexit  
'Ball in your court': Britain and EU clash over which side should make the next move to unblock Brexit talks  
He's right, Tories = worst possible Brexit. Lab could have rescued this but instead offered voters a lifelong Eurosceptic. Idiots all round.  
The comments in this @SPIEGELONLINE article on the 5th round of Brexit negs are something else. Highlights follow:  
Hilary Clinton: “Brexit voters have a small village mentality”.  No Hilary. We have a global engagement mentality. UK is not an EU province 
Finally figured out what the UK's Brexit negotiating position reminds me of. In fairness, it worked when Bart did it in Blazing Saddles.  
The constant patronising narrative of abuse (Leave supporters are ignorant, bigoted etc) - a factor which to helped us win the referendum! 
Gordon Ramsay tells 'luvvie' Jamie Oliver to LEAVE UK after Brexit as spat continues  
I know Brexit is a learning experience for some Brexit Tory MPs, but still bizarre anyone shocked ECJ part of transition. Of course it is. 
Don’t get out. Stop Brexit: we can & will do it.  
I appreciate it's difficult to find people prepared to defend Brexit on air but such abject failure to understand should surely disqualify.  
Theresa May helped sow the seeds of Brexit with her dire performance at the Home Office. Her failures at @ukhomeoffice made her PM! Weird! 
"Regardless of Brexit" China priority is EU trade deal not UK because bigger market. Easy international trade deals? Another #Brexit lie  
I have good news later for those asking for Malcolm Tucker on Brexit.... 
Fortunately, @jonworth has done a sterling job in recovering many of the Brexit-related tweets, see here 2/3 
Genuinely sad that Brexit architect Dominic Cummings (@odysseanproject) has left Twitter.Real and candid insights.1/3 
It can be revoked. Which is the way out of the growing Brexit crisis  
Outside parliament yesterday. The police won't remove them. Leavers won't remove them because the police are there. Bollards to brexit  X  
This Leaver’s thread confirms that Brexit will be an appalling disaster. However, he appears to have some economic expertise, so: ignore?  
"Why Brexit will be a good thing for lazy Britain" - Gordon Ramsay  
Theresa May. Brexit policy: lay in a wheat field with her fingers in her ears while her party breaks down  
A new cabinet won’t save Theresa May. Brexit has doomed her | Steve Richards  
Brexit means UK sausage exports will collapse so Europe should prepare for the wurst. 
Brexit is deadly serious – so why do the Tories only want jokers in charge? | Stephen Moss  
Farmers at risk of a post-Brexit hammering.  
Scotland Office 'forgot to tell' Scottish ministers about Brexit Bill white paper  
Show me, Mrs May, in this advisory referendum, where the vote was split pretty equally, exactly where the box is for 'Crash Out - No Deal'?  
This would carry more weight if Corbyn wasn’t a bigger supporter of Brexit than May.  
May refuses to say if Article 50 can be revoked. Cos it can be. And refuses to publish Brexit papers. Because they make clear it should be 
Brexit threatens the port of Dover with massive traffic jams  
Hope for Brexit is fading fast.  A disastrous 'No Deal' looking most likely. Time to stop this idiocy, time to #StopBrexit!! #BrexitShambles 
UK farmers risk seeing incomes halve after Brexit  
The Telegraph:Spend billions on Tory No Deal Brexit Suicide  and for what to save Theresa May?!?  
Puigdemont appears ready to endorse the referendum's results, while Madrid ponders a "nuclear option," Article 155  
#TelegraphView: Britain has a strong Brexit hand. Planning for no deal helps the Government play it #Premium 
This thread. Leavers must read. There is no mandate for a Brexit at any cost - It must (and can) be stopped.  
Spend billions on Tory Brexit Suicide and for what to save Theresa May?!?  
After waiting 40+ years to leave the EU you would imagine that Brexiters could wait another couple to ensure it was done properly. #Brexit  
I keep telling everyone what's going to happen in Brexit, but for some reason they keep listening to politicians. A laughable indulgence. 
This is actually starting to get pretty worrying. May is not behaving as a responsible leader should. #Brexit  
May herself has said a badly-handled Brexit would be disastrous. Now she is offering us that very thing. How is the UK this stupid? 
The suffering that accompanies it won’t matter to those who are behind Brexit. Rees-Mogg etc love the idea. 
The excuse for radical change - more austerity, more tax cuts, fewer rights, etc etc etc. All become ‘necessary’ after no-deal Brexit. 
Hard #Brexit? Get out whilst you still can, people. The UK's going down the drain. @Conservatives @UKLabour @LibDems 
'Voters aren't thick' John Humphrys slams Nick Clegg for PATRONISING the people on Brexit  
UK farm incomes could slump from £38k to £15k after Brexit without UK-EU free-trade agreement, warns @TheAHDB 
Theresa May sets out trade plans for a no-deal Brexit  
Theresa May piles pressure on Brussels by revealing detailed plans for walking away with 'no deal' on Brexit  
Don't believe government lies that #Brexit is now inevitable. It was our decision and we can change our minds #StopBrexit 
Brexit Threatens Dover With Massive Traffic Jams  
Brexit poses threat to London’s role as global markets hub  
Oops ...Brexit will cause 'considerable' damage to the UK, warns RBS chairman  
This means we've surpassed Ireland, folks — marriage referendum turnout there was 60.5% 
Most Britons want May to lead through Brexit process -Telegraph  
Has the North East changed its mind on Brexit? 
This will be remembered as the day Brexit died. Now all we need to do is bury its corpse.  
I just published “Self Determination and the Catalan Referendum”  
1. So now we shall be subject to a torrent of articles ruminating on preparations for a "no deal" #Brexit 
Colau promised a referendum with or without authorization, he only wants to ascend politically anyway. 
Theresa May accelerates into Brexit tidal wave  
UK is being destroyed by ideologues who think a right wing Brexit with no deal or an independent Socialist UK is a the way forward. 
Prepare for No-Deal Brexit : May tells UKHOW!How do we prepare for food, fuel & medicine shortages?Dig hole, climb in & wait ? 
Trump has succeeded in changing the narrative to make it a referendum on patriotism when the players are the real patriots. Go @jemelehill ! 
#Iraq Parliament's Judiciary Committee rules that #Kurdish MPs who took part in referendum violated their oath of office. 
"I voted for #BrexitI put the country in a terribly weak positionBut I didn't realize itAnd now I don't want to accept responsibility"  
Time you stepped up for REMAIN, @Keir_Starmer. @UKLabour could have prevented this! My vote for @UKLabour was NOT a vote for BREXIT!  
Boris Johnson 'caves in' over Brexit red lines Sky News:He praises May's powerful vision. Should have gone2 Specsavr  
Conniving with the EU by meeting Barnier & discussing brexit deals behind our ELECTED government's back in an attempt to undermine May 
Would you like to see a second Scottish independence referendum? 
MORE Brexit woes – Brexit boss heads for the exit & quits leaving Govt in chaos  via @LondonEconomic 
Boris Johnson’s face as Kenneth Clarke exposes Tory hopeless lack of direction on Brexit  via @LondonEconomic 
Agreed - they owe it to the British public to expose the corrupt fraud of "brexit" for what it really is 
The Catalonia referendum: Twilight of the nation-state?  
Stop Brexit by voting against it in 2nd Referendum or voting for pro-Remain MP in next GE.Voting for a Brexit party gives a Brexit outcome  
And now we go live to the UK @DExEUgov to catch up with the latest #Brexit news.  
Parliament needs to intervene. There needs to be a game changer or we are toast.#Brexit 
Theresa May refusing to answer questions about secret advice that says Brexit can be stopped #brexitwontwork 
They didn't even bother to protect Scottish brands such as Beef etc in their Brexit/Japan deals/talks. Who needs them? Not us! Independence  
Just in case I haven't said it enough;Brexit was created by the 1% & the 1% are the only people who will benefit from Brexit. 
Can someone please show this article to Bernard Jenkins. Brexit won't work We must #stopbrexit#brexitwontwork 
Right, for tonight I’m done. Many of Dominic Cummings’s most controversial tweets now recovered. #Brexit Blog post:  
2. The EU Referendum was constitutionally & legally 'Non-binding'.....this has been evidenced time & time again...  
Great thread. Simply can't understand why you still think Brexit a good idea. 
A NO DEAL #Brexit means a General Election!We are frequently told what people voted 4 in #EUrefbut one thing we DIDN'T vote 4 is NO DEAL! 
“#Brexit-an example..of people making a decision not based on economic self-interest”#RichardThaler-#NobelPrize2017 
Brexit had division and extremity baked in. It was unlikely to produce cool headed pragmatic wonkery. I hope we'll be okay. 
Brexit the "single most calamitous example of national self-harm in my lifetime” - Lord Patten. #StopBrexit. 
Leave got millions of votes for the Norway model which was never available... Leavers are afraid of a referendum which isn't gerrymandered.  
SNP economy minister attacks banks for 'not threatening to leave' UK after Brexit #Premium 
EU vs Ireland & Apple, EU vs UK, @ECB #QE  @EU_Commission @JunckerEU #EU #Eurozone #ECB #Brexit $AAPL #investors 
Ken Clarke on Brexit: ‘I’ve never seen anything as mad or chaotic as this’  
A no deal Brexit slams the door on our biggest and closest market. A no deal Brexit is just fucking mad. Best deal, the one we already have. 
#TelegraphView: Britain has a strong Brexit hand. Planning for no deal helps the Government play it #Premium  
No deal to a No deal Brexit. The best deal is No Brexit.#StopBrexit 
The Brexit doomsday scenario, by a paid-up Leaver.  
Brexit isn't necessary. Serves no purpose whatsoever. Benefits almost nobody. Pass it on. 
Nothing has happened since the EU Referendum to make me regret my decision to #VoteLeave. If anything the EU's stance has vindicated me 
A rotten party trying to push a Brexit based on blatant lies through today. Yet #Newsnight decides to undermine #GrenfellTower victims 
I'd feel a lot happier with Larry the Cat overseeing the Brexit negotiations from here on in  
And now we go over live to Brexit...  
Not even Brexiteers are pretending that Brexit isn't going to be a massive economic hit to UK. What the hell are we doing? #Newsnight 
Nicola Sturgeon has told Sky News a second referendum on Brexit is becoming "hard to resist"  
@Rachael_Swindon @UKDemockery As Brexit descends into catastrophe Theresa turns her attention to the people starving on her watch..  
No deal is a terrible outcome. If we had been told this before referendum, would Leave had won? #newsnight 
The horrors of Brexit will have the Scottish people wanting to assess all their constitutional options. Me Today.  
Chances of no deal? What I'm told;David Davis privately, 10%Cabinet minister who campaigned Remain, 40%Another who campaigned Brexit, 50%  
We have to keep going, it's vital. Half our country are being ignored. It's a disgrace . Democracy didn't stop on Referendum Day.Onwards. 
Brexiteer cabinet ministers demand billions to prepare for no deal Brexit. Why wasn't this on the side of their bus?  
Tuesday's THE INDEPENDENT: "Prepare for no-deal Brexit, May warns Britain" #tomorrowspaperstoday #bbcpapers 
This is madness, for the sake of the country, call a halt to #Brexit!  
Leave promised Brexit wd slash red tape & bureaucrcy; in fact means raft of new regs & many new Whitehall officials   
Tuesday's THE DAILY TELEGRAPH: "May draws up plans for no deal on Brexit" #tomorrowspaperstoday #bbcpapers 
May is failing the nation. Says Britain will still be ruled by ECJ after #Brexit! #UKIP is the only 100% pro-Brexit party & will mobilise! 
There are many legitimate views on Brexit. But how can British MEPs oppose moving onto trade talks with the EU?  
If 20 odd UK cabinet members can’t even reach a #Brexit agreement among themselves how can they do so with 27 states? #UselessandToothless 
Theresa May tells Britain to prepare for a no-deal Brexit  
How would you vote now? RT after voting #bbcqt #bbcdp #Article50 #Brexit #Remain #skypapers #bbcbreakfast #itvnews #skynews 
Thoughts on #Brexit you can only negotiate with someone who wants to negotiate 
Labour have nothing constructive to contribute to the very difficult #Brexit discussions, they just make childish remarks & undermine the UK 
ECJ jurisdiction after Mar '19 means UK courts & gov't will be subordinate to foreign power. That is not #Brexit! Unacceptable @Number10gov 
Leading Tory Slams Treasury For Working with EU to Undermine Brexit  
The PM says, "The ball is in the EU’s court," on #Brexit. I thought we voted to have nothing to do with those courts. 
."Boris Johnson briefs the papers about his Brexit red lines, but it turns out he's just yellow.". 
If there's a civil servant who would leak the 50 Brexit impact studies then the tide might turn abruptly. #RethinkBrexit 
Tuesday's METRO: "Braced for a no deal Brexit" #tomorrowspaperstoday #bbcpapers (via @BBCHelenaLee) 
If there's a civil servant out there pondering if it's in public interest to leak the 50 Brexit impact studies, I say to them - Just do it. 
@theresa_may How about "No Brexit is better than no deal or a bad deal" or have you completely lost your integrity/common sense/marbles? 
#TheresaMay refused 3 times today to answer question on whether #Brexit can be revoked. Here’s the answer:  
If I had my way, his first job, after wrecking our country with Brexit, would be working in the prison kitchen.  
Theresa May's plans for a No Deal Brexit include massive delays at UK ports. Did YOU vote for this reality?  
This is as decisive as Brexit! #Brexit #F1 
The new border after Brexit ahould be named after Shane Duffy; nothings getting through him! #WALIRL #COYBIG 
Put your money where your mouth is Anna; resign the whip & vote against Brexit. Anything less is just noise.  
Welcome thread from @ChukaUmunna where he edges closer to joining @vincecable in calling for ref on Brexit Deal v Remain to #ExitFromBrexit 
May tells the UK to prepare for a No Deal Brexit. That means tariffs on imports. Not a good idea for a country that imports 50% of its food.  
Jeremy Corbyn's response to May's brexit update: "If Tories cannot negotiate a deal for Britain they should make way for a team that can!"  
Brexit is an opportunity for UK firms, says eBay boss - Sky News  
Never forget, Theresa May campaigned AGAINST Brexit & she continues to undermine it. She is not a patriot, she is an internationalist.  
This isn't Brexit, it's capitulation. UKIP back in the game as the real Brexit pressure group. 
#Brexit update: no plan is the new plan. 
Who in their right mind voted for this?☞ Prepare for no-deal Brexit, Theresa May warns Britain  
Keir Starmer blames David Cameron, Boris Johnson and Theresa May for Brexit #shambles. 
Nicola Sturgeon has branded #Brexit a "developing disaster"  
Tomorrow @ScotNational Tomorrow's front page ... Scotland Office 'forgot' to let Scotland know about new Brexit papers  
JAMES MCCLEAN TO SEND THE BRITS OUT THE WORLD CUP THIS IS FUTBOL THIS IS BREXIT 
Nobel winning economist Richard Thaler wrote last year for us on David Cameron's decision to hold an EU referendum  
Charge Of The Brexit Brigade #BrexitInFiveWords 
The Welsh voted for Brexit, and yet there they are advertising Socar - Energy of Azerbaijan tonight. You can't have it both ways, lads, ffs. 
Britain sets out contingency plans for Brexit with no customs deal  
Why should EU consider extending article 50 by 2 years to accommodate when Brexit mob planning a mega tax haven to undermine the EU itself? 
At the moment when Britain needs a strong Brexit negotiating team, the @Conservatives are negotiating who will be their next leader. 
Britain must prepare for the worst on a Brexit deal, Theresa May warns  
Exclusive poll: Six in 10 voters want Theresa May to stay on as Prime Minister until after Brexit #Premium 
A new cabinet won’t save Theresa May. Brexit has doomed her | Steve Richards  
Where will it end?A weak PM.A lost Tory party with no direction.A Brexit veering into the abyss.The country needs Corbyn more than ever.  
It turns out that #Brexit doesn’t mean #Brexit  
Boris Johnson 'caves in' over Brexit red lines  
The man who just won the Nobel prize for economics says Brexit is completely irrational  
RL: "We will fight for a Brexit that puts jobs, workers rights, citizens rights, the environment and access to research funding first". 
Fancy the EU not siding with the UK during the #brexit negotiations! 
The prospect of shaping Brexit amplifies the inherent Machiavellian nature of Tories.  May is on borrowed time 
I will never, ever be in favour of an independent Scotland or a second independence referendum.  
(Insanity confirmed ... ) Prepare for no-deal Brexit, Theresa May warns Britain - The Independent  
eBay's UK boss has said Brexit should be the catalyst for Britain to put a greater focus on its small businesses #SNT 
Imagine trying to pass this off as journalism. A complete fucking disgrace, is what it is.#Brexit pic.twitter.com/4eCiLk9Qyt 
President @masoud_barzani & @EUAmbIraq discussed @eu_eeas @Kurdistan Cooperation,Post-Referendum Reactions & need for dialogue with #Baghdad 
Today @jeremycorbyn complained of inaction, yet voted against the Great Repeal Bill and sat in front of Labour MPs wanting to block Brexit 
The ball is in Britain's court and not the other way round, EU tells Theresa May  
BREAKING: EU leaders to SNUB BARNIER AND CO to start trade talks with Britain anyway  via @Your Brexit 
Salman Rushdie about the real impact of what Brexit will do to Britainpic.twitter.com/F7UXM74dgZ 
Brexit MPs angry as Theresa May accepts continuing rule of EU court over the UK during the “implementation period” 
Nicola Sturgeon suggests second Scottish independence referendum could be held in next four years  
After all the #Brexit idiocy I've endured today, I am not feeling particularly kindly towards #Leavers, so I leave this here...#StopBrexit 
Both May and EU say ball is in the others' court. But Brexit shouldn't be a spectator sport – British people must have final say on any deal 
Nobel prize winning economist says #Brexit is irrational and won't work. He must be another #ProjectFear protagonist 
These stickers have been here for weeks.... job satisfaction..... 'Save Britain, stop Brexit'  
If I believe I can fly: "Some #Brexit supporters have an  @rkelly vision of Brexit"@AdamBienkov 
Would it be possible for you to split them into pre & post referendum -Just so we understand how biased the BBC is? 
Honoured to propose & see passed a motion in solidarity with the people of Catalonia on their recent referendum for independence.  
Banks must know soon about Brexit transition or more jobs may leave London, RBS chair says  
The Guardian view on Brexit transition: Mrs May must stand firm | Editorial  
The PM needs a strong #Brexit cabinet for the next two years. They will get the job done, be positive, work hard and have her back. 
What 200,000 Remain Voters died since Referendum?As scientific as Leave numbers?  
Petition to BAN SHARIA LAW in the UK submitted to official government petition service  via @Your Brexit 
'Make way' House of Commons erupts in hysterics as Corbyn calls for Labour to lead Brexit  
JRM expression sums up how Brexiteers feel about the softening from the UK Gov on Brexit. JRM is the only man to save Brexit.  
"Puppetry of bigots and morons"#brexit is dead. And it's for the best. RT if you agree x#eu #remain #uk #willofthepeople 
.As Brexit Britain prepares to SHUT her doorsIreland OPENS hers...... 
I grant a democratic vote called for #Brexit & that should be respected but the people didn't vote for morons to negotiate our exit from EU 
Aha... let’s just remind ourselves of your previous statements... 
Great statement by the PM. Powerful vision. Future is bright #brexit  
Meanwhile away from Brexit, a Cabinet minister refuses to guarantee UniversalCredit families won't go hungry at Xmas  
Brexit MPs angry as Theresa May accepts continuing rule of EU court  
Unable to face the reality of Brexit, Tories still relying on EU playing along with the fantasy that they need us more than we need them  
Brexit Working Group set up to work on Malta's strategy to attract new investment #MaltaBudget18 
UK must be given #EUref2 once full deal & impact of Brexit is known. It’s not about replays until we win. It’s about looking before we leap!  
Looks like the mandarinate is running the Brexit show.  Delay, postpone, stall. Hope innate caution of ministers allows fudge... its working 
."Brexit will not result in Empire 2.0, but Empire 0.0."by @dannydorling & Sally Tomlinson 
'1 in 10 Brits don’t know that Hitler was involved in WWII – no wonder we voted for Brexit'  
The main thing to remember is that Theresa May is not going to give a running commentary on Brexit... 
And now we go live to #Brexit  
Very fair question “15 months on from the referendum we’re no clearer on what will happen, what on earth has the government been up to?”  
Remember to mention this next time someone tells you that Brexit can't be stopped #stopbrexit 
READ | Theresa May confirms she doesn't intend to deliver a proper Brexit until 2021. Absolute betrayal! 
Theresa May committing to Brexit under the mistaken belief that Article 50 can't be revoked, reminds me of the ending of Romeo and Juliet...  
Another #Brexit tragedy. This prestigious global sporting event lost to the great maritime city of #Plymouth 
Strong statement from PM on Brexit - let's be pragmatic over implementation  to secure maximum freedom to diverge from EU in end state 
What's striking about UK customs & trade papers is they do a better job at explaining value of current status than post-Brexit opportunities  
PM's statement reeks of delusion, I've met over 30 orgs in 3 months, none believe Brexit will be smooth. It's wake up time for the Tories. 
Link to #LiamFox trade paper. 40 something pages of mostly  platitudes.We're in trouble, people.#Brexit 
Does anyone remember life before Brexit? Was it...was it good 
A leading Brexiteer says Theresa May will be ‘cheered’ if she walks away from Brexit talks this month  
She may have been a “remainer” but her time in charge of immigration helped deliver Brexit. 
In Gen Election May asked what percentage of electorate still back her #Brexit vision. She got 42%. She has no mandate to crash on with it. 
Then they'd own their Brexit catastrophe  
Businesses have asked can the PM publish her ‘no-deal’ Brexit plans by Christmas, so they can plan for that eventuality? @PeterBoneUK 
Part of me would like to see Brexit extremists impose their disastrous immediate hard break instead of saving the bleaters from their idiocy 
"FEELS like Heaven" --NOT  "just like heaven". Geez. Way to get RobSmiths attention BBC. Brexit me now permanently 
10 Here's the hardcore "no deal" porn for Brexit extremists - in a brown paper envelope marked "contingency scenario" to get past censors. pic.twitter.com/tE0NmOohjo 
Customs Bill White Paper makes same mistake as Govt's #Brexit customs paper in assuming only Customs Union is what matters 4 customs control 
May's proposals for Brexit are contradictory, confused, + risk taking the UK off a cliff. We must stay in the Single Market + Customs Union.  
Why won't the Prime Minister publish the legal advice she received on Article 50's revocability? WATCH:  #brexit  
Useless May’s Brexit speech today: just a rehash of her Florence speech, more confusion than clarity, making “no deal” inevitable. Shambles!  
Corbyn: 15 months from referendum, we are still no clearer what the future of this country will look likeArticle 50 
The sort of people who ask why Brexit is such a fixation are the sort of people who're unperturbed when a hand grenade lands in their lap. 
7 Govt confirms it wants *a* customs union to replace *the* customs union. The swear word "int*rim" is uttered before the Brexit watershed.  
If you can, join one of the regional #StopBrexit rallies on Saturday Oct 14 #Brexit #Remain 
I'm not British, I am Scottish62% of my fellow Scots, in Scotland, the Land of the Scots didn't vote for you, or your Brexit  
Striking how many Labour MPs are asking for legal advice on revoking A50. Seems Labour seeks legal cover to renege on EU referendum 
May rejecting referendum on final terms by saying: "The British people were given their opportunity to choose." 
"I believe we can prove the Doomsayers wrong." Theresa May makes a statement on Brexit to the House of Commons  
New UK Customs White Paper should be read with Ireland's Revenue report. It goes into far greater detail on Brexit  
Why don't we just pick up the Brexit "ball" and go and play with countries that don't actually hate us? 
Theresa May refusing to answer questions about secret advice that says Brexit can be stopped  
NEW: Liam Fox confirms to me 'across Whitehall a great deal of contingency work is underway' for eventuality of no deal with the EU. #Brexit 
This will not be acceptable to most Leave voters I know. The side that won the referendum, lest No 10 has forgotten already.  
PetitionNo more of cash to the EU as part of any #Brexit deal.A net £250,000,000,000 is more than enough already. 
Govt don't care about "the will of the people" anymore. What people want (via polls) is at odds with where the Brexit Elite are driving us.  
Potential cost of #Brexitsource LSE Centre for Economic Performance 
Just asked the PM in today's Commons Statement on Brexit what the cost of Brexit is to the public purse but she couldn't say. Unbelievable. 
Brexit questions against noisy Tories. Message still gets across. Scotland must be consulted and payed heed! 
It's on days like this that Brexit feels like a heavy, ominous cloud over the City  
Now clear PM hopes Brexit transition will be 100% fudge: ECJ, single market, customs union & all new EU rules, but temporarily re-named 
No it wouldn't, a minority of pop voted to leave EU in flawed referendum & opinion polls now show maj backing Remain. MPs have nowt to fear 
Corbyn’s response to May on Brexit was pretty good. “Negotiations are most important in Britain’s recent history”Penny finally dropping?  
“As we look forward to the next stage, the ball is in their court,” says @theresa_may as she updates Parliament on Brexit  
UK to hold referendum on whether or not to carry on pretending May knows what's doing 
Including but not limited to 80% tariffs on Bombadier & immediately rejecting the Govnt's post-Brexit agriculture deal with the EU you mean?  
In its response to the final deal referendum petition the govt quietly admitted Article 50 can be revoked #Brexit 
May dodges questions on whether or not #Article50 #Brexit process can be halted if need be & if she's received legal advice on the matter. 
Ken Clarke smacks down "ultra brexiteer" Boris Johnson with his question to the PM during the commons #Brexit negotiations statement  
Theresa May and the Tory establishment have no real intention of seeing through Brexit and have betrayed the country. Time to go. 
Theresa May does not look like a Prime Minister. She doesn't sound like a Prime Minister, and  she has made a complete mess of Brexit. 
Tories really trying to shout down @IanBlackfordMP - Scotland's voice will NOT be silenced in the #Brexit negotiations. 
Main message I took from PM's #Brexit statement is that no deal will be the eventual outcome. Disastrous. Negligent. Shameful 
Our Customs Bill White Paper outlines how we will implement a new customs regime after Brexit  
How can anyone trust a PM who says 'around two years' for #Brexit?  Give us a firm date. 
A measure of how far Corbyn has come that he handled that Brexit statement so confidently. Tory heckles, but his own party right behind him. 
"Staggering" the government has made so little progress since triggering Article 50 - @jeremycorbyn  #Brexit  
Corbyn totally taking May and the Tories apart on their shambles handling of #Brexit. She comes back with a quip about Momentum. Useless!  
Plenty of ammunition for Corbyn - claiming cabinet at each other's throats, no real progress on Brexit 16 months on 
Jeremy Corbyn responding to Theresa May’s statement on Brexit: ‘What has this Govt been doing all this time?’ 
Labour Leader Jeremy Corbyn says PM's Brexit speech in Florence showed "scale of the mess the Government is making of these negotiations" 
"Fifteen months on from the referendum, we are still no clearer what the future of this country will look like," says @JeremyCorbyn #Brexit  
The only good thing to come out of No10 today Dear old Larry at last has a new collar sporting the Union Jack  come on Larry lead us through Brexit   
May says she will "prove the doomsayers wrong" on Brexit. Here's what she wrote herself before the referendum.  
Theresa May is completely losing the plot.. this would be absolutely catastrophic for the country for everybody.. it’s Tory Brexit Suicide  
On Brexit, I’m done with it. Sorry folks but I can’t help spread the pretence of a miracle happy ending, nor the domestic propaganda. 
Corbyn: Government making a "mess" of Brexit negotiations - "what on earth are they doing? Cabinet squabbling. 15 months wasted" 
May once again calls for a "unique" and "creative" solution to Brexit. Once again not the slightest clue to what that solution actually is. 
Worth a read. - Why it’s not too late to step back from the Brexit brink | Jessica Simor  
ANALYSIS: Communism is in historic retreat, now restricted mostly to the British Isles, due to the Brexit  
Watch live as the PM updates Parliament on the progress of Brexit negotiations, following her Florence speech  
LIVE: @theresa_may delivers #Brexit statement to @UKParliament 
British Prime Minister Theresa May gives lawmakers an update on Brexit  
Michael Gove is demanding that Britain pull out of Europe’s common fisheries policy immediately after Brexit  
Nobel winning economist Richard Thaler wrote last year for us on David Cameron's decision to hold an EU referendum  
SNP has mandate for an independence referendum before 2021, says Nicola Sturgeon  
Peter Schrank on police violence during the Catalan referendum – political cartoon gallery in Putney  
Council of Europe calls for an investigation into Spain’s police violence on referendum day  
American Media List Biafra, 2 Others As Next To Go For Referendum  
Brexit will result in a shortage of retail workers, a new report claims. What are the other implications?  
We have a mandate for calling a second independence referendum – we should use or lose it   
Chris Patten on Brexit:"The single most calamitous example of national self-harm in my lifetime”. 
Nicola Sturgeon says Brexit a 'developing disaster'  
Sturgeon is doing her best once again to undermine the democratic result of the EU Referendum. 
UK ministers 'deeply pessimistic' about Brexit talks progress  
Salman Rushdie thinks both 'Remain' and 'Leave' camps are understating the real impact of what Brexit will do to the country.  
This is perfectly acceptable situation for the Catalan government. But Spain would not accept the referendum  
The man who just won the Nobel prize for economics says Brexit is completely irrational  #StopBrexit #brexitshambles 
Tory infighting puts self-interest above national interest at crucial stage of Brexit negotiations. Unacceptable.   
For balance, a lot of complete fucking tools have said Brexit is a good idea.  
The World Bank's analysis of changes to UK trade with the EU after Brexit. Such outcomes would devastate many of our businesses.  
Jesus.. this is about Theresa May and the Tories this is not about anything else.. they own Brexit and will send us all into the abyss  
Brexit talks hit impasse after EU refuses to negotiate future relationship. Says UK must follow agreed sequence, define divorce terms first. 
For the first time since Article 50 was triggered, neither Remain nor Leave voters give May an overall positive rating for handling Brexit.  
As a leading British Nationalist, how would you describe your own British Nationalism? Given you support ultra narrow nationalist Brexit. 
Harry Leslie Smith's new book is an essential call to arms | Article | News | UNISON National  #labour, #brexit, 
Tories obsessed with themselves at the expense of electorate. They have zero idea of how they can reach any #brexit deal! #toryshambles 
Leave campaigner Nadhim Zahawi admits there are "no advantages" to a no deal #Brexit  
We can’t trust the Treasury on Brexit says @bernardjenkin  
Forget Brexit or that cough. The Bombardier crisis could finally do for the PM – and her squabbling ministers.  
Brexiters want to freeload on the EU. Even outside it we would benefit greatly from the huge integrated market on our doorstep. #Brexit /1 
New warning of job losses linked to Brexit  
Here's what Nobel prize-winning Richard Taler had to say about #brexit last year. But remember, he's only an expert:  
Must-read blog post  by my friend @pdegrauwe "Catalonia and Brexit: the same nationalism  
EU 'cannot rely on UK to stick to Brexit deal' because of cabinet divisions  
Relax, UK. The ideological Brexit loons have this covered: no deal is fine. Back in the real world, that would be a catastrophe.  
Theresa May refusing to answer questions about secret advice that says Brexit can be stopped  
In Brussels today for meetings on Europol & security cooperation. Concerned that Brexit negotiations not yet discussing this when so serious 
They desperately need this guy in the Brexit department.  
The Bank of England is finally adjusting to the fact that the Brexit economy is growing steadily  
As far as I can tell, on the whole Brexit supporters seem well balanced outward looking people, deeply proud of country but open to the world not anti immigration but want to control quality. Yet those Remainers come across much more narrow than we do 
Misinformation works, and a large number of people will always be suseptible to propaganda. I think problem as a country is we've been caught sleeping, definitely calls into question the legitimacy of referendum.Needs investigating by govt, problem is they are one of sources. 
Truly pathetic that a protest that started to denounce police brutality has morphed into a referendum on who is more patriotic #TakeAKnee 
Leanne Wood of Plaid Cymru says the Celtic nations won't allow Tories to ride roughshod over them in Brexit "power grab". 
What's stopped me panicking re Brexit til now is having repeatedly seen politicians pull off near-impossible in past (eg NI peace process) 
Flint: ‘People want government to hurry up and deliver Brexit’  
Redwood: ‘Relax, no Brexit deal is fine’  
WATCH: Alistair Darling on why we need a Scottish Labour leader who can take on the SNP over independence AND the Tories over Brexit.  
‘We’ve got nowhere and it’s not in our hands!’ BREXITEER MP@CrispinBlunt slams EU over lack of Brexit progress  
SNP Conference motion: "calls upon the Spanish Government to respect the overwhelming ‘si’ vote won in the Catalan referendum". 
RELAX: Tory stalwart @johnredwood says no Brexit deal is fine. Time to walk away? 
If there's one bit of Brexit related analysis you read today, make it this  
Soulwax discuss LCD Soundsystem, Despacio, 'Brexit Rock' and how they're already working on a new album  
.@NicolaSturgeon says it's "not the right time" for #IndyRef2 because of #Brexit instability  #SNP17 
Trying to keep up with #Brexit negotiations but I have no idea which court the ball is in any more! Does anyone?  
The general election didn't make Govt's Brexit predicament worse, & a new PM wouldn't make it better: @JananGanesh  
Theresa May tells Commons that Brexit will go brilliantly just as soon as she can think of a catchy enough slogan for it.  
V smart politics from Sturgeon here. Strikes Brexit compromise, creates clear blue water w/ Tories, and makes Govt look petty & unreasonable  
Idea that young Europeans would stop coming to London because of Brexit - rather than say ridiculous housing prices - is just laughable 
So the EU ‘tell us off’ because of no Brexit deal. We should tell them “no deal and no further payment is becoming inevitable.” #leavenow. 
Join us & @Mcr4EU for a live twitter Q&A with @jameschappers! Sun 15th Oct 6-7pm. Tweet @Mcr4EU your Brexit Q’s using #StopBrexitHour 
UK manufacturing going well and remaining buoyant, despite Brexit and the @BBCBusiness constant stream of bad news stories! #ukmfg #gbmfg 
'@CarolineFlintMP: Public want government to get on with Brexit. She's right!  
The Brexit talks are like debating with a Leaver on Twitter. Unable to deal with hard facts, the government's now moved onto the abuse stage  
It is time @BBCNews started showing true balance, by reporting Brexit as it really is: an impending national catastrophe we can & must stop. 
My statement following withdrawal of Conservative whip over the weekend #Brexit  
It’s a sad truth: on Brexit we just can’t trust the Treasury | Bernard Jenkin  
The only thing still motivating Brexit is sheer bloody mindedness. 
Hard to see how Sturgeon can argue the need for a second referendum to ratify Brexit without agreeing it's also necessary for Scots indy. 
#brexit is a journey from nationalism to desperation chaptered by incompetence, lies and puffery. 
Scottish Brexit minister Michael Russell going for the double mic drop. Wow.  
Seriously. It's uncanny. #brexit  
Mike Russell, Scotland’s Brexit minister, tells an SNP fringe event that a good Brexit is “a fantasy led by fanatics”. 
As @stephenkb points out, Brexit talks are going badly because May puts party before country, not because the Treasury "makes it difficult"  
The man who just won the Nobel prize for economics says Brexit is  completely irrational  
Far from having more for public services, Brexit Britain will have to spend tens of billions it doesn't have on new quangos. Brilliant. 
Nicola Sturgeon tells me in Sky News interview at SNP conference in Glasgow that argument for 2nd Brexit referendum is becoming "hard to resist". 
Here's @R_Thaler writing last summer on "Britain pays the price for a badly designed Brexit choice"  
2/ On citizens' rights, there are four problem areas. These are: Exporting of benefits after Brexit, role of the ECJ, family reunification and the UK's new 'settled status' offer. 
1/ Senior EU diplomat gives a fairly glum prognosis of what to expect from this week's Brexit talks. Says there are still significant divergences on citizens' rights and the Brexit bill. 
9th of Oct 2017 #IPOB in Mozambique  protest against ongoing killings of Biafrans by #NigerianArmy demand #Referendum #StopBiafrakillings 
Live from #snp17 to @daily_politics. Trying to get a word in to talk Brexit, independence and the truth of the opinion polls  
Excellent. How Brexit is a revolution: it creates a parallel political legitimacy ('the will of the people' vs parliament) & a power vacuum  
Yet again, another expert warns that #Brexit is a bad idea. Time to wake up and listen #StopBrexit @Conservatives 
Latest YouGov poll tells a new story. Brexit? The end is nigh! @acgrayling @JolyonMaugham @Channel4News 
May's Brexit rhetoric grows stronger by the day as she clings to power only with the support of Tory/DUP headbangers.Oh, I forgot & Corbyn. 
3. 'Robert' plays on your heritage (when you had an actual leader) and even supports Brexit.But there's a problem.Robert isn't real. 
Business investment in UK has grown in year since referendum after  revised figures cancelled out 1st estimates it had stagnated. 
@Rachael_Swindon @UKDemockery And yet one more reason to reject Brexit with enthusiasm  
Read: I tell @MoneyWeek - 'Theresa May must call Brussels’ bluff'! More about City of London and Brexit...  
Nadhim Zahawi praises "gritty" Theresa May and says she'll get a good Brexit deal. #bbcdp 
EU hits back at Theresa May: 'Brexit negotiations are not a ball game'  
 Given the EU obfuscation and delay a workable No Deal contingency plan is essential to #Brexit planning. 
Be flexible! I'm reasonably asking for a divorce with full access to the family home, children & conjugal rights.Tory #Brexit.#StopBrexit 
Slightly more manageable intro to what's going on w Brexit at WTO from the excellent @CoppetainPU 
Release the brexit impact studies then 
As a British EU negotiator, I can tell you that Brexit is going to be far worse than anyone could have guessed  
#Barzani to Baghdad: no one should think about cancelling the results of the referendum because it is the verdict of the people of Kurdistan  
Erdogan blames “the Jew” for Kurdistan “treasonous” referendum; threatens war  
The attacks have started already. Why does UK politics have to be binary?  Corruption is the biggest issue to face, starting with Brexit 
Round five of the Brexit negotiations begins today. Here's a summary of the previous four.  
Tories in frenzy to sack each other. . Labour too cowardly to even discuss Brexit. LibDems alone united & coherent. 
Tory and Labour conferences both failed to address Brexit, biggest issue of our time. More like ostriches than serious politicians. 
Brexit latest - no-one knows where the ball is  
As the fifth round of #Brexit talks get under way, check out the Parliament's take on them   
. @NickClegg on @adamboultonSKY - The turbulence will continue until the Brexiteers are held to account for their fibs.#StopBrexit #Brexit 
. @NickClegg on @adamboultonSKY - The public was sold a #Brexit Utopia by lying Brexiteers. #StopBrexit 
BREAK: govt to publish two white papers on #Brexit - customs & trade - after PM makes statement in HoC 
Britain should pull out of the EU’s common fisheries policy immediately after Brexit 
"I call on the Irish Govt to publish the Revenue Commissioners' report on Customs post-Brexit" – TD @davidcullinane  
.@nickclegg telling @SkyNews Brexit means we "consign ourselves to some distant corner of outer space". You're not even an MP mate, go home.  
Whip Withdrawn From Tory MEPs Who Voted For British Interests: Brexit Elite impose dictatorship and destroy democracy. #BrexitRef2 
Richard Thaler wrote about choice architecture and the Brexit vote for @ftcomment last year  
Wolfgang Münchau: A Catalan breakaway would make Brexit look like a cake walk  
NEWS! Talking down Brexit Britain is OK if you’re being paid by Fox News to talk about Muslims, insists Nigel Farage  
Any Brexit deal won’t be as good as EU membership. We shouldn’t therefore be arguing for a ‘limited’ membership.  
#SNP conference not talking  independence which is like Labour not talking about soaking the rich & LibDems overturning  Brexit 
Granite Brexit needed  
Spot on by @bernardjenkin: Treasury has allowed itself to be recruited to anti-#Brexit cause by the #EU & Remainers. 
IPOB PRESS RELEASE: We can call for and conduct our referendum with or without the cooperation of Nigeria  
LIVE: Kurds protesting in front of US embassies across Europe in response to Washington opposing Referendum.#SupportKurdistan #TwitterKurds 
Can't help thinking that this Brexit thing hasn't really been thought through  
Poll: what is the best military analogy for Brexit? 
Apparently @NicolaSturgeon is using "weren't left with any choice" line to prepare for illegal referendum or UDI.  
Sturgeon says that Brexit is a 'developing disaster' and the case for 2nd referendum getting 'difficult to resist'.  
'We will prove Brexit doomsayers wrong' - about time Theresa! 
. @bernardjenkin talking drivel on @adamboultonSKY.  The EU acts for the EU27, it is not in the business of making #Brexit lies come true /1 
"In a democracy, everyone has the right to change their mind." @nick_clegg Stop Brexit book out this Thursday.  
I will never break EU27 unity on #Brexit It is in Denmark’s best interest to stand united wit EU27 I hope for a good deal for both parts  
Scotland's first minister says a second referendum on final Brexit terms "will be discussed and debated"  
..should Hammond be sacked? "isnt about personalities..I think Treasury has a mindset which is v pro-Remain..v discredited after referendum" 
Let’s keep our #EU benefits. There are no benefits to #Brexit. Let’s do a democratic U-turn on Brexit. Our report:  
Jenkin: I think EU is going to try to impose a punishment Brexit on us.. what will be delivered is the promises in the referendum campaign 
Faced with an increasingly uncertain future, farmers should be empowered to try out new ideas after #Brexit    
#SNP17: Sturgeon says #Brexit 'developing disaster'; case for #indyref2 getting 'difficult to resist' - live blog  
Back in Westminster, big task on Brexit select committee + will fight to get Bath money for social housing. #Parliament 
Just cannot get over this notion that Brexit would be a doddle were it not for Philip Hammond  
Then release the Brexit impact studies @theresa_may. Let the people take a view based on fact not endless rhetoric. 
So perhaps, before telling us that the ball is in the EU's court, she could fill us in on what her Brexit policy actually is? 
Spain's violent refusal to allow a Quebec style-referendum is pushing Catalans into the arms of secessionists  
'@f_philippot: Les Patriotes want Frexit France to follow Brexit Britain back into the world.  
Collapse of Monarch partially due to #Brexit. Never mind we can replace EU trade with US. Good start with Bombardier wings 300% tax.... 
Danish finance minister boosts UK’s hopes of securing a Brexit trade deal  
'Voters aren't thick' John Humphrys slams Nick Clegg for PATRONISING the people on Brexit  
"Relax, no deal is fine" says @Conservatives MP @JohnRedwood#Brexit  
Michael Heseltine: Theresa May is too tied up with Brexit to fix Britain's housing crisis - PoliticsHome  
Will @GCHQ please address the crisis revealed by the FBI in the Trump/Russia affair: the revelation that Putin is involved with 'active measures' in Brexit vote?  
How can an actual MP accuse the Treasury of being in cahoots with EU to make Brexit difficult, only negative & blind to facts? Mind boggles.  
May under pressure to sack Spreadsheet Phil: Leave MPs fear the chancellor is trying to stall Brexit negotiations  
And they say we'll be ready for Brexit  
A no deal option would harm most British people, while offering the rich opportunities to profiteer from market turbulence. /1#Brexit 
WATCH | @Nigel_Farage responds to Hillary Clinton's comments on him and Brexit. She's such a sad bitter loser! pic.twitter.com/PO2c2rEH33 
.@JLongworthLML: “The Treasury are driving Theresa May down an entirely wrong route and are delaying the benefits of Brexit” @daily_politics 
In spite of all their evidence Theresa May pillories the 'doomsayers'(experts) that say Brexit will be a disaster #BrexitShambles #ToriesOut 
This is the key problem with Brexit and covertly racist anti-immigrant sentiment. We rely on immigrant skills that we can't easily replace.  
54.7% support a referendum on independence to give the people of Scotland a choice on its future. #SNP17 
.@nick_clegg: MPs have a duty to reject a bad #Brexit that falls short of what Leave campaigners promised  
Excellent thread as usual by @OliverNorgrove nailing some eccentric #brexit arguments.  
Incredible. 16 months after the Referendum, 7 months after triggering A50, May is meeting UK's largest companies to find out what they want  
You CAN stop Brexit. Ahead of my new book's publication on Thursday, here's my Observer article telling you how  
Some argue that, because we have a £70bn trade deficit with the EU, a no deal Brexit will not lead to predatory tariffs being imposed on us. 
EC for British Applicants to Horizon 2020. If mobility rules can't be met, then this will end your EU funding. #Brexit @Scientists4EU 
It seems that Theresa May is once more going to threaten to push the hostages (the British people) over the cliff.#Brexit #StopBrexit 
How encrypted apps helped Catalans fight for their independence referendum  
We told Brexiters that the EU wouldn't give them the kind of deal they promised. Now they wail the EU is being inflexible. #Brexit #Remain 
Fascinated as I am in the sex lives of dead PMs,is it not possible to divert some resources to inquiring into Russian involvement in Brexit? 
This is the dangerous point in the Brexit talks. PM attempting to shore up internal party political capital by burning EU-27 capital. 
Sturgeon says Brexit 'developing disaster' and case for 2nd referendum getting 'difficult to resist'  
Nicholas Soames just called Zimbabwe "Rhodesia", and we're meant to think Tories can forge new international deals after Brexit. #r4today 
Here we go. Ready for the 5th round of #Brexit negotiations.It's not too late to put #PeopleB4Politics and guarantee #citizensrights. 
Russia will charge us a lot more for gas once we're no longer part of a strong union of consumers. I wonder why it wanted Brexit for us.  
Danish minister of Finance deny any change in the  #Brexit policy of the Danish Government. Denmark back line of EU27. @danieldombey 
Daily Briefing: - Pro-union rally in Spain- Merkel's migration pact- Time running short in Brexit talks 
Bernard Jenkin: ‘Everyone, and all the facts & indicators, say Brexit is bonkers, but they’re all wrong! I say it’s brilliant & easy!’  
Latest Brexiter strategy is to shout loudly at the Treasury for pointing out inconvenient facts and figures on Brexit. 
So, here's the challenge - find the benefits of #Brexit. We have 24 hours, please help me with an RT!#DesperatelySeekingBenefitsOfBrexit 
How long before we have - after Britannia, the old passports, rickets etc - a Brexit campaign to bring back the old £1 coin?  
"Let's defeat Brexit by mocking and abusing Leave voters within our self-selecting bubble of ardent Remainers" 
A clean break in 2019 would be preferable to a messy and costly Brexit transition period, writes @bernardjenkin 
Can Theresa May prove #Brexit Doomsayers wrong? RETWEET & VOTE #yourvoice 
Distracted, divided Sack Boris Tories square up to Sack Hammond Tories as US new Bombardier Tariff reveals reality of future Brexit hell 
No, it’s in yours Mrs May, it’s your #Brexit government which wants to leave the EU and is demanding to retain the benefits of membership.  
'Voters aren't thick' BBC host slams Treacherous Remainiac  @nick_clegg for his attempts to overturn Brexit  
disappointing to hear @DonnellyStephen trying to make Irelands approach to BREXIT negotiations "party political" on @morningireland 
Good morning Britain, enjoy another day of apathy while your country is being fucked over with Brexit. Keep calm and carry on won't cut it. 
It isn't sustainable. Brexit wd be complex even with a stable cabinet. But this lot? Please. Get a cross party commission to do this instead 
French bankers weighing Brexit face Paris pressure to come home  
Lord Heseltine tells @lbc brexit will be a disaster. He also said it would be a disaster if Britain didn't join the euro 
The Brexit revolution - no one knows where this process is heading or how it will end. My latest  
Europhile @RichardAshMEP suspended from @Conservatives after voting against the 59% in Kent who voted Leave. #Brexit 
It's not the cough. It's not that Conference speech. It's not the threat of Corbyn tearing the Tories apart. It's Brexit, stupid 1/2 
May and Corbyn need to accept neither of them has a Plan A for Brexit. Plan B is #StopBrexit and they need to get on with Plan B. 
Bernard Jenkin desperately ramping up the lies & regurgitating Referendum soundbites in his #r4today interview. Reality is biting 
Another record of the gradual shift in public opinion against Brexit.#ExitfromBrexit 
Waking to crazy Bernard Jenkin on #r4today saying any remaining trade barriers post-Brexit would be all the fault of EU, not UK. *Sigh* 
Sadly for Theresa May, one of the "Brexit doomsayers" happens to be reality itself. 
Monday morning and, guess what, it's full of #Brexit in-fighting among the Tories again. Here's our top stories for the day... 
The chairman of RBS just warned the damage from Brexit will be 'considerable'  
The #Brexit mob do not understand the difference between 'the ball's in the EU Court' and 'the EU hold all the cards' in this negotiation. 
Brexit is not the elephant in the room... it is the room. A 'must read' from @Bonn1eGreer on 'authenticity' -  
This is the problem. The Conservative pledge was simply to Brexit. That’s only one measure of success and they will meet it at all costs.  
10k middle class march to overturn EU referendum big coverage. 50k working class march for tougher anti-terror policy no coverage. #BBCBias 
I'm trying very hard to look at #Brexit bright side.  Can you help @LiamFox? 
#Brexit talks resume today. They are  “even more dead in water after May fiasco”, says @InFactsOrg 
The Brexit referendum question was flawed in its design  
"Theresa May is not showing the authority or leadership needed to be successful in the Brexit talks": @NicolaSturgeon #SNP17 #GMB 
Nicola Sturgeon MSP says Theresa May doesn’t have the ‘authority’ or ‘leadership’ required to succeed in the #Brexit negotiations  
Half of Scots believed SNP distorted economics of independence for Yes vote in 2014 referendum  
They know that EU aware of public opinion in UK and knows most people do not want Brexit. @GuyVerhofstadt cares more about 48% than UK govt 
UK retailers 'need EU workers after Brexit'  
470,000 younger folks hit by the effects of a Brexit they didn't want. Pensioners who did want it get protected by the triple lock.  
This company loves Brexit and its Polish workers don't mind  
Here's how a referendum has not only exposed divisions between Catalonia and Spain, but within Catalonia itself  
Retail sector warns of Brexit price hikes without EU staff  
Thank you, Theresa May!  Finally clarity on what to expect from Brexit!“It will be the best possible deal for UK & EU.”Totally get it now. 
QUICK POLL ENDS MIDNIGHTIs it time to dump #brexit 
Billions could be released to help ready a no-deal Brexit  
Bojo must go and so must Tories damaging & dangerous #Brexit#StopBrexit #gpconf 
Top of agenda for Brexit negotiations today: citizens' rights. Deal within reach?   
It would be a mistake to demote Boris; the only minister in a grey Westminster sea with the balls to speak up for a bright post-Brexit UK.  
May's inability to amicably engage EU leaders means Brexit negotiations are adversarial - won't end well for UK #BrexitShambles #r4today 
Trying to explain the Brexit process to a Tory is like trying to explain nuclear physics to a hamster. 
The great Labour betrayal continues: 'Brexit means Remain' in all but name for Corbyn & Shadow cabinet   
We've moved a long way from: "There will be no downside to Brexit, only a considerable upside" (David Davis). /1 
Brexit and the parable of the boiling frog. THREAD 
May Day! Talking her survival struggle in a mo on @GMB with @piersmorgan @susannareid100 @toryboypierce. Harder to get a decent Brexit deal 
Weakened May to give bullish Brexit prognosis but say ball is in EU's court  
From Lloyd George to Brexit: 10 of the best books on British politics  
The Government already knows how #Brexit could impact the UK -  over 18,000 voters are demanding they tell us here: 
18. Even if a two year implementation of "no deal" Brexit is agreed we won't have have managed even the basics in time. 
1. According to The Times, May will warn European leaders today that Britain will make no more "concessions" on Brexit until they compromise 
Europe could see another Brexit-like rupture, and it's not Spain  
Denmark dismisses EU’s wrangling over Brexit divorce bill as 'a game'  
Everybody knows Brexit is doomed☞ Theresa May 'got secret legal advice' on how she could back out of Brexit  
Theresa May: 'We can prove Brexit doomsayers wrong'  
Here's how a referendum has not only exposed divisions between Catalonia and Spain, but within Catalonia itself  
UK, BMG poll:LAB-S&D: 42% ↑CON-ECR: 37% ↓#Brexit #May #Corbyn 
Theresa May believes Brexit 'doomsayers' can be proved wrong  
Soooo if the result of a referendum was based on lies, it should be considered invalid. Now THERE is an interesting thought. #IndyRef2 
What a mess..there was never going to be a good #Brexit. It's now just about damage limitation & the least damaging course is to #StopBrexit 
Britain's May to consult business leaders on Brexit  
Given that conservatives got what they want with Trump and Brexit, why are they so angry all the time? 
Weakened May to give bullish Brexit prognosis but say ball is in EU's court  
However, getting this ‘guarantee’ from EU27 could be sold as a win, and also helps UK’s own Agri/Regional funding gap post Brexit 16/ 
It requires either payments to be be made after Brexit, or a formula to be agreed to take account of decommitments & paid upfront 5/ 
Do the politicians who deliver Brexit honestly believe they’ll be re-elected when the people see the extent of the damage they’ve done? 
This is an excellent example of the Brexit cult mind set. Totally deranged.  
"Analysts" still fail to understand the Trump phenomenon. It's not just here, it's in the UK w the Brexit vote. Anti-globalism is a movement 
Why hasn't he been sacked? As with everything in British politics, the answer lies in Brexit  
Get details on the 2017 school bond referendum & be sure to vote on November 7!  
UK retailers 'need EU workers after Brexit'  
Globally, news media, have noticed that the British government appears to be falling apart?Chaotic, vague, Brexit.  
Catalonia And Brexit: The Same Nationalism  
Our senior #UK correspondent @FatimahLove92 writes#Britain eyeing to be ‘key partner’ of #CPEC post-Brexit. 
Funny how @BBCNews didn’t report the Catalan referendum but can devote prime news time to a demo by Unionists. 
Post-Brexit invisible border is impossible, says Irish report  
Catalonia will apply referendum law calling for independence declaration: leader  
Quit the departure from "join the Lib Dems, only we can stop Brexit"   
New court complex planned to bolster City of London after Brexit  
The actual #Brexit policy is yet to be revealed. Mainly because they don't have one yet. 
Brexit: overtaken by madness - if people close to power believe "no deal" is an option, we're doomed...  #Brexit.  
472 days since the referendum and still no fucking clue. No fucking clue I say! Best to call the whole thing off. #StopBrexit 
It is increasingly clear that Brexit was an act of violence against the existing economic order, writes @Simon_Nixon 
We need to secure our borders NOW..... so that when she gives them German passports they can't come here !! #Brexit  
Farage Tells Hillary Clinton to 'Stop Whinging' After She Demeans Brexit Voters -  HILLARY WILL NEVER STOP WHINING 
I mean, what is the actual Brexit policy? The one they outlined in Florence, or the one they outline the rest of time? 
Theresa May ‘must keep Boris and SACK Philip Hammond to save Brexit’ Conservative MPs demand  
Why do they keep saying the opposite of the speech that they said defined their new approach to Brexit?  
#CATALONIA TO MAKE SYMBOLIC RECOGNITION OF INDEPENDENCE REFERENDUM THIS WEEK, BUT NO UNILATERAL INDEPENDENCE DECLARATION - GOV SOURCES: BBC 
Tory Grandee Chris Patten Brands 'Calamitous' Brexit An Act Of 'National Self-Harm'  
This is big. Two Tory rebel MEPs suspended for supporting a resolution to block #Brexit 
.@theresa_may tells EU she will make no more concessions "the ball is in your court" #Brexit  
10's of 1000's of Leave voters abandoned by Monarch Airlines bc they voted for Brexit... How many will lose their homes for the same reason? 
Why is the news about the Biafra referendum poll not on Aljazeera Africa region website? 
"The EU...is still open to the prospect of the UK returning to the fold... ‘the door remains open’."Reverse Brexit  
Playtime is OVER: Brexit bill talks just a ‘game' - Denmark warns Brussels MUST compromise  
Tell us again why we haven't seen ONE #brexit march or demonstration? All we've ever seen is @bbcqt Wall of Gammon and a few hundred bots.  
Hopefully.It gets harder by the day to pretend that Brexit is anything positive. It’s insane.  
“#Northeast—58% #Brexit-only part of UK to lose salaried jobs over the past year”-@Brexit 
Perhaps she should reassert authority by sacking the Remoaners in her cabinet instead. Boris is after all on the side of the Brexit majority  
EU braces for Brexit talks collapse.Good.  
Knives out for the Chancellor in tomorrow's papers, but the biggest risk to UK isn't the Treasury's influence over Brexit, but a lack of it. 
Love the idea of firing Hammond for "making Brexit hard", as if that'd make wrapping decades of laws and international deals a cinch.  
Meanwhile, in Brexit fantasy land: "Only a fraction of the UK economy is dependent on membership of the EU".  
Britain's 'secret Brexit weapon': Employers urged to hire army veterans 'US-style'  
Quite apart from Brexit, Phil Hammond is just useless.  
Michael Heseltine: Theresa May is too tied up with Brexit to fix Britain's housing crisis  
the idea that some Tory MPs want Hammond sacked because he's "making Brexit hard" has nearly given me an aneurysm 
If you are agitating to Stop Brexit, then you are agitating to Stop Democracy. @spikedonline's Brendan O’Neill is dead right. 
Bernard Jenkin: It’s a sad truth: on Brexit we just can’t trust the Treasury [for which read: Philip Hammond].  
Fascist party Phalange marching in Barcelona today for the unity of Spain and against the democratic referendum.  
Denmark minister tells the EU to get on with Brexit discussions and stop f••king the UK around  
Excellent thread showing how many of the EU projects Brexiters rage against were British government policy. #Brexit 
We do have the optionWe have a mandate in the Scottish ParliamentWe shouldn't have to ask England's permission to hold a referendum  
Brexit will cause 'considerable' damage to the UK, warns RBS chairman  
I demonstrate against Brexit not because I'm "unpatriotic". On the contrary, I see it as my patriotic duty to do so. 
Banks expect their Brexit moving bills to reach $500 million each, sources say  
Irish Revenue commission report - open border post Brexit impossible.  @TconnellyRTE got scoop for new Brexit book  
Trying to legitimize an illegal referendum by demonizing Spanish citizens who support an indivisible Spain is intellectually bankrupt. 
Two @Conservatives suspended for daring to oppose "wanton economic self-harm". A party gripped by Brexit madness   
A Brexit heartland was among the only parts of Britain to lose jobs last year  
Graph in @Telegraph @ORB_Int shows people are realising how complex & difficult #Brexit is & realising promises of easy #Brexit were false  
ICYMI, this article by Finlan O'Toole on Brexit, English nationalism & Ireland's "impossible frontier" is brilliant.  
first #brexit now this  
Outgoing German finance minister Wolfgang Schauble interviewed in @FT doesn’t mince his words on #Brexit  
This essay, tough as it is, echoes the sentiments on Brexit of many I know across Europe. It's not a good sentiment.  
Twitter sadly is full of the  "I voted for the most painful, debilitating Brexit, because I am a deranged ideologue" part of the Leave vote.  
EU playing a 'game' over Brexit divorce bill and should reach 'speedy' compromise, says Danish minister  
The Tories don't only hate the ECJ and ECHR. Like criminals, they hate legal checks on their power. See the shocking comments below.#Brexit  
Farage Urges ‘Weak’ May to Show ‘More Determination’ in Brexit Negotiations or Prepare for ‘No Deal’   
The abuse of an advisory referendum shows how right Attlee & Thatcher were to condemn referendums as the device of dictators & demagogues!  
Wow - a must-read: Brexit, psycho right-wing tabloids and a very English problem ...   
An important reminder Tory spin on Brexit cost is “unlocking” billions.Why did they keep billions “locked up” when elderly dying?  
Tories sneaking in Thatcherism on steroids under cover of #Brexit which they could never win via an election  /1 
After referendum more unity between Kurds. Possibility for new relations between Rojava and KRI?  
EU infighting ERUPTS: Merkel and Macron block Brexit to STOP Barnier succeeding Juncker  
Links to the Oct 14 Regional Rallies  Try to get to one if you can! Keep the campaign rolling!#StopBrexit #Brexit 
"Serious divergencies" on Brexit remain between the EU and Britain, Michel Barnier says  
Theresa May under pressure over ‘secret advice’ on halting Brexit  THOSE WHO VOTED BREXIT WON’T BE SO FORGIVING 
Absolutely, nothing inevitable about Brexit - the British people have the right to change their mind if Brexit is not what was promised.  
Looking for a Leaver who has changed their mind since the #Brexit vote.  
Playtime is OVER: Brexit divorce bill talks blasted as just a ‘game' as Denmark warns Brussels MUST compromise  
#BrexitInFiveWords People This Thick Support Brexit 
We will not Brexit!#BrexitInFiveWords Ok, it's four words, but #Brexit is all about #FantasyNumbers#BrexitDoesntAddUp #FollowTheMoney 
That's a nice meal. Very Hard Brexit. Wish I could afford this meal  
Phew! Why it’s not too late to step back from the Brexit brink | Jessica Simor | Opinion | The Guardian  
Catalonia will apply referendum law calling for independence declaration: leader  
UK will have to maintain many EU regulations after #Brexit to sell 2 our largest export market. No point leaving #stopbrexit #brexitshambles 
There will never be import tariffs paid by British consumers on UK- produced goods. That includes farm produce. After Brexit, British farming will boom. No more faux fallow fields, for example. We have a very bright future indeed ahead of us outside the European Union. 
The notion of an "invisible border" in Ireland after Brexit is impossible says new Irish report.  
Catalan independence more self-harming than Brexit: out of EU and euro with no central bank - Wolfgang Munchau.  
If Tories don’t listen to LordHeseltine,they will go in2 obvilion by the next election;Brexit needs 2 be stopped now  
Well done to @RBS Chairman for speaking up and outlining business realities of Brexit for Financial Services; urgency for damage limitation  
Tory MEPs Suspended After Voting with Eurocrats on Blocking Brexit Talks 
Loudest applause in my talk at Carlisle today when I made the speech May should have made, ending ‘that is why I will not do Brexit’ 
If Labour can’t be honest about Corbyn & McDonnell wanting to leave the EU for 30 yrs, how can they have a consistent Brexit policy?  
.Brexit Britain is not worth the risk. 
None absolutely none. Before Brexit UK had a AAA credit rating now downgraded. Sterling was strong now it’s weak. Jobs are going to Europe. UK economy floundering, inflation rising.  You are destroying the UK. YOU!  
This is a good paragraph from Kazuo Ishiguro piece on Brexit from last summer, if you cannot access it.  
This on Brexit by Kazuo_Ishiguro, who has been in news this week(!), from the week after referendum, reads well now:  
Lord Heseltine is predicting the fall of this awful Tory government before Brexit even happens. Ouch @theresa_may 
#Brexit is a fraud on the British people. #stopbrexit #stopbrexithour 
The only people still behind Brexit are the racists, the xenophobes, the ignorant and the apathetic. Not a basis for GB! #StopBrexitHour 
The word 'crime' is increasingly being used when referring to Brexit  
In this Brexit process - which is more complex than thought, with promises turning out to be undeliverable- the people deserve the facts /10 
The legal advice to Govt on whether the British people can change their mind on Brexit should be published. There should be no cover up /9 
There are still things to say of Brexit that are both original and true. 
Legally, there is nothing inevitable about the Brexit process - the UK retains the right to change its mind  /7 
Worth remembering: so many Leave campaigners asserted again and again that if you vote for Brexit, the UK will get a great EU Deal /6 
Increasingly voters ask: if the final UK/EU deal looks materially different to what they were promised, can the UK decide to halt Brexit? /5 
So now the Tories planning to spend billions preparing for the cost of the failures on #Brexit - shameful  
Brexit is hugely more complex than people were told it would be - they were told it would be straightforward by Boris & co and it isn't /3 
Thread: There's nothing inevitable about Brexit - the British people have the right to change their mind if Brexit is not what was promised 
If you Stop Brexit you kill democracy, says Brendan O'Neill  
This week, I'm outside EU, outside UK, looking in. From this vantage point UK's position looks like some crazy shit gone really bad #brexit 
Theresa May 'got secret legal advice' on how she could back out of #Brexit  
Sign the #WorkingInTheEU petition to call on Government to back free movement for musicians post-Brexit ↓  
they promised us a Brexit deal cd be wrapped up over a quick cuppa & a biscuit now they're spending billions in case they can't/won't get 1  
Govt has conducted 50 Brexit impact studies. In refusing to release them they insult democracy.#StopBrexitHour 
Incredible that Govt suppressed internal Revenue report on Brexit.Should have been shared with public and Dail #Brexit @tconnellyRTE 
So Brexit will cost £55bn over four years. Let's spend that on the NHS instead. #StopBrexitFollow & RT. #StopBrexitHour 
Farage Tells Hillary Clinton to ‘Stop Whinging’ After She Demeans Brexit Voters  
Also #Marr got it wrong,saying Brexit was not debated at Labour Conference. It was debated.  Editing biased in favour of Tories. #MSM Bias 
"What is true is that Brexit would bring a significant fall in value of sterling"Brexit based on little 'in fact'.  
#Catalunya gov sources tell me there'll be symbolic recognition of independence referendum this week but no unilateral indep declaration 
The increasingly shrill 'no deal' mantra is simply thickos & zealots realising Brexit cannot be achieved without burning Britain down 
#BrexitInFiveWords Brexit is a looming disaster. 
7) No #brexit can be delivered that will satisfy more than 30-40% of the country. So any party trying will be finished afterwardsLet it go 
5) #Brexit is finished - and anyone saying "we must respect the vote" is a hypocrite, the vote cannot be respected, because it cannot be met 
There’s been a ‘significant’ change in the Brexit talks that’s very bad news for Theresa May  
3) saying "I don't care, I want out at any cost" - too bad. The party that delivers "any cost Brexit" will be destroyed by the impacts 
@DamienGreen On #bbcq you stated that debate on Brexit was banned @ #LPC17. Please see this schedule. I'm sure u won't mind being corrected 
Kent Conservative MEP suspended from party over Brexit rebellion "THERE MAY BE TROUBLE AHEAD .............." 
RBS chief reveals EU is dragging out Brexit talks to exploit British 'financial exodus'  
."The case for Scottish independence is made “greater & stronger by the day” by May’s chaotic approach to Brexit". 
Brexit, UK's most significant decision in a lifetime, will impact on us for generations.Need to base ultimate decision on facts not lies. 
Please RT to your MP #stopbrexit #brexitshambles #brexit @acgrayling @dontbrexitfixit @Andrew_Adonis @GuitarMoog @tony_nog @Undercover_mole 
The former U.K. Attorney General says the #EUwithdrawalbill will be challenged in the courts. #Brexit  
Well come on then Italy get a referendum going and vote to leave the EU 
.Early Brexit-induced crisis begins for NI farmers"Fall in value of £ = alternate feed sources more expensive". 
Blah blah. She still doesn’t understand why she lost, and the ignorant remarks about #Brexit prove it. #MAGA #Trump #4MoreYears 
Post-Brexit invisible border is impossible, says Irish report  
May's party suspends two EU lawmakers over Brexit vote  
May's magic money tree bearing fruit again. This is way beyond a joke. This crazy Tory Brexit must b stopped!  
"No deal is better than where we are now.""Paying up to £10bn every single year into an organisation that over regulates many of our industries takes away our fishing waters & bans us from making our trade deals with other parts of the world."#Brexit 
"If we go in for Brexit we will find that jobs will leave the City and there will be a rebalancing of financial activity within Europe"  
Ruth Davidson call for 'loyalty'.  Loyalty to the Brexit voters would be a start.  We don't want Hammond, Rudd or Davidson thanks. Traitors.  
At least 350,000 join demonstrations on the streets in Madrid & Barcelona on Sunday in wake of an outlawed Catalonia independence referendum  
.Irish Govt has reports showing TRUTH about effects of BrexitSo does UK Govt but they're hiding them from us . 
Brexit could cost Britain its position as the leading data market in Europe, report warns  
so Brexit will raise prody by destroying millions of jobs?  Same output divided by smaller empt  Black Death was good for productivity too  
Lord Heseltine is right. The disaster of Brexit is the result of a putrid festering wound within the Tory Party. 
Nicola Sturgeon: No Scottish referendum before clarity on UK’s future outside EU 
We've pulled together our work on #Brexit and the impact it might have on the #NHS into one handy place > 
.A clear view from Ireland"Driven by the ideology of Brexit, the British govt cannot deliver economic growth" 
"The electorate is changing, the elderly voters for Brexit are dying & the younger voters are becoming in at the other end...." Heseltine.  
Brexit heading to national food security crisis and PM doesn't seem to care says @ProfTimLang #foodbrexit #gpconf 
Julian Assange taught young Catalans how to use encrypted chat apps to avoid Spanish police during the referendum  
Scottish independence case helped by "Brexit chaos": Sturgeon  
There is nothing undemocratic about a ratification referendum on #Brexit deal, says @MollyMEP at #gpconf  
Farage Tells Hillary Clinton to 'Stop Whinging' After She Demeans Brexit Voters  
... perhaps we should just set up a Brexit Negotiations WhatsApp Group to sort all this out 
Dominic Grieve: Brexit is a “fundamentally unconservative” thing to do  
Brexit: 'No deal' planning is well under way, says minister  
Eg claiming Labour didn't discuss Brexit at conference. What about Dimbleby's lie on #bbcqt that Labour promised to pay off student debt? 
If Arlene Foster and the DUP stick to this line, #Brexit as the Tories and EU understand it is impossible.  
Just had a chat with Brexit minister Michael Russell after SNP vote on 'independence in Europe'. Available on @ScotNational Facebook page. 
Over past 2 months, visionary Mogg's been lining up the parties to blame for Brexit disaster: 1) Barnier/EU, 2) Remoaners, 3) civil service:  
Must read analysis: Low productivity is the UK economy's Achilles Heel: why Brexit Britain should worry...  
Same happened on there being 'no brexit debate at Labour conference'. It happens every week.  
Cath Kidston boss: 'Brand Britain' hasn't been weakened by Brexit  
Calls for Theresa May to reveal ‘legal advice’ she received on stopping Brexit  
#Brexit Deep down even the very incompetent UK government should know that  'NO DEAL" will be a catastrophe...#StopBrexit#remain 
The only aspect of Brexit I'd put money on now is the impossibility of its loudest cheerleaders taking any responsibility for what happens. 
Of course we can do something other than #Brexit, we can stop it anytime if the people have changed their mind - so we should ask them  
I am a proud European and terrifiedby Brexit. Listening to @Feorlean at #SNP17 gives me reassurance. The SNP will always fight for Scotland. 
Prolonged fall in living standards since the Brexit vote & we haven't left yet... We still don't have to do this.  
#Clinton says #Brexit supporters 'voted against modern Britain' -Confirmed #Brexit is a big lie taking us back 30yrs  
Tory Brexit rebels SUSPENDED... Now David Davis tells Corbyn 'AXE YOURS TOO'  
Don’t count on our independent Bank to stop Brexit disaster | William Keegan  
I wonder if one day supporting Brexit will be a recognised as a mental illness?  
Watch: Tory Brexiteer's Call For EU Hard Brexit, WTO Rules 'Christmas Ultimatum'  via @BreitbartNews 
A Catalan breakaway would make Brexit look like a cake walk  
Brexit supporters IQ reaches a new low. Police rush to border to stop them returning to UK  via @wordpressdotcom 
Politics is locked in stalemate between Anywheres + Somewheres Can Brexit break the logjam? My thoughts in @guardian 
How @BritishInEurope cope w/ #Brexit & fight for their EU rights. My interview w/ chair Jane Golding @EuropeStreet. 
Another example of how Brexit has driven the Tories mad. The 'Unionist' party so carelessly flippant on what Brexit means for Ire/NI.  
Sturgeon vows Scotland will pay to let EU citizens stay after #Brexit.Thank you for putting #PeopleB4Politics 
#gpconf @MollyMEP's speech about Brexit was amazing! I wish the whole public could or would hear this. 
"The historic mistake of voting to leave the EU can be reversed. We can and must stop #Brexit." @MollyMEP #gpconf 
Sadly @UKLabour are dodging responsibility for opposition, allowing #Brexit debate to be stifled & people sold short says @MollyMEP #GPConf 
#gpconf "you can't be anti-austerity & pro-Brexit" @MollyMEP @TheGreenParty #Brexit spokesperson  
Great Brexit thread! It's an on old favourite to Remainers. And a MUST READ if you haven't seen it before.  
I trust the 1000's of Leavers abandoned abroad bc the Monarch Airlines collapse bc of Brexit won't be claiming compensation under EU rules? 
VIDEO: Anti-independence supporters perform fascist salutes in Spain ahead of referendum  
Brexit has led to falling real wages in the UK  
I've written to my MP about Brexit.We all should.We live in a democracy.Let's make it work.Dear @LaylaMoran, please see attached. 
As more people are forced to use food banks, Brexit denier Sturgeon is going to blow another £25m of our cash appeasing EU workers. #SNP17 
Many of us have never felt less at home in the UK than since the Brexit vote, says @MollyMEP 
#gpconf @MollyMEP in Brussels finding sympathy & concern from EU colleagues about Brexit, not the vindictiveness the tabloids claim  
Dear Leavers,is there a red line for you where Brexit damage is concerned?What would need to happen for you to admit it was a mistake? 
Great speech. It's time for Resisters to GET ANGRY and organised. NO BREXIT  
Former Prime Minister of Australia Tony Abbott is to advise a new British Brexit free trade think-tank the Institute for Free Trade, reports the Sydney Morning Herald. 
The Japanese car giant has sounded a bullish outlook on its future in post-Brexit Britain  
The referendum was not about the EU or even immigration - it was about foreigners  
#Britain can stop #Brexit. Now, we need to persuade Britain that we should stop Brexit. Share our report. Link:  
If you will be 18 on or before 15th February 2018 then you can vote in next year's referendum but you must register to vote by November 1st 
The Brexit cabal: ‘too much mediocrity, too many lies’.  
Brexit IS totally bonkers.Even more bonkers that MPs know it... and do nothing.  
The Labour party on Brexit:More positions than the fully illustrated version of a well known book on human recreation...#LabourShambles 
It's comes to something when it's incumbent on social media to constantly correct the BBC. Brexit WAS debated at Lab17. #Marr 
ICYMI - Brexit Minister @Feorlean on #indyref2: "The mandate the Scottish people gave the SNP in 2016 remains" #bbcsp Scotland 
Rammed Fringe meeting at SNP Conference on Europe & Brexit led by @AlynSmithMEP This a party that takes Brexit & Europe seriously. #SNP17 
Your periodic reminder that no Brexiteer, bar Patrick Minford, ever wanted a no-deal exit during the referendum campaign. 
First fringe meeting - Alyn Smith MEP - Brexit, Scotland & the EU: what now?  Standing room only even with extra seats being brought in  
Packed hoose for @AlynSmithMEP Brexit fringe event #SNP17 
‘The only way this is going to work is if the #North remains in the customs union’ @PearseDoherty #twip #brexit #border 
If David Cameron was a true patriot he’d be saying the same thing today. The damage #Brexit is doing to Britain is obvious and avoidable.  
Official Results of the Democratic Referendum on Catalonia's Independence  
Appalling patronising arrogance again; refusing to believe that the Brexit vote happened & she lost, sneering at those she disagrees with. 
May's party suspends two EU lawmakers over Brexit vote  
Regional rallies against #Brexit on October 14  Let's keep the campaign rolling!#StopBrexit #Remain 
WATCH: All Labour's Different Brexit Positions  
#BrexitThere is no plan.There is no vision.There is no agreement within cabinet.There is no negotiating position.The UK is in trouble 
Now over 115k! Let's keep the petition for a referendum on the final #Brexit deal rolling! #StopBrexit #Remain 
"We need assurances that funding to tackle poverty & inequalities will continue after  Brexit" @cerysfurlong on @BBCWales Sunday Politics 
On @MarrShow this morning, Andrew Marr said Labour didn't discuss Brexit on Conference floor, this is false we did two debates & two votes 
"Leave it to us, the grown ups, to negotiate" -  @EmilyThornberry  on Labour negotiating Brexit with the EU #bbcsp 
Britons think it would be bad for Brexit talks if Theresa May resigned as PM, an exclusive @SkyData poll reveals 
Read all about the court case that could bring Vote Leave campaign - and #Brexit result - into doubt. 
Have you noticed all the nutters support Brexit?  pic.twitter.com/HQEDB4qGqP 
My speech to campaign groups fighting for EU citizens' rights post-referendum #StopBrexit 
Sturgeon says timing of Scottish independence vote on hold until Brexit clearer  
Lab Brexit position clear says @EmilyThornberry - what is it? Asks @BBCsarahsmith . These are the wrong questions, says @EmilyThornberry 
It's a shame Mrs May can't sack senior civil servants in a reshuffle. They seem to be an even bigger obstacle to Brexit than the politicians 
#porridge box set available to download now on iPlayer. Ignore the haters. We all know they voted brexit. Have a lovely Sunday  
And here you have the truth of Labour's Brexit position: "We can't leave most of these EU institutions" :  @EmilyThornberry on #bbcsp 
Disgraceful that govt refuses to reveal its studies on impact of #brexit .They must be dire -but public should know cost of #BrexitReality ! 
Is there any clarity on Labour's position on Brexit? Here are all their different positions... #bbcsp 
Govt should move aside and leave Brexit to the grown ups in labour says @EmilyThornberry - yes, she did, stop laughing! @daily_politics 
What DON'T you get ! #bbcspLabour's position on #Brexit is as clear as it can be at this stageUNLIKE the Tores who are allegedly in charge 
Labour leadership still won't rule out continuation of free movement of people post Brexit, if they're in charge @EmilyThornberry on #bbcsp 
Does the Spanish response to the Catalonia referendum mean independence is inevitable? #FarageOnLBC 
Has @EmilyThornberry on @SkyNews changed Labour's stance on Brexit again. How many times has it changed in the last week? 
Two Tory MEPs suspended from the Conservative Party after voting to block Britain’s progress in Brexit talks  
.@stellacreasy slams the Government for spending billions on a no-deal #Brexit rather than our NHS  
I don’t know what the British Dream is, but I know what the British Nightmare is: Brexit.  
The inside story of the chat apps Catalans used to secretly organize their referendum  
Detailed, damning report about impact of Brexit on Irish border and Irish-UK trade. Shows impossibility of UK ideas.  
18 Labour MEPs who voted 2 block Brexit have defied their party policy. What is @jeremycorbyn going to do about it? 
#Brexit is now evidenced as the most anti intellectual and economically suicidal exercise the country has undertaken. We need to stop it. 
RBS Chairman Sir Howard Davies has told Sky News the European Union's Brexit negotiators have "no incentive" to make a transitional deal 
The DExEU quietly admits Article 50 notification can be revoked. So Liz Truss was lying when she said #Brexit was irreversible.#StopBrexit 
'We will lose jobs in the City and at RBS as a result of Brexit' - @RBS Chairman says damage in banking will be "considerable" #Paterson 
Brexit is not the elephant in the room... it is the room. @Bonn1eGreer on the importance of 'authenticity' -  
You can't help but admire @NicolaSturgeon Crystal clear, on domestic policy, #indyref2 #Catalonia #brexit Always proud she's our FM  
Ruth Davidson's Scottish Tories fallen into 3rd place in latest polling behing SNP & Labour. 72% of Scots pessimistic about Brexit... #Marr 
Michael Heseltine thinks the government could fall before Brexit is fully implemented.  
On @MarrShow this morning, Andrew Marr said Labour didn't discuss Brexit on Conference floor. We did. Two debates and two votes. 
The govt has already quietly admitted that Article 50 notification can be revoked in its response to the final deal ref petition.#Brexit  
May's Europe Minister @AlanDuncanMP says Leave vote was "working-class tantrum" on immigration. Can't trust her on #Brexit until he's gone.  
UK media tried to oust the UK PM this week.They're panicking over Brexit, they see the end game now.They lie. TM will deliver #Brexit. 
First rule of almost anything is to ask "who's set to profit?" - in the case of Brexit, the answer is "mostly tax haven-based billionaires" 
Two Tory MEPs suspended for backing a Brexit blocking motion. What about the 18 Labour MEPs who also backed it 
Late to @PrivateEyeNews. This on the funding of the Legatum Institute / prolific Brexit cheerleader Tim Montgomerie is worth remembering:  
Open customs border impossible after Brexit: unpublished report by Revenue spells out scale of Brexit impact  
Brexit with no deal is "a very, very bad idea" for Britain's economy, @CBItweets chief says  
A week after the Catalan referendum we want to show our support to all the people injured by the repression of the Spanish police. 
The right wing faction pro hard Brexit = full of ppl who represent hereditary wealth. But even centrist Tories have same problem...2/ 
.@NicolaSturgeon says she's making case for #indyref2 because "the damage [of Brexit] done to Scotland is likely to be monumental"#marr 
Fantastic interview with the FM. She's spot on - the case for Indy will get ever stronger when we experience Brexit. Let's make the case now 
Brexit blocking MEPs suspended, Davis demands Labour act  
Nicola Sturgeon says the case for independence will get "ever stronger" the more we know about the UK government's Brexit deal. 
Internal report by Ireland revenue: open customs border "impossible" after Brexit  (ht @bearaboi) 
Border controls in Northern Ireland would be a "red line" for the DUP's Arlene Foster  
Why it’s not too late to step back from the Brexit brink | Jessica Simor  
The Sunday Times, which backed Mrs May and Brexit, appears to be having a total nervous breakdown  
Senior legal figures in the UK think Theresa May received ‘legal advice’ on stopping Brexit - My piece:  
26 British MEPs voted in the European Parliament against progressing trade talks in the Brexit negotiations. 2 were Conservatives. 
It is outrageous that May sacks the only 2 Tory MEPs who know & speak the truth about Brexit @RichardAshMEP & @juliegirling @Europarl_EN 
Does the Brexit priesthood have any idea of the anti-politics that'll certainly be unleashed when people see what Brexit really means?  
Theresa May plans for no EU deal | Two Tory MEPs suspended after voting to block Britain’s progress in Brexit talks  
Britain cannot import Australia’s weather, but post-Brexit she has much to learn from her old ally | @matthewlesh 
#TheresaMay under pressure over ‘secret advice’on halting #Brexit as downsides of #BrexitReality become more visible 
Brexit blocking MEPs are a disgrace!  
1. The Brexit vote was a one-off. A spasm. If it weren't, there would be many more genuine Twitter accounts supporting it. There aren't. 
Oh FFS! #marr just repeated the lie that Labour didn't discuss #Brexit at their conference. I watched a whole morning of debate on it. 
The SNP not debating indy is NOTHING like Labour not debating Brexit. Everyone knows what the SNP's position on independence is. 
Ooh. Good news. How about a second referendum?  
US has been superbly protected from Trump by a strong press, Opposition & principled Republicans. We can't sadly say the same about Brexit. 
Theresa May under pressure over ‘secret advice’ on halting Brexit  
BREXIT BLOCK: Merkel and Macron CRUSH May's hopes for quick transitional deal. Block their cars at our Ports!!  
This is of course good common sense. The EU are refusing to move onto the next phase of negotiations, talks on trade. #Brexit  
The Balkans may have a nifty way to solve the Irish border issue  
Too much remembering is locking Europe into hating, "taking back control", secession threats and our own Brexit  
1 Not a terrorist incident.2 Farage is not 'Brexit leader', he's a twat.3 Fox news isn't 'news', it's a bunch of twats, owned by a twat.  
From today's Observer - Govnt still refusing to publish studies into impact of Brexit on our economy.  
READ | 18 Labour MEPs sided with the EU against the UK on Brexit talks, but still haven't been suspended. Disgrace! 
PM has no long-term future but has to stay. Govt has no Brexit plan and is just hoping something will turn up. UK is in suspended animation 
Most voters want Theresa May to stay on as Prime Minister & believe she is best person to deliver Brexit #ImWithMay 
We don't succumb to blackmail as a nation.See my web for how to deal with these gangsters.BREXIT blogs  
Almost half of Britons think it will be bad for Brexit negotiations if Theresa May resigns as Prime Minister. Should she stay in power?  
So odd watching the Tories install Corbyn in No.10 rather than admit their fruitloops are wrong about Brexit.  
Internal Revenue report finds open customs border impossible after Brexit  
Putting national interest above party or any other interest, @nick_clegg on challenging the  Brexit false narrative of taking back control.  
Bwahahaha...#ExitBrexit Theresa May under pressure over ‘secret advice’ on halting Brexit  
This is what they called Project Fear but is really just economic inevitability. And we haven't even left yet . . . much worse would follow a hard #Brexit  
EU infighting ERUPTS: Merkel and Macron block Brexit to STOP Barnier succeeding Juncker  
Tory Brexit rebels SUSPENDED... Now David Davis tells Corbyn 'AXE YOURS TOO'  
Calls for Theresa May to reveal ‘legal advice’ she received on stopping Brexit  
So we've had seven years of 'necessary' austerity but Tories can find billions for a suicidal Brexit No Deal + a bung to DUP? Criminal!  
I can't imagine "branch office government" in Holyrood ever again, when you consider how The SNP is ploughing a lone furrow re Brexit. 
Most voters want Theresa May to stay on as Prime Minister and believe she is ‘best person to deliver Brexit’, poll…  
They have the "gaul" to demand a Brexit payment from UK!!  
Sky Data Poll: Immediate Theresa May exit would be bad for Brexit negotiations, Britons say  
Poll by @SkyData suggests 42% of people think it would be bad for Brexit negotiations if Theresa May immediately resigned as Prime Minister 
The SNP will vow to protect the rights of EU citizens living in Scotland after Brexit  
So no "magic money tree" for health, schools or public sector pay - but there's one for "no deal" Brexit extremists?  
Brexit can be reversed at any time before we leaveTheresa May under pressure over ‘secret advice’ on halting Brexit  
Road bond referendum passes in a landslide — via @jake_zuckerman 
*NB Hard WTO Brexit wipes out 1m British jobs, £50bn a year in wages. It steals £34bn a year from the public purse. Best case. #BrexitRef2 
Governor Justice thanks state voters for overwhelmingly passing the Roads to Prosperity Bond Referendum.#wvgov 
What was it that attracted u to Brexit The tanking the economy, inflation, pressures on the NHS or the hormone-injected chlorinated chicken?  
Great ideas in history: invading Iraq 2003; saving South Vietnam 1960-75; Brexit; ignoring climate change; WarOnDrugs; to be continued... 
Kurdish referendum sees massive growth in supporters @AJENews 
Will be same in Brexit UK: young people not only having opportunities taken away, they’ll have to pay for older people who took them away.  
How #Brexit madness inflamed by our non dom press owners. A Dutchman leaves England because of it's class system and 'Unhinged Press'  via @prospect_uk 
Week in pictures: Mass shooting in Las Vegas, Catalan referendum on independence and Shia pilgrims during Ashura  
On a Barcelona roof observing the aftermath of the referendum Barcelona and its ramifications., Barca was settled by Phoenicians and Carthaginians for centuries. Parts of it resemble to Phoenicia in old Lebanon. Wishing the best solution for Catalonia and Spain  
It’s a pity Labour didn’t make this - and voting rights of ex-pats - a prerequisite for their support of Cameron’s EU referendum legislation  
After the disputed referendum for Catalan independence last week, tens of thousands have turned out for protests in Madrid and Barcelona. pic.twitter.com/qXAkr2f2Vi 
As the fog clears , is it not widely apparent that Brexit will be a cock-up of IMMENSE proportions, whatever those dickheads tell you ?  
That'll be the no deal that was never going to happen as UK had the upper hand on #brexitA simple "I got it wrong" would be more helpful  
Just one of the reasons why it's worth fighting for the European Union! #Brexit  
.@JeremyCorbyn has yet to take action on 19 Labour MEP’s who voted to block #Brexit talks progress.Only the @Conservatives will deliver #Brexit   
.@Theresa_May flexed her muscles yesterday, stripping the whip from two Conservative MEP’s who voted to block progress in #Brexit talks. South West MEP @JulieGirling & South West MEP @RichardAshMEP were suspended from the party last night. 
 @Rachael_Swindon The smoking gun that will finish her. Brexit CAN be stopped. Lied to monarch. Lying about Brexit 
Whip withdrawn from Tory MEPs who voted to block Brexit progress  
Brexiters complain that the EU is undemocratic, but were there a directly elected EU President they would rage about a superstate.#Brexit 
EU officials hold secret Brexit talks with Jeremy Corbyn - Bob Moran - political cartoon gallery in Putney  
May putting party & her own survival once again before country as she plans to blow billions on #Brexit no deal disaster  
It's always someone else's fault with Leavers☞ The top 10 reasons Brexit isn't working, according to Brexiteers  
Germany’s been rejecting this UK dream for months. There is nothing new here unless you subscribe to blind British #Brexit fantasies  
Guess you can't please all the people all the time. But why are some people on twitter so rude??  Still Brexit will be worth all the abuse ! 
Brexiters say "Remoaners are talking the country down".Actually, Brexit is taking the country down.  
In conversation with mates and we can’t remember why,now the nation is more aware of what Brexit means, we don’t have another referendum? 
#Brexit Legal advice “that the article 50 notification can be withdrawn by the UK at any time before 29 March 2019"  
Really good from @AnasSarwar I've been waiting for someone in Labour leadership to say this since brexit vote.  
Prime minister is sent FOI request to publish legal guidance thought to argue that UK can stop Brexit at any time  
Jeremy Corbyn is PM. "EU steps up Brexit talks with Labour amid concerns over Theresa May's future".   #JC4PM 
At last! The subversion of Brexit has begun | The Spectator  
The Brexit that Brexit liars promised isn't going to happen because reality is an actual thing. Plough ahead anyway? 
Should the UK still fulfil #EU financial commitments if trade deal is not concluded end of #Brexit negotiations? RETWEET & VOTE #yourvoice 
The Sunday Times reports the Tory whip has been removed from MEPs Richard Ashworth & Julie Girling for opposing move to Brexit trade talks  
Theresa May's Brexit plans in ruins after France and Germany 'reject transitional arrangement'  
Failure of Brexit delivery is not just Government's- it's Farage & co pushing bank robbery for decades without a pl…  
How many people voted for 30 years of lower growth post #brexit?  
A big Japanese bank is among the first to sign a post-Brexit lease in Frankfurt, sources say  
Catalonia referendum results show 90% of voters backed independence  
Top Eurocrat Brands Patriotic Poland 'Greater Danger for the EU than Brexit'  Stand Strong Poland  #NoRefugees 
Brexiteer's Call For EU Hard Brexit, WTO Rules 'Christmas Ultimatum'  via @BreitbartNews @owenpaterson 
No #brexit is better than a good brexit.#hardremain 
As the scale of Brexit disaster grows w Tory chaos, there's a tiny window in which we can call stop.Keep calm & carry on isn't working. 
brexit inflation moving mad £12 a box?? daylight robbery  
Wow! Southside radio ads I'm hearing from amoral @EdWGillespie replays his '04 anti-gay referendum strategy with full Pro-Confed race appeal 
Farage has been advocating Brexit since he smoked his first ciggy & drunk his first pint 25 fecking years ago - where was his detailed plan? 
Amazing advice from Nick Clegg, if  just 150,000 Remainers join the Tories they could outvote the existing members on Brexit. Worth a try? 
"All this was brought to you, bought for you, by the Brexit elite": @nick_clegg putting national interest above all. 
Pressure now on May to reveal legal advice to halt Brexit before March'19.Publish the advice & impact statements.  
GE17 flop TMay under pressure to release ‘secret advice’ on halting Brexit 
From Irn Bru to hotels, Scotland also enjoying its full share of "despite Brexit" good news   
'The electorate is changing.' Lord Heseltine gives his view that the government will fall before Brexit can happen.  
London has overtaken New York to become world capital of the visual arts. (And yes, WWD, "despite Brexit")  via @wwd 
The Catalan crisis confirms the #EU is tearing nations apart, says Brendan O'Neill on this week's podcast. #Brexit  
You say if a democracy can't change its mind, it ceases to be a democracy @DavidDavisMP. Hypocritically, you deny exactly that on Brexit.  
Brexiters : people should be able to eat chlorinated chicken but not be able to read government own studies of the impact of Brexit. 
Time for us to all unite behind Prime Minister @Theresa_May & let her get on with the job of #Brexit #ImWithMay  
It's "very possible" Brexit won't happen, ex-Deputy PM Michael Heseltine says  
50 Secret Brexit Impact Reports#BrexitInFiveWords 
The 3 step Brexit plan:Q. Can we have a 2 year transition?A. NoQ. Are we fucked?A. YesQ. Can we #remainA. Sure 
The "three Humiliations of Brexit" by Gideon Rachman in the FT. Or: Why EU wins in every scenario.   
Do it. In the name of whatever is holy to you do it now  May under pressure over ‘secret advice’ on halting Brexit  
The overlooked #transport dimension of #brexit is part of the #brexitshambles : 
Theresa May under pressure over ‘secret advice’ on halting Brexit  
Why it’s not too late to step back from the Brexit brink | Jessica Simor  
It's still possible to halt Brexit if the final deal doesn't match the promises made by Leave campaigners   
In Slemani ,President Barzani met both Iraqi Vice Presidents, Nujaifi& Allawi. After exchanging views on latest developments, there is an initial agreement for having dialogue, rejecting collective punishment from Baghdad on Kurdistan People after the referendum.  
Some public advice for the government: stop Brexit. 
Hard Brexit by January? Maybe, if the European Union keep dragging their heels...  
Looks like #brexiters will be funding brexit after all  
We still need more clarity on Brexit before we can talk trade, Jean-Claude Juncker says  
"Catalonia referendum: Spain apologises to injured Catalans"-BBCThey didnt kill them or declare them as terrorists! ARE U LISTENING! 
#Brexit Britain is a King Lear of nations, old & foolish, taking advice from charlatans and liars who flatter its conceit of greatness. 
Thousands of people are attending rival demonstrations amid tensions over Catalonia's independence referendum  
"Brexit leader" in the US (not terrorism btw); less popular than an Elvis impersonator in the UK  
.@Telegraph cartoon#JeremyCorbyn #juncker #Brexit  
Theresa May's Brexit plans in ruins after France and Germany 'reject transitional arrangement'   
 Admirably clear Brexit analysis. Cuts through the crap. 
Absent Madrid's overreaction, the world and many Catalans would have ignored the result of the referendum.  
"Voice of Nigel Farage, Brexit leader". He's not even a fucking MP America?!  
Brexidiots are tweeting away as if a British Airline didn't go down this week due to Brexit... They just don't care. 
Brexit & the future safety & quality of our meat & animal welfare standards. Grim reading on a grim topic  
A racist man celebrates his national pride in an empty room is a pretty good metaphor for brexit tbf  
Just confirms what a disaster #Brexit will be @RCorbettMEP @mcashmanCBE @Kevin_Maguire @Keir_Starmer @derekvaughan 
EU infighting ERUPTS: Merkel and Macron block Brexit to STOP Barnier succeeding Juncker  
People aren't attaching a high enough probability to a hard Brexit, Niall Ferguson says  
Once again, Russia's invasion of Ukraine began w/the annexation of Crimea, which had a fake referendum covered by reporters on the ground. The Russian military's annexation of Crimea in no way has any similarities to the attempted referendum in Catalonia:  
I'm catching up on #GBBO and the Paul handshake is losing value quicker than the pound on Brexit morning. 
We saw it Toronto, with Brexit and then Trump...and now Calgary? Older voters are controlling elections. Why? Cause they vote. Please vote. 
Concise account of chaos of Brexit  
Only way to oppose Brexit1. Change public opinion2. Change public opinion3. As at 1 & 2THEN there will be a 2nd ref to overturn 1st ref 
Old £1 coins will be worthless in a week, Just like the New Pound Coins thanks to thick #brexit voters  
WATCH: Today I announced that I will support permanent UK membership of the single market. #Brexit  
Without a free trade vision, we may lose our Brexit opportunity says @GraemeLeachEcon 
UK (Scotland): Independence Referendum, YouGov poll:Yes: 44% (+1)No: 56% (-1)#indyref2 #Brexit #ScotRef 
Brexit plans at the port of Zeebrugge, which does 45% of its trade with the UK 
Catalonia: WATCH moment pro-Spain marchers ATTACK Catalan referendum supporters 
Govt daren't tell us the true costs of #Brexit or folks wouldn't want it...it's why they're hiding the 50 odd assessments from us...  
The Daily Mail in the 1930's "German Jews Pouring into this Country" & in 2016 "Migrants, How many more can we take"#Brexit #StopBrexit /1 
Nigel Farage isn’t “Brexit leader”; he’s an MEP for a minor party and local radio DJ. 
Our excellent Green MEP for the South West @MollyMEP is giving a talk on Brexit & the environment at Penryn Campus on 1 Nov  
Theresa May's Brexit plans in ruins after France and Germany 'reject transitional arrangement'  No progress, no talks 
But even with a Brexit deal,the UK will have to set up dozens of new agencies, at great expense.  
Dear @bloomberg: you can justify it as an opinion piece, but when your author is spouting outright lies, you bear responsibility. Reshat #Ametov, a Crimean Tatar activist, was tortured and murdered by Russians before the fake "referendum"  
Why won't the government release their Brexit impact data?  
Why is noone asking govt about cost of contingency planning alone for different Brexit outcomes? Vast new UK quango state will be needed 
Spanish "dialogue" in Palma #Catalonia now: destroying a pro referendum post with the complicity of Spanish police 
Fact check. Farage is not Brexit leader. He’s not even UKIP leader any more. No-one is quite sure what he does except share his opinion. 
Logically the Spanish government should also be taking all 2.26 million citizens to court for voting in an ‘illegal’ referendum. 
The Government needs to be united to deliver Brexit - May should axe traitors  
Belgian ports batten down the hatches for Brexit trade shock  
Parliamentary delegation: Witnessing the #Catalan referendum firsthand  
Brexit: the devil finds work for idle hands#Brexit  
You’ll all be glad to hear that the Oracle on Parker’s Piece at Cambridge just predicted that the Brexit negotiations will fail... ;)  
Polls: Ruth Davidsons' Scottish Tories fall to 3rd in holyrood poll and 72% of scots are pessimistic about #brexit  
Today Kurds grieve death of Jalal Talabani. Few days ago Kurds celebrated independence referendum. The two events unite Kurdistan. 
Amendments you don’t like can be repealed by a simple whining referendum. #FakeConstitutionFacts 
Talking Catalonia and democracy on KCBS in San Francisco at 10:20am PT (1:20pm ET, 7:20pm Barcelona time)  @CBSSF #KPIX #Referendum 
German and French diplomats reject Brexit transition unless UK pays cash  
#Brexit 37% of a gerrymandered electorate in an advisory referendum for a catch-all slogan, based on lies and disinformation.#StopBrexit 
Brexit has many forms, many names, many outcomes. Of all the Brexits there is one I like the most:- No Brexit#StopBrexit #dontbrexitfixit 
Brexit happening can only end one way, return, it is inevitable. All the pain, none of the gain. What's the point? Stop the pain #StopBrexit 
Excellent Idea!Ministers suggest PM May appoint a “No Deal” Secretary of State to call EU's bluff over failure to discuss a trade agreement with UK.#Brexit 
Brexit: simultaneously taking the 'Great' out of GB & the 'United' out of UK.We need to #exitfrombrexit 
DONALD TRUMP IS TRASH okay now that i got your attention MAKE SURE YOU REGISTER TO VOTE BEFORE NOV 1ST TO VOTE IN THE ABORTION REFERENDUM 
Top Eurocrat Brands Patriotic Poland 'Greater Danger for the EU than Brexit'  
Brexit will cost £55bn over next four years. Let's spend that on the NHS instead. #BrexitReality #StopBrexit 
I've been looking at the official Referendum results published by the Catalan @Govern. Only 13 towns (out of 948) registered 0 votes. 
There's a warning that Brexit threatens Britain's plan to spend billions on nuclear reactors  
EU infighting ERUPTS: Merkel and Macron block Brexit to STOP Barnier succeeding Juncker  
can we just stop let's just not do Brexit yeah let's just not 
Without a free trade vision, we may lose our Brexit opportunity  via @telebusiness 
If the public want control over Brexit, they’re going to have to join the Tories and ‘do a Corbyn’ | @JohnRentoul 
#Brexit rallies in #Birmingham #Bristol #Cardiff #Cambridge #Edinburgh #IsleofWight #Liverpool #London #Newcastle #Nottingham #Reading #York 
Another reason to stop Brexit......  
Scottish Labour now have a different position on Brexit than the Labour manifesto. The Labour Party have no plan for Brexit.  
Brexit backing MPs call on May to appoint 'no deal' minister amid EU squabble  
So, to put it even more simply:                Cost of EU membership: 87p per household per dayCost of Brexit: £11.50 per household per day                           #StopBrexit 
Spanish "dialogue" in Palma now: destroying a pro referendum post with the complicity of Spanish police  
These are the people of #Togo saying No to a referendum the @ecowas_cedeaois asking them to accept to keep dictator in power @Togodebout 
Brexit will let us stop ruthless puppy-smuggling criminals  
Unionist attack in Palma against people in favour of rhe Referendum  
#Brexit to cost more per year than our membership to the EU. @Conservatives @UKLabour @LibDems @theSNP need to put a stop to this madness 
I don’t want Brexit but I’d trust Corbyn and Starmer over May and cronies any day!!  
“Most of the people making the worst arguments in the Brexit campaign had done PPE at Oxford.”   
Another packed CLP meeting this morning in Driffield! Special thanks to @RCorbettMEP for speaking to us about the implications of Brexit.  
The classic Labour slogan "Better Tory than independent". Come Brexit or Boris.PS. Sarwar is campaiging to be regional manager not leader.  
EU steps up Brexit talks with Labour  
Achieving @UKLabour goals needs money; that means a growing economy unhampered by #Brexit uncertainty & loss of trade.#StopBrexit 
It's time to call a halt to #Brexit. We heartily agree!  #StopBrexit 
If UK concedes ECJ can oversee this agreement, why not aviation, pharma, nuclear, broadcasting etc etc? Brexit is unravelling #stopbrexit 
Abandoning opportunities of EU for this ... Brexit brings out the worst. Again.  
Sunni Arabs in Mosul support Kurdish referendum ‘Kurdish referendum sees massive growth in supporters’ @AJEnglish 
How ready is the UK for Brexit?  
Leavers say Britain is full, so how is it that crowded inner-city living makes for healthier, happier people #Brexit 
Possible Brexit ECJ compromise via @JenniferMerode - though what about lower courts, other post-Brexit ECJ rulings, other ECJ jurisdiction?  
Spotted in a garden centre in Derby.... was it you @Derby4Europe  !!?? When we started last year, hardly any anti brexit stuff. Now tho.....  
It's amazing how immigration has completely receded from the Brexit debate, having been such a massive feature of the referendum campaign. 
But I thought Brexiters celebrated non-experts? ;) Here's a non-comedian's view on the Brexit trade catastrofarce.  
Brexit in two mentions  
Vote Leave spending casts doubt on validity of #brexit #Referendum  (via @InFactsOrg) 
Theresa May's Brexit plans in ruins after France and Germany 'reject transitional arrangement'  
Letter in @standardnews asks: if PM can change her mind about an early general election, why are voters denied another look at Brexit? 
So @DavidCameron_MP has reconciled himself w/ #Brexit. Don't let him forget he's plunged UK into crisis & #ToryParty too. RT to remind him! 
The @TheNewEuropean front pages get better and better. Best in the business #Brexit  
Brexit is putting us not just on the wrong side of history but on the side of some of history's greatest wrong-doers  
Two thirds of people now disapprove of Theresa May’s handling of Brexit, and it’s not because of her cough 
No one will be happier about this than Nicola Sturgeon. Gives her a way out of losing a referendum that would end her leadership.  
Just remember that if the Tories dismantled Holyrood and went for a Hard Brexit then Labour would *never* support independence. Never.  
With EU eying Labour as a likely government, @jeremycorbyn should embrace the truth and say Brexit would be ruinous for workers and the poor 
European Medicines Agency (EMA) tries to plug Brexit staffing gap caused by the agency now having to move. 
Brexit increasingly feels like a man in his 50s getting divorced because he can’t wait to get on Tinder and meet loads of 20 year olds. 
Prize for the 1st journo to ask @MichelBarnier exactly what 'significant progress' means. Even Brexit means Brexit was more specific 
"Please brief the nation about Brexit chancellor"  
Poland's attack on EU values and the rule of law poses “a greater danger for the EU than Brexit"--EU commissioner.  
If May went for full no compromise #brexit and said it was her sole mission to sort that; she'd find she had an army behind her.  
I knitted a sock and Team Brexit lost its shit.  pic.twitter.com/nQ2Uy1GWcC 
Britain will be ready for a Brexit with no deal if EU talks fail, Theresa May says  
Germany rejects May’s Brexit transition plans (£) 
Cable: @LibDems to pursue moderate voters who feel politically homeless in hard-Brexit Tory party/far-left and pro-Brexit Labour. 
Catalan referendum: Yes or No?  
Let us rescue ourselves from the jaws of self-defeat. Fight Brexit. 
John Redwood MP: Preparing for No deal"If they want each side to have to pay to trade, then WTO tariffs is the cheapest and easiest way of paying for trade, and would be legal."#Brexit 
This is all a year late, lads. #Brexit  
Theresa May's Brexit plans in ruins after France and Germany 'reject transitional arrangement'  
On #bbcaq Leadsom States ‘in 2019 the UK is leaving the EU.’Zero applause from audience.I am sensing a shift against Brexit rally calls. 
Britain's wildlife needs urgent new protections ahead of Brexit, say MPs  
The majority of Scots have little or no faith in the UK’s approach to the Brexit negotiations, according to a poll  
With all the talk about an SDLP/Fianna Fail merger. Here's everything you need to know about FF view of the North and Brexit in one image.  
Brexit once in a lifetime chance to thwart Eastern European gangs of puppy smugglers #premium 
EU negotiators have reportedly stepped up backroom #Brexit talks with Labour amid concerns over Theresa May's future  
I don’t think you should be allowed to talk about Brexit at the weekend. 
Our party must support permanent membership of the single market. #Brexit  
Our own party must never repeat the falsehood that it is immigrants who are responsible for downward pressure on wages. #Brexit 
She can still save herself politically with a straight no deal no fee BREXIT.Embrace real free trade & appear positive for a world role.  
BREAKING: @AnasSarwar announces that Scottish Labour will support permanent UK membership of the single market under his leadership. #Brexit 
The American Chamber of Commerce has warned that US investment in the UK has been largely based on access to the Single Market.#Brexit  
EU steps up Brexit talks with Labour amid uncertainty over Theresa May  
What do you believe will come first? #brexit #labour #nodeal #EURETWEET & VOTE #yourvoice 
75% of investors abroad invest in the UK to access the Single Market.  /1#Brexit #StopBrexit 
Should Jeremy Corbyn honour agreements with #EU reached with the Conservatives if he comes to power before #brexit?  
The rise of the Re-Leavers, i.e. remainers who now believe the government has a duty to carry out Brexit. Remoaners are the loony fringe.  
Brexit negotiations restart Monday. Focus on citizens' rights. UK can & should - finally - make "generous offer".   
Barnier absolutely right here - those who took this (Brexit) decision should shoulder the responsibility for the consequences & 'get real'  
The main square outside Barcelona's govt building is filled with protesters calling for peaceful negotiations after the Catalonia referendum  
Why won't the government acknowledge that Brexit is a threat to national security?  
'The Economist': "Any settlement must include the option of a referendum on independence"  
So Rees Mogg will 'flee the country'. Strongest argument for Brexit yet! Should we scour the earth to see who would give him refuge? 
Labour should not wait in transition to United Ireland – @DeclanKearneySF  Full speech on Brexit/workers' rights  
Why a hard Brexit could be a lot more painful for Britain than the EU  
Please help fund the legal case to test whether the Leave campaign broke spending limits. #StopBrexit #Brexit 
Why on earth do some in Labour want to quit the EU for the far more ruthless capitalist jungle outside?#Brexit #StopBrexit #Remain 
It’s all about the money(quelle surprise)! : German & French diplomats reject Brexit transition unless UK pays cash  
Time to walk away from the Brexit talks whilst we have a shred of dignity and self respect left....... 
Let's get the petition of for a final deal referendum rolling again! #StopBrexit #Remain #Brexit 
Brexit Britain reaches out to another principled potential trade partner. Telegraph today.  
Merkel's Brexit plot: Germany 'has been preparing for no deal for MONTHS'  NO THEY WERE NEVER GOING TO GIVE US A DEAL 
Brexit:For the powerfulFor the eliteFor the richFor the fewNot for You#StopBrexit #ThatIsMyWill #exitbrexit #dontbrexitfixit 
Interesting comments on #UKIP Daily - one branch has all officers resign over treatment of @AMDWaters and her supporters (branch likely to close) and Kent members say saw no evidence of @_HenryBolton during Referendum Campaign 
Andrea Leadsom could face Cabinet axe for 'slamming May’s DISASTROUS soft Brexit speech’. Punished for the truth.  
Britain is stepping up efforts to prepare for Brexit without an EU deal, David Davis says  
Spanish media coverage of referendum reflects polarised society  
Beyond infighting:1. Transition talks hardball in Brussels2. Whitehall Brexit turf war3. China biffs UK for US4. US tariffs/ WTO trouble 
The worst thing about this shambles is the laziness of our politicians triggering Art 50 without bothering to look at consequences of Brexit 
Quite Richard, Brexit cannot work for Britain.  
Labour should be patient & allow the Tories to self-destruct over #Brexit. We might then witness the end of modern conservatism by May 2022 
Increasing realisation in Scotland and rest of UK that the outcomes from any type of #Brexit won’t be good ( & certainly not “glorious”)  
Brexit backing MPs call on May to appoint 'no deal' minister amid EU squabble  
Have you no shame at all? Brexit will rob them of opportunities. It will take away rights. Impacts on economy and £ will affect them etc. 1/  
It would be far more constructive if Evening Standard’s editorial could tone down its contempt for BREXIT & be more tolerant & constructive 
Stop lying. There is no transformation of Britain for the many while you support hard Brexit>>destructive for economy, future of young etc  
It's EU27 governments that are being firmest on #Brexit talks, not the Big Bad CommissionOne EU Ambassador: 'Not our job to save the Tory party' 
If only someone had mentioned there might be issues with Brexit..  
Brexit backing MPs call on May to appoint 'no deal' minister amid EU squabble  
And not evident in many humans, if Brexit is anything to go by.  
Tory Remain MPs - have they the guts to come out against Brexit? Leave Tories wouldn't desert the party - go for it? @Anna_Soubry 
Young people need to take the Brexit bull by the horns says @blairspowart 
Restoring the vote to UK nationals living abroad would also be welcome, especially as we are about 2 lose our EU voting rights tx 2 Brexit  
The Brexit Paradox: anyone stupid enough to think it's a good idea is by definition too stupid to implement it 
Brexidiots will never admit Brexit was wrong, they'll just say it was done wrong.  
A guide to next week's #Brexit talks: progress on citizens' rights, even ECJ possible; money still a stumbling block  
Brexit is already savaging UK GDP Growth. Without productivity growth we’re in deep water.  
Michel Barnier giving clear, calm leadership for EU in Brexit negotiations + continues to work in close partnership with Ireland    
BLOCKED: German and French diplomats reject transitional deal, demand UK pays big Brexit bill. 
Want to know impact of different Brexit scenarios on NHS? Big paper by @martinmckee and colleagues in Lancet. Warning flags everywhere: 
Further tariff of 80% imposed on import of C-Series Get used to the Brexit effect, folks. @RCorbettMEP 
.Brexit has become the acid in the eyes of British Conservatism, blinding them to the national interest. My column  
Syrian President rejects Iraqi Kurdistan referendum  #Assad #Iran #Syria 
Goldman Sachs agrees to rent new offices in Frankfurt as part of its Brexit plans  
10, 20 years on I will think of those like me who fought the madness & injustice of Brexit & how we peacefully campaigned to #StopBrexit 
."72% of Scots said they were pessimistic about the Brexit negotiations"#BeginningToLookALotLikeIndy. 
Is this mounting confusion an attempt to discredit the Conservatives and to derail Brexit?  
Shuffling deckchairs on the Titanic ...#Brexit #StopBrexitHour#MayMustGo #StopBrexit #cpc17 #cpc2017 #Remain #Brexitshambles #EU #Boris 
Keep Rupert happy - support Brexit#BrexitInFiveWords 
UK shouldn't allow EU to push us around over #BrexitWe should offer a free trade agreement & walk awayUK's supine surrender to EU must end 
The #Brexit paradox: those who have the knowledge to make it happen won't; those who want to make it happen can't because they don't know enough 
A lot of people think Brexit isn't that harmful because they think we've already left. That's the level of ignorance we still have to beat. 
Brexit backing MPs call on May to appoint 'no deal' minister amid EU squabble  
Europe could see another Brexit-like rupture, and it's not Spain  
#Brexit, Catalonia, cybercrime. Catch up with all the big news items from #EPlenary  
Amb Jouyet tells @thetimes his mission is to strengthen &ties in challenging #Brexit context. "We are cousins!" 
"The ‘monumental political misjudgment’ that tied  #indyref2  to the issue of Brexit.:  
How and with whom can Brussels negotiate? So we head - the Government asleep at the wheel - for a car crash Brexit. What a shambles!  
The Tories don't know (1) who they want to lead them (2) or conduct negotiations (3) what they want from Brexit (4) or whether they want it.  
Tories seem determined to sink the UK. Their approach to Brexit is shambolic at best - Stop this madness now! #StopBrexit #BrexitShambles 
The Tories are destroying themselves (and the rest of us) in pursuit of hard Brexit  
Britain could lose a €67 billion market after Brexit  
The party that brought you a referendum with no plan, triggered time-limited A50 then called an election it lost wants your total confidence  
At last! The subversion of #Brexit has begunThe Brexit crowd are right to smell a rat  
Catalonia referendum: Call for pro-unity rallies in Spain  
#brexit #indyref2 #scotref Most Scots have little confidence in UK's Brexit talks, poll shows - The Times  
Everybody knows it's madness☞ EU braces for Brexit talks collapse as May falters | Article [AMP] | Reuters  
May is desperate for a backroom deal, but the EU isn't playing ball☞ Germany rejects May’s Brexit transition hopes  
Remain propaganda worked a treat. Enjoy your hard Brexit.  
EU 'steps up' Brexit talks with Labour amid 'plot' to oust Theresa May  
Trade deals reduce uncertainty.Trump & Brexit are gumming that up.Nuno Limão visitsLatest @Trade__Talkson iTunes 
The referendum in June was a clear ‘yes’. Regardless, the referendums aren’t binding; only Congress has the authority to begin the process. 
The Catalan referendum has renewed a conversation about Spanish nationalism: “They’re pushing us to think."  
Mugabe knee jerk reaction to land Reform was prompted by the following developments 1)His arrest of Svosve villagers after they invaded farms proved unpopular 2)Warvets booing & walking out of his address 3) Losing a referendum was a sign of the decline of his political capital 
Strong early sales at Frieze pierce the Brexit gloom  
My latest, on the coming break in first past the post’s monopoly — if not in BC’s referendum, then elsewhere  
Brexit: some growing up to do - an almost child-like belief that there will be no adverse consequences to #Brexit . 
Spanish police hitting an old lady who wanted to vote in catalan referendum 
Green Party conference: Brexit and Grenfell Tower on agenda  
EU steps up Brexit talks with Labour over fears Theresa May's government will fall  via @telegraphnews 
Last week you were the party of Brexit, this week you are the party of Brexit. Confirming you won't be getting my vote.  
Hard #Brexit is still a big risk; no guarantees of smooth transition! MPs MUST work across parties & add safeguards into #EUwithdrawalbill 
Judge to investigate referendum police violence, rejects Public Prosecutors' arguments via @Elnacionalcaten  
Judge to investigate referendum police violence, rejects Public Prosecutors arguments. @mlasalas to @Elnacionalcaten 
Germany rejects May’s transition hopes: the Brexit good news keeps on rollin' in folks #StopBrexit  
Our cartoonist KAL offers his take on the messy consequences of Catalonia's independence referendum  
Does Treeza sucking a Fishermans friend count as a Scottish waters  Brexit negotiation?? 
No pain Brexit pain here Remainers, move on.Fox: Britain will have 40 free trade deals in place for Brexit.  
What an embarrassment that #Wales is on the wrong side #Brexit  
UK Cathes @MBuhari Islamisation bug plans new sukuk; Brexit may boost Islamic finance.  
Salman Rushdie on Brexit: "Somehow this myth of Englishness has been used to propagate the idea of separation from Europe" #Newsnight 
There'll be no #Brexit deal/transition because Tories won't:accept ECJsettle Irish questionagree financial settlementprotect citizens 
48% voted for the #4thReich. The 52% saved us all. What's your prob #Remainoron? We dont want #EUArmy here! #HomageToCatalonia #Brexit #NOW 
The Brexit referendum was advisory, had no thresholds, required no supermajority, and millions were disenfranchised. It was not democratic. 
What They Won't Tell You About The Catalonia Referendum:  via @YouTube 
Germany rejects May’s #Brexit transition hopes  via @FT 
B.C. Attorney General David Eby says electoral reform referendum will be completed through mail in ballot. #cdnpoli #pnpcbc 
#Brexit cheats can't be trusted with pubic money  via @FT 
EU submits new goods commitments to WTO. Covers EU28. Implements 2015 WTO pact to scrap farm export subsidies - assume UK too post Brexit  
I’ve taken part in many public votes. But the Catalan referendum stands out as special, says @GeorgeKerevan 
The Catalan referendum has renewed a conversation about Spanish nationalism: “They’re pushing us to think." 
Catalonia's referendum result is out...so will independence be declared next week? Big showdown, as companies leave  
Britain's wildlife needs urgent new protections ahead of Brexit, say MPs  
This is so bizarre and about  years late...Interesting the PM has time for Ivory laws but not for proper #Brexit strategy agreements 
Kazuo Ishiguro on his fears for Britain after Brexit  
I am starting to think Theresa May has a plan and it isn’t Brexit. How else do you explain what is happening? 
Trump administration rejects Theresa May’s post-Brexit agriculture deal with EU  
Says John Redwood who insisted 16 & 17 year olds and British expats were prevented from voting in EU Referendum  
Barnier could not be any clearer. #Brexit  
.If the Tories REALLY wanted to show STRENGTH - they'd dump Johnson AND Brexit. 
What is this shite Fianna Fáil? Self proclaimed "Republican Party" with Union Flag for the north. And opportunities of Brexit? Disgrace. pic.twitter.com/lUOLbYdDll 
EU steps up Brexit talks with Labour over fears May's government will fall #Premium  
Germany rejects May’s Brexit transition hopes  
Merkel's Brexit plot: Germany 'has been preparing for no deal for MONTHS'  
'They need us more than we need them'.....they said...was anything they said truthful? 
The EU's ethos is "One state, one currency, one army"   #Brexit 
I want you to take a minute to think about this one. Is #brexit going to happen? 
Read this. This is important. You need to know this. Closing statement by Michel Barnier...#Brexit 
John Major said "If they decide to leave on the basis of inaccurate information... then I regard that to be deceitful"#Brexit #LeaveLies 
Voters were grossly misinformed about the issues in the #Brexit referendum, much to the benefit of #Leave. /1#LeaveLies #StopBrexit 
Scot Nat'ts condemning EU cos of Catalonia are demolishing their major argument for leaving the UK cos of Brexit. Fools unto themselves 
I just popped back from 2021. How we laugh at the events of 2016/17. I mean can you imagine actually going ahead with #Brexit All good now!  
Spain apologies for referendum violence as it passes decree to help companies leave Catalonia  
Final results #referendum Participation smashed below 50% by violence &lock down, see figures! Spain wants to arrest the Catalan electorate  
#brexit as seen by the @nytimes  
#Brexit is now naked. The fake clothes don't work any more. Everyone can see just how ugly it is. #StopBrexit #StopBrexitNow #bbcaq 
This is completely and utterly untrue.  Young people face a more constricted & significantly poorer future post #Brexit & they know it.  
John Redwood July 2016: "Getting out of the EU can be quick and easy - the UK holds most of the cards..."#Brexit #StopBrexit 
The government needs to publish the Brexit impact studies it is trying to hush up, and set out any #BrexitBenefits: @CommonsEUexit @DExEUgov 
‘It’s time for ALL British schools to fly the Union Jack and sing God Save The Queen’  via @Your Brexit 
Changes from Brexit pose risks to our iconic British species and treasured natural spaces  
The EU "will not shift talks onto a post-Brexit transition period, let alone a future trade deal, this month"  
#LIVE "The people working on Brexit make Capt Mainwaring's platoon in Dads Army look like Alexander the Great" @talkRADIO 
The euro € is the currency to have as May trashes the pound £ over brexit.  
#Spain apologizes to #Catalonia protestors after the referendum  
Nick Clegg tells people to join Labour to stop Brexit  
We should ask whether such threats caused British business to mute its criticism of #Brexit during the referendum campaign.#StopBrexit 
Given the government’s #brexitshambles and the growing awareness that #Brexit will damage our economy, this comment is heard more & more...  
ON NOW - second #UnreportedWorld of the series looking at Ireland's abortion debate as the country prepares for a referendum on the issue.  
You can't negotiate leaving with an entity like the EU, they ultimately crave power, federalism and money & not a trade deal.#Brexit  
BREXIT BOMBSHELL: Europe's leaders could OVERRULE Barnier and start trade talks NEXT MONTH  
Spain apologises for police crackdown on Catalonia’s independence referendum.  
Reminder: 2014: Businesses that speak out for Britain's EU membership will be punished, vows John Redwood#Brexit  
Spain apologies for referendum violence as it passes decree to help Catalan companies relocate  
We who wish to overturn Brexit need to articulate how our vision differs from the EU status quo. Remain & reform is a good starting point. 
Catalonia independence referendum: Final results show 90% backed secession from Spain  
A good piece on the reality of WTO rulesIt is not a Brexit safety net for the UKOut of EU the UK has zero clout 
.@DaveCullenCF takes May's Europe Minister @AlanDuncanMP to task for calling #Brexit vote a "working-class tantrum"  
I fully support @theresa_may. She is the right leader to take us through #Brexit and I am proud she is the ’s “bloody difficult woman”. 
Rees-Mogg threatened a purge of the europhiles. A quaint anachronism, or a dangerous fanatic? #StopBrexit #Brexit #Remain 
Rees-Mogg accuses two government departments of disrupting Brexit process  via @CityAM 
Last thing country needs is a leadership contest. Cabinet/party must support PM delivering Brexit as per Lancaster House/Manifesto/Florence. 
Thank you for 20,000 followers! You can get even more @BrexitCentral by signing up to our daily Brexit Briefing →  
The Tories are destroying themselves in pursuit of hard Brexit | Great article by Jonathan Freedland  
If and only if "no deal" equals the status quo. If (as with Brexit) that's not the case, it's nothing of the sort.  
Their list of crimes is horrendous yet they plod on with the insanity of Brexit with the sure footedness of a 1 legged drunk in a minefield  
The quislings show their true colours and vote against Britain's interests  #Brexit 
Leavers like to talk up New Zealand as post-Brexit UK economic partner. Kiwis are great ppl but, in economic terms, NZ is basically Ireland. 
The Times is changing its tune. Brexit is already deeply damaging the U.K. in so many ways & we haven’t left. Time to #StopBrexit 
When you lose a democratic referendum and then you resort to YouGov polls for "proof" it was wrong. You're hilarious @acgrayling  
Just as Brexit talks were supposed to get serious, the Conservatives have imploded  
My cartoon - hard #Brexit in a nutshell  
To beat #Brexit, we need to think big about #Britain. Please share our report on ‘10 Steps to Stop Brexit’. Link:  
we now go live to brexit  
Spain apologises for police crackdown on Catalonia’s independence referendum.  
1. It is *axiomatically* true that no deal is better than bad deal2. No Brexit deal is only better than a MONUMENTALLY HORRIFIC Brexit deal  
Brexit won't happenThe consequences of it happening are so appalling reality will set in  
Reasons for #Brexit:Rupert Murdoch: "When I go to Downing Street they do what I say; when I go to Brussels they take no notice."  
It's what Brexiters can't seem to grasp - it's not "personal" it's the market - it responds how it does irrespective of Brexit or not 
The Trump administration just blocked a potential British post-Brexit trade deal with the EU  
Should we not see the Whitehall #Brexit risk assessments? I suspect they don't look pretty. Please RT.  
Gove accused of breaking #Brexit pledges to #farmers  - more #brexitshambles ! 
Participation of the active population.- Brexit 37'5%- CAT Referendum 38'8%( despite the violence to avoide the vote )#CatalanReferendum 
How will Brexit affect British wildlife?  
Catalan regional government says final results of referendum show 90.18% of voters in favour of independence from Spain and 7.83% against it 
The Tories are destroying themselves in pursuit of hard Brexit.   
Fury as minister says Brexit was the working class 'throwing a tantrum' over immigration  via @Daily_Express 
Live in the East of England? Want to stop #Brexit?  Join the #StopBrexit rally in Cambridge, 2 pm Sat 14 October!  
We need more Boris' talking up Britain & less negative gloom by Remoaners, blasts Question Time audience.#Brexit 
Brexit trade negotiations going well then. It's not a conspiracy. It's not remoaning. It's just how the world works.  
Interesting piece on how Brexit Jacobins are willing to torch everything, including Tory Party itself 
Brexit puts a question mark over two British bases on Cyprus  
Last year’s referendum was a vote for democracy. Brexit will deliver powers from Brussels to the devolved nations 
All Ireland bodies must be protected from Brexit - @M_AndersonSF 
Catalan referendum turnout exceeded 50% in those regions where ballot centers could open normally and there was no Spanish police repression.  
Let's carry on with Brexit because world war was such fun or something  
Tory options:Keep weak & wobbly May = Labour will win before BrexitAppoint a hard right miscreant = Labour will win before Brexit  
#Catalonia govt says 90.2% of votes in favor of independence. Says it has submitted final results of the referendum to regional parliament.  
I'm old enough to remember how over 90% positive outcome of #Crimea referendum was declared unrealistic by MSM.  
EU braces for Brexit talks collapse as May falters  
Good piece. As I said on last night's @Channel4News #Brexit debate voters in Eng & Wales need choice. Instead they've two Brexit parties.  
Paul Hearn arriving at No10 this morning to a great reception from the @No10Vigil crowd. 850km by bike to deliver his #Brexit petition   
Catalonia independence referendum final result shows 90% backed seccession  
The Tories are destroying themselves in pursuit of hard Brexit 
It's nonsense to talk of a 'transition' when no one knows what we're transitioning to. But Brexit is nonsense  
How will Brexit affect British wildlife?Interactive  #Brexit #wildlife 
Conservative leaders are "completely botching Brexit."  
Official Results of the Democratic Referendum on Catalonia's Independence  
Remainers when news is bad: “Brexit caused this”Remainers when news is good “we haven’t left yet”  
Brexit makes no economic sense, but is being championed by the Govt. By extension, it appears sanguine about the possibility of no deal.  
Treachery: The British MEPs Who Voted Against Bringing Trade Talks into Brexit Negotiations  
The paperwork costs alone for businesses exporting to the EU if we have a Hard Brexit will be a disaster for local businesses.  
Entire UK media showed bandwagoning bias on May being great, Corbyn being awful, Trump never winning and Brexit. They call it 'impartiality' 
London lord mayor says Dublin top post-Brexit choice for business  via @IrishTimesBiz 
I've only got one grandson and she's a non-binary gender bending pansexual socialist who wants an exit from Brexit  
'Brexit' is a party political misjudgement of an order never seen before, how could the Tories and Labour ever have supported this travesty?  
Britain's wildlife needs urgent new protections ahead of Brexit, say MPs  
Four Scenarios for Brexit, and none of them look positive. The best scenario is the UK staying in the EU  #proEU 
#Brexit HAS GONE TOO FAR. NUMBER OF JAFFA CAKES PER PACK REDUCED! FUCKING #StopBrexit & GIVE BACK MY 2 JAFFA CAKES! #BrexitReality 
Agreed, a Tory government is temporary, #Brexit is for keeps.  
Brexit is an abhorrent abomination. There is no possibility of it being anything other than a disaster. As such I will not get behind it. 
A party of two headed snakes. One head for Brexit the other for Remain.Your party opened the Brexit Pandora's box & caused this suffering!  
Brexit newsletter issue 4 EU Parliament Vote is significant step towards special status newsletter  via @M_AndersonSF 
Great @guardian editorial on why the World Trade Organisation is not a #Brexit safety net  
Brexit Britain should look to the country with 3rd highest GDP per capita for economic inspiration | Alex Michelin  
The UK Government is fighting like ferrets in a sack, but the #Brexit clock ticks on: 
Interview in Vilaweb about my experience of the Catalan referendum ...  
Cameron thought a referendum would heal the party; May that an election would give her a mandate. This Brexit thing is an unforgivable mire 
Spain: government apologises for policing of Catalan referendum  
Critics of "Building a Bridge" like @OSV and @McCormickProf are turning the discussion into a referendum on my orthodoxy. It's a dodge.  Because neither I nor the book challenge church teaching. How many times do I need to state church teaching? See 0:40:  
An interesting little example of how the EU's rigid approach to Brexit isn't exceptionalism or 'punishment'. What Juncker told Indian PM Modhi earlier: Basically - for Brussels rules are rules, whoever you are.  
#Brexit negotiations next week should continue to advance. EU27, EP are united, as I said @Europarl_EN on Tuesday  
Another new machine ordered, despite BREXIT #SME #GBmfg   Productivity is amazing in our Company  @BBCBusiness 
 CNN: "Hidden ballot boxes, encrypted texts: How Catalans staged their referendum" 
The history books will show Brexit as a momentary lapse of British values. But we got over it. Our European friends will forgive us.  
Spanish government 'sorry' for police violence in Catalonia independence referendum  
EU is becoming a No-Go-Zone for Business | This is a truly awesome opportunity for the UK post BREXIT.  
Both Tories and Labour will find it very difficult to reconcile their members after Brexit.  Remainers will never stop blaming Leavers. 
#Brexit #NickClegg telling #Remoaners to join #Labour to stop #Brexit! Never gives  up this idiot! Does everything he can derail Brexit!   
France's economy is on course for its strongest year since 2011  
#BREAKING - #US Pentagon stops paying #Peshmerga salaries after unilateral #Kurdistan referendum against US proposals for negotiations.  
The @Daily_Express calls for the 24 British MEPs who voted against progressing the Brexit talks to resign  
Hundreds of buses (free) from Spain coming to Barcelona on Sunday against Catalonia's democratic referendum.  
I think baby-boom leavers subconsciously yearn to emulate their parents' WW2 glory by winning a great victory against Europeans. #Brexit /1 
This tweet (which I think is correct) is an example of Brexit's insidious, damaging effect on government 1/   
She's bang on. Tory Conference was openly falling apart -with no honest deep solutions to NHS, police, or Brexit.  
US, Canada, New Zealand reject "global [sic] Britain" plan for food quotas - post-Brexit trade woes deepening   
No, the EU did not “stop” Theresa May getting rights for EU citizens.#Brexit #citizensrights 
I'm a London MEP. #Brexit is a car crash disaster for London. My constituents voted for me to save their jobs & £s not lose them @Labour4EU 
Brexiters don't understand that regulatory standards are set by the EU, USA & China. No-one else has regulatory sovereignty#Brexit  
#Brexit is already making us poorer  
#Poland, don't give in. Stand up for your own country and what you believe is right for #Poland . #Polexit #Brexit  
Great piece from @jdportes on the #Brexit deadlock over EU citizens' rights in UK, and who's to blame. 
Let this be clear: Brexit is in Russia's interest.The Catalan crisis poses a threat to the European order  via @FT 
And now we're going to waste Brexit time having a Tory nervous breakdown, before we get back to Brexit time which is in itself wasted time. 
Tragedy of Brexit is all the things we'll fail to fix in this country while we lose a decade fucking ourselves over for no reason at all. 
To @theresa_may Under no circumstances should you think of resigning now. A good Brexit deal first..the plotters lack backbone anyway.. 
Remember Britain before the referendum? Not looking that bad now is it #brexit 
KAL on Catalonia's bid for independence and Brexit – political cartoon gallery in Putney  
Sterling falls against the dollar and the euro following complete lack of plan for Brexit. Fixed that for you #brexitshambles 
It will only take one Brexit sector Impact Assessment to leak & whole rotten edifice of Brexit lies would collapse... & there are 50 of them 
Read my speech 'Why Brexit is Great for the UK & the USA' delivered @Heritage here:  Watch:  
Brexit looks like an act of utter folly so I should keep quiet?  
The Tories are destroying themselves in pursuit of hard Brexit  
No Brexit is better than a bad Brexit. 
'BJ encapsulates everything that is tragic about our national state today....the founding father of this Brexit mess.'Yes.@TheNewEuropean 
#PeterBone #MP: The #EU would rather damage its own people than let #Brexit #Britain be a success! AGREED  #BBC #TORY 
I voted Remain and these sensible red flags of warning are so telling. We survived 2 World Wars, I'm sure we can defeat Brexit.  
Despite the lies from #Remain, there will be an #EUarmy to fulfill this role very soon! #PrayforCatalonia #BBC #SKY #UK #EU #TORY #BREXIT  
Do not get it twisted: the reason we keep hearing about the economic anxieties of trump/brexit supporters is because the writers are racist 
Considering the Brexit promises of economic prosperity and magic unicorns that shit liquid gold, merely "surviving" seems a bit of a kop out pic.twitter.com/13v19cblLv 
Brexit deadlock CRISIS as UK retaliates against EU’s refusal to talk trade   
I was never a Brexiteer, Janet. I fought for remain and then spent a year in govt trying to make Brexit work, before concluding it won't 
But also sounds weird cos, until Brexit, the British didn't really think in these grand political ways. And we were all the better for it. 
But we're going to get a great trade deal with China after #Brexit right?  
"Let's abandon this mad escapade, before it's too late" - Hugo Dixon on C4's 'Brexit Reality Debate'  
Corbyn, Clegg, Cable have all ensured we get a worse EU deal. One by refusing to endorse Brexit, the other two with straight torpedo-ing 
Don't fixate on May's personal shortcomings here. Fundamental reasons for the mess are the impossibility of Brexit, & Tory impossiblism 
Trump just quietly ruined our last hope of Brexit not being a disaster  
FAILED #politician @grantshapps trying to plot against #BREXIT! DESELECT the #TURD! #BBC #SKY #UK #TORY #Welwyn #Hatfield #GrantShapps #MP 
Explaining our #Brexit predicament to a French audience - my discussion with @sylvieguillaume MEP : 
Brexit has a lot in common with death. A good death or a bad death, you're still dead at the end of it. 
MEET the #REMAIN #POLITICAL TURD @grantshapps trying to plot against #BREXIT! backed by other fellow POLITICAL TURDS! #BBC #SKY #UK #TORY 
Exciting opportunity for EU Nationals to meet and put #brexit concerns to MPs!@ProspectUnion @TradeUnionLaw 
EU gearing up for a free trade deal with India - UK could be left at the back of the queue due to #Brexit  
@DavidRutley This is damaging to businesses like mine & will drive up inflation. Time to Exit Brexit!  
Best thread I’ve seen on how the Tory Brexit & the socialist Brexit of Corbyn & McDonnel are delusional & will cause so much harm  
Why the hard Brexit think tank Legatum Institute is one to watch  
My latest: Islamic State defeats in Iraq show that the Kurdish referendum never undermined fight against IS  
There is no majority for Brexit in the UK , and never was: see this! 
The Conservative plan is to still be effectively in the EU by 2021 or beyond. Clean Brexit! the cabinet stuffed full of remainers  
What's important now is we get a proper, clean Brexit. Let's not lose sight of this. Our PM is doing a fantastic job in difficult times! 
Here's a suggestion: how about Tory Party gets over its nasty dose of political ADHD and just bloody gets on with delivering Brexit? 
William Friedkin: "American movie superheroes maybe should come to Catalonia and save the referendum". #Sitges2017 #Sitges50 
The Constitution says nothing about referendums& in penal code,there's nothing about calling a referendum illegal  
"The referendum was not illegal. Calling a referendum is not illegal under Spanish law."  
WE NOW GO LIVE TO BREXIT  
Sacking the "godfather of Brexit" might upset the delicate balance in the cabinet  
Prepare now for over-the-cliff Brexit, German industry says  
Not all photos of police violence at Catalan referendum were genuine. A breakdown of the most-shared fake images  
EU negotiator Michel Barnier has failed to officially record all his Brexit meetings despite pledging transparency  
#Brexit risk of antibiotics-filled, hormone-stuffed meat & vegetables laced with dangerous pesticide. US will push  
The world was such a happier place before Big Tim Sherwood left Spurs to go and invent Brexit 
Reuters: Sources say Toyota is expected to build its new Auris model in the UK on the assumption there will be a Brexit transition period 
Brexit deadlock looms as European negotiators say they have lost faith in May  #proEU 
We oppose the UK Government's power grab. Read & share our #Brexit report:  
Anyone telling you that Brexit has gripped the country negatively, visit Brighton as I have today - it’s HEAVING!! 
Catalonia, and the British and Scottish unionist reaction to it, shows we may face a task we didn't see as likely: organise a referendum in the face of deliberate state obstruction. We should be thinking about that now. 
Haiku is my offering....Please exit #BrexitMadness for UK to leaveOr our future's lost  
Boris Johnson's Remain-supporting father is now backing Brexit after Juncker set out vision of an all-powerful EU  
My two youngest kids' new passports just collected - their EU citizenship now protected vs Brexit   
Live in the East of England? Want to stop #Brexit?  Join the #StopBrexit rally in Cambridge, 2 pm Sat 14 October!  
Britain's productivity has fallen for a second quarter in a row  
I’ve finally been convinced to back Brexit by Jean-Claude Juncker  
#UK Supreme Court has asked for clarity on EU judgements post #Brexit. about blooming time too! 
Nick Clegg suggests people join Labour to stop Brexit. How can this failure be taken seriously?  
More than anything it has been the failure of the Brexidiots to listen to experts who told them Brexit was going to be a bloody disaster  
OMG. The OBR has apparently overestimated productivity for the past 7 years, so most of 26m set aside to cushion Brexit wiped out. *coughs* 
Why are some pretending that Theresa May must stay because she is some sort of Brexiteer? She was a Remainer and has delayed Brexit by 2 yrs 
Don't be sucked into this "remove the PM" furore media have stirred up.They want Brexit derailed. @theresa_may will deliver Brexit#StayMay 
The Tories were offered a cross party institution to negotiate Brexit - if revolt against May succeeds it should place that back on agenda 
And whilst Brexit devours political airtime another threat to our national prosperity and future equality roams free unabated...  
UK plans new sukuk; Brexit may boost Islamic finance 
It is stirring, isn't it? My main Brexit question these days is: Who is happier now because this vote was held? Anyone? Anyone? 
Theresa May's failure is the failure of the hard Brexit project - not that of a woman or a few crap advisers 
Brexit, weak car sales, ratings agency downgrades & weak leadership from Theresa May - all contributed. Terrible for economy #BrexitShambles 
Catalan government to press ahead with referendum debate  
Very worrying if true. The clock is ticking and without a settlement we risk a destructive no-deal #Brexit  
Two questions Tory MPs must consider:1. Can PM command respect of EU counterparts?2. Can PM command support of enough MPs through Brexit? 
. #MCYvBRI The Catalonia Referendum has been felt @AAMIPark.Good decision by @MelbourneCity to play the game behind closed doors 
And so brexit essentially becomes the silence of the lambs ...more evidence of why we need decisions now to stop #brexithaos .. 
As Tories debate leadership can Brexit talks continue? Should UK ask EU for a pause given different visions of poss candidates? 
#Madrid's unfailing condemnation of #Catalonia's referendum only strengthens the independence cause. 
Brexit in 4 words. "Is it worth it"? As time passes, it is obvious that it won't be. The people won't accept a bad deal for our country. 
I stopped watching Question Time a long time ago.Too left wingToo anti #BrexitToo anti TrumpToo BBC  
Yes but we're not actually "engaged" are we? At least not with the EU - #Brexit negotiations still going on with ourselves  
Corpse or chaos. That's the choice now.With the #Brexit clock ticking the muddle-through feels over. 9/ENDS 
Actually, to any group in IE: If you're not sure what 8th is, why a referendum is happening etc contact me & I will do a free session w/ you  
It's gone from 'easiest deal we will ever do' (Fox) & 'absolutely no downsides' (Davis), to 'if we can survive WW2 we can survive Brexit'  
How Spain's overreaction to the Catalan referendum legitimized the call for independence:  
I have travelled the country & I know that virtually none of our young people want Brexit to happen  @IBTimesUK 
Low bar if the Brexit target is fewer than the 1m+ UK dead in two wars. Hope we beat it  
Poland is EU’s BIGGEST THREAT: Eurocrat warns it will be DOWNFALL of EU - more than Brexit  
True grit @theresa_may must stay. A disaster for the nation to have a divisive three month leadership election during Brexit negotiations. 
Theresa May, to quote a Tory peer to me, is the "mummified corpse" of a Prime Minister. For #Brexit this is a problem 1/ 
I voted Remain but these apocalyptic white flags of surrender are so spineless. We survived 2 World Wars, I'm sure we can survive Brexit.  
.@hmtreasury prediction of budget "bloodbath". Cause low #Productivity. But cant improve productivity when #investment stalled over #Brexit. 
Both pro and anti-Brexit lawmakers back ousting PM May: former Conservative chairman  
Britain prepares to dig in over the Brexit bill as EU negotiators refuse to move talks on to the next phase  
I wonder who will be first prominent leaver to admit to self, then country that Brexit proving impossible to do without breaking everything. 
There is a way forward in national interest, but dare they?Transparency.Publish impact statements.Offer a referendum on terms of deal. 
#Brexit Economic Bloodbath on its way. What lies will Boris Johnson, Priti Patel, Michael Gove now tell us? via @FT 
Pound heads for its worst week in a year  
'The Economist': "Any settlement must include the option of a referendum on independence" 
Labour should be destroying this government over Brexit and over defence cuts. Let the Tories do the psychodrama. Go for them on policy 
Not for one second would I hesitate to vote Tory if they came to their senses on Brexit and Labour did not.  
"A TALE OF TWO CITIES" - A Brexit Facts4EU take on EU hypocrisy over Catalonia:  EU's now shocking even jaded journos 
Plot to topple pm - on board Destroy boris - love itRemainder leader - yesDestroy Brexit - sign me the fuck up 
How has govn led UK to Brexit cliff edge? How to explain low growth , low productivity etc? Answers needed before another leadership contest 
"European Parliament's vote on #Brexit talks doesn't matter” : Really?A look behind the headline... 
We're winning the fight against Brexit by winning every argument for Remaining. As the drafter of Article 50 said: the penny will drop. 
Germany’s largest business lobby has urged companies operating in the UK to prepare for a "very hard Brexit".  
UK in the run up to Brexit seems to be channeling the England football squad in World Cup mode. Huge hype then total psychological collapse 
But that’s on Twitter, & won’t reach far beyond echo chambers. Our national broadcasters need to do more to provide context on Brexit. /10 
Brexit is like a Zombie Death Cult. “Stop doing Britain down! Shut up and drink the Kool-Aid!”  /5 
I see a leadership debate is now distracting the Tories from sorting Brexit which is distracting them from getting anything meaningful done 
Brexit can’t be delivered. The damage too great. Public opinion shifting away fast. How much longer will bbqt, bbcr4 etc cont. to support? 
1st leader with a Brexit plan, 1st leader to condemn Spain’s behaviour, Scot economy outperforming UK. What would you do better Mr Sillars? 
These graphs come from Chris Giles.  The Economics Editor of the Financial Times.Brexit is not patriotic - stopping it is.#StopBrexit 
An organised exit from Brexit would be better than the current unmanaged chaos. 
The Cabinet is in a mess, because most of them never wanted Brexit. They are now fighting for their jobs/party, and NOT for their country.  
New leader, calls new referendum on EU and single market membership, wins it emphatically, country saved, Tory party saved. Get behind it 
Plotters insist it's not about Brexit - numbers include Leavers, but this is suspicion  
At least Shapps is saying what he really thinks. Unlike May who knows Brexit is a disaster. And the Cabinet who know she is. 
READ | Grant Shapps reveals that Cabinet members support ousting May. Time to seize the opportunity for a Brexit PM! 
Shapps breaking cover underlines point that it's Remainers who wish to cause a Tory leadership contest in the hope upheaval will kill Brexit 
Michael Gove says May and Boris are doing a brilliant job. Bear those judgement skills in mind when he says Brexit is going well. #r4today 
Charge Of The Brexit Brigade...  
In case you missed this on May’s conference speech and No Deal Brexit, I’m not a lone voice: banking and industry concur. Writing on wall.  
The plot is by remain MPs to topple the PM, destroy Boris and put a remain leader in place to delay and possibly destroy #Brexit 
I missed this y'day.In all the noise about a cough, there are fundamental challenges to confront before Brexit.  
What @Jacob_Rees_Mogg said then: "it may be more sense to have a second referendum." 1/3  
“Northern Iraq’s Referendum Decision is a Betrayal to Iraq’s Territorial Integrity”  
"Other countries see Brexit as an opportunity to reopen settled matters. They know they can drive a harder bargain." 
You’ll notice that calls for May’s resignation take us from Hard Brexit to No Lube Brexit and leave the alternative as Venezuela Brexit. 
Brexit for juveniles. My latest blogpost, on the Tory Party conference:  
To recap:- referendum called because Tories fighting over EU- election called because Tories fighting over Brexit- Tories still fighting  
The humiliation of St Theresa. This morning's lesson comes from The Book of Brexit chapter 1 verse 1.   
Why does it take the head of German industry to make point that Gov disarray over Brexit increases chances of disastrous Brexit. When will UK CEOs speak out? @QuentinPeel 
Months more Brexit time wasted as Con plotters show May no sympathy. Discussing the Tory attempted coup on @GMB at 7.10 with @DavidWooding 
Next step to defend Scotland & Wales now taken : Brexit bill amendments from devolved governments tabled - BBC News  
German business warned to expect ‘very hard Brexit’ -  via @FT 
EU negotiators say they have lost faith in May over Brexit. I am fed up with their naked greed.  via @telegraphnews 
Europe could see another Brexit-like rupture, and it's not Spain  
Impact of Brexit on UK private sector jobs (to date): Created - zeroDestroyed- thousands More as it happens. 
Nicola Sturgeon: Scotland and Ireland 'are Brexit allies'  
Spanish extreme violence unacceptable says @rasmusnordqvist - Danish MP who eye-witnessed #referendum @politiken #catalunya 
People in Brighton are supposedly "cheesed off" with a cheese called "Brexit Blue" being sold in the city  
Senior European diplomats have questioned whether Theresa May still has the authority to negotiate Brexit  
"Upbeating your own drum"THAT "TALK #BREXIT UP" LOGIC, IN FULL  
As if Brexit isn’t reducing our standing and security enough already this is madness on top  
How long until the Tories have to admit Brexit is a REALLY bad idea and tell the country we should abandon Brexit?It’s just ego driven. 
To try and amend 102b by referendum is in itself unconstitutional. The only way is by parliament  
Mariano Rajoy’s handling of the referendum has exposed his political limitations  
I didn't vote for Brexit nor did I vote for 'Theresa May's Team'. I'll question this shambles all I like. Too much at stake here. 
The Catalan referendum has renewed a conversation about Spanish nationalism: “They’re pushing us to think."  
I am sure then the @FT support a referendum to back their assertion! Or they proclaim it on same basis as #Brexit  
It would allow the US investment bank to add 800 staff in Germany's financial capital as it gears up for Brexit  
This election is a referendum on the President. Make no mistake. A vote for @EdForVirginia is a Vote for @realDonaldTrump 
UK’s northern cities lobby Brexit minister over EU funding  via @FT 
US deal 2 pay pesh expired July & hasn't been renewed: seems 2 be referendum, could it also be lack of reforms?   
Article 50 architect warns Brexit legislation may collapse Lord Kerr said “At some stage the penny is going to drop" 
Europe could see another Brexit-like rupture, and it's not Spain  
3 things you need to know about the WTO  #Brexit  
Our very own @mdavisqlder & the Referendum Council has been ranked #7 in the @FinancialReview's Cultural Power list 
Con greybeards reject idea of a Brexit war by plotters - say ringleaders "all have something beyond Leave/Remain- they got fired last year." 
#bbctwCameron begged Putin to intervene in the Scottish Independence referendumYour "expert" is talking shite pic.twitter.com/ZoMMvNb97S 
#Erdogan obsessed! 4 years ago Im "behind" the Egyptian coup: . Now, the #Kurdish referendum:  
Trump loses more friends by objecting to UK-EU Brexit plan to divvy up shared farm import obligations | By @SDonnan 
BBC News - Catalonia referendum: Violence as police block voting  
If a Remainer was prime minister and wanted to sabotage a successful Brexit, their actions would be indistinguishable from what May has done  
A50 without preparationNeedless electionDamaging 'red lines'Surrender on sequencingTories: "irresponsible to replace May for Brexit" 
Nicola Sturgeon tells business leaders in Dublin the UK should stay in single market and customs union after #Brexit  
A @CNN: Hidden ballot boxes, encrypted texts: How Catalans staged their referendum  
The EU elite sees the Brexit talks as an exercise in teaching the British people and the rest of Europe a lesson   
Boris has not "talked the country up" - he is stirring up trouble over the world and Brexit is making our country appear ridiculous #bbcqt 
Boris doesn't believe in Brexit, he knows it's bad for Britain but he poses as the Hardest of Brexiteers to further his career #TWAT#BBCQT pic.twitter.com/0KxL08Fh9R 
It's not rocket science. Boris Johnson is the perfect human shield for Brexit, just as Trump is for the GOP, and as Milo is for neo-Nazis. 
People who use the word "Remoaner" are absolutely the people who moan to everyone else about everything else but Brexit. #bbcqt 
#bbcqt biggest cheer for lady who called out #Brexit shambles.Clearly the public are against it.Get over it #Leavers you've lost it. 
Michael Gove accused of breaking Brexit pledges to Scottish farmers | UK news | The Guardian  
Good visit @kewgardens. Great science. Stable finances after @LibDems intervened in Coalition. How to keep #European staff after #Brexit ? 
A cough, prankster & signfail aren’t reason for leadership change! The real issues are: detoxing Brexit, productivity & party reform #BBCQT 
Nick Clegg urges voters to join Labour or Tories to keep UK in EU. Will there always be a contingent who will never accept the referendum?  
Post Brexit, Britain will need credible Armed forces, yet another round of cuts looms.  #Newsnight #defence #Brexit  
Something very big will have to snap before any Tory admits that Brexit is a hugely damaging error which must be reversed.But snap it will. 
.@realDonaldTrump is #AmericaFirst economic nationalism. Naive to base #Brexit strategy on Special Relationship with US. #Boeing, now this. 
#Brexit is now beyond farce; they haven’t got a clue... It’d be comedy, if it wasn’t our lives, taxes and futures  
"We've had a massive range of questions here in Stockport..." I bet there'll be one on Brexit and one on immigration, though... #bbcqt 
A 10% fall in car sales & the BBC didn't mention Brexit while reporting on it on the Ten O'clock News. Was it BBC Bias or BBC Incompetence? 
Brexit is, when you are still holding a grudge 679 years later.  
A despicable act which reveals how Brexit has allowed xenophobia and racism to thrive.  
It's Not the second.  First was in 1975 Second in 2016.  It would be a third referendum or more accurately a first referendum on the terms.  
Trudeau is a LIAR, we all know that. He`s finishing job started by PET+NEB.Hates Alberta like his Dad+has divided East+West like Daddy did. Jason we want a Referendum on leaving Canada,we`ve been Quebec+Eastern Canada`s doormat 4 60yrs. Time 4 Alberta 2 separate+the time is now.  
Go read articles 259,260,261&262.U will know what can b ammended thru parliament,district councils& referendum.102 (b) isn't 4 a referendum  
Fury as British MEPs vote against UK starting post-Brexit trade talks | @DavidScullion 
EXC. We are back to first base on #Brexit talks. UK will not talk "commitments" at talks next week Me & @JamesCrisp6 
We must go from retweeting to canvassing ahead of the referendum next year. Those who can multitask should still retweet#RepealThe8th 
Sturgeon declares Scotland and Ireland 'Brexit allies'  
One of the many tragedies of Brexit is that Labour offer no alternative 
Prepare for 'very hard #Brexit,' German industry group warns  
A classic example of why the Tories cannot be trusted to manage trade or #Brexit for Scotland. Truly shocking  
In honour of Nobel, think Queen should declare next week a holiday so the nation can read all the #Ishiguro books. Take our mind off Brexit 
Maybe if we are quiet and stand very still it will go away #brexit  
That Joe Hart save was so Hard Brexit Wembley left the Single Market. Took a big wallop on the way through 
The Catalan referendum has renewed a conversation about Spanish nationalism: “They’re pushing us to think."  
Nah, the criminal folly was (a) having the referendum then (b) anointing Theresa May as leader and (c) bringing in Fox, Davis and Johnson.  
When carriers were ordered we had sensible plan for balanced fleet. Then hit by Iraq/Afghan, then 2010 SDSR, then Brexit/weak£ & weak govt 
Goldman Sachs rents space for 1,000 more workers in Frankfurt as part of its Brexit plans  
'Any settlement, though, must include the option of a referendum on independence'#DiàlegÉsReferèndum  @TheEconomist 
Looks like Brexit will lower the UK population. The problem is the people that make the place work are the ones wanting to go. 
Nicola Sturgeon tells business leaders in Dublin that Scotland and Ireland 'are Brexit allies'  
Please help fund the legal case to test whether Vote Leave broke the referendum spending limits #StopBrexit #Brexit 
The government wants us to forget the final deal referendum petition. #StopBrexit #Remain #Brexit 
Hidden ballot boxes, encrypted texts: How Catalans staged their referendum  
Kurdistan Referendum has revealed the true intention & positions of double standard policy, narrow minded ideologically driven politics. Denying a nation even from the right to have the right to vote on future is another ethnic cleansing. 
Please help fund the legal challenge to UK Government/DUP deal for breaking Good Friday Agreement #Brexit #Remain 
This @SebastianEPayne is just one eg of FT’s OTT coverage that drives so many of us to increasingly despair at its journalism on #Brexit  
Those who stand against 93% of Yes votes in a democratic, free & fair referendum in Kurdistan,are just adding points to question moralities,value based politics & other claims of brotherhood in the region. 
For years President Barzani & Kurdistan leadership were openly & clearly telling everyone, if there be no genuine efforts to solve issues with Baghdad, we will go to our people to decide on their future.Standing against Referendum, proves hypocrisy 
Absolutely nothing to do with Brexit #Sarcasm 
Prepare for ‘Very Hard Brexit’ Says Top German Industry Group  
."On virtually every issue of substance relating to Brexit, the Irish Government has an ally in Scotland." 
Ireland and Scotland allies in Brexit negotiations, says Nicola Sturgeon  
It's seemingly endless... the number of major EU-headquartered manufacturing companies investing in the UK right now. Without UK government or EU subsidies, or absolute assurances of success, these corporations are buying into the dynamic prospect of our post-Brexit Britain. 
As Brexit become more and more of a shambles, the Brexiteers begin to turn upon themselves.This is great news for Remain  
Construction entering recession.  Banks leaving. I know lots of people facing threat of redundancy due to Brexit. 
USA opposes EU-UK WTO deal in blow to May’s Brexit plans - staying in the EU seems like a much better option  #proEU 
Scotland must act to protect our natural environment after Brexit. Read & share our report:  
Syria’s Assad rejects Kurdistan Region’s referendum that undermines Iraq’s unity  
The Guardian view on WTO rules: not a Brexit safety net | Editorial  
 @NicolaSturgeon is making a speech in Dublin tonight, here's just some of what she'll say on Brexit & the economy.  
Your periodic reminder that Steve Baker and Daniel Hannan are thick as pigshit.#Brexit pic.twitter.com/YzJdzcJrK3 
As someone already said, it's not the uncertainty that is scaring business, it's the certainty that #Brexit will be a disaster. #StopBrexit 
Quite clear from the research that Leavers knew exactly what they were doing, and what they expected Brexit would bring. 
The hackers who made possible a universal electoral register for the referendum  
#BrexitReality. Democracy isn’t a moment frozen in time, wot wld have happened if suffragettes had given up! Well said. #Resist#Brexit 
Brexit was “won” on lies & propaganda.It made undeliverable promises.  Leavers will not get the Brexit they want. #BrexitReality 
Why is the government treating ordinary people like Brexit experts?WE ARE NOT INTERNATIONAL TRADE & INDUSTRY EXPERTS!#BrexitReality 
1/4 “They don’t know what to do with us” @mikegalsworthy on the EU Brexit and the UK   
The Catalan referendum has deepened pride in Spanish identity elsewhere: "The rest of Spain feels more united"  
Fancy #Brexit for breakfast? Be like @Jacob_Rees_Mogg and sign up to our daily Briefing for your early morning fix →  
Kristin Scott Thomas: ‘For me, Brexit is a disaster – talk about not knowing where you belong’  
"There is NO good #Brexit. That's why Cabinet ministers are fighting like ferrets in a sack." Hugo Dixon on @Channel4News #BrexitReality. 
Brexit supporting minister describes plot as "Remainers last throw. Destabilise and destroy May. Engineer election of a puppet Remainer". 
The EU is not being arrogant, it is defending the interests of its members. Why @Jacob_Rees_Mogg, is that so hard to understand!#Brexit  
Time for a Brexit twin track strategy. The warm emollience of Florence hand-in-hand with visible and detailed preparations for no deal. 
If 30 MPs want to force the PMs resignation pre Brexit then they are likely to be running a party with only 30 MPs. Put up or shut up please 
Brexit: Border in Irish Sea a red line for DUP, says minority party of a minority community in a 1/3 of Ireland    
We now have over 1000 #Reasons2Remain in the #EU and for #Britain to do a U-turn on #Brexit. Link:  Please Re-tweet. 
I love Paddington director Paul King's understated take on Brexit in Empire this month:  
We spent 2 years fighting the referendum and winning. The Islamic issue is huge but you don't want to do anything about it. Armchair warrior  
The Kurdish people are committed to democracy, but unfortunately the United States has not supported the referendum.  
The MSM should be more honest & recognise that the biggest cause 2 current economic uncertainty is not Brexit, but a hard left Corbyn govt. 
Brexit is really about:Deregulating fin sectorRelaxing protns for employees, environ, data, consumersIncreasing scope for tax avoidance 
David Cameron arrested after throwing Tory party in canal in bag weighed down with Brexit 
.  So you'd prefer jobs to stay in Holland rather than come here. pitiful. Get over it. you lost the referendum  
Former LibDem leader @nickclegg advising people to vote Labour to block Brexit. Has he forgotten the referendum result 
Careful what you wish for @TheEconomist #Catalonia #CatalanReferendum #CatalanReferendum #Brexit  
.More Brexit Consequences......This time for dairy farmers. 
Dutch firm TMF is to move its HQ from Amsterdam to London after £1bn float on Stock Exchange. Another boost for Brexit 
Keep this going, next target 200k. Pls sign, RT and pass on. Petition: Hold a referendum on the final Brexit deal  
WE NOW GO LIVE TO BREXIT  
."A sign of how the US & others plan to use Brexit to force UK to further open its market for farm products". 
Wall Street moves to Frankfurt as Brexit doubts grow  
Dominic Grieve: Brexit is a “fundamentally unconservative” thing to do  
Having tried to stop a democratic referendum with force now Catalan parliament suspended #democracy #Spain #EU 
As we continue our decisive steps towards Brexit, we are committed to bringing every region of the UK with us.Whether they want it or not. 
A group of Kurds gathered earlier today in front of the White House to demand support for Kurdish referendum  
Some harsh reality for the “Germany needs us to buy their cars” school of #Brexit thinking.  
Waiting... still waiting... for that elusive positive aspect to Brexit.  
Hidden ballot boxes, encrypted texts: How Catalans staged their referendum  
German firms (who employ 400,000 in the UK) told to plan for very hard #Brexit as the UK has no coherent plan. 
“The British government is lacking a clear concept" in regards to Brexit says trade chief  #proEU 
Another ‘sign’ of Brexit falling apart?! #Whitstable 
Remember she's only still there so she can be fired when Brexit negtns end disastrously, saving the skin of each of the potential successors 
They look across the Channel and do not see the infrastructure for a "hard Brexit" being hurriedly constructed  
Labour need to avoid the Brexit trap... of letting it happen.  
“German companies must make provisions for worst-case scenario of a very hard Brexit.. Anything else would be naive”  
Dunno? Maybe we don't take to kindly to being called Racists by (allegedly) one of our own... 
Eric Brown of @HudsonInstitute: The US must seize this opportunity and respect the results of the referendum. #SupportKurdistan 
Ex-Lib Dem leader Nick Clegg: Join Labour or Tories to stop Brexit  
i'm constantly amazed by Brits (and others) who think there *isn't going to be a hard Brexit.  
Even size can't shield Tesco from the effects of Brexit  
Come along to our #Brexit event, 'Brexit and NI - the story so far' 20th October 2-4pm at @QUBelfast Co-hosted by @QUBHRC 
US, Canada, New Zealand, Brazil all say no to joint UK-EU post-Brexit tariffs proposal. (Staying in CU is smarter).  
'The Best Brexit'  
International trade heavyweights have dashed May's hopes of a smooth Brexit by rejecting her import proposals 
The attempted repression of the Catalan referendum should remind Leavers that nation states are the primary threat to our liberty.#Brexit 
Hidden ballot boxes, encrypted texts: How #Catalans staged their referendum @CNNI 
#OneNationOnePoll | I think 99% Indians in a referendum will say it's good: TSR Subramanian, Fmr Cabinet Secretary  
Country is a laughing stock in Europe.Brexit negotiations a shambles.Johnson making sick jokes about dead Libyans. No policy ideas......  
Chlorine chickens are just the start: Liam Fox’s Brexit trade free-for-all  from @redpeppermag 
Catalan Referendum:International observers “strongly condemn” Spanish violenceCatalonia Votes  
Donatella della Porta et alt. "The streets will always be ours" - Catalonia, a referendum from below @openDemocracy 
"Monarch says independence referendum is 'illegal and democratic'"....there is no punchline. 
Kristin Scott Thomas: ‘For me, Brexit is a disaster – talk about not knowing where you belong’  
German companies in UK should be planning for a "very hard Brexit" - Germany's biggest industry body warns  
Sunlit uplands promised by HardBrexiteers and Brexit hasn't happened yet. Expect a lot of more of this over next year.  
“Statement by the International Parliamentary Delegation on Catalonia’s Referendum on Self-Determination Oct1 2017”  
Anybody still hankering after Corbyn should read chapters 19 and 27 of Tim Shipman's book All Out War - about the Brexit campaign. 
Fantastic that Boris Johnson’s father, Stanley, who campaigned for Remain has now voiced his support for Brexit 
Nick Clegg suggests people join Labour to stop Brexit  
Despite weeks of bidding we can find no Conservative MP prepared to debate fighting Brexit tonight. We will have Tory voters/councillors  
The news failed to mention that the referendum was illegal under the constitutional law of Spain, says Charles Moore  
Productive meeting between Minister @simoncoveney, US Envoy @JohnDeasyTD with @SpeakerRyan on immigration, economic & #Brexit @uscapitol 
The hackers who made possible a universal electoral register for the referendum@JulianAssange 
Britons to get easy sex after Brexit as the entire world lines up to screw us 
This. Syria, nKorea, Afghanistan, Kurdish referendum, Ukraine, central Africa, China, Russia, cyber, Venezuela...while eyes on the palace  
.@GeorgeKerevan: I’ve taken part in many public votes. But the Catalan referendum stands out as special  
#Brexit negos important for social partners. Constructive & open dialogue in Sweden @LOSverige @TCOSverige @Akademikerna & @svenaringsliv 
UK should have sent "much stronger" message about violent scenes around the Catalan referendum says @AndrewRosindell 
Catalonia referendum: Spanish crisis impact on markets will DESTROY EU stability 
Brexiters said time & again German industries wuld pressure Merkel. Now making provisions for “v hard Brexit” Pls RT  
..so good news in fact this Fox plan ha sbeen worked out between UK & EU, but bad news that potential post-Brexit trade partners hardballing 
Even Boris' dad - a passionate Remainer in the EURef - believes "the time has come to bail out" of the EU! The country is uniting on #Brexit  
Aberdeenshire fermers vote No for indy, Yes for Brexit and then a Tory vote at the GE, now they get fucked over like the rest of us. #karma 
Unhinged Juncker is a great recruiting sergeant for Brexit!  
The Tories are making such a mess of Brexit that two of their own MEPs sided with the EU in a key vote   
“Regardless of what you think about Brexit you got to admit this Govt is screwing it up big time”. @mikegalsworthy 
Nope, MEPs like @MollyMEP are doing their job & having the voices of their constituents heard. Nearly half the country voted against #Brexit  
I've just spotted those post-Brexit sunny uplands. We might be able to do a free trade deal with Catalonia. 
CatalanParliamentPresident "Plenary session to be held October 9, at 10h so that President @KRLS can explain results and consequences of the referendum”  
Points to interesting conundrum for Tories: May has no authority to do Brexit deal; only grounds for keeping her is to do Brexit deal.  
EU27 consultations today in Stockholm with @SwedishPM Stefan Löfven. Close dialogue and unity at heart EU27 approach. #Brexit  
Quick post on this WTO row and why it shows that, for the Tories, there's no such thing as a "successful Brexit":  
Meet the two #Tory #MEP's @RichardAshMEP & @juliegirling who voted against #BRITAIN & #BREXIT & sided with the #EU! #TRAITORS! #BBC #SKY #UK 
Move to Scotland, join the SNP, vote Yes in a second independence referendum. Job done.  
Delighted @SIPTU conference voted 'overwhelmingly' today to back #repealthe8th referendum @pb4p @labour @NWCI 
"Brexit will be the death of London."Oh wait...  
Some frightening Brexit facts about the existential dangers to UK farming in the next few months (via @jayrayner1) 
Joining Labour to stop Brexit is like joining UKIP to stop bigotry. 
Higher proportion of Lib Dem members under age 44 than any other Party. Membership growing fast. Join @LibDems now to stop Brexit.  
Unbelievable. #UK #MEPs, including 2 #Tories, #vote against starting phase 2 of #Brexit talks.  #BBC #SKY #NEWS #EU 
May’s meltdown makes it easier to stop Brexit - my latest  
Britain's energy users have a taste of Brexit and they don't like it  
"Painful", "tedious", "disaster!" - @adamfleming asks Members of the European Parliament to sum up the #Brexit process in one word.  
Migration Watch UK found there was no sign EU workers would leave the UK in their droves after Brexit  
Prepare now for over-the-cliff Brexit, Germany industry says  
Even Boris' dad - a passionate Remainer in the EURef - believes "the time has come to bail out" of the EU! The country is uniting on Brexit.  
Former Danish Foreign Minister: "Whatever you think about the Catalan referendum: the reaction of the Spanish government is foolish."  
Wall Street moves to Frankfurt as Brexit doubts grow  
Catalonian @govern refuses to follow a court order to stop the illegal rules and the referendum. Now we are expecting them to be in jail.  
Brexit Should End Cheap Migrant Labour ‘Free For All’ Which Costs Taxpayers £12 Million a Day  
Watch this #German #MEP absolutely shellack senior #EU officials over their behavior towards #UK on #Brexit.  #BBC 
It might not be the youngest car, or the fastest car, or the most rust free. But, it's a fucking good motor is my Rover 75. Hard Brexit car pic.twitter.com/Ozu2J7y8Lu 
Dom Cummings, head of Vote Leave, sounding as if he's ODed on acid - understandably given the way Brexit is going  
So the UK overestimates its influence once again☞ Trump opposes EU-UK WTO deal in blow to May’s Brexit plans  
NDP announces B.C. referendum on proportional representation  
Stephen Fry is clever. That’s why he thinks Brexit is shit. If you think Brexit isn’t shit, you’re not very clever.Fact.  
If crashing out of EU on WTO terms is 'hard Brexit', what's the term for crashing out with no agreement at the WTO?  
The removal of Theresa May from power is necessary, but not sufficient condition, for restoring UK. The govt and Brexit need to be abandoned 
Remember what Daniel Hannan MEP really wants is a "buccaneering, offshore, low-tax" Britain meaning a tax haven for the rich.#Brexit  
The US, Brazil, Argentina, Canada, New Zealand, Uruguay and Thailand reject post-Brexit food import proposals  
Vote Leave spending casts doubt on referendum validity. Please read and share.  
 The referendum was illegal under Spanish law Would you prefer the EU to dictate our internal democracy? They did condemn the violence 
Project Fear SMASHED: Investor insists UK economy is EVEN BETTER since Brexit vote  
Brexiters would have erupted in fury had the EU condemned or acted against Britain's stance in Northern Ireland during the troubles#Brexit  
SIPTU conference votes to back referendum to #repealthe8th Amendment  #OurSIPTU 
The real reasons for #Brexit:Leading Brexiters call for privatisation of the NHS   John Major warned us!  /1 
Kazuo Ishiguro has won the Nobel literature prize. Here's our most recent int with him - just after the Brexit vote  
Prepare now for over-the-cliff Brexit, Germany industry says  
My interview with the BBC via the @dailyexpressuk : . @theresa_may has 'overwhelming' support over Brexit.  
The appointment of Rona Fairhead as a trade minister speaks volumes about post-brexit Britain's direction of travel. @PrivateEyeNews 
>Be Kazuo>Have a monumentous lifetime achievement>Be praised with "He's Asian and I just think that's swell. Uh... Brexit or whatever." pic.twitter.com/ZkHoyASqqj 
"You're seeing effectively police being given political instructions to beat people up in a democratic referendum" @AndrewRosindell #bbcdp 
Insult the British workers, frighten away the migrant workers, so WHO will we be employing post Brexit?  
A controversial independence referendum in Catalonia has thrown Spain into chaos:  
Brexit makes UK acutely vulnerable, as WTO mess shows. Instead of listening to concerns, May put Liam Fox in charge.  
UK's new supreme court chief calls for clarity on ECJ after Brexit  
First we had Liam Fox wanting to cut & paste our new FTA's now we have the PM's cut & pasted speeches...the country's become a joke. 
How Baghdad has been working with Ankara and Tehran against Kurdistan after referendum...  
#Exclusive: @joanmariapique Chief communicator of the Catalan Govt @catalangov: "The referendum was not illegal."  
Agreeing timetable hardly worst mistake. Tories triggered referendum without knowing what Brexit would mean, triggered A50 without a plan.  
Tory Brexit is increasingly resembling a mental illness.  
Move along now, nothing to see... No really, there is nothing to see - other than the pain and misery inflicted by a self obsessed Tory party. It is time for them to go - and to stop the car cash that is Brexit #ToriesOut #StopBrexit #EndAusterity 
Nationalists boycotting organisations that oppose nationalism. Sounds familiar doesn’t it - #Scotland #Brexit  
Pro-Brexit minister lobbied MEPs against EU tobacco regulations.  Drain the #Brexit Swamp! #StopBrexit 
We urge the Spain and the #Catalonian authorities to enter into dialogue to find a solution enabling a referendum @LYMEC @KarnaMikko 
#Brexit Nick Clegg telling Remoaners to join Labour to stop Brexit! Never gives up this idiot! Do everything he can derail Brexit. Go away.  
Brexit means BrexitStrong and StableRed, White and Blue BrexitThe British Dream... all designed to hide the fact that this is a coup. 
》The 1% want to drag us back to the 1700s》We can only stop them if we fight together》That's why the 1% support Brexit》It's divide & rule 
"Replacing May at this point will cause chaos and lack of direction at this crucial moment in the Brexit talks."Er.... 
The real project fear is that of the #Brexit right, whipping up the kind of frightened group mentality that puts loyalty above reason. 
SIPTU Activists Alison Regan and Susie Gaynor McGowan talk about the vital importance of a #repealthe8th referendum - #OurSIPTU 
Immigrants, coming over here, winning Nobel prizes and embellishing our culture..... 
Boris: Brexit Britain has potential to be world leader in the liberalisation of trade in services  
I’m with @campbellclaret here. Both main parties are offering the same Brexit carcass, just with different gravy.  
“They don’t know what to do with us” @mikegalsworthy on the EU Brexit and the UK  
When you hold a ref that splits the country down the middle but still say your Party works for everyone #brexit 
"US and other trade heavyweights dash #TheresaMay’s hopes of a smooth #Brexit "(#Brexiteers said it would be easy!) 
'Stop STALLING!' @LiamFox blasts Brussels for Brexit trade deal talks delay   
An impending crisis on our farms with Brexit and crashing £ but Theresa's Scots Tories want to drive down wages.  
The SIPTU Biennial Delegate Conference overwhelmingly backs the call of a referendum to #repealthe8th 
Uk post Brexit: As long as UK taxes and red tape don’t rise to EU levels, and profitability remains, then capital keeps flowing to the UK.  
‘Brexit should be a lesson!' Furious Hungary promises EU WAR over new Brussels crackdown  
Very witty & informative contribution from MP Ken Clarke at today's @COSLA #COSLAIS17 on Brexit, elections & hoovers!  
UK: Stress on EU gives it better negotiating power for Brexit. Chance to create a nexus if EU mismanages. Gibraltar, weapons and intelligence exports opportunities.France: 300B Catalan economy will orient towards France due to hostility in Spain. Catalan speakers in France help 
Don't let the government think we've forgotten the final deal referendum petition!  #StopBrexit #Remain #Brexit 
£1 billion company setting up HQ in London says "Brexit vote represented an opportunity rather than a hindrance."  
If the problem is that a referendum is not legal ... why the Spanish Gov is using same methods in railroad protest  
Re uk farmers and brexit I think this sums it up.  
Project Fear SMASHED: Investor insists UK economy is EVEN BETTER since Brexit vote  
Firstly, please buy the print edition of @PrivateEyeNews. Secondly, read this to grasp complex impact of Brexit on U.K. food supply.  
Brexit contingency plans kicking into action: Goldman leases space for 800 people in Frankfurt  
From the heart:-England would dump Scotland  in Exchange for #Brexit Just like expendable in WW1 and WW2    
EU27 consultations. Today in Stockholm in @Sverigesriksdag National parliaments at heart of public debate. #Brexit  
UPDATE: UKIP leader @_HenryBolton slams British MEPs who voted against progression of Brexit talks. 
The Tories are falling apart over Brexit. They know it’s a disaster but unable to change course It’s their ‘titanic’ moment & they know this 
Theresa given P45, Johnson wants to be sacked and David Davis wants to retire ASAP. Brexit is going really well. 
'No longer fooled' British MEP lays down the law on Brexit in EPIC Brussels slap down  
Time to be honest. Joining Labour won't stop #Brexit won't protect Freedom of Movement & you can't stop austerity by leaving single market.  
Pound hits 3-week low after speculation that Theresa May could face a rebellion  
The brexit implications for agriculture are flat out disastrous. And yet the brexiteers all sing along.  
.@ChukaUmunna – New car sales figures show Brexit is having a damaging impact on our economy  
TRAITORS: @IainDale calls for Tory MEPs to be sacked after they vote AGAINST progressing to Brexit trade talks.  
Brexit is the biggest challenge facing this country, it consumes 70% of civil service time. May had nothing to say on it during her speech! 
Tonight #C4News live in Bath with a roomful of Remainers debating should they accept Brexit or fight to overturn the referendum result? 
Why young people should embrace Brexit. 
Second trade spat looms as *seven* trading heavyweights (lead by US) slam UK Govt's position on quotas post Brexit:  
Trump opposes EU-UK WTO deal in blow to May’s Brexit plans  
This is an interesting one for the CANZUK / US "will give us a great deal crowd" @IanDunt @andrew_lilico #brexit  
#Brexit: hopelessly trying to buy time while the Article 50 clock is tickingNew blog post in light of #CPC17 
Mrs May could still become the greatest PM in history! She could resign in a blaze of glory saying Brexit is unworkable and a disaster. 
Brexit has got to be stopped. But. And this is as a lifelong Labour supporter.Labour has also got to be stopped. 
Jacob Rees-Mogg, who takes a hard line on Brexit, is being talked up as a possible Conservative Party leader  
Brexit Should End Cheap Migrant Labour ‘Free For All’ Which Costs Taxpayers £12 Million a Day: Report  
UK car sales suffer big fall in September  Do you remember that Brexit downturn? It's here now 
“You mean others might exploit #Brexit for their own ends”. Don’t be ridiculous  
This is good on why an arcane-sounding US+others v EU27+UK tariff rate quotas story matters. "WTO rules" is not some Brexit safety net.  
Michael Gove accused of breaking Brexit pledges to Scottish farmers  
The 'idea' of the #EU is fabulous.It is some way from that idea but only by staying in the EU can we influence that journey. #Brexit  
Brexit is already in chaos. If the Tories did ditch May by Xmas (as some would have it) it will be in absolute meltdown. 
Voting in an illegal referendum is a political act. Coshing a voter's head is a criminal act. Not seeing the difference is political crime. 
UK car sales slide 9% in September partly due to uncertainty around Brexit  
Unbelievable. UK MEPs, including 2 Tories, vote against starting phase 2 of #Brexit talks.  
#Brexit: Now after Bombardier, here's where sucking up to Orange Idi has got us at the  WTO.  
Unless the Conservatives quickly get a new leader, inspiring policies and embrace Brexit then a Labour victory becomes inevitable. 
After reading this, I will say for the umpteenth time, thank heavens we voted for Brexit. We are bailing out at the right time.  
Boris Johnson’s Remainer dad now backs Brexit – thanks to JUNCKER  
This tweet encapsulates both the madness and the frustration of #Brexit  
Brexit dept suggesting stringent EU safety checks on electric goods be replaced by Amazon reviews by Sue in Staines  
Boris Johsnon has trashed Brexit plans & insulted leaders/countries from around the world.Why's he still employed?#BrexitShambles #ToriesOut 
Officially out today: the inside story of how Brexit will hit Ireland. Available in shops, ,  pic.twitter.com/cfuh5FJd8u 
This is serious blow to Govt's hopes of easy post Brexit trade dealsUK farmers should be very worried of US stance. 
Brexit transition deal needed by Christmas, says top official at the Bank of England  
"People like me have no say in gvt", 1986-2012 (UK)Look at working class & people with no qualificationsShould have seen Brexit coming  
Leave ministers preparing to jump ship. They want to be able to blame others for the Brexit failure they created. 
Turkish & Iranian leaders unite against Kurdish referendum, accuse Mossad of meddling  
Stanley Johnson Backs Brexit "The Time Has Come to Bail Out"  
Kind of funny that people who said Brexit vote would cause immediate recession in Ireland in 2017, now say we'll grow by 5%!! 
Pro Brexit parties, Tories and Labour, will pay at the next election. By then, even Leavers will recognise the damage they have caused. 
Setting the stage for a referendum on proportional representation  #bcpoli 
.Brexit Means-"Chances of owning your own home? SlimSense that country has your interests at heart? Not really". 
Ministers ready to quit over Brexit 
We want nation states, we do not want your federal Europe.  Understand?  That's why we're leaving. #Brexit  
‘We must be prepared to leave, with or without #Brexit deal’ – UKIP leader @_HenryBolton  
The media haven't said how the Tory Conference voted on Brexit & the Single Market.Oh, hang on, there were no votes on anything. #r4today 
These anti-Brexit traitors included 18 Labour MEPs who showed their loyalties are not to the UK.  
Confusion ensues as Kurdish government announces parliamentary and presidential polls days after referendum vote  
Thanks for your honesty Guy, you DO want a Federal Europe.  No surprise, then, that the UK voted #Brexit  
Noooooo Jeremy Corbyn! We might as well keep the Tories in. Their Brexit, your Brexit, makes no difference. #FofftoBrexit #StopBrexit 
Why the independence vote? And why is the Spanish government cracking down on it? The Catalan Referendum, explained.  
US excuse to be against #Kurdistan referendum was the war against #ISIS. Now #Iraq is virtually free of #ISIS. What is the excuse? 
Donate! Hold the @ElectoralCommUK to account over dubious #Brexit campaign funding.  
Stop Brexit organisers call on remainers to support #RegionalRallies #StopBrexit which will you attend? 14/10/2017  
Philip Obin - minding his business and worried about the Catalonia referendum. The heist in NNPC is the least of all his worries.  
What Brexit offers is the political instability that creates vacuums for the likes of Johnson and Rees-Mogg to fill:  
Despite Madrid's efforts to thwart the vote, Catalans mounted an extraordinary covert operation for the referendum  
Europe could see another Brexit-like rupture, and it's not Spain  
Important. Trump opposes EU-UK agricultural quotas (TRQs) carve-up in blow to May’s #Brexit plans  via @FT 
Our mantra is simple, #BiafraReferendum, #BiafrExit must hold & #Biafra must be restored. #Support #Referendum 4 #Biafra. 
The latest idea from a Brexit official: Replace EU safety checks with Amazon reviews | London Evening Standard  
We don't have an open return ticket on another referendum. It is time the Scottish government set a date.  
€zone rotting corpse suddenly smelling of roses! What a pity Cameron held Referendum so early on. What a difference a year would have made!  
Ministers are ready to quit over Brexit (but insist it will be OK)  
Catalan leader faults Spanish King for failing to heal divisions after a bitterly contested independence referendum  pic.twitter.com/enAWZ0zy7o 
The attractions of holding a referendum without a Section 30 order -  #ScotRef 
I know I have tweeted about this before but this is far and away my favourite thing about democracy in New Zealand. This is how actual laws are made. Australia is having that awful referendum, our marriage equality bill just came from the biscuit tin.  
1. If we were to take Mrs May at her word then the #Brexit she outlines is pretty close to what we actually want. 
Scottish democracy means nothing to Britain. It knows after Brexit devolution is a thing of the past. #ScotRef 
Trump administration opposing EU-UK WTO deal in blow to May's Brexit plans. Our @FT take:  
I joined @LibDems as a desperately needed pro-EU voice, not for @vincecable *sneaking admiration* for May holding her Brexit party together.  
On the Catalan Referendum: The Old State, a New State, or No State at All? @crimethinc 
DuncanBrexit is Working Class "Tantrum" If he says this in publicImagine what he says in private about us plebs. 
#Erdogan accuses Israel's Mossad of supporting Iraqi #Kurdistan referendum  #Iraq 
The Increasingly Tense Standoff Over Catalonia’s Independence Referendum  
Why the Catalan referendum in Spain is a warning for Indians trying to impose Hindi  | @shoaibdaniyal 
Kurd referendum inspires Iraq Christians to fight for their own independence amid fears of being caught in crossfire  
Catalonia's referendum unmasks authoritarianism in Spain  
Telling us the people of #Togo that rejecting a referendum meant to keep us in bondage is a threat to peace is simple blackmail. #Togodebout 
Dear @ecowas_cedeao the only referendum we'll accept in #Togo will be to decide to exit an abusive institution like you. #Togodebout 
Dear @ecowas_cedeao we will never accept a referendum that is meant to maintain a family in power for 7 decades. Never #Togodebout 
In a very inconsiderate statement, the #Ecowas  and the AU are calling us the people of #Togo to accept the succidal referendum.#fauremustgo 
Decolonization process is not yet completed. #Sahrawi  people are still waiting for self-determination #Referendum #westernsahara #SAUSA 
All Tory & Labour spending plans are uncosted as neither has put a cost down against Brexit. #Hypocrite 
Min @simoncoveney & US Envoy meeting members of Congressional Friends of Ireland at Amb. @DanMulhall's Residence to discuss #Brexit & NI  
NDP proportional rep referendum: 50% needed, no requirement for majority of ridings. Ignores referendum act. Very disrespectful to regions. 
Today was a turning point and Eddie Mair absolutely nailed it. When does the Brexit remit run out? A lot sooner than anyone thinks. #brexit  
Ireland has "fall back" Brexit plan if talks fail, Premier says  
Catalan crisis “bigger threat to #EU than Brexit” 
Palestinians and Israelis watched last week’s referendum of Iraq’s Kurds with special interest.  
In the next independence referendum the Labour party will fight to keep Theresa May as PM of Scotland just as they did with David Cameron.  
I don't know how some journalists who backed this PM and Brexit can honestly look at themselves in the mirror without bursting into tears. 
#PSLstatement - Spanish government’s crackdown on Catalan referendum: Socialism...  
The latest idea from a Brexit official: Replace EU safety checks with Amazon reviews  
BREAKING: BC Gov. announces referendum 2 change voting sys! Help FVC-BC teams win! #bcpoli 
Catalonia is preparing to declare its independence after the referendum vote.  
Usually loyal ministers are in despair this evening. But overbearing message... what can we actually do this side of Brexit? Again. 
B.C. Attorney General announces NDP plan for a referendum on proportional representation for province:  
Says the man who's department failed to conduct an impact assessment of Brexit on the Scottish economy...  
Tories in chaosLabour cluelessCountry dividedBusinesses leavingEU people now pawnsPrices upWhen will we abandon this Brexit nonsense?  
Catalan leader faults Spanish King for failing to heal divisions after a bitterly contested independence referendum  pic.twitter.com/6nnFzxr0df 
Netanyahu Scoffs at Erdogan’s Claim that Mossad Behind Kurdish Referendum  
Brexit means BrexitStrong and StableRed White and Blue BrexitThe British Dream... all designed to hide the fact this this is a coup. 
Brexit will hit Britain’s overseas territories hard – why is no one talking about it? 
'No longer fooled' British MEP lays down the law on Brexit in EPIC Brussels slap down  
"I’ve finally been convinced to back Brexit by Jean-Claude Juncker"  
BREAKING: NDP announces referendum on proportional representation for B.C.  
Catalan crisis 'bigger threat to EU than Brexit': What next as Spain crisis escalates?  
I have three family members working in the NHS. And they - and I - are totally fed up with Brexit and Boris! Let’s help the NHS. Please RT! 
Brexit with no deal is "a very, very bad idea" for Britain's economy, CBI chief says  
Today we began laying the groundwork for a referendum on #electoralreform, so you can have a say in how you elect your gov't. #bcpoli 
Mrs May @theresa_may perhaps you'd like to comment on how long the remit of Brexit is? whether Johnson should be sacked? Your judgement? 
.@yanisvaroufakis on Brexit, the future of Europe, and the recovery of the eurozone. Full interview at  
NDP bill calls for referendum on electoral reform by the end of Nov. 2018. 50% threshold to pass. Mail in ballot. #bcpoli 
31,7 M € is the cost, until now, to repress the Catalan Democratic Referendum  
New UKIP leader Henry Bolton tells RT he’ll press for Brexit with or without a deal  
Theresa May's legacy could well be a disorderly Brexit and Prime Minister Corbyn. Would be most catastrophic premiership since Chamberlain. 
Tories threatening a no-deal #Brexit are employing the logic of gangsters threatening to push the hostages over the cliff.#StopBrexit 
#Catalonia: UN experts urge political dialogue to defuse tensions after referendum  
The UK has an inflation rate of 2.9%, the highest out of the G7 economies #Brexit - working to make Britons poorer  
Goldman Sachs leases more Frankfurt office space ahead of Brexit  
Unelected Spanish King calls elected Catalan Government undemocratic for holding a democratic referendum.Yeah. 
Cancel Brexit : Theresa May, Jeremy Corbyn and Ruth Davidson - Sign the Petition!  via @UKChange 
Theresa May's 'no deal is better than a bad deal' Brexit logic is rapidly destroying the British economy. 
Over half Britain's car production is exported to the EU. Major car factories are at severe risk of #Brexit disruption. #StopBrexit #Remain 
Free Trade Agreements don't necessarily liberalise .... FTSE100 muppets still taking Brexit advice from this Europhile ex mandarin  
Liam Fox is either ignorant or lying here. Does he think EU doesn’t have internet, that their officials can’t watch this?  #Brexit  
My 'Brexit is Cancelled' Tweet Is Ready...  
To be correct- was only Andre who said he may leave, not Konstantin. But fyi,  UK Nobel Prizewinners from last year also slagged of Brexit.  
message from Liam Cosgrave to the electorate from the 1972 Referendum on joining the EEC  
Should the Tories should make the contemptible Boris their leader? He can own hard Brexit and the consequences.  
 Piqué: "Catalan referendum? There is a big problem in Spain, if there isn’t dialogue it will get worse. Talking can achieve everything." 
Bank calls for Brexit transition deal by Christmas  
"Video played across Europe & seen by Brexit negotiators, showed her big moment overshadowed by a collapsing set". 
May renews Brexit walk-out threat, but Brussels does not believe her - The Telegraph  
If Mayhem is ousted in the near future it won't be bc of her calamitous speech or her disastrous election but bc Brexit is slipping away...  
EU calls for Spanish-Catalan talks after referendum violence  
Rafael Nadal on Catalonia's Referendum: "I think is better if I don't say anything."  
Brexit: Theresa May assures Tory faithful she is willing to crash out of EU without deal  
Watch the moment when Theresa May was handed her P45 by a comedian  
This #Brexit thing's going really well, isn't it? 
Uk Government:- shit at speeches- shit at conference security- shit at sticking signs to walls- optimistic about Brexit 
Puigdemont says Catalan government to apply referendum result  
NDU's Denise Natali @dnataliDC: The Kurdish referendum has exacerbated relations between Arabs & Kurds not only between #Baghdad & #Erbil. 
potential softening in Ireland position suggesting it, not just N Ireland might get special post Brexit arrangement  
Tusk: insufficient progress in Brexit talks. Disappointing but unsurprising. We’re running out of time and facing cliff edge. 
Theresa May has had a nightmare of a day  Here's how it unfolded, in 3 minutes: 
Disgraceful remarks from @campaignforleo on referendum on water says @bridsmith - people mobilised across country to prevent privatisation 
Whatever your views of Brexit, these British MEPs, voting against further talks, are behaving appallingly  
The #EU wants a #EUArmy - would you really trust Brussels with an army?Really? Would you?#Brexit #Flexcit 
George Galloway - “#Brexit is presently being betrayed. That which 17.4 million people voted for is being systematically betrayed."  
Catalan referendum: Dangerous use of force by Spanish police confirmed by Amnesty  
Exactly this. Or a bunch of shopkeepers cd hold a referendum on refusing to serve black/gay customers and enact just that.  
This is what happens when you deny legitimate calls for a referendum.  
"In the coming days we will again show the best side of our country when we have to apply the result of the referendum" 
"On Sunday we managed to hold a referendum in the midst of unprecedented repression." 
This is the latest edition of Brexit, the disaster comedy on which the US version, Trump, is loosely based. 
How Brexit works: from this week's Private Eye. Can you spot more than one UK job here ?  
A Brexit transition fails to dodge the perils of leaving the EU - wise comments:  
The Spanish region of Catalonia recently held an independence referendum the government responded swiftly with violence.  
'Error which changes everything': Catalan leader vows to put referendum results into effect by next week  
Brexit restructuring by firms will in general increase their complexity.  #geofinance 
AMAZING CONVO with Investigative Journalist @TonyGosling on events in CATALONIA juxtaposed with #Brexit and the Vegas Shooting!  THANK YOU! 
"TM's ready to leave the EU w no Brexit deal if necessary - and is making preparations"No Deal = No #citizensrights 
Incase you missed it… Here’s @Nigel_Farage’s Brexit Briefing which features some very positive economic news  
Kivuitu in 05 & 07 elections & Hassan in the 10 referendum & 13 elections are rare lessons .Lot did not look back. Run when you can chiloba 
Brexit is a bigger risk to UK economy than a Labour Government. My views reported in today's @standardnews 
Will Theresa May's Brexit be Great or Shit? 
Peter Bone MP - The EU would rather damage its own people than let #Brexit Britain be a success.  
Maldito Bulo sale en Poynter: Online hoaxes about the Catalan referendum concentrated on police action in Barcelona.  
She’s PM because of Brexit! So she’s hardly going to rat on it. But her jaikit is hingin by a shooglie peg.  
Extraordinary watching how fast Tories falling apart. They're negotiating #Brexit & therefore our future! We need @UKLabour Government 
Maybe. But so far not any dead. Unlike Iraq. And you really think Mrs May performs like that because of Brexit. Didn’t you meet before?  
No idea what you’re saying. Brexit has discombobulated many Remainers and Leavers inc yourself. Haven’t bandwidth to keep up. Corbyn onside?  
But will #Brexit destroy the country in 45mins? 
Eddie Mair to Amber Rudd. "When does the remit of the EU referendum run out?" 
Stop Brexit and they will, Theresa  
Come on. Surely this alone is worth a second referendum...  
Terrible irony in devolved regions blamed for wanting breakup of UK when English nationalism produced the Brexit that makes it inevitable 
By 'fake' I mean activists & botnets. The sentiment of 'normaltons' is heavily anti-Brexit. Massively.  
Tories won't regain public's support until the drop the act that #Brexit is good for Britain, writes Nick Kent. 
Never has a PM done more to split a country in two than Cameron. Then, when she could have united it, May divides it still further.#Brexit 
.If the Tories & Labour force a Brexit on Scotland & Ireland - then yes - they will be.. 
.@Ross_Greer has launched a Brexit position paper calling for devolution of migration and asylum policy to Scotland 
I'll still be here, fighting Tories, fighting Brexit, fighting for those who need it as best I can. But I haven't felt at home in 15 months. 
#Brexit is economic suicide as UK has a structural #Trade Deficit in Goods Guess who has more power to negotiate FTAs with 3rd countries? 
This. None of this is the will of the people, this is the will of the Tory cabal driving what is essentially a coup, a power grab. 
May quietly resigns Brexit negotiations to the dark cupboard, along with Britain's future.Me for @Byline_Media 
Anyone looking at the UK political landscape seriously thinking they haven't achieved their objective? 
Are we stumbling farcically towards the point where brand Brexit is so irretrievably damaged that MPs might start to distance themselves? 
What odds would you give me on there being three prime minister before any form of Brexit?  
'Post-Brexit, we need languages more than ever.'  
Anna, moderates really need to stop Brexit. It will tear your party and the country apart. 
Catalonia's leaders are in danger of mistaking international horror at Spanish state brutality as support for outcome of flawed referendum. 
Xnet's report on successes and failures in the use of digital tools during the Catalan referendum is excellent:  
Go, Eddie, go! Eddie Mair presses Amber Rudd how long the 'will of the ppl' in #brexit ref must be upheld. #BBCPM #stopbrexit #cpc17 
Brexit’s Got TalentTheresa May from Maindehead - Human(ish) Beatbox  
A member of the Tory gov that Scotland never voted for, telling Scots who voted 62% remain, that brexit disaster is @theSNP 's fault #FOFF 
Prankster giving a P45, the set falling down behind her and delivered with a cough.... May's speech was basically a bit Brexit! 
It was criminally irresponsible to have that bastard referendum in the first place. Poisoned this fucking country forever. 
4. Ok. Start by being honest with people on the impact of Brexit and sack any minister who refers to Remoaners. You won't.  
12/ @SZ: "Tories are clueless on how to prevent party splitting, manage Brexit & keep May at helm - no matter how lethal her performance."  
Nothing at Tory conference which was new or significant on Brexit.No evidence any minister grasps difficulties or complexities ahead. 
It could be about Britain's real problems, none of which Brexit will solve. Or even help with.  
"The case for a second referendum in Scotland DENIED" - How many Scots applauded that? How many of them will sing the anthem tomorrow? 
So @JonnElledge has a summary of Tory thinking on the NI border and #Brexit from #CPC17. It isn't good.  
Turkey's Erodgan links Israel's Mossad to Kurdish referendum, while Iran's Rouhani blames "foreign sectarian plot"  
The Catalan president will make a statement in the parliament on Monday at 10am to explain how the referendum results will be enforced 
Stop Brexit organisers call on remainers to support Regional Rallies  
I met today UN SRSG Jan Kubis to discuss political developments following Kurdistan's referendum and mechanisms to de-escalate tensions- mb.  
All bar 1 of @Theresa_May’s #Brexit cabinet supported the #EU or the #SingleMarket before the #EUReferendum. Report:  
CNN Reporting evidence of Russia manipulating Facebook in key states of Wisconsin and Michigan. No doubt that they helped to rig Brexit too. 
Bloody EU, cracking down on multinationals ripping us off. Who do they think they are? We want multinationals to rip us off! Brexit now!  
A coughing fit, a comedian and a crumbling set - what a fitting analogy for the Tories' broken Brexit Britain 
Varadkar's outright refusal to hold referendum on water has reawakened the beast. Bad decision Taoiseach @campaignforleo #right2water 
When ppl say there's no way Brexit can be stopped, I say: 'Look at the quality of the ppl trying to accomplish it.' Today was case in point. 
We’re apparently going to be wrecked by Tories we didn’t vote for because of Brexit...which we didn’t vote for either.  
Strong chances of Brexit no deal, but UK government may collapse: Scottish minister  
A lot of empathy being shown for May. What about empathy for those she sanctioned, the shambolic Brexit and the state of the UK 
No Fucking Chance@jeremycorbyn I will not unite after Brexit until we rejoin the EU  
Brexit is one of the most significant issues right now, but May gave no new information about Brexit in her speech  
TOLD: 'Stop giving the impression you want to punish Brexit Britain' - German MEP @HansOlafHenkel to Michel Barnier. 
She spoke out about Spain, but since the EU and the UN have said the Referendum was illegal ... #WheresNicola 
It seems Philip Hammond and Amber Rudd's positions on Brexit have hurt their satisfaction ratings. Rightfully so. 
When they create a second referendum on the European Union  
RINSED: German MEP @HansOlafHenkel tells Guy Verhofstadt to stop being ARROGANT towards Brexit voters. 
Brexit at Tiffany's: A lighthearted political film about Tiffany, a quirky European, trying to find her place in 2016 
. . . A Country That Works _or E veryone . . . Who Bought And Paid For Brexit At The Expense Of Ordinary People.  
☛@amnesty report on Spain police brutality in #Catalonia #referendum: Those responsible should be brought to justice  
Brexit significantly reduces UKs ability to create, develop or exploit future tech, or attract skills required to get it. 
Catalonia’s police chief faces sedition charge for 'allegedly failing to follow orders' ahead of referendum  
May claimed to be a champion for whole country, but ignores the 48% who voted #Remain, and is steering us towards a hard Tory #Brexit (6/12) 
In a reversal of themes from the election, Brexit featured more in Jeremy Corbyn's conference speech than in Theresa May's  
it is clear the time has come for the Brexit negotiators to demand GBP 350 Billion Refund From The EU For Overpayments To An Unlawful Cult.  
JRM's a true patriot who puts his country first, doesn't waver even in the face of hecklers & Brexit whingers, the gentle man with tenacity. 
Do people really believe the UK holds the cards in the Brexit negotiations? This insanity must stop.  
It's increasingly clear no-one wants to be in power when #Brexit finally comes home to roost. UK politics has turned into a game of Shithead pic.twitter.com/KzLTbwfW6B 
Leaders of the Catalan Parliament hold their first meeting since Sunday's referendum  
Catalan protesters blocked roads to protest a crackdown by Spanish police during the independence referendum  
UKs terribly loss if our brightest and best scientist migrants leave and this is after being made to feel unwelcome in Brexit Britain  
Rees-Mogg and Farage both say they will quit Britain if #Brexit doesn't go their way. Their claim to be patriots is one big stinking lie. 
Greens @SkaKeller: This was massive police violence against innocent people whatever you think of the referendum #Catalonia 
"There's no excuse for police violence regardless of your thoughts on #Catalonia independence or on the referendum" @SkaKeller #4Oct 
Rows over Brexit left Theresa May only able to tinker around the edges of the great challenges the country faces  
Imagine the economic boom we'd have if Brexit was cancelled tomorrow. 
Rees-Mogg would “flee the country” should the Tories decide to abandon #Brexit ?Rees-Mogg - fair weather patriot! 
Poll of 45K @welt readers: 54% support 'hard Brexit' w/ "no compromises." 35% support soft even though "it's best option for both sides."  
"We want our money back" - French Economy Minister Bruno Le Maire says UK must settle its #Brexit divorce bill  
“Our interlocutor in Iraq is the central government. We deem the referendum held by the IKRG illegitimate.” 
II can understand why #GreatBritain voted for #Brexit. European Union is the biggest lie EVER. After independence, #CatalExit. #ByeByeEurope 
My new blog:  Brexit and Catalonia exhibit same nationalism. More formal sovereignty leads to less real sovereignty 
Chairman of German Green Party (in talks to be in Merkel's next govt) picks up on Boris "mocking the dead" (Libya) & asks "Brexit or Vomit?"  
A thought, well, a thread, on what May actually said (not the calamitous delivery). The one thing that really matters is Brexit. On that ... 
And they called it Project Fear☞ UK construction suffered a shock fall in September and Brexit was blamed  
1/ Keep in mind: Catalonian separatists STOLE private data from citizens in order to build a "census" for their illegal referendum. 
The King of Spain lashes out at referendum organizers and accuses Catalan authorities of "unacceptable disloyalty."  
The outside world looks at us, they see Boris and Brexit. We look to them like Trump's US looks to us. Dangerous territory for a country.  
Before adding: "It was every bit as good as I imagine Brexit will be"  
Yes. #Brexit is the single biggest danger facing the UK economy, the NHS, basically the whole UK right now. It goes way beyond party loyalty  
Welcome to the land of the deluded that Brexit Britain has become   
GALLOWAY: The break-up of Spain is inevitable after the Catalonia referendum debacle @georgegalloway. 
For god's sake @theresa_may we have 17 months until Brexit. We don't need your yogurt weaving 'British Dream'. We need solid viable plans  
Brexit means Br x t 
Until his last great gamble, the EU referendum, @David_Cameron was always a lucky general. Same cannot be said of Mrs May #cpc17 
The American Dream was a delusional era build on genocide & slavery. A post Brexit British Dream is a colonial era golden age fantasy 
You should have "Scotland doesn't need another referendum" and then have the "n't" fall off after a wee shoogle 
Brexit means glue that doesn't meet EU quality standards.  
Who is going to buy it? @campaignforleo rules out referendum for our water supply.  #Dáil#not1pipe #right2water 
They'll be an inquiry into how a prankster got so close to the PM But on how a right-wing group gerrymandered a referendum silence is golden  
Theresa May boasts Graphene was created in UK.Yes. By two immigrants. Who plan to leave over Brexit. FFS 
John McDonnell admits Labour has no plan on Brexit, nor will within 6 months. Corbyn claims to be ready to rule. As ready as the Tories. 
No Ruth, that shambolic, crumbling disaster was a metaphor for her leadership, your party, and the state of Brexit UK.  
'Bigger threat than Brexit'...  
Amazon and Apple caught in latest EU tax crackdown The EU protecting us from corporate tax-dodging!#Brexit 
May praises discovery of graphene, but forgets to mention a scientist who discovered it plans to leave over Brexit  
#ToryPartyConference Your one-stop shop for crushingly obvious Brexit metaphors...  
As if things weren't bad enough for Theresa May, the sign behind her started falling down  
Catalonia’s leader said the region will declare independence "in a matter of days." Hundreds of people were injured during the referendum.  
Brexit really is "putting Britain on the path to greatness again," isn't it @DavidDavisMP? 
We now go live to brexit  
I know everyone has already said this, but that speech really was the perfect metaphor for Brexit UK.Scotland, I think this is our stop. 
2nd referendum on Scotland's #Independence 'DENIED' says Tresemme in her haughtiest voice & 2 rapturous applause. Chase yerself hen. #cpc17 
The Scottish Government has a mandate for a second independence referendumMay can try and deny thatShe'll be met with force  
Varadkar just told me in Dail his pref is for May referendum! Lets make sure we keep him to that; let all students vote! #repealthe8th 
The difficult delivery is actually helping cover up the Brexit-denying, rambling, unimaginative banality of this speech. 
'Racism, intolerance and hatred have no place in British politics,' says Mrs May in #CPC17. So that's the end of Brexit, then. 
Content of May's speech is in effect: "look at all the things we could do as a government, if we were not going to preoccupied with Brexit." 
"The case for a second referendum in Scotland denied" says May  
Longworth: Brexit transition beyond 2 years would be biggest capitulation since 1938  
May: "I take comfort that the general election saw the threat of nationalism set back, the case for a second referendum in Scotland denied." 
Spain used DPI (Deep Packet Inspection) for censoring, in an attempt to hack and stop the Catalonian referendum 
Please can the British Dream not become the new Global Britain? Brexit renders both insultingly meaningless. #TheresaMay 
Coughing aside, the significance of this Brexit-lite speech is that it shows what politics could be about if Brexit was not taking place. 
The Sad Demise of The Vicar's Daughter Who Knew It Is A Sin to Lie But Did It Anyway Because She Wanted to Be Prime Minister 
Jacob Rees-Mogg's Brexit pitch to the youth is hardly a winner.  
UKIP and Brexit more popular with a particular brand of English nationalist voter. May openly appealing to those voters just months ago.  
Theresa May's speech recapped so far: She's handed a P45 and loses her voice  
If @theresa_may is serious about #Brexit, sack @AlanDuncanMP immediately for his outrageous & arrogant comments  #BBC 
Theresa May loses her voice during her big speech - but Philip Hammond comes to the rescue  
'No longer fooled' British MEP lays down the law on Brexit in EPIC Brussels slap down  
The Brexit bit was short in length, & short in detail. A welcome message to EU citizens but without any detail to back it up. Nothing new. 
Min @simoncoveney is in #WashingtonDC for political meetings on immigration, trade, foreign policy & Brexit address  
May at #CPC17Nothing of substance or new on Brexit.Mere re-statement of positions. 
"Let's make the country so shit no-one in their right mind would come here. 'Won't we only get the lunatics then, Theresa?' Yes- and in Brexit Britain they'll fit right fucking in." pic.twitter.com/EF2EGLUbc1 
Watch the moment Theresa May's speech was interrupted by a man waving a P45 form  
May says free market is greatest ever human creation, but insists on an extreme Brexit that takes us out of  world's largest single market 
Theresa May is at this very moment making a very good case against brexit! How is she going to turn this speech around to defend it ? 
May Says U.K. Govt Is Preparing in Case of No-Deal Brexit 
"Narrow nationalist agendas" threatening the union of the UK claims May. #Brexit nothing to do with narrow nationalism then. #CPC17 
Isn’t the British dream the one where we turn up naked and unprepared for an important exam? Or Brexit, as it’s otherwise known. 
'Britain leading the world on tackling #climatechange,' claims Mrs May at #CPC17. The fact is Brexit puts all of our commitments in doubt. 
May forgets to mention that since Brexit vote, UK has seen longest period of falling living standards in six years  
Mrs May talks of 'progress between the generations' at #CPC17:  Brexit is older generation taking an almighty dump on the younger generation 
#EuropeanUnion confronting @amazon over #TaxFairness. Commissioner @vestager stopping #Luxembourg dodge. After #Brexit easier to avoid tax. 
BREAKING: #US-led group rejects EU-UK proposal on splitting #WTO #quotas after #Brexit | Details @MLexclusive :  
Aug 1: #Brexit and euro clearing relocation could force 40,000 City jobs into the EU #StopBrexit #Remain/1 
Had to attend Tory conference yesterday- the depth of animosity towards Boris from Tory MPs is astounding. Brexit could split them LT. 
17/16 And @theSNP politicos who indulged in referendum tourism, and have been egging CatNats on, are safely back home & feel no consequences 
Rees-Mogg says young people must be told that #Brexit is 'liberation from a failing economic model'. Know what, Mogg? They will laugh. 
Tory party policy chairman on the future of the Tory party “the Brexit obsessed bank managers of austerity” And he’s being kind!#CPC17 
At last! The subversion of Brexit has begun  Can we be called Subversives as well as Saboteurs? We rather like that 
Iraqi Kurdish referendum ‘strategic mistake’: Iran MP 
The digital fight to disrupt the Catalan referendum will be a case study for years to come:  
LONGWORTH: Brexit transition second more than 2 years would be biggest capitulation since Munich in 1938.  
From the erroneous description of the KRG referendum result down, every line in this piece is horseshit.  
A hopeful journalist shouts to Gove: "Do you think there should be a referendum on the monarchy?""Very nice to see you," he replies.  
Britain could lose a €67 billion market after Brexit  
With every passing day brexit look more and more like a libertarian right coup. No idea why isn’t described in those terms more  
At least 25 sites related to the Catalan referendum were blocked  #ReferendumCatalan 
Guy Verhofstadt and his fellow MEPs should not be indulged in their tantrum over Brexit 
Brexit isn’t just for blokes - Women have been written out of the EU debate, writes @CCriadoPerez  
Henkel -Message to London 'They should really get their act together and come up with a stable and unified government' @Number10gov #Brexit  
5. "The authority of EU law in Britain will end" on Brexit day.Now, natural reading of Florence speech is "around two years" after exit.  
#KRG #DFR Min @FalahMustafa talked to @inga of @NZZ abt latest political developments, post-#referendum phase, #Erbil #Baghdad Dialogue 
Heywood is deeply committed to BREXIT failure.Bit like putting Herman Goering in charge of the 1940 RAF  
Scotland is being sidelined in the post Brexit trade deals with Canada and Japan! Don’t say you weren’t warned!  
Of course the Tory leaders, their rich chums & super-rich patrons are prepared for a no-deal #Brexit. They won't suffer, ordinary folk will! 
Brexit with no deal is "a very, very bad idea" for Britain's economy, @CBItweets chief says  
Since the #Brexit vote households have endured the longest period of falling living standards in 6 years #Remain 
Yet more proof, if it were needed, that Boris Johnson is at best a sociopath, at worst a psychopath #Brexit 
With the referendum behind them, Catalans have begun to ask: What just happened? And what happens now?  
EMA publishes comments on the 19 Member States’ bids to host the Agency after #Brexit  
On #WorldAnimalDay RT if you agree that Brexit must protect animals! Read recommendations from UK NGOs here:  
British officials are worrying in private about the risk of a Brexit with no EU trade deal  
After Brexit, we will have the exact same benefits as we have in the EU.Broadly. Sort of. Approximately. Best efforts and all that. 
Would you vote for a candidate at election, no matter their party, if they vowed to fight #Brexit in commons? Pls RT #StopBrexit 
Businesses now making it clear that they feel let down by @GovUK because of lack of clarity about #Brexit objectives & constant infighting 
Most UK MEPs, including some #Tories, voted for EP motion critical of UK govt failure to make #Brexit talks progress 
Turkey's President Erdogan arrives in Tehran for talks for talks on the KRG independence referendum, Syria and trade ties.  
After weeks of backstabbing and politicking over Brexit, a battle to succeed Theresa May is emerging  
Joint statement calling to uplift the area of woodland cover in the UK after #Brexit @forestsandwood @WoodlandTrust  
Patel says here she wants to introduce free market into health. Brexit is a huge danger to the NHS.  
The real Brexit end game: it give the Tories an "opportunity" to axe regulations requiring public spending:  
After his interventions on Brexit and shameful comments on Libya, how does May sit in the same room as Boris? 
Regarding Boris Johnson, it’s clear he is still trying to escape responsibility for his actions in Brexit. Hence all attempts to get sacked. 
Excellent speech from my @GreensEP colleague @ph_lamberts on giving UK citizens a final say on the #brexit deal 
Spain's King Filip VI, in his speech last night denouncing Catalonia's referendum on independence, chose an exceedingly ominous backdrop.  
Johnson wants to get sacked to try to escape blame for Brexit disaster.May wants him gone but is too weak to sack him.What a shambles! 
#BBC frantically running round seeking out every anti-Brexit, rent-a-quote, semi-detached #NotATory MP they can find, to ramp up an entirely manufactured outrage.And they think we're so stupid, we don't realise what their game is. 
To clarify: Labour's position on Brexit is as clear as mud.  
Ireland an afterthought during Brexit campaign when I was Cameron adviser  
Very good exchange with #Transport Comm. Violeta @Bulc_EU on #Aviation, #Brexit, #Barcelona #Airport & #CompetitionReport @Transport_EU 
More purely synthetic outrage, from the same #NotATory camp as Heidi Allen.Has Nanny Wollaston also demanded Alan Duncan "consider his position" after his equally crass "Brexit was a working-class tantrum over immigration" assertion?  
Rees-Mogg says he will leave the UK if Brexit doesn't happen. - Stop Brexit!  
Not only that, she’s repurposing a speech by a fictional president after a fictional terrorist attack to talk about... Brexit  
Watch me being interviewed about @ESRC @socdatalab research on hate crime post referendum on Panorama next Tues BBC1  
That @thetimes editorial in full: Govt must admit growth is already being constrained by Brexit. Please RT:  
If you think Brexit uncertainty is damaging to prosperity, wait til you see the impact of Brexit certainty.  
Frankfurt is winning the battle to lure Brexit banks - but that may come at a price  
. I suspect, post Brexit, that we might find Scotland's own brand of "Local Autonomy" to have been likewise provisional...and temporary. 
Brexit could make us the global leader in technology says @SyedKamall 
I think it was other way around. I think the very wealthy instigated Brexit but used the working class to achieve it. Multi-Nat elite coup.  
Despite Brexit  
Living standards in decline since Brexit vote. And this is before we've left. Join @LibDems to stop this self-harm 
Was at a meeting of senior UK space industry folk & UK ESA staff last night, held under Chatham House Rule. Every single one against Brexit. 
We need our male allies, in the referendum campaign. Brothers, fathers, friends & partners. Thank you @MarianKeyes for this one of himself  
The head of the Catalan police whose local police defended the referendum process and citizens could face sedition charges.  
Have yet to see any senior Labour figure condemn Alan Duncan's remarks about working class Brexit voters. Is it because they feel the same? 
#PredictMaysSpeech Brexit is Boris is Brexit is Boris is Brexit is Boris is Brexit is Boris is Brexit is Boris is Brexit is Boris is Brexit 
My article @TheNatlInterest looks at  #Kurdistan and region after referendum; road to independence @FalahMustafa 
By speaking honestly to party and country to admit that Brexit is a terrible mistake and must be abandoned in the national interest.  
Those seeking to subvert the referendum result are clearly targeting Boris 
Thousands take to the streets to strike against Catalonia referendum violence  
Friends! Why indeed!After all, Our FT is justly notorious for its full and fair coverage of every shade of pro-EU/anti-Brexit opinion.  
Jeremy Hunt on GMS describing indyref1 as an "even bigger majority" than the Scottish vote on Brexit! Astonishing! Do they even get briefed? 
Surprise! Everything that Leadsom defines as a benefit of Brexit here could happen just as easily without Brexit. Even Scottish satellites.  
CNN's journalist puzzled over the Spanish Minister of Foreign Affairs denial of police violence in last Sunday's Catalan referendum  
Our government, and their plans.  #ToryPartyConference #ToryConf #toryconference #CPC17 #cpc2017 #Brexit #Boris #MayDUP #StopBrexit #4EU 
The King of Spain lashes out at referendum organizers and accuses Catalan authorities of "unacceptable disloyalty."  
Nikki Kaye says Nats have set aside $20 million to solve the teacher shortage crisis. They used $26 million on the flag referendum. 
God. I need a break from Brexit. I just told my six year old that he was not making "sufficient progress" in eating his breakfast bagel. 
Duncan said there should have been a turnout threshold or super-majority required for the referendum. Yes, as Tories have applied to unions. 
MP for Rutland. Muslims and immigrants  probably not rehomed there. I assume he has  not visited Birmingham then, he would soon want #brexit 
The EU has low tariff trade deals with two thirds of the entire world. After #Brexit, the UK loses full access to all of this. #CPC17 
"Tariffic Access"(fixed version)♫ ON THE FIRST DAY OF BREXIT, THE EU GAVE TO ME... ♫  
Investors may look elsewhere unless a Brexit trade deal is reached, Liam Fox suggests  
King Felipe: Catalonia's authorities have 'scorned' all Spaniards with referendum  
UK exports in 2016: ($bn)India 4.5Australia 5.4Japan 6.6 Canada 6.3China 18.3US 62.3EU 203.2Spot the problem. #Brexit #CPC17 
Catalonia referendum: Puigdemont will declare independence 'in matter of days'  @BBCWorld 
It's always good to see a hereditary monarch point out that a referendum is undemocratic #CatalanReferendum 
Brexit-related housing demand could push Frankfurt's rents even higher  
For the love of my country I will continue to talk down Brexit until it is dead. I will fight to #StopBrexit by all legal & peaceful means. 
Straightforward, to the point petition> Don't leave the EU #Brexit 
Jeremy Hunt explains "Arrogance" of EU Commission & Resilience of British economy have changed his mind on Brexit  
It's clear that @BorisJohnson is begging to be sacked, just so he can distance himself from the Brexit shambles. What a Charlatan   
BBC News - #Catalonia referendum: Independence will be declared 'by end of week'  
Wait a minute. Hasn't she been insisting that the party is totally united behind her and on Brexit?   
Wednesday briefing: May writes riot act over Brexit disunity  
The EU Withdrawal Bill has serious implications for devolution  #brexit  
She keeps saying 'Brexit means Brexit' and 'Boris will be Boris' but is the real problem that Theresa will be Theresa - i.e. 'Labour Lite'? 
Yet another Brexit delay - "transition" now expected to last two years and nine months. This is getting laughable  
Wolfgang Tillmans Brexit posters have been nominated in 2017's Design of the Year awards  
700k protest #Spain's referendum crackdown in #Barcelona – local police (PHOTO, VIDEO)  
The center of Barcelona was brought to a halt with protests on Tuesday after the Catalan referendum crackdown  
The center of Barcelona was brought to a halt with protests on Tuesday after the Catalan referendum crackdown  
Alan Duncan MP talking about Brexit: The government will "make the most of what we are now required to do" In other words, damage limitation 
The more I see about the Catalan Referendum, the more the EU looks like Naziism 2.0.  
1. One facet of a no deal Brexit, on top of supply chain infrastructure failures, is the massive legal uncertainty. 
Why does Turkey object to the referendum in the Iraq Kurdish region?  
This is his first interview since Sunday's disputed referendum on @BBCNews - critical and potentially volatile moment. How will Europe act? 
Catalonia referendum: Puigdemont will declare independence 'in matter of days'  
Catalan referendum: Region's independence 'in matter of days'  
Mr. Brexit. AKA Britain’s Donald Trump.  
. @BorisJohnson dropped Brexit fact bombs and expressed opinion of the 17MILLION, says @michaelgove 
Better Than Zero, Worse Than...Everyone ElseUK's disappointing post-Brexit GDP.#MakeoverMonday #notabumpchartViz:  
The King of Spain lashes out at referendum organizers and accuses Catalan authorities of "unacceptable disloyalty."  
Catalans stop work, block roads to protest police crackdown during secession referendum  
"This election wasn’t simply a political contest. It was a referendum on how much America still hates women."  
Which, I believe would be a referendum on childish behavior.  
Now that's a protest...700k protest Spain's referendum crackdown in Barcelona – local police (PHOTO, VIDEO) 
Thank you PTC members @isd719 for all you do for our students & schools! Thanks for coming to hear facts of the referendum! #WeArePLSAS 
Angry residents in Barcelona are on strike, protesting against violent disruptions to Spain's independence referendum. @michaelbesty #9News 
Richard Corbett speech as MEPs vote 'sufficient progress' not been made on Brexit talks  via @RCorbettMEP #stopbrexit 
How Baghdad is punishing the Kurds post-referendum  
Things are starting to snowball☞ UK construction suffered a shock fall in September and Brexit was blamed  
And the EU Parliament can veto any deal☞ The EU just said Britain hadn't made enough progress in the Brexit talks  
They just can't stop lying, can they?☞ Liam Fox promises to sign 40 free trade deals the 'second after' Brexit  
Julia Lopez MP and TH Councillor welcomes a speedy Brexit, she is confident May & cabinet will deliver #GreatBrexit #CPC17 @THConservatives 
School construction projects in the 2017 school bond referendum = more jobs in Fairfax County. Get informed: . 
Ireland an afterthought during Brexit campaign when I was Cameron adviser  
#plsas #fivehawks  100+ interested PTC members listening to information about Referendum at Grainwood! Come on over!  
King Felipe VI condemns Catalan authorities over 'irresponsible conduct' after 'illegal' referendum  
Tory reasons why Brexit will be a successAgincourtEnid BlytonCricket on village greenThe QueenScones & a nice cup of teaStonehenge 
More than half of Catalans did not vote in the referendum on breaking from Spain, leaving the region divided  
3/ @IanDunt on the 'vacuous and mercurial use of language' *at the #CPC17 regarding Brexit* #skypapers @HarrietSergeant 
the ex that voted for Brexit and thinks the muslim ban is a good idea but can't work out why I never want to get back together w/ him 
Introducing the euro failed to foster sense of European identity, academics conclude.Here's a clue why.Youth Unemployment using euro:46% Greece39% Spain35% Italy23% Portugal22% Belgium21% France21% Finland20% CyprusNot using euro:13% UK#Brexit 
Fucking brexit / trump supporters that piss all over the toilet seat in a club. Have a word with yourselves! 
Er no it's not. @UKLabour is not convincing anyone on Brexit. They are in bed with the @conservatives destroying the nation. 
Reference to Liam Fox and unilateral tariff elimination, but conveniently describes Brexit and literally everything said and done by May too  
EU, Britain agree to seek same WTO quotas after Brexit: sources  
Their counterparts in the UK voted for Brexit to make a point, But Surely that wouldn't actually mean leaving the UK. 
In JFK on way to Washington DC, 2 days of meetings - great access to key people, talking Brexit, trade, immigration reform and undocumented 
The Act of Parliament which was passed to hold the referendum. Keep up 
Las Vegas, Catalan referendum are fresh fodder for Julian Assange and other Internet demagogues   by @anneapplebaum 
Open Letter to Misinformed Foreigners Concerning the Catalan Referendum, by @ansedetaboada  
Hooray! We won Agincourt - and Trafalgar! Therefore we win Brexit! You couldn't make it up. It's Trump with glasses on Earl Grey tea...  
Imagine a king decrying a referendum as undemocratic.  
People = A slim majority in an advisory referendum. It’s split the country and it gets worse every day. It needs to be stopped. #StopBrexit 
UK has highest inflation rate among world’s top economies, says OECD  Brexit sunlit uplands. Wait till mortgages rise 
After Brexit, I find it a bit difficult to accept lessons fron British politicians& journalists.  
Anna your stance on Brexit should be applauded, your execution of your values are questionable at best. Follow your heart Brexit is wrong 
But #Boris doesn’t actually want to take over from #TheresaMay just yet cos he knows that delivering Brexit is a poison chalice. #CPC17 2/ 
The Catalonia independence referendum has passed. Now what? @YasmeenSerhan investigates:  
“Can you imagine if the British police beat up a couple of anti-Brexit demonstrators?” - Nigel Farage  
In which Liam Fox confirms:1) he has zero comprehension of how the EU works2) he has no plan for #Brexit talk failure3) he is Liar Fox  
Dear PM, yr Foreign Secy is a buffoon and yr Brexit Secy isn't very sure why he keeps meeting that nice Mr Bernier. Time to #reshuffle 
German MEP @HansOlafHenkel absolutely nails all three points on why the Leave campaign won the Brexit vote, why the EU are damaging their reputation and what a shambles the Conservatives are in the post Brexit period.  
Theresa May to tell Tories it's time for Brexit infighting to cease  
Yet another unacceptable line crossed. Sacking won’t make him a Brexit martyr. Just confirm unfit to hold office. 
Some compare Brexit to divorce. Maybe. If you were polygamous. And 27 ex-spouses had to agree on the terms. You won't get the house! 
The vast majority of Spanish and half of Catalonia doesn't want this. These people haven't even worked out implications, like w/ #brexit 
"First do no harm" is implied by the Hippocratic Oath. If only politicians were bound by such an oath when mouthing off about Brexit... 
Felipe says Catalan referendum organisers were "outside the law." National police beating local firefighters within the law then? 
In Scotland, we voted in a legal independence referendum and the vote result was for staying part of the UK. SNP still can't accept this! 
The Brexit result was a 'bit of a tantrum' thrown by the British working class over immigration, Sir Alan Duncan has said. Do you agree?  
This tweet was a joke about Davis saying UK can be confident on Brexit because of Shakespeare and Austen.  Not a literal report, sorry. 
What will the government do if the EU plays “hardball” in Brexit negotiations? @EvanHD asks @LiamFox #newsnight 
Wednesday's FT: "Cabinet tensions rise as ministers defy Johnson’s ‘red line’ on Brexit" (via @hendopolis) 
So @theSNP don't accept the result of a legal referendum but are prepared to accept the result of an illegal one, speaks volumes about them. 
#EvanDavis just gets owned on #bbcnewsnight by #LiamFox over #Brexit. No agreement by EU to a FTA is pointless & self harming to all.  
Liam Fox again accuses EU of  “ideology” for refusing quick FTA with UK. But here’s Fox admitting Brexit is itself “ideology” #newsnight 
THE GUARDIAN FRONT PAGE: "May time for infighting over Brexit to stop" #skypapers 
The roaring coward who wrote two articles on the EU referendum before opting for the one which served his ego best.  
Brexit : "We want our money back", dit Bruno Le Maire aux Britanniques  #AFP pic.twitter.com/tXGOrbtDLX 
Don't forget that as the SNP interfere with Spanish politics, they warned David Cameron to 'Butt out" from the Scottish referendum. pic.twitter.com/w7e10Ye1Du 
What would a no deal Brexit mean for British science?  
Theresa May to tell Tories it's time for Brexit infighting to cease  
Brexit.  
Liam Fox mocks #EU parliament’s #Brexit trade talks vote"It doesn’t matter at all.European Parliament has no say in the process.So it’s an opinion.Were any of us surprised by it? No, we weren’t.Will it really make a difference? No, it won’t!" 
Oh please do one Denis. The FT is a paper of record and should act accordingly. On Brexit it hasn't. 
#SuggestNewJobsForBorisSTRONG(andstable)MAN at the #Brexit circus?!doesn't he look fetching in mankini!!!#StopBrexit 
UK construction suffered a shock fall in September and Brexit was blamed  
Barcelona gridlocked as thousands of Catalans join general strike against independence referendum crackdown  
No justification for Spanish internet censorship during Catalonian referendum  
The rampant nationalism unleashed by #Brexit is socially & economically damaging. Say No to confinement on the British Isles. Yes to Europe. 
Spain's King Felipe condemns organisers of Catalan independence referendum for putting themselves "outside the law"  
John Redwood MP: What we want from #BrexitIt's time to remind ourselves of why a majority in UK voted to leave #EU... 
In his speech at the #ConservativePartyConference, Boris Johnson urges post-Brexit Britain to 'let the lion roar'  
At this point the only way out of this crisis in Spain is to allow a legal referendum.Allow both sides in Catalonia their voice. 
EU's attitude to Brexit is back-firing on them.  Even Jeremy Hunt is fed up with their disgraceful posturing.  
Here is some more good Brexit news you won’t hear anywhere else.  
Say NO to #JeremyCorbyn's HARD #Brexit! Stream the single on repeat and help get it into the UKTop40 #StopBrexit  
Brexit, Trump, Catalonia. Do we really want to re-run the '30s? Really, really? Or the 40s?? Why go back there? Why, why?? 
Which country do you think will be the first to leave the European Union ? #brexit #ref2 #EU @JunckerEU RETWEET & VOTE #yourvoice 
David Davis reveals that the government is preparing for a ‘NO DEAL’  via @Your Brexit 
Despite Brexit, central banks may have to remain in U.K. assets because of the need to diversify out of the dollar  
Alan Duncan: Brexit is Working Class “Tantrum”  
Not a good look from @SM_FelipeVI. He made no mention of the violence that marred Sunday's referendum  
FINANCIAL TIMES FRONT PAGE: "Cabinet tensions rise as ministers defy Johnson's 'red line' on Brexit" #skypapers 
These are the ppl Ministers should listen to as they opt for a hard #Brexit - Forkhill (Armagh) residents who know what a border means in NI  
Tories have instructed that G4S must confiscate Bollocks to Brexit stickers from delegates. Delegates are coming back and asking for more! 
Watch Theresa May’s full interview with Jon Snow about Brexit, Grenfell Tower and nurses’ pay. 
Irish freedom is an indefeasible right, it is not something that can be put to any sort of referendum. 
MEPs have voted to block Brexit negotiations moving to the next phase  
.@FabianPicardo highlights the fact that the UK challenged the legality of #Gibraltar's 2002 referendum but did not attempt to stop the vote  
Boris Johnson point-by-point: People must stop treating Brexit like a 'plague of boils' #Premium 
Worth to keep this is mind : "Jeremy Hunt says #NHS needs EU immigrant workers amid claims of Cabinet Brexit row." 
Opinion | Why the Kurdish referendum is none of Turkey's business  
"We believe in a free press, down with Leveson," says the minister, "but the press should not be so critical of government Brexit policy." 
Who do you think the UK will lose first? #brexit #ref2 #EURETWEET & VOTE #yourvoice 
King Felipe: Catalan authorities have 'scorned' all Spaniards with referendum  
Textbook example of management pressure on journalists by state broadcaster during referendum.  
Brexit happened because Leave 'stirred up' people about immigration, minister in Boris Johnson's department says  
Yet more lies. And more lies. And more lies. ... "UK will be ready if Brexit talks with EU fail, says David Davis"  
Sorry Diane @HackneyAbbott, but a @jeremycorbyn led @UKLabour will bring more austerity from Red Brexit. Foolish to think otherwise  
The European Parliament overwhelmingly backed motion condemning lack of progress in Brexit talks today  
The EU has more safeguards against the abuse of democracy than the UK.#StopBrexit #Brexit #Remain 
Brexit is Trafalgar, Agincourt and Crecy? Is this Monty Python?  
No. No. No.Last thing #Brexit needs is mainly pro-Remain govt caucusing with pro-Remain big-business CBI for “best Brexit deal together”.This is crony-corporatism writ large.  
'@AlanDuncanMP, Brexit was a positive decision in favour of independence. Keep your unwelcome slurs to yourself.   
Don't let the government think we've forgotten the petition for a final deal referendum #StopBrexit #Remain #Brexit 
O'Neill nails it at @spikedonline.The State's attempt to silence citizens' voices in Catalonia merely echoes, just more violently, the anti-Brexit demos-phobia of our own Remainer-Elite. 
.@michaelgove I am standing up for something precious and special: the truth, democracy and the future. That is why I oppose Brexit. 1/  
‘Double standard & hypocrisy’ - #Serbia's president calls out the EU after denouncement of the #Catalan #referendum  
Opinion: Las Vegas and the Catalan referendum are fresh fodder for Julian Assange and other Internet demagogues  
Mind when the Queen interfered in the EU referendum? Very disappointing. It spoilt her two-year unbroken record of not meddling in politics. 
Here are 4 things to know about the Catalan referendum.  
Farage and Bolton call for Minister to be sacked after he describes Brexit “tantrum”  
Catalonia goes on strike in protest at Madrid's supression of referendum  
EU Were never going to give us a deal They still hoping out Traitorous MPs Will stop Brexit As two Thirds of them want us to remain in theEU 
Pro-Russian networks see 2,000% increase in activity in favor of Catalan referendum  via @el_pais 
Jacob Rees-Mogg - "John McDonnell and Keir Starmer are talking in different directions about what #Brexit would mean."  
Brexit vote was NOT tantrum by British working class but justifiable protest vote against political system in Westminster, overlaid by lies. 
Britain is ready to walk away with no deal on Brexit, Davis says  
Should the ration books be blue to match our new passports or should we go for the traditional green?#Brexit  
Britain's construction sector slumps in September as new work dried up amid "Brexit blight" of uncertainty  
.@Nigel_Farage is fed up with the Brexit gloom, so he’s compiled another list of good economic news  
Sinn Féin are the only party preparing for Brexit on an all-island basis with a Capital Plan to boost infrastructure  
EU Parliament votes for delay in Brexit talks due to lack of progress  
Jacob Rees-Mogg compares Brexit to battles of Agincourt, Waterloo and Trafalgar  
Rudd coining donations-funding at rate of £30k per month.,via @GuidoFawkes.Who's funding her?No prizes for guessing what donors hope to gain.She's Continuity-Remain candidate to oust May & either stop Brexit or water it down to Brexit-in-name-only. 
King Felipe VI condemns Catalan authorities over 'irresponsible conduct' after 'illegal' referendum  
Reminder: referendum question was "Do you want Catalonia to become an independent state in the form of a republic?" 
TONIGHT: @ggatehouse reports from Barcelona on protests over police violence during the Catalan referendum  
Just give it up, for the sake of all our sanity. It's over. It failed. Brexit is no more. It has gone to meet its maker. 
“King says referendum was undemocratic” ok 2017 you’ve had your fun 
A king saying that a referendum is undemocratic  
In 21st Century Spain elites - literally a hereditary monarch - call a referendum around self-determination 'undemocratic' 
People aren't attaching a high enough probability to a hard Brexit, Niall Ferguson says  
The King of Spain has not a single word for those brutally repressed in the Indy referendum. Just warns with more repression. Please EU help  
Spain's King Felipe attacks Catalan referendum organisers for having put themselves "outside the law", in TV address  
The EU Referendum wasn't founded on accurate, evidence-led debate, the whole Brexit proposition has been a sham.  
She dared to cast her vote and the EU loving Spanish State kicked the shit out of her. The road to freedom is tough but worth it. #Brexit pic.twitter.com/T5ICGNSGss 
So basically Tory Brexit strategy seems to be based on pigs ears.....Possibly the same ones Cameron held on to...I'll leave that image here 
Spain fans boo Barcelona's Gerard Pique because of his support for Catalan independence referendum  
Tories are a disaster.They caused Brexit,they've destroyed the economy with austerity &they've created more inequality. Bloody awful #c4news 
Europe Minister Alan Duncan claims the Brexit vote was a 'tantrum'. No, Alan, it was a decision by people you should have the good grace to respect. 
Catalonia: tensions rise as strikes held over police violence during referendum  
Evidence of Internet Censorship during Catalonia's Independence Referendum.  @OpenObservatory @X_net_ @nodo50 @EFF 
True face of May's Remainer-dominated government? Europe Minister @AlanDuncanMP branding #Brexit vote a "working-class tantrum". #SackDuncan 
Woolfe: The British people are no longer fooled that the EU want to negotiate a fair Brexit agreement. It's time for the UK to walk away.  
Gradually we're hearing Conservatives like @AlanDuncanMP challenge May's Brexit stance. This is critical for a shift to an #exitfrombrexit 
Brexit may have been a working class tantrum, but it was fuelled by upper-class twats who won’t suffer consequences. 
#Catalonia: The brutality of the Spanish police during the #referendum on #1Oct, you still did not see it. #ACAB 
With Brexit, what kind of border will the Republic of Ireland and Northern Ireland have? People on both sides are worried.  
Have you been misold #Brexit? You may be due for compensation. Hold the liars to account 
I know nothing about Brexit is going to be resolved,but has anyone ever sought to define what this 'transitional period' will actually mean? 
The Guardian view on the Tories and Brexit: Debate? What debate? | Editorial  
The Tories want #Brexit to sneak in low taxes for them, their rich chums & their super-rich patrons. Here's Boris extolling flat taxes  
Pro indy people together with pro Spanish people today walking for a referendum & against the @marianorajoy police violence. We want to Vote 
#NationalBoyfriendDay If #Brexit was a boyfriend, he'd let you pick posh restaurant, fail to negotiate reservation & end up w a Greggs pasty 
Brexit vote was 'tantrum' by British working class, says Alan Duncan  I agree with Sir Alan who has made big journey 
“The Crisis Surrounding the Referendum in Northern Iraq is an Attempt to Drive a Dagger through the Region’s Heart”  
Theresa May: UK making preparations for no Brexit deal  
Here we go. These are the ‘opportunities’ the Conservatives see in #Brexit. This has always been the endgame.  
 Catalonia referendum's impact on Barcelona? #FCBayern Is Ranieri doing a Leicester in France?New podcast: 
Good speech by Jacob Rees-Mogg on #Brexit. We”re in a strong position. We don’t have to let them push us around. 
Jacob Rees-Mogg delivers passionate Brexit speech and it’s the best thing you’ll watch all day  via @Your Brexit 
Petition: Ban the Niqab and Burka in public places in the UK  via @Your Brexit 
Justice Minister Dominic Raab tells @BrexitCentral: The economic reality is that we are going to make a success of Brexit, come what may  
In his speech at the #ConservativePartyConference, Boris Johnson urges post-Brexit Britain to 'let the lion roar'  
Tory infighting is harming the Brexit process - @Keir_Starmer 
.@M_AndersonSF  Busy day in Strasbourg huge interest in Brexit joint resolution and protecting the Good Friday Agreement @RT_com France 4. 
.@JLongworthLML: We cannot implement the benefits of Brexit unless we leave the single market and customs union 
What happens if Britain fails to reach a Brexit deal with the EU? David Davis explains  
.@JLongworthLML tells @BrexitCentral Brexit means leaving the single market and customs union. 'Soft Brexit' does not exist #CPC17 
Tory Brexit rally: speaker says if transition deal exceeds two years would be "biggest capitulation since Munich". German ambo taking notes 
Well done @_HenryBolton, quoted in Sun story about Alan Duncan's anti-Brexit outburst. An early hit for our new party leader.  
The EU is seeking to delay, damage and deny Brexit! This is why we need to walk away now.  
Who'd have thunk it @patel4witham. Before the referendum you were saying the NHS would get an extra £100m a week.  
WE NOW GO LIVE TO BREXIT  
."We are locked in a death spiral with these Tories, plunging towards Brexit and ignominy, set for the most painful of landings.".  
Former Brexit Minister @DavidJonesMP says govt should publish position paper on no deal as soon as next month #cpc17 
The Tories' only line on Brexit is "Let's not be all doom and gloom about it!" Not a single policy idea or evidence for a positive outcome. 
Proud to have Boris speaking at @LegatumInst fringe. Painting a confident, positive vision of UK's post-Brexit future  
I am now even more resolute to see Brexit abandoned.  #StopBrexit #dontbrexitfixit #notinmyname #ThatIsMyWill #exitbrexit 
With a referendum getting closer, now is the time to join one of our regional groups and help #repealthe8th !!!  
Rees-Mogg describes the customs union as a "protection racket" and says Brexit Britain will have "a real opportunity for free trade" 
"Brexit was this country's largest ever democratic vote." - @Jacob_Rees_Mogg at the @BrexitCentral rally pic.twitter.com/XbvTUywxCW 
Tories don’t like reality. They prefer Mail, Express, Telegraph & Sun, where their Brexit BS goes unquestioned and is lapped up by idiots.  
BREAKING: Spanish King Felipe to address the nation at 9 p.m. (3 p.m. ET) after Catalonia's unauthorized referendum on independence 
Reminder - Tory, UKIP and DUP MEPs who united to vote against EU anti-tax avoidance measures #StopBrexit #Brexit 
King Felipe of Spain to make rare televised speech to the nation at 19:00 GMT, two days after Catalonia referendum  
Pleasure to be on the panel with @OpenEurope discussing Britain beyond Brexit #CPC17 
Tory squabbling gives the European Commission and Parliament an alibi for not agreeing to move to the next stage of Brexit negotiations. 
But, as @dfriedman33 notes, the Nevada background check referendum has not gone into effect yet.  
Tory tells truth about Brexit shocker Brexit vote was 'tantrum' by British working class, says Alan Duncan   
MPs stand accused of abetting a national act of self-harm, a self-harm of staggering proportions. Yes, Brexit. #Tory17 
The Spanish government's Internet censorship around the Catalonian referendum violated global human rights norms.  
I'll be chatting more about Brexit stuff with someone who is wrong on Sky paper review at 10:30pm. 
Ada Colau, Mayor of Barcelonaon Rajoy's disastrous mistreatment of the referendum#CatalanReferendum #RajoyDIMISION 
An education is a luxury, peasants. Book learning will only feed your resentment as you toil in the onion mines for a Brexit groat.  
. @DavidDavisMP speech LIVE: UK is READY for NO DEAL - Brexit secretary hints at alternative  
Who do you blame for delays in Brexit?  
Dear @michaelgoveForgive me for asking, but if we're not going to tag pigs through their ears after Brexit, where ARE we going to tag them? 
Tory Minister"#Brexit is Working Class "Tantrum"Establishment can't stand not getting their own way.@amdwaters 
David Davis: Government preparing for ‘no deal’ on Brexit  
Farage and Bolton call for Minister to be sacked after he describes Brexit “tantrum”  
Theresa May sits down with @faisalislam to talk about Brexit negotiations, Jeremy Corbyn and divisions in the Tory party  
Catalonia held a referendum. Russia won. - The Washington Post  
Ask PM if perhaps the Conservative problem with young voters is just possibly down to the tone and tenure of her Brexit plan... 
Beneath all the patriotic bluster of Boris Johnson's speech lies the real reason for Tory #Brexit, massive tax cuts for the rich.#Remain 
Things not so bad after all: Jacob Rees-Mogg will 'flee the country' if Con Party abandons Brexit  via @HuffPostUKPol 
The slow death of the Tory party  brexit is going to bury this rich boys club once and for all 
Very struck today by meeting Vicky from @LearningDisEng who told me how little of #cpc17 discussion had included any reference to disabled ppl.  Reminded me no mention of disabled ppl in #Brexit white paper #livesmadeinvisible 
Cutting through the #Brexit cacophony  via @FT 
Jeremy Hunt has changed his mind on Brexit, why? "The arrogance of the EU Commission" @IainDale 
Thousands in Barcelona to protest against police violence during Catalonia's referendum on independence  
Barcelona is gridlocked as thousands of Catalans join a general strike against the independence referendum crackdown  
Boris Johnson makes the case for 'flat taxes' - massive tax cuts for the rich which the Tories know hard #Brexit will deliver. /1  
MEPs vote that 'sufficient progress' has not yet been made on Brexit talks See my speech to Parliament here: 
Barnier: not enough progress to unlock next phase of #Brexit talks  
These #Brexit negotiations could use a little less hesitation and a little more @HansOlafHenkel #realtalk 
Spain's Flawed Response to the Catalonian Referendum  
Brexit will restore our tomatoes to their former glory. #BrexitShambles #BrexitOpportunities #twats pic.twitter.com/VUaw79RGnu 
Jesus @AlanDuncanMP have you of all people learned nothing...you should apologise or resign, this insults the 17.4 million who voted Brexit  
Both Farage, and now Rees-Mogg, have said they will leave UK if Brexit abandoned.  Bonus. 
Catalonia's referendum: Human rights groups investigate claims that Spanish police used excessive force  
50 years ago Britain was debating whether to withdraw from east of Suez, now it's planning to withdraw from east of Dover. #Brexit 
Alan Duncan is spot on and that's why we MUST ignore the referendum result and bin Brexit. Half the Leavers would be secretly relieved. 
Have watched every government speech on Brexit (some many times, alas) since the vote, these were the least confident and strident. 
Sat through Fox, Davis, Johnson speeches - nothing to show they have any grasp of the complexities and difficulties of Brexit. 
WATCH Alan Duncan: Brexit is "Tantrum" Thrown By Working Class  
I am very sorry for those caught up in this, unless you voted Brexit, in which cause, you voted for this, suck it up and deal with it.  
Catalan protesters blocked roads to protest a crackdown by Spanish police during the independence referendum  
'@Nigel_Farage + @_HenryBolton call for PM to sack Minister who described Brexit voters as 'throwing a tantrum'.  
The @FT reports and comments on Brexit like everything else: without fear and without favour. Since 1888. 
They genuinely could not give a shit about NI or anyone else. Brexit at any cost, even lives.  
So far we've had foreign sec not mentioning Syria, health sec barely mentioning social care, Brexit sec with nowt new to say on Brexit... 
For the second time at #cpc17, a Cabinet minister has gone out of their way to attack @FT for our Brexit coverage. Why? 
My 4-year old niece asked me for the structural root cause of the Catalan Referendum.I told her it was because the Castilians supported a Bourbon imposter, and not a true Habsburg King.  
"Brexit vote was 'tantrum' by British working class" says Europe Minister Alan Duncan.   Whipped up by Leave Liar No 1 his boss B Johnson @iandunt @ryanheath @D_G_Alexander 
Brexit- it's just like Agincourt. When we drove 10,000 to their deaths as we wanted to be in France. Spent a fortune. Then ultimately lost.  
We're committed to preserving GFA achievements in all its aspects, Ireland valued as core EU27 member. Fruitful meeting w/ @HMcEntee #Brexit  
Boris summary; Labour bad! Theresa great! Brexit greater! We're all lions; the future is golden! Yep, as detailed & well-argued as that 
'It is time to stop treating the referendum result like a plague of boils' says @BorisJohnson 
Yet again the Chancellor talking down economic prospects - are they actually trying to provoke a recession as an excuse to block Brexit?  
Jacob Rees-Mogg Will 'Flee The Country' If Conservative Party Abandons Brexit  
Report by the International Parliamentary Delegation on Catalonia’s Referendum 
Israeli politician @KseniaSvetlova was invited to observe the Catalan referendum. She believes the state was heavy handed in its response.  
Oh good. Now Boris doing the "despite Brexit" bit. "It is time to be bold, to seize the opportunities". 
All the things Johnson says Britain does, we’ve done in the EU. We trade with the world as well as with Europe. Brexit harms not helps. 
"We will be no less European" after Brexit because "our most important exports are our values". Speech basically meaningless at this stage. 
More fool anyone who thought #Brexit was about anything other than a race to the bottom...  
Heartening to hear from Simon Allison of 'Tories Against Brexit' at the #StopBrexit march #Manchester. Thnk you!Pic: @BluetackPhoto 
Wonder why the FT, one of our most thoughtful newspapers, might be concerned about Brexit?   
On Brexit: 'Labour would inflict a national humiliation' says @BorisJohnson 
Crushing blow to @ft as @BorisJohnson joins @LiamFox in criticising "distinguished pink newspaper" and its "Eeyore" like Brexit coverage 
Britain is ready to walk away with no deal on Brexit, Davis says  
Catalonia firefighters form human chain to protect voters from police amid referendum violence  
.@BorisJohnson complicit in the biggest lie in the history of British politics. He & his Tory cronies using #Brexit as a power grab. #CPC17 
The center of Barcelona was brought to a halt with protests today after the Catalan referendum crackdown  
I think the Guardian report about the Europe Minister Alan Duncan deriding Brexit is very significant.  His position close to untenable. 
Boris Johnson says whole cabinet united behind May's Florentine plan for Brexit. He has of course been making that quite clear 
I've seen some people with serious political front. But Boris talking about cabinet unity in Brexit takes the biscuit. 
Boris Johnson does a Trump and bashes the @FT for pointing out economic risks of Brexit #FakeNewsMedia 
BJ, like Fox and Davis, clearly smarting from critical coverage of Brexit. 
If Mrs May is serious about Brexit, she will sack @AlanDuncanMP immediately for his outrageous & arrogant comments. 
Rees-Mogg speaks of Crecy & Agincourt - English not UK victories. The Tory Right willing to destroy the UK to get their tax haven.#Brexit 
Catalonia shut down today in protest against Spain’s police violence during the independence referendum #3Oct . 
The Europe Minister dissing and ridiculing Brexit. Not good enough. Boris Johnson is right that Britain needs a Govt that believes in Brexit  
Apparently Liam Fox quoted low prices at Aldi and Lidl as an example of the benefits of free trade he wants after Brexit. Erm ... 
Brexit, where people think the UK is strong enough to go it alone in the world, but too weak to influence its closest neighbours and allies 
1: Johnson's Brexit speech2: Davis contradicts Johnson3: Fox contradicts Davis4: Johnson contradicts Johnson5: May:"Brexit means Brexit"  
MEPs will not sign off a Brexit deal that allows the UK to weaken its environmental standards. That will not fly.  
Now here’s a new Tory line as leaving the EU goes tits up - blaming the working class for Brexit  
#BREAKING Spain's public prosecutor says police intervention against the Catalan referendum "did not affect at all the normal coexistence" 
We'll I think we can all agree David Davis is speaking the truth here. Nothing remotely simple or sunlit uplandish about Brexit.  
Andrea Leadsom Says Young People Should Get Excited About Brexit 'Because Robots Will Pick Your Raspberries'  
Hope isn't a strategy - my piece on Liam Fox, Brexit and trade.  
Britain is making contingency plans for Brexit without an EU deal, David Davis says  
Michael Fallon, Defence Secretary, sees brokering further deals with terror sponsoring Saudi Arabia as a post-Brexit bonus #SaveTheUK #CPC17 
UK construction companies report sharp falls in activity since the Brexit vote.  
4) pain free #Brexit was always a fantasy, but the real complex, phased, compromise based #Brexit that they supported would never have won 
NO DEAL: David Davis says government is preparing for no deal on Brexit and wants to set UK on path to greatness. 
2) However, #Brexit was *always* about populism, because no-one was ever going to vote for the reality 
DRAMATIC footage of Spanish cops violently throwing a Catalan woman down stairs during their crackdown on the region's 'illegal' referendum  
`The Brexit referendum and misjudged Thatcherite response to the crash are causes of current Tory crisis- deep causes that pre-date T May. 
Spain's general prosecutor says that police agressions against voters "did not affect coexistence" during the Catalan Referendum. Spain is still governed by non-redeemed Francoists.  
"Public opinion is shifting towards @UKLabour as @Conservatives​ can't agree on #Brexit" @RCorbettMEP​ as thousands protest in Manchester. 
Catalans turn out in large numbers for a planned strike to protest police violence independence referendum.  
Labour claim they respect the outcome of the Referendum…but oppose every step required to deliver it 
Brexit is 'a one-off...time-limited…extraordinary opportunity' 
Speaking about Brexit and the great opportunities ahead for young people because of it with @AndreaLeadsom. #CPC17 #YZ17 
The Tories' approach to Brexit will lead us off a cliff edge, and will threaten jobs and workers' rights. #failingthemany #CPC17 
UK aiming for "a good deal" on #Brexit but is "ready for the alternative" - Brexit Secretary David Davis #CPC17  
LISTEN: @michaelgove tells @juliahb1 Boris Johnson is 'speaking from the heart' on Brexit #talktory  
The Tory Right pose as English (not British) patriots. In reality they would sell Britain to US private business to gain a #Brexit tax haven 
"Closer to home we're getting Britain ready for Brexit step by step." Really? That's great Dave. 
If we can't get a Brexit deal then we are ready for NO deal  - David Davis #cpc17 
David Davis there stumbling twice in one autocue line about how the tiniest Brexit error could cost the country billions. 
Freeman: "Brexit is currently looking to the under 40s like an insult." #CPC17 
If the Brexit outcome falls short, Britain is ready for the alternative, David Davis to say  
Brexit talks are a game played on Barnier's turf, by his rules | Dan Roberts  
>> Opinion | Catalonia held a referendum. Russia won.  
No, he doesn't. Rees-Mogg drones on about Agincourt but can't name ONE benefit of #brexit.  
Liam Fox ignores fact UK won't be able to sign new trade deals until 2022 (no mention of Brexit transition period). 
Still amazed at #BBCReportingScotland last night insinuating that violence in #Catalonia due Referendum as opposed to violent Police! What? 
Brexit vote was 'tantrum' by British working class, says Alan Duncan  
Liam Fox wows Tory conference:'Doesn't it annoy you when good economic news is prefaced 'despite Brexit?'-Silence#Brexit 
“I want to commend the enormous courage of the Catalan people in their efforts to hold a peaceful referendum.” 
“Millions of Catalans voted in an independence referendum. They did so in the face of violent repression on the part of the Spanish state.” 
Hammond: business investment falling due to Brexit. Fox: UK seeing record foreign investment "despite Brexit". 
Brexit vote was 'tantrum' by British working class, says Alan Duncan  
"Doesn't it annoy you when they preface any bit of good economic news with the words 'despite Brexit'?" Silence. "Well doesn't it?" 
Brexit speeches currently ongoing at Tory conference. It's like a school nativity play for economic illiterates. 
Barcelona is now badly split between separatists and unionists. Like the aftermath of Brexit, this helps no one except opportunists. 
Serbia’s foreign minister accuses world powers of double standards over Catalonia referendum and a separate Kosovo.  
I'm waiting for someone to say it's bad taste to talk about brexit after the economy collapses 
When you find out your vendor has lied about the product do you carry on with the purchase? Of course not! #Brexit#StopBrexit 
European Parliament votes 557 to 92 to back  theres not been "sufficient progress" in Brexit talks for trade talks  
£350m week (0.9% GDP) for NHS by 2021 would roughly restore projected cuts.  Perfectly affordable (just not from Brexit "savings")  
Mrs May must show she understands that the only reason she is PM is because she was content to implement Brexit while David Cameron wasn't. 
Rajoy made many mistakes but the referendum was a meaningless sham: Damage to Catalonia  
The Alternative Vote - on which we had a referendum - would have delivered an even less proportional parliament than FPTP in 2015 #AVisnotPR 
Jacob Rees-Mogg compares Brexit to battles of Agincourt, Waterloo and Trafalgar  
The UK government has formally invited @NicolaSturgeon to hold talks with the prime minister over Brexit  
Catalonia goes on strike in protest at Madrid's supression of referendum  
The #Brexit blight of uncertainty:Civil engineering activity experienced the steepest fall in over 4 years  #Remain 
Does anyone around the Chancellor care that being unduly doomy about Brexit risks transmitting negative sentiment across the economy? 
Fox says that if there's a 'No deal' Brexit outcome, that would be 'damaging' 'for the whole of the EU, not just the UK'. Signif remark. 
Here Rees-Mogg likens Brexit to the "great" battles of Britain's past. He is glorifying the slaughter of millions for political means.  
Cat let out of the bag. Why Brexit? To slash rights and protections for all - putting profit before people.  
Brexit 'blight' blamed as recession looms for construction sector  
Could have been drawn yesterday but is actually in a calendar from 1984 #brexit #mess #steadman  
Andrew Rosindell: Catalonia shames EU, ‘no deal’ could be best Brexit option  
Barcelona is gridlocked as thousands of Catalans join a general strike against the independence referendum crackdown  
EU Lawmakers chide U.K. over Brexit divisions, saying too little progress has been made to discuss future trade deal  
The "Will of the People" is a democratic sounding excuse to circumvent legal & democratic checks on government power. #Brexit #StopBrexit 
The New York Times:The brutality of the Spanish police on Sunday in their mission to shut down the referendum  
Why is our feeble Gov letting EU dictate the agenda and timetable of #Brexit?We should offer a free trade deal & walk away.NOW@AMDWaters 
"If #Brexit is a divorce then we are the children of the divorce and the process is a painful & troubling one. Powerful from @MollyMEP 
Roads are blocked and shops are closed in Barcelona as pro-independence protesters launch a second day of demos after banned referendum.  
IEA director says Brexit is an "opportunity for substantial deregulation". Priti Patel: "Absolutely right."  #CPC17 
Catalans protest on the streets as tensions flare over the continued presence of Spanish police after referendum  
There are many sides to most stories, which is what I tried to show in my Shetland Brexit piece. Express filleted it for only those voices that backed up their brexit agenda. Appalling journalism. 
Express piece quotes fishing reps but doesn't mention that value of Shetland's fish processing and aquaculture industries (under threat from Brexit) are almost three times that of catching fish - wonder why that is? 
#otd a year ago. Amazing how far we’ve come since then, right.... #Brexitshambles #Brexit  
SNP & SG are missing in action. Obsessed with foreign events, their own EU, Brexit & Indy plans in tatters. Scotland deserves better 
#MEPs vote against moving on to second phase of #Brexit talks in #EU Parliament.  They aren't interested in a fair deal - time to walk away! 
In a word, yes. Makes you all warm and hopeful for Brexit, doesn't it? 
Protestors throw referendum ballots at a rally in front of Spanish Partido Popular ruling party HQ in Barcelona today. @EmilioMorenatti 
Before I'd even noticed Shetland #Brexit piece was live, @Daily_Express had ripped the story off, selectively quoting for headline 'We want freedom!’ Shetland fishermen urge Remainer authorities stop seas being plundered 
Conservative MP @Anna_Soubry says Boris Johnson "consistently undermines what the Prime Minister" says on Brexit.  
"We have great concerns about Shetland’s future after Brexit" - I wrote this piece from Shetland on Brexit for @POLITICOEurope 
Catalans take part in general strike called after police crackdown during Sunday's independence referendum  
Anyone who thinks #Brexit is patriotic is the useful tool of a bunch of rich bastards who want a British tax haven.#StopBrexit 
Social media made Brexit and President Trump possible, Niall Ferguson says  
It was more centralisation, more socialisation, which led to the #Brexit referendum in the first place.  
#Brexit: not enough progress on citizens' rights, Northern Ireland and money, #EPlenary tells European Council  
Tories like Rees-Mogg rant patriotism to get themselves and their rich chums a #Brexit tax haven.They are deceiving the nation. #Remain 
Spain's Foreign Minister accuses media of "misconceptions" and exaggeration in reporting of Catalan referendum - and defends police response  
Davis is already planning to jump ship as #Brexit is such a complete disaster.  
Fake weddings and domino games where all used to trick police so people could vote in the Catalan referendum  
19/ Brexit discourse is angry and heated in general because there is so much on the line. Legacy, economic growth, sovereignty, etc. 
Strong European Parliament support for work of @EU_Commission + @MichelBarnier in Brexit negotiation. 557 votes for resolution, 92 against 
18/ Scream it to the skies: "I support Brexit" and "Brexit will be difficult to carry out" are perfectly compatible opinions. 
Jacob Rees-MoggConservative MP for North East Somerset#Brexit#Moggmentum 
Instead of putting citizens’ interests first, the UK government is putting Party interests above all. My plenary speech in #Brexit debate.  
WATCH: Catalonia shames the EU and no deal could be the best Brexit option - @AndrewRosindell. 
2/ It is because Brexit, the centrepiece of his life and career, is difficult enough to flop...and badly. If it does, he will be blamed. 
“Referendum crisis in N. Iraq is an attempt to drive a dagger through our region’s heart. It is not about the rights of the Kurdish people.” 
EU Parl Resolution says negotiations not progressed far enough to go to next stage. Sabotage campaign to delay, impede, & reverse Brexit 
And we were shocked that people voted Brexit? Clear this country has no idea what we're doing.  
The center of Barcelona was brought to a halt with protests today after the Catalan referendum crackdown  
Michael Fallon to announce £1 billion Navy boost for post-Brexit Britain  
What are we doing? Jobs & business leaving. No plan. All to leave a union of leading western nations that generates GB jobs & a hefty profit 
#BREAKING: 2 Kurdish parties called on Diaspora Kurds to protest in front of US embassies across EU to #SupportKurdistan referendum results.  
David Davis to retire just before Brexit so he can move to the Algarve 
.@M_AndersonSF speaks at EU Parliament meeting in Strasbourg, to see if sufficient progress had been made on Brexit talks.  
Those who say "of course" Brexit deal will not be vetoed by European Parliament overlook how often recent politics has been unpredictable. 
So a political (daft) vote but not insignificant. Parliament has veto on Brexit deal. Complacent to assume Parliament will nod it through. 
Inspired by Jacob Rees Mogg, which historical event does Brexit most resemble? Please share for objective sample 
MEPs vote to urge EU not to open next phase of #Brexit talks unless there is a "major breakthrough"  
UK construction industry into recession-fragile confidence amid uncertainty.#Brexit reality 
It takes a Catalan village: Parishioners sing to hide vote counting from Spain's military police during Sunday's referendum on independence.  
MEPs voted overwhelmingly today by 557 - 92 that sufficient progress has not been made in #brexit negotiations with the UK. #EPlenary Thread 
The @EUparliament has voted #Brexit talks should not move on to next stage as there has been no sufficient progress  
MEPs vote against moving on to second phase of Brexit talks in EU Parliament.They aren't interested in a fair deal - time to walk away! 
Strong support in European Parliament for the work of @MichelBarnier in Brexit negotiation. 557 votes in favour of resolution, 92 against  
557 MEPs vote to keep north of Ireland in custom union & single market after #Brexit; support growing in the Parliament for special status  
#Brexit is starting to hit the construction industry #StopBrexit @Conservatives @UKLabour 
MEPs have voted against moving on to the second phase of Brexit talks in a non-binding vote in the European Parliament 
'Look at me, Look at me' - Priti Patel, the queen of the bleedin' obvious; that's what Brexit is all about, a low tax, deregulated economy  
No deal is bad, bad deal is bad. Probability of good deal is bad. Brexit is bad, m'kay?  
UK construction in recession for first time since Brexit vote aftermath  
#BREAKING EU parliament says 'sufficient progress' not made in Brexit talks 
BREAKING - European Parliament overwhelmingly backs motion saying no 'sufficient progress' in Brexit talks - @AFP 
Actually, he says "we need to be reiterating the benefits of Brexit". And then fails to detail a single one. (Probably because none exist).  
Of course MEPS will vote against UK's BREXIT stance.  The EU does not want to negotiate! 
When @NicolaSturgeon's twitter goes silent, she has a real problem.#Catalonia grandstanding alienated #SNP from EU. #Brexit card busted.  
Oops. Non-EU countries at WTO saying that the Brexit process might be more complicated than UK thought...  
Work colleague: "fitting Rees-Mogg compared Brexit to Agincourt, England went into HYW holding half of France and ended up with just Calais" 
You cannot have a coherent & unified approach to implementing a mess of incompatible lies, delusions & fantasies.#Brexit #StopBrexit 
Labour conf was bad enough denying members a #Brexit vote, Tory one even worse denying them a voice. Only @libdems had #LDConf debate & vote 
If these studies showed positive effect of Brexit (or "no deal") on the UK economy, they would've been leaked immediately & reiterated daily  
Catalonians strike to protest referendum violence.  #Catalanreferendum #3Oct 
GBP Falls on Construction PMI Miss, Brexit Turmoil  
Serbian president accuses EU of hypocrisy & double standards following denouncement of Catalan #referendum  
And the 'no 2nd independence referendum' Perthshire Tory councillors are inflicting these cuts because of their chaotic Brexit referendum! 
After Sunday's referendum, Catalonia goes on a general strike.  
If you voted Tory in Perth & Kinross Council elections because you didn't want another referendumYou are an idiot 
Jeremy Hunt to 150,000 EU workers in health system: "We want you to stay" after #Brexit #CPC17 
The petition calling for a referendum to impeach UCD SU president Katie Ascough has been rejected.  
Both @AdamBoultonSKY & @JonSnowC4 have asked on their shows if Brexit is "Slipping Away." in the last 15 hours. 
#Brexit debate in #EPlenary quote from @M_AndersonSF for @GUENGL Download full statement in HD broadcast quality:  
“We’d rather the Tories got back in than work with you fucks, and we don’t give a shit if you hate Brexit, you’re coming with us anyway” pic.twitter.com/lon9QDPpU2 
Sack Boris Johnson for sake of Brexit talks, key MEP urges May  
Catalonia holds a general strike in protest over the police violence during Sunday's independence referendum:  
Scottish nats who talk about Bannockburn are rightly ridiculed. Here is an actual MP comparing Brexit to Agincourt.  
I called it a while back. Unless the Tories ditch May and replace her with someone who wants Brexit (I.e. the Mogg), Brexit ain't happening. 
Farage: Brexit negotiation charade cannot go on, we need a proper PM  
 #Live: Rudaw in Catalonia, huge rally condemning violence used against pro-independence referendum voters. #CatalanReferendum 
"We need to reiterate the benefits of brexit" *proceeds to wang on with a load of waffle about centuries old wars, mentions no benefits*  
"Serious divergencies" on Brexit remain between the EU and Britain, Michel Barnier says  
You can also try searching for the #o1 #oct1 #votarem #referendumcat #referendum #Catalunya #CatalanReferendum hashtags 
.@JunckerEU on #Brexit: The devil will be, as always, in the detail. But the taxpayers of the EU27 should not pay for the British decision.  
UK construction suffered a shock fall in September and Brexit was blamed  
He literally said Agincourt. He compared Brexit with Agincourt. You can't help these people. 
"We'll tell you what powers you will have after we've fallen off the Brexit cliff and splashed in the water. Be thankful."  
Dramatic: Woman ‘thrown down stairs, kicked’ by Spanish cops during #Catalonia #referendum  
And we have the one trick 'no to a second independence referendum' Tories in charge of this in Perthshire.  
This morning we have seen more Brexit bashing and bullying from the EU!   
EuroParl has decided to choose Conservative Party Conference week to debate Brexit. An unhelpful, non binding motion. EP not a negotiator 
. @TheGreenParty calling for ratification referendum when we can see where talks conclude  
Shame !BBC News "Catalonia referendum: Violence as police block voting"Hundreds (900) of people have been injured 
Very good article: Opinion | Why the Kurdish referendum is none of Turkey's business  
READ: 'Transition' period = Zombie Brexit. Half in, half out & delaying the opportunities Brexit presents. More - ? 
"Until now I can't say that we are ready to enter 2nd phase of negotiations"Pres @JunckerEU's full speech→  #Brexit  
Spain is facing a political crisis after Catalans voted in favor of independence in a contested referendum  
Boris Johnson is providing the leadership, colour and vision which was so desperately needed for Brexit.  
#Catalonia holds general strike in protest over referendum violence  
Cartoon Movement - Catalan Referendum #CatalanReferendum 
.@mrjamesob’s reaction to Michael Gove’s "pigs ear” Brexit claim is priceless  
UK construction suffers shock fall in September down to lowest levels since Brexit referendum  
Just made a speech in Euro Parl re Brexit negotiations, saying 'Mrs May is clueless, and has neither courage nor will to do it'. 
A Brexit heartland was among the only parts of Britain to lose jobs last year  
No Tories turned up to debate the #Brexit negotiations although the Parliament will vote on the final deal. UKIP MEPs left to represent HMG 
He lists two battles won in a war we then lost. Classic short-term thinking. Brexit will be a triumph, but then a catastrophe  
Catalans urged to strike to protest alleged brutality by police during referendum on region's secession from Spain.  
'@MichelBarnier should stop giving the impression he wants to punish UK by dictating them his roadmap & timetable.'@HansOlafHenkel #Brexit 
'It's time for @GuyVerhofstadt to stop his arrogant behaviour towards the British voters.' @HansOlafHenkel #Brexit 
Here's an interesting fact. As a "bad cop" whip in Major's government it was Brexit Secretary David Davis who forced Maastricht through HoC 
Good to hear Brexit update on negotiations from Junker & Barnier but also the views of MEPs @EUparliament 
.@HansOlafHenkel: It's the Junckers, the Merkels & the Verhofstadts with their 'more centralisation' mantra who are responsible for #Brexit 
-Tuesday: David Davis 'will retire and leave Brexit transition to Boris'  
Obesity kills 3m people a year.  Tate & Lyle should be 'in jail', not chucking cash at the Tories to buy Brexit #CPIC17 
Twitter didn't like me pointing out that they blocked the Catalan referendum from trending, so I'll be on this account from now on. 
UN demands investigation into police violence during 1st October referendum  
Swedish Liberal MEP ridicules Farage for leaving chamber as soon as his speech finished. Not willing to debate Brexit, just call names. 
So are millions of us. If UK Govt don't even know what #Brexit is then why are they doing it to us? 
.@JNicholsonMEP: #Brexit must not be used as a way of dividing up the United Kingdom. The European Parliament resolution is biased  
Last month I asked @DExEUgov to publish their Brexit impact studies. Govnt still trying to avoid scrutiny and bypass the public on Brexit  
Why did Bernard Henry Levy join the Kurdish referendum & ignore the Catalonian one? Isn't Barcelona closer to him than Erbil?  
Branson: "Brexit was the worst thing that's happened to Britain in my lifetime".You never tasted Virgin Cola then?  
Grassroots Tories tell ministers to stop squabbling over Brexit and bring back hanging  
A short-lived Brexit, in name only, may prove a price worth paying for the annihilation of the Conservative Party #ToryPartyConference 
Catalonia holds general strike in protest over referendum violence  
Jacob Rees Mogg attacks the BBC for anti-Brexit bias saying since ‘the referendum it has been absolutely appalling’  
Juncker fires WARNING SHOT to @theresa_may: Britain CANNOT go over Barnier's head in Brexit talks  
Solutions needed to deliver rights and protect from austerity, cuts and Brexit – O'Neill  @moneillsf 
Sadly it's the country and people without Davis's cash to cushion them from Brexit who're already being punished  
October 1 referendum results must be taken into account, says the international delegation  
This is very good by Clegg. A Brexit transition fails to dodge the perils of leaving the EU  
"Everybody can understand, Europe is not going to pay w/ 27 what has been committed by 28." @GuyVerhofstadt on Financial Settlement. #Brexit  
The main problem is Brexit. You cannot promote the impossible or defend the utterly irrational. They have to pull the plug. Now. 
I deplore that we haven't made greater progress, but let's demonstrate unity. Let’s massively support @Europarl_EN #Brexit resolution.  
I'm really worried about the lack of clarity & disunity on the other side of the negotiation table. #Brexit 
UKIP MEPs in the chamber in force for Europarl Brexit debate. Other UK MEP delegations, not so much. 
Here are 4 things to know about the Catalan referendum.  
That David Davis 'joke' about Johnson speaks volumes. Even he now concedes that being in charge of Brexit is a punishment. 
This is the real face of Tory #Brexit and the real Tory view of Scotland.......   
Painful to hear @GuyVerhofstadt describe Tory divisions and Brexit confusion so clearly. #BrexitShambles in global spotlight is humiliating 
 Independence referendum 25/9 #KurdistanBlockade measures  Iran closes borders  Kurdish airports shut down 
"Serious divergences remain on financial commitments. EU27 taxpayers mustn't foot bill for what was decided at 28"-@MichelBarnier #Brexit  
.There is NO RESET that will HIDE the damage of this Government's damaging BrexitThere is NO HIDING PLACENone. 
How long does this nonsense have to go on? The madness of Michael Gove’s Latest Brexit Claim - LBC @LBC 
The Catalan "illegal" referendum won the battle of truth. Now the Spanish government is struggling to impose the post-truth. #FactChecking 
Spotted this Missing poster in north London.  'Last seen 22nd June 2016.'   #brexit  
Labour’s willingness to let the Tories mess up Brexit is worrying. It won’t just damage the Tories, but Britain and workers’ futures. 
#Catalonia begins a nation wide general strike today after Spanish police brutality against its voters in Sunday's independence referendum. 
.@JunckerEU #Brexit #EPlenary "Financial obligations must be respected. The taxpayers of the #EU27 should not pay for the British decision." 
#DailMail Scotland is a country not a fiefdom of England nor WM, if we choose to have a referendum it is people's choice, we are sovereign 
May can't sack Johnson for fear she'll make a Brexit martyr; he can't quit for fear of MP backlash. Plan B? Hope he self destructs instead 
.@JunckerEU to MEPs: "Brexit is not our future. Notre avenir c'est l'Europe" #strasbourg 
Brexit: MEPs to criticise UK over approach to talks  
Don't try and go over @MichelBarnier's head in #Brexit talks, warns @JunckerEU at European Parliament 
Juncker starts his speech about Brexit to a largely empty Europarl chamber. 
.@JunckerEU #Brexit: "We first need to agree on the terms of the divorce and then we see if we can half-lovingly find each other again." 
The ludicrous Jeremy Hunt warns ministers "if they don’t pull in behind Theresa May then they are risking Brexit." But what's the downside? 
The Catalan independence referendum is a smokescreen for other issues  
Boris Johnson is told to "keep his bloody mouth shut" after going rogue on Brexit  
Theresa May asked if she agrees with Boris Johnson's #Brexit red lines. PM says cabinet focused on getting best deal  
Your daily Brexit reminder for #cpc2017 #CPC17 
Debate this morning in Strasbourg on #brexit. I’ll be speaking on Scotland and citizens’ rights. Tory UK still not being serious. 
Essential reading from @JananGanesh: Boris Johnson’s impatience over Brexit masks a fear of delay  via @FT 
Michael Gove says Brexit will boost exports of pigs' ears Jacob Rees Mogg says eat chlorinated chicken it’s great  
A big Japanese bank is among the first to sign a post-Brexit lease in Frankfurt, sources say  
By far the biggest risk factor to the UK economy is not Brexit but a Lab Govt with John McDonnell as Chancellor. Biz will admit this soon. 
Liam Fox slams the BBC over their anti-Brexit bias — and accuses them of only broadcasting negative stories  
Goodbye City of London. Just to remind everyone, the City accounts for more than 10% of the UK economy. @FT #Brexit  
These days, Richard Dawkins is more worried about Brexit than Islam, Sam Harris Trump, and the NSS racism. Brave New world. 
No one of sufficiently high calibre would have advocated Brexit in the first place 
Catalan referendum: Pro-Russian networks see 2,000% increase in activity in favor of Catalan referendum  
One of the many problems with brexit is that nobody of sufficiently high calibre to negotiate it advocated it.  
‘Double standard & hypocrisy’: Serbian president on EU denouncement of Catalan referendum  
Couldn't make it to up. Some Ministers seemingly inhabit an Alice in Wonderland through the looking-glass Brexit world  
Yes @marianorajoy I can promise you there was a referendum, one - thanks to your barbarism - that will finish Spain.  
Banning this #Catalonia illegal referendum should not be considered a restriction of political freedom.A governor of the US or the president of a regional council in Israel would be in jail by now had he pushed for such an illegal action. 
Never let a few lies stand in the way of a bit of Brexit Brussels bashing even if as a Minister of the Crown you should know better!  
What then is happening in #Catalonia?The secessionist regional minority government, with its well subsidized network of supremacist groups and associations, is the one pushing for an illegal referendum on independence. Catalonia has been led by a corrupt & radical elite see more: 
#Euro drops below $1.17 on pol uncertainty following German elections & Catalan referendum AND decent econ numbers from the US.  
Most of those opposed to independence probably stayed away from Catalonia's controversial referendum  
May wants a 'red white & blue' Brexit and now Gove wants a 'green' Brexit. In reality, Brexit will be brown. And smelly. 
Young voters reject the Tories because 'Brexit is as bad as Trump’s wall', Government minister warns Theresa May  
The Catalan independence referendum is a smokescreen for other issues  
The Catalan independence referendum is a much bigger issue for the EU than Brexit  
That feeling when someone is spot on: ”Boris Johnson’s impatience over Brexit masks a fear of delay” @JananGanesh 
Monarch: Brexit and the collapse of the pound was the final blow: Monarch’s fuel costs have risen by an estimated 16%. @guardian 
A Brexit transition fails to dodge the perils of leaving the EU  
If you’ve followed the Brexit debate, the dividing lines over Uber in London may look oddly familiar  
Catalonia referendum: Thousands protest Spanish police violence  
The Tories: ‘devoid of direction, policy or purpose, poisoned by Brexit’ @pollytoynbee 
Chief negotiator for Bougainville: #PNG PM O'Neill's views on referendum is “insensitive, provocative and dangerous.” 
Pique mulls quitting Spain's national team after backlash over the Catalonia referendum 
Catalans Defy Spanish Police to Vote in Independence Referendum  
Catalan referendum: Regional strike threatened after vote  
Spain is facing a political crisis after Catalans voted in favor of independence in a contested referendum  
#Catalonians revel after referendum: "We have voted!”  
Catalans expected to observe general strike to condemn police violence at banned weekend referendum on independence  
Pro-Russian networks see 2,000% increase in activity in favor of Catalan referendum - #Spain #Russia #EU #IW 
Spain's internet censorship during Catalonian referendum was completely unjustified  
Turkey and Iran, along with the central Iraqi government, opposed the Kurdish referendum process most vigorously.  
57.5% have already voted with weeks to go - Ireland referendum turnout was 60.52% #marriageequality 
The European Commission has not taken an official position on the independence referendum in Catalonia.  
The Yes side should not call a win yet. We all saw Trump win an unwinnable election & we saw Brexit go the unforeseen way. Vote Yes #auspol 
British politics is becoming more radical since Brexit  
No, Jacob. Brexit isn't Waterloo, Agincourt or Trafalgar. It's the Battle of Bouvines, Yorktown and Gallipoli.  
Everyone in Catalonia is going on strike after police violence at referendum  
Really? Then please name one practical, tangible benefit that Brexit will bring to our daily life.  
It's about time our MEPs stood up for themselves on Brexit  
Banks may be spending upwards of $500 million each on Brexit moving costs  
Please, please, please let common sense prevail! #StopBrexit 
Brexit: MEPs to criticise UK over approach to talks  
#UK: few hundred turn up to anti-#Brexit demo in #Manchester   #BBC #SKY #UK #TORY #LABOUR #EU #USA #NEWS #RT 
“I believe in freedom and respect for any language and culture”: Catalans vote in independence referendum  
One reason why Tories are so keen on Brexit. Nothing better than taking away our rights (e.g. Working directives) for their benefit ... 
why the Kurdish referendum is none of Turkey's business  
Brexit: the iron lady of conference? - clues that Mrs May is about to do something incredibly stupid ...  #Brexit.  
Barcelona referendum chaos had Israeli lawmaker dodging bullets  
Catalonia referendum: Barcelona residents react to poll, ensuing violence  
I can second that. At least 99.9% of civil servants, especially those who worked with Europe at some time , oppose Brexit! Just can't say so 
Sort of justifies having the referendum, don't you think?  
It annoys me so much that people aren’t allowed have their own view on the abortion referendum, it’s their choice, they’re allowed choose 
I am 32, so basically #brexit will cost me the rest of my working life! Great! This blue passport better be amazing!  
Thread on how, in part, Brexit brought down Monarch:  
Barcelona Mayor: Police sexually abused protesters in Catalan Referendum.  
Past week:- Iraqi Kurdistan referendum- Merkel wins German election- Catalonia referendum- Rohingya refugees reach half million- Marseilles terrorist attack: 2 killed- September deadliest month of 2017 in Syria: 955 civilians killed- Las Vegas shooting: 59 killed 
Brexit is summed up by twats sitting in front of vacuous toffs shouting "Don't forget Trafalgar m'lud" while furiously doffing their caps.  
What an amazing load of nonsense - Rees-Mogg can't offer a single reason for Brexit! Listen to his stuttering & rambling -  
Things that are blindingly obvious but seem to provoke “debate”:1. Allowing anyone to have a machine gun is a bad idea2. Brexit is crazy 
What Brexit is really about - “It is intellectually unsustainable to believe that workplace rights should remain untouchable.” (Liam Fox) 
.@davidfrum on what Canada can teach Spain following the Catalonia referendum:  
#Catalonia launches general strike over referendum crackdown  
Thank god for my Irish passport, I don't need to live amongst gun crazies, xenophobes or in a failed pre Brexit state. I'm off.#skypapers 
Arrived in Strasbourg - another busy & important week ahead - Standing up for you in the EU. Tomorrow #Brexit #Ireland #citizens #Catalonia 
October 1 referendum results must be taken into account, says the international delegation  #CatalanReferendum 
The idea that Barnier needs Brexit to work is laughable. Davis knows he's making a mess of it and his exit strategy is to run away.  
Exit for Brexit Secretary on the cards...? BoJo can deal with the transition, says Davis.   
My Washington Post piece on why Ankara’s anti-Kurdish stance after Kurdish referendum is a big strategic mistake  
'David Davis wants out by 2019.' So doesn't look as if Brexit department will even make it ... to Brexit! 
.@paufaus on Catalonia referendum crackdown: "The images that we saw yesterday are far beyond from what we expected"  
JK Rowling destroyed this awful Brexit metaphor  
Spain's Foreign Minister @AlfonsoDastisQ says if there was a second Catalan referendum it should take place in the whole country #newsnight 
Catalonia referendum(contains some violence) 
Someone else ignored the verdict of two million people in a referendum. I just can't out my finger on who....  
First Cameron, then Osborne, now Davis backing off when hasn't even negotiated Brexit yet! What does he know that we don't?  
Monarch: Brexit and lack of confidence in Tories partly to blame for airline's collapse, says - The Independent  
Brexit 'stupidest thing' Britain could do, says Neave Brown via @BDOnline  #RoyalGoldMedal 
Recull impressionant de la BBC...BBC News - Catalonia referendum: Violence as police block voting  
CBI should be ignored at all costs. Globalists and crony corporatists who seek to deny us Brexit.  
One more plug for first of two new #AnywhereButWestminster films: return to Brexit Britain  
Or age for that matter. I am a baby boomer and I say no Brexit.  
Imagine a government ignoring two millions votes in a referendum on independence.  
May is a zombie. So is brexit..... Make no mistake, brexit will fail. It is a matter of when, not if. RIP May. RIP Brexit. #Fightback 
Jacob Rees Mogg attacks the BBC for anti-Brexit bias saying since ‘the referendum it has been absolutely appalling’  
Ballot boxes hidden in church after referendum and counted during a staged Mass. #ViveLaResistance #CatalanReferendum Restores my faith. 
As predicted the Tories want #Brexit to undermine things like environmental protection, employment rights, building standards, food safety..  
..And now.......Over to David Davis for a Brexit update .. 
WE NOW GO LIVE TO BREXIT  
The performance out of him, you'd think he already had..... 
Organisations within the state are working against Brexit, including the Home Office, Treasury and BBC   
EXCLUSIVE David Davis 'plans to retire' as Brexit secretary when the UK leaves the EU in 2019  via @telegraphnews 
Boris Johnson’s impatience over Brexit masks a fear of delay: that "transition" may well morph into remain. 
#BBCNews blaming #BRexit for the Monarch collapse despite the CEO of Monarch saying it was the loss of their Egypt and Med markets. 
.@Jacob_Rees_Mogg extolls the benefits of #Brexit at one of the busiest fringe meetings of the @Conservatives' Party Conference. #CPC17  
JACOB REES-MOGG: Brexit "is such a positive thing for this country"   
BOOM: David Davis shares plan to quit in 2019 and pass the Brexit torch to Boris:  
Please RT if you love Jacob Rees Mogg! #Brexit  
The Catalan independence referendum is a much bigger issue for the EU than Brexit  
No matter your politics, faith, colour or gender, I stand with anyone who will fight Brexit. It is an injustice that will impact on us all. 
Why the Kurdish referendum is none of Turkey’s business 
After Brexit and Trump if @walkers_crisps gets rid of salt and vinegar in #chooseorlose I will lose all faith in human decision making 
Liam Fox blasts 'bizarre' BBC Brexit coverage  
We would ask, “Why ever would the EU give us an equally good deal in terms of market access after Brexit as we had as paying members?” 3/3  
The referendum’s cosmetic, Musharraf’s win is assured (GUEST COLUMN / by @ejazhaider | Apr 28, 2002 The Times of India) then there is this 
Deregulation means diminishing of workers rights, pension rights, sick pay, workers contracts....Tory Brexit always been about cheap labour.  
Of course, it suits Brexiters politically to push a narrative where spiteful Europeans are “punishing” Britain for Brexit but... 1/3  
The appalling attitude in Brussels towards Britain leaving the #EU has created such a toxic atmosphere of distrust that leaving is inevitable and reversing #Brexit impossible. 
The Truth About The Catalonia Independence Referendum 
Nearly two in three voters don’t approve of the way the government is handling the Brexit negotiations  
Young voters reject the Tories because 'Brexit is as bad as Trump’s wall', Government minister warns Theresa May  
.@JunckerEU You say "referendum was illegal". We know that. This was an act of civil disobedience. Violence shames #EU and #Spain#Catalonia 
Catalan leaders denounce referendum violence  
Watching this I can't help thinking: Thank God for Brexit.  
TONIGHT: We’ll be joined by Spain's Foreign Minister @AlfonsoDastisQ to discuss the Catalan referendum – 22:30 on BBC Two  
Catalonia's @AngladaMarti on why it was necessary to hold referendum despite the violence  #CatalanReferendum2017 @France24_en 
Peter Bone MP - “The only people who really think #Brexit should go 2 years are those people who are trying to keep us in the EU."  
On the way the government is handling the Brexit negotiationsApprove: 36% (-4)Disapprove: 64% (+4)via @ORB_Int 
.@Jacob_Rees_Mogg extolls the benefits of Brexit at one of the busiest fringe meetings of the @Conservatives' conference. #cpc17 
Brexit’ll take 5yrs & 5yrs to re-join. “Remain” & we save 100 Billion &10 yrs of unknowable chaos.  
The UN rejected the Catalan referendum while acknowledging Kosovo’s 2008 declaration of independence from Serbia. 
U.N. Human Rights Agency Calls For Probe Into Catalan Referendum Violence -  #OANN 
Brexit - advice from @jameschappers - ex Brexit Dept - lobby your MP on Art 127 - it could well stop it. 
Former Brexit Minister: Government Must Publish No Deal Plans  
If Spain leaves EU it kills Catalan nationalism. As I said in 2015 Brexit would destroy Scottish nationalism. It did 
"Cost of the Spanish police deployment to avoid the referendum in Catalonia has been €31,776,643.41."  
The longer #brexit is dragged out the less likely it is to happen. In other words, it gets worse.  
Brexit isn't gonna happen... Pass it on. 
Brexit is NOT going to be good for the NHS, contrary to what Boris told you... 
Virgin Richard Branson reveals Brexit has cost "tens of millions of pounds". Rubbish, terror threat is the reason!  
I don't think Brexit will happen because of article 127 of EEA hasn't been triggered I don't think there is a majority  @jameschappers 
People will be turning up in MPs surgeries with lost jobs due to Brexit @jameschappers 
'I want the BEST Brexit' @Jacob_Rees_Mogg cheered during EU exit rally at Tory conference 
UN demands investigation into police violence during 1st October referendum via @Elnacionalcaten 
It's "very possible" Brexit won't happen, ex-Deputy PM Michael Heseltine says  
Sounds like Dominic Grieve is one of the few Tories yet to leave Britain for the Brexit Fantasyland, current capital Manchester 
Mat on Breakfast or is it Brexit - political cartoon gallery in Putney  
In a Tory party torn apart by Brexit, the fever of schism burns | Polly Toynbee  
"Immigration minister says final version of new policy will not emerge until a few months before Brexit day"Why so late?  
Remainers saying Brexit was won on a lie The truth is there was more lies told by the remoaners then their was at a pinnochio convention 
I do respect the result of your gerrymandered EU referendum... Now I'd like an ungerrymandered one... 
Brexit must happen faster! Delay sparks fears of NO TRADE with new partners, expert warns  
Leaders Seek to Make Referendum Binding...  
Michael Gove has claimed that Britain will be able to export more unpierced pigs’ ears after #Brexit…This is priceless#NeverTrustaTory 
Davidson signals she would have sacked Johnson over Brexit outbursts  Ruth cant even sack her counciillors properly 
Read @CarlosDelclos on the Catalan referendum, Mariano Rajoy's irresponsible, cynical politics and Podemos  
It's "very possible" Brexit won't happen, ex-Deputy PM Michael Heseltine says  
More than 500 community members at an impromptu meeting in our square, to make sure Catalan referendum results are respected. #Gràcia 
A day after Catalan referendum, Barcelona defender Gerard Pique gets terrible reception as he comes out to train with Spain national team  
Had a political meeting with a Norwegian diplomatic delegation from Their Embassy in Iraq.Exchanged views on post referendum steps from Kurdistan based on readiness to start dialogue with Baghdad, deescalation & going forward .  
'Shocking scenes that I never thought I’d see in a mature European democracy'@AdamPrice on observing the referendum in #Catalonia 
Post-Brexit immigration white paper delayed until late autumn  Perhaps they can't agree how mean to be to foreigners 
Brexit and lack of confidence in Tories partly to blame for Monarch's collapse, says @VinceCable 
New report shows a Hard Brexit could likely cost British industries £17bn: 
Tories say collapse of Monarch nothing to with Brexit but something to do with falling £ [which of course has nothing to do with Brexit!] 
what's happening in post Kurdistan referendum? @amberinzaman gives important analysis on Turkish & Iran machinations  
Noticed how the media differentiates between anti-Austerity and anti-Brexit voters?As if it's not possible to be anti BOTH !!! 
#Jacob4PM laid into the BBC, whose coverage since the referendum he labelled “absolutely appalling” 
"I firmly believe in the peace process"Fragile peace a year after FARC referendum in Colombia  
EU scrutinised on REFUSAL to criticise Spain over Catalonia, yet Brussels shows contempt for lawful Brexit vote.  
.@sinnfeinireland Belfast councillors have stood for protest at tonight's monthly council meeting over repression of Catalan referendum  
I wonder how many of the 100,000 + Monarch Airlines passengers stranded abroad voted for Brexit? 
We declared war on Germany, assembled alliance, fought global campaigns, secured victory in a shorter time than #Brexit! @theresa_may???? 
Tory MP Dominic Grieve on Brexit: "Can you have a revolution without victims?" Answer: No. 
How many companies failing due to Brexit will be acceptable collateral damage? Any Brexiter want to explain to these devastated workers?  
It's all the predictable remain MP's calling for Boris to resign. They will never forgive him for delivering #Brexit to Britain 
What is the true meaning of May's Brexit transition? I didn't know; I do now  
Jacob Rees Mogg attacks the BBC for anti-Brexit bias saying since ‘the referendum it has been absolutely appalling’  
Dominic Grieve says the U.K. does 70% of business bank lending in Europe, British Banking Association estimate that falls to 40% post-Brexit 
Brexit is as toxic to young people as Trump's wall, minister warns Theresa May  
Men should not be allowed to vote in this upcoming abortion referendum. It is not their bodies 
Tory MP @LiamFox says EU will 'harm its own people' by failing to start post-Brexit trade talks  
How did you vote in the referendum? 
IEA director Mark Littlewood says he voted for Brexit because it's an "opportunity for substantial deregulation". Patel: "absolutely right". 
Why is anyone listening to this guy? Border controls are entailed by the Brexit policy he supports, yet he talks of them as an EU imposition  
 "...but the referendum was illegal," is a fundamentally right-wing authoritarian stance. This is the preferred position of unionists. 
Bone: Those who want 2 year Brexit transition are trying to keep UK inside EU  
Andrea Leadsom says UK will take back control of "money, borders and laws" during Brexit transition period. Not under current plans... 
Britain should refuse to set up Irish border posts after Brexit, Jacob Rees-Mogg says  
BREAKING: Catalan Parliament will discuss the consequences of the referendum and possibly declare independence later this week. 
Falling wages, unaffordable housing, doubling the debt and Brexit... they already have.  
'We're taking back control!' @michaelgove blasts Brexit bashers for DISREGARDING leave voters  
."Our NHS is on its knees.But far from offering a helping hand, Brexit threatens to bring it down altogether." 
#StopBrexitNow! Super #EU Heroes are here to save #britian from this #brexit disaster!  @acgrayling a hero who doesn't need a costume! 
Former Brexit minister calls on government to publish no deal plans. @LeaveMnsLeave event this evening: 
Former Brexit Minister: Government Must Publish No Deal Plans  
#Violence can never be an instrument in #politics, says @EU_Commission maintaining that #referendum was illegal  . 
Speaking at the @CER_EU fringe event about the opportunities of Brexit, thanks to @CER_Grant for organising!  #CPC17 
Great reception @LeaveMnsLeave's "The Threat to Brexit" event @Conservatives #CPC17 with @jacob_rees_mogg @LiamHalligan & @DavidJonesMP 
Spanish Police Injure 800 in Crackdown on Catalonia Independence Referendum as Crisis Escalates  #CatalanReferendum 
Positioning for Brexit, France asks finance industry where it can simplify rules  
Brexit must happen faster! Delay sparks fears of NO TRADE with new partners, expert warns  
Why no Brexit deal would cost the UK far more than the EU (via @CER_EU). 
Given that Michael Gove was lying when he used fishing to push for Brexit I think he should keep quiet, to be honest  
In 2019, you can add London to the European regions fighting for independence. Brexit is not the will of our people. 
Mass protests against police violence during the #Catalan referendum hit #Barcelona 
The EU thought the Brexit referendum was a mistake. Catalonia has shown that squashing a vote could be even worse  
Catalan referendum: Statement by the Communist Party of #Greece (KKE)  #CatalanReferendum #Spain #Catalonia #1OctARV 
Ex Brexit minister David Jones hugely impressive at #LeaveMeansLeave event. The PM should bring him back into government 
Catalonia independence referendum: EU urges Madrid to avoid more force  
With austerity, staff shortages & low morale, our NHS is on its knees. Brexit threatens to bring it down altogether  
Don't worry, Brexit BritainInnovative pig ear flavoured jam will save you! 
Mogg: the BBC has been "absolutely appalling" since the referendum 
NEW: @JunckerEU and @MichelBarnier will join plenary debate in EU Parliament tomorrow morning on #Brexit. Resolution vote follows 11am. 
Sorry to see Monarch go into administration. Brexit among reasons for sad loss of 50-year-old airline  #readbyrichard 
Catalan leaders think Spain may have helped their referendum by cracking down hard on it.  
And while I'm no fan of Brexit, the EU's response to the Catalonian situation has really given Brexiteers lots of ammo. 
Imagine if the EU had in its Constitution a stipulation that no member state could ever legally hold a referendum to leave. 
Rees-Mogg typically lashing out at anyone with actual understanding of Brexit, but has precisely no workable ideas himself.  
The government IS preparing for WTO rules after Brexit, confirms former Brexit minister David Jones + calls on govt to reveal those plans 
Undermining Catalonia’s referendum is a threat to democracy  
Did Gove not consider it unwise to mention Brexit and pigs' ears in the same breath?  
What should happen to Scotland? #ref2 #SNP #scottish #brexit RETWEET & VOTE #yourvoice 
"The EU should have taken a role much earlier in Catalonian referendum issue" 
What happens when EUflagmafia get in to the Tory party conference. Rees mogg's place stickered with 'bollocks to brexit' sticker. X  
Awe, shame - my heart bleeds  : Richard Branson reveals Brexit has cost "tens of millions of pounds"  via @CityAM 
Mogg also names Home Office as a threat to Brexit. Says it is in civil servants' interests to delay Brexit and border controls. 
"I am very suspicious of Her Majesty's Treasury" says @Jacob_Rees_Mogg who says their "dishonest" approach to Brexit "besmirched" reputation 
Mogg warns "organisations within the state" are working against Brexit. "I am very suspicious of Her Majesty's Treasury" 
This is wrong. We weren’t protesting the Tories, or Labour or austerity. We were protesting Brexit. 30 thousand of us. @BBCNews 
After Brexit, the EU wants no more division. It won't recognize Catalonia, but is uncomfortable with the crackdown.  
EP plenary will debate Catalunyan referendum and excessive police violence on Wednesday afternoon. Finally, majority supports Greens demand 
Hard to square the weak results of background check initiatives with polls showing near universal popularity. Can't blame enthusiasm/turnout in general election referendum, either.  
We should be suspicious, says @Jacob_Rees_Mogg , warning of efforts to derail Brexit #LeaveMeansLeave #CPC17 
Generation Brexit ...  
Catalonia declares landslide win in independence referendum marred by violence  
I wish everyone fretting about #Brexit would pay more attention to #4IR #technology is gonna bring a massive change to our economy/country 
Gideon Rachman: In the end, Spain may have to concede an independence referendum for Catalonia  
VIDEO: Barcelona's Gerard Pique threatens to retire from Spanish national side over referendum.  
"They saved the ballot boxes from the Escola Industrial by throwing them out a window." #CatalanIngenuity#referendum  
This ballot was in a ballot box. It reads "This referendum is illegitimate but I won't stay at home while they beat people up in my town."  
Big turnout @LeaveMnsLeave Mogg 'Threat to Brexit' event: David Davis, Stewart Jackson, Steve Baker, OPatz, David Jones, Cash, Bone 
FC Barcelona to go on strike over #CatalonianIndependence referendum violence  
New figures show British exports are being helped by the weaker pound, triggered by last year's Brexit vote  
The "yes" vote won in Catalonia's referendum. Could an independent Catalonia be under way?  
The #Leave option was a catch-all slogan which covered a huge mess of incompatible and mostly completely unworkable proposals.#Brexit /1 
Brexit could destroy the NHS?  I did not know this.€3.5bn supplied by the European Investment Bank to the NHS since 2001  
#Brexit was a stupid, doomed referendum designed only to split the country, cause chaos in the EU & further the aims of #Putin. It worked. 
1. Another cornerstone of Toryboy #Brexit folly is the assumption that the world has been in stasis for thirty years. 
I don’t want an image of Corbyn sans woolly niceties in my head, but he is saying the same as the Tories. Brexit means Brexit after all.  
'Stop delaying Brexit' Boris Johnson urges swift end to two-year transition deal  
This, just published by @DExEUgov at #CPC17 At last, some clarity around #Brexit  
Ruth Davidson suggests she would have sacked Boris Johnson over Brexit articles - Politics live  
Overheard at #CON17 fringe event on post-#Brexit environment policy. #poorlittleduke 
Spanish police damaged 314.000€ worth of material during their actions 1OCT. That's 1/3 MORE than the cost of the referendum itself#smart 
From Puerto Rico to Vegas to the Catalonian Referendum. My heart is just constantly heavy right now. All love to everyone involved. 
The Catalonia referendum overwhelmingly passed. Here's what it means well beyond Spanish borders. 
“When Tony Blair or Vince Cable tell us that the referendum decision to leave the EU must be overturned... then I feel it’s time to stand up for something precious, something special to us all, something that defines us a nation,” says @michaelgove at #CPC17 
He's right & Chris Grayling is in denial.@vincecable says Brexit & the Govt partly to blame for Monarch's collapse.  
Why I am saying this. Well today is the first overdue day of Russian Sanctions, as well as the recent Catalonia referendum...2/ 
Just spoke to a Tory candidate who said the anti-Brexit protesters were among the nicest people he's met at conference so far!  
Referendum was not illegal from the moment Government said "this is no longer a referendum" and that they were not gonna prevent a "picnic". 
Catalonia's government has held its independence referendum. So, what happens now?  
Sir Vince Cable says Brexit and the Government are partly to blame for Monarch's collapse  
Catalan referendum: Spain region 'not seeking traumatic split'  
Five conclusions from the Catalonia independence referendum on Sunday  
Tories - like Labour - seem oblivious to the fact they're playing politics with people's jobs and lives with their Brexit parlour games. 
Monarch airline goes bust citing the post-Brexit vote fall in the £ as major factor. Any leavers questioning their decision? #BrexitShambles 
Catalan referendum: Catalonia has 'won right to statehood' where is Putin and Cambridge Analytica is all this?  
Landslide victory for Independence in democratic Catalonia's referendum in spite of Spain's violence  
it seems #michaelgove is still trying to make a sow's purse out of the pig's ear Brexit gave us. #cpc17 
What next for Catalonia after police violence mars independence referendum?  Newsweek 
Brunswick hiring ex-EU official as chair of EU public affairs clearly illustrates EU #revolvingdoors problem #Brexit  
The future of trade post Brexit is PIGS EARS. I mean. I MEAN. A pigs EAR. As in slang for a TOTAL MESS  
Seeing videos and images from the police brutality in Spain during the Catalan referendum. Seriously, the uniform corrupts the soul. 
Jacob Rees-Mogg says Brexit deal could take decades if the Government drag their feet   
Michael Gove and the Tories have failed to offer clarity for our agriculture and fishing industries post-Brexit. #CPC17 #failingthemany 
Britain sinks from top to bottom of G7 growth table. Very sadly this is just the start of Brexit pain  #readbyrichard 
The referendum severed us from our continental siblings, our collective heritages -  
It is curious that the British media has mainly ignored the anti-Brexit march in Manchester yesterday.And they wonder why the trust is gone.  
Catalonia's independence referendum: What just happened?  
Michael Gove: "Leaving the EU gives us the chance to secure a special prize - a Green Brexit" #cpc17 
Brexit could destroy the NHS. This will hurt us all | Jonathan Lis  
1 Russia had a legal military presence in Crimea (since 1783)2 These are not referendum photos 3 You want the whole truth about 'Maidan'?.  
So Nigel, should the EU interfere in the affairs of a sovereign state? #Brexit  
"Chanting ‘bollocks to Brexit’ thousands of campaigners and activists descended on the streets"... yup.  
Just what is Boris Johnson up to? Casting himself as the real Brexit bulldog? My @ft thoughts from #cpc17  
Yes @Channel4News 100s of anti-Brexit protesters turned up & 100s more. How many 100s make 30,000? When does distortion become misreporting? 
Lots of us, pensioners, know we are #BetterTogether. And the truth about Brexit is being revealed. #BrexitCanBeStopped 
Man unelected by party members & unelected by the ppl says IrishGovt will not recognise result of Catalan referendum  
Catalonia referendum marred by violence.The Daily Brief: 
DailyFX Morning Digest: Euro Lower after Catalonian Referendum Results  
There's always several reasons for a business failing, but Monarch looks like first to include Brexit as reason.We need to #exitfrombrexit 
"Half of voters believe Mr Johnson’s views on Brexit are mainly motivated by his personal political interests” - our poll in @standardnews 
One of Barcelona's star players, Catalan Gerard Pique, may stop playing for Spain amid protests over the referendum result  
There cannot be a legitimate referendum on Catalan independence unless all Spaniards first agree to amend the current 1978 Constitution.  
'@BrugesGroup Brexit event has just finished, 57,000 views already. If you missed it catch up here:  
The EU thought the Brexit referendum was a mistake. Catalonia has shown that squashing a vote could be even worse  
After 100,000 leave voters are left stranded by the collapse of Monarch. Boris promises to send out his Brexit bus to bring them all home. 
Spot on. From Brexit to Catalonia: the silencing of citizens’ voices  
It's @JananGanesh on Boris Johnson's opposition to Brexit limbo  
We might want tougher response from EU but that still doesn't make them directly culpable. Anyway no Brexit can demand it w a straight face. 
Attendee at Rees-Mogg Brexit event says we must "climb out of the European ditch and into the sunlit uplands" 
#CPC17: @Jacob_Rees_Mogg urges "generous, tough, conservative" Brexit.  
"#Brexit uncertainty contributed to #Monarch collapse" #brexitbankruptcy A look behind the headline:  
Catalans in Ireland to protest against referendum violence  
'Ridiculous' Lib Dem leader Cable slammed for trying to blame Monarch collapse on Brexit  
An architect friend has lost his job TWICE since the Brexit vote - both practices folded as investors pulled out. He's off to Germany now 
.@f_grovewhite – Ministers are making a pig’s ear of Brexit  
@Jacob_Rees_Mogg We are leaving the European Union & soft Brexit means staying in the European Union 
Top-ranking European politicians turned their backs on Theresa May's big Brexit speech.  
Sunday's events have made a proper Catalan independence referendum more likely, argues @gideonrachman 
We should be generous, tough and conservative to get the best Brexit, says @Jacob_Rees_Mogg at the @BrugesGroup fringe event 
Chairman of Brexit fringe event introduces Rees-Mogg by crying, "Jacob - speak for England!" Mogg: "I must speak for the United Kingdom" 
By numbers: Catalonia's explosive independence referendum.  
Today at Commission, chief spokesman says Catalan referendum was not legal  
Michael Gove is talking about pigs' ears and Brexit. The material is enough. There is no snark value to be added.  
Our @sdonnan on why Boeing-Bombardier fight is not about Trump or Brexit. Trade law is like this all the time, folks  
I'm detecting enormous hostility to Boris Johnson at the Tory Party conference, across the political/Brexit divide 
Sufficient progress #Brexit negotiations has not been achieved. We ask @EUCouncil to determine that @ next meeting 
Sally McNair:"The independence referendum in Catalonia is illegal!!!!!!!"Scream the unionist BBCNot it's not SallyIt's legal  
Irony - many of Monarch's elderly clientele were Brexit voters. Brexit caused the related crash in the £ shoved #Monarch under. #BrexitRef2 
Referendum results #In2minutes:YES: 90.09%NO: 7.87%Null votes: 0.89%Blank votes: 2.03% #infographic 
Brexit is a clear and present danger to prosperity. The Tory party has lost all credibility on this issue.  
Just heard Michael Fallon on #wato - said everything is fine with govt, full support & agreement in cabinet & Brexit is going great. Phew! 
#UPDATE Spain vows to stop Catalonia from declaring independence after a banned referendum  
Remoaners blaming #Brexit for #Monarch collapse. Big yawn. Not only had it nothing to do with Brexit, it had #NothingToDoWithIslam either.  
The @EU_Commission today called the #CatalanReferendum "illegal" and warned that a "legal" referendum would put Catalonia outside the EU.  
If you still believe Brexit won't affect your life, read this quote from a woman who just lost her job because of it.  
Safe to say Brexit hastened its demise. All round, Brexit will make companies far more vulnerable to pressures they might otherwise survive. 
‘Job-destroying hard Brexit’ or ‘Job-destroying soft Brexit’ seem to be only things on table. How about ‘Non-job-destroying Remain in EU’?  
Leave and Remain voters united over refusal to pay Brexit bill  
This letter writer says that Nicola Sturgeon’s approach to Brexit negotiations is to “weaken the pan-UK approach”.  
Those who say "it was an illegal referendum" why don't you say how to make it legal?And please, don't tell me dialog, we've already tried it 
Was Brexit responsible for the Monarch Airlines bankrupcy?Yes, in part.Here are some quotes ☟  
#TheresaMay 's  falsehoods & fantasies on #brexit are designed only to keep #Conservatives together says Will Hutton 
Michael Gove says Britain will be able to export more pigs’ ears after Brexit… @mrjamesob’s reaction is priceless  
UN commissioner calls for investigation into #Catalonia referendum violence  
Corbyn & May - so long as they both back Brexit - are like two one-legged individuals in an arse-kicking competition struggling to get ahead 
Tory party conference thinking on #Brexit: much talk about being loyal to the cause of #Brexit,but no speakers can come up with any benefits 
"The #Brexit myth that we 'stood alone' during the Blitz is just garbage." Actual history from @almurray on new ep. 
The young people I've met here will carry yesterday's events with them forever, and tell their children about them. I get the feeling the referendum has changed everything. I don't believe it of Scotland but do of Catalonia: independence is now inevitable. 
The EU has declared the Catalan referendum results not valid because it violates the Spanish constitution. 
Very correct @mamur, in the case of #Biafra, British govt are yet to condemn Nigerian army killings of Biafrans agitating for referendum. 
Michael Gove literally making a pig's ear of Brexit  
International observers denounce Spanish state for using "force" against referendum 
"There was no independence referendum in Catalonia" says Spanish PM @marianorajoy as nearly 900 people were injured in yesterday's violence. 
Brexit fringe event coming up. Beside Jacob Rees-Mogg: a framed photograph of Margaret Thatcher  
Catalonia Independence Referendum presentation coming up. 
Me listening to @mrjamesob on @LBC: More pigs’ ears for export after Brexit, says Michael Gove.  
The Catalan leader said he'll present the results of the referendum to the regional Parliament to make them binding  
UN calls for investigation into Catalonia referendum violence #1o 
'The scenes here should outrage us'@Plaid_Cymru AM @AdamPrice was observing the referendum in #Catalonia 
Scottish independence has "gone away" according to the PM. In the same way that Catalonia didn't have an independence referendum yesterday? 
So it's an internal matter when the cap fits thus relinquished responsibility. So why is @GuyVerhofstadt interfering with the Brexit verdict  
The Tory wars were inevitable the moment the government tried to turn #Brexit lies and fantasies into reality. Only Remainers are united!  
All former prime ministers living in the UK are against Brexit. Maybe they should also come together to share a stage like this?  
Gloomy Hammond Falls Flat- attacks Boris / Fox- talks up "difficulties" of Brexit- stay "closely linked" to EU 
Most people who voted Brexit will be compost before the negotiations are finished  why bother leaving 
Joke of the day: Pakistan is against Kurdistan Referendum and we don't know "why?" 
Not ‘supporters’ - they were trying to VOTE in a referendum.  
Catalan leaders think Spain may have helped their referendum by cracking down hard on it.  
Sad day for #Vegas today but here's some pics from #Manchester yesterday, was a great day in a great city #Brexit #StopBrexit #Remain  
It's clear: Govt must reject a hard & destructive Brexit, and keep British membership of the Single Market. Pls RT:  
Catalonia independence referendum: What happens in Spain now?  
We just spoke to the one and only Jim Davidson at #CPC17 about Britain's veterans, Brexit and more. Watch here:  
Government estimates show hard Brexit would cause severe damage to UK economy for a generation. May must listen 
Hammond says UK needs to tackle stagnating wages, but his government is committed to a hard Brexit that is already hitting living standards 
Current measures in place against #Kurdistan for holding an independence referendum: Iran closes borders  Airports shut down  
Catalonia is going on strike to protest police violence at referendum  
"The #referendum is valid, despite the fear that was inflicted by the police who acted acted across Catalonia" 
Which Brexit plan do YOU prefer?  
'@b_hq: David Davis or Jacob Rees-Mogg could lead a Brexit government. #CPC17 
Hammond hasn't mentioned Brexit yet. No surprise: hard to defend capitalism when UK is leaving EU single market. 
Former soldier of 22 years service, horrified at what Brexit is doing to my country. #StopBrexit 
The good thing about the troubles at #monarchairlines and #ryanair is that we'll not miss Europe post brexit if we can't get there anymore 
wake me up when referendum ends 
Irony alert. Hammond says jobs, economy too important "to be put at risk for an ideological experiment." #Brexit 
Looking forward to speaking later about the future of political journalism, Brexit, what next for Tories and more  
You think Brexit is a risk for EU? You just betrayed the very rights EU boasts. Yesterday Rajoy betrayed Catalans, today you're betraying us 
'The scenes here should outrage us'@Plaid_Cymru AM @AdamPrice was observing the referendum in #Catalonia 
United Ireland Confirmed After Gerry Adams Holds Referendum In His House  
After Brexit, the rest of the EU will soon run out of German money to spend  
New film from #AnywhereButWestminster: Brexit, Tories, Manchester... and the Latvian & Italian people left in limbo  
The Catalonia referendum. More in our newsroom:  
"We are ashamed." Employees of a Spanish TV channel are protesting how the referendum was covered by their channel.  
11. Brexit has also shown how utterly useless parliament is as a safeguard against silent coups like this. People don't have a voice. 
7. Brexit has shone a light on Westminster. The incompetence we see is not something instigated by Brexit. It is institutionalised. 
Yep. If you voted for Brexit you did this. You. Did. This.  
Gd to see lovely & gt MP @annietre Anne-Marie Trevelyan at conference. Many MPs determined to see fishing Brexit realised for communities  
First Brexiters complain that the EU intrudes on national sovereignty, then they shriek when it doesn't. Total Fuckwits!#Brexit  
Spanish Stocks, Bonds, Euro Sink After Catalan Referendum Fiasco; S&P Futures Rise   
Catalan leaders are working to turn their independence referendum into reality  
Referendums are now effectively banned in the EU. The UK will be the last country to have a referendum that is legally recognised by the EU. 
Gove proclaims Brexit good news:'Exports of pigs' ears will be boosted. They're delicacy in China.'#scrapingbarrel 
FAIL: 'Hundreds' turn up to anti-Brexit protest to overturn will of 17.4 million. Point well made...  
Where are EU? #CatalanRederendum #referendumCAT #Referendum  
Neus Català, 102 years old, survivor of Nazi camp, voted in the Catalan referendum.  
How the Catalan independence referendum has affected Barcelona  
"trust"?This is your response, after the events of yesterday, is morally reprehensible, pathetic, shameful.After #Brexit, REALLY?#Catalonia 
The EU Commission just said the Catalan referendum was illegal  
BREAKING: Catalonia referendum: European Commission calls on all sides in Spain to move 'swiftly from confrontation to dialogue.' 
The EU Commission has said the Catalan referendum was not legal and has urged all parties to "move swiftly from confrontation to dialogue" 
So that's all right then ? 800 people injured ! Riot police & plastic bullets used in a referendum ? Appalling ! Franco's ghost ! 
#Pakistan concerned over #Kurd independence referendum, backs #Iraq’s unityRead more:  
UPDATE: EU Commission says Catalan referendum was not legal and the issue is an internal matter for Spain. - @ReutersWorld 
More and more people filling our square for the short #stoppage #aturada today. Tomorrow all day. #gracia#Catalonia #Referendum  
Spain's justice minister praises the security force for "measured" response after referendum  
'Brexit must happen faster! Delay sparks fears of NO TRADE with new partners, expert warns 
Legal position: If referendum were to be organised in line with the  Spanish Const. = territory leaving would find itself outside of EU. 
Elderly Catalan referendum voter resting after (according to the Spanish PM) being treated with dignity by the riot police.....apparently.  
After the Catalan referendum: what happens next?  
Catalonia government says 893 injured in clashes during banned referendum  
Statement by the International Parliamentary Delegation on #Catalonia’s Referendum on Self-Determination 1oct2017  
The government's refusal to admit publicly that brexit will be damaging is very reminiscent of the USSR faking tractor production stats. 
Just what Putin wants: Troubling times for EU. Catalonia, alt right in Germany, Brexit. Leave is madness. We must Remain & work within it. 
"People who voted Brexit are from older generation" Really? Tell that to my 28 & 32yr old sons.  
.@anna_arque "Spain could not avoid the referendum. The declaration of independence is inevitable. We've won. Visca Catalunya!" #1oct 
When politicians enter government, do they swear an oath to never tell whole truth?Truth: any Brexit is a disaster 
Things to happen since Berahino scored.BrexitTrump electedLeicester win Premier LeagueWeek's football in stats  
Catalan Independence Referendum Violence | Polandball’s Countryballs  countryballs, polandball, countryball, HathMe… 
EU leaders STILL silent on Catalonia referendum violence which left 850 voters injured  
Catalonia referendum: region holds emergency meeting after tumultuous poll  
Good coverage by The Independent of the anti-Brexit march in Manchester. A great event and there'll be more!   
Hard Brexit entails three decades of damage to UK economy, according to internal govt estimate   
Brexit: Business would prefer it was just abandoned Philip. But you know that.  
Every Remain voter, every Regretter, every person too young to vote in June '16 needs to know how fragile Brexit has become  
#Catalonia update: 893 injured in referendum clashes with Spanish cops  
Heseltine is against Brexit. Why has he never mentioned this before?  
TLDR: Supply chains are fragile, medicines are at risk, I'm not going to die for your fucking Brexit. /6 
Monarch collapse impacts 860,000 customers.Wonder how many voted #Brexit, which crashed pound and ruined Monarch? 
May insists the Cabinet are united on Brexit.  
Virgin entrepreneur Richard Branson reveals Brexit has cost "tens of millions of pounds" 
So back from Italy & questioned about my residency by UK Border - first time this happened in 25 yrs using my  passport. Brexit in action. 
Hundreds of anti-Brexit protesters turn up at the @Conservatives' conference in Manchester. #cpc17 
Catalonia declares landslide win in independence referendum marred by violence  
Vince Cable cites Brexit uncertainty and fall in £ for collapse of  @Monarch 
This is a must-read for anyone remotely interested in Brexit.  
893 people now injured in Catalan referendum violence  
#ConservativePartyConference #CPC17 #cpc2017 An amusing but accurate description of the two main  #Conservative  factions on #brexit :  
UPDATE: 893 people people injured during the police attacks in yesterday's Catalan referendum, according to the Catalonia's health department  
This is an important point - many Remainers out there offline who think Brexit is inevitable need to know it *can* be stopped.  
Will hear lots of 'nobody said Brexit would be easy' comments over coming years. When it happens remind them of this  
Without any reservations I condemn the violence against peaceful voters in the Catalan referendum. 
#Monarch CEO predicted Brexit price rises in May.Uncertainty around Brexit stopped investors saving Monarch today. 
As more evidence of damage from brexit Sunderland Echo readers completely changed their minds. #BrexitRef2 #stopbrexit 
Catalonia government says 893 people were injured in clashes during the region's independence referendum 
Poll: Should the Irish government criticise the intervention of Spanish police in Catalonia's referendum  
Ripples from Catalan referendum could extend beyond Spain 
MOGG: 'No Deal' means we pay EU not a brass farthing. Brexit bill of £0 sounds good!  
Ryanair cancellations, fighting cybercrime, Brexit, safety at sea on #EPlenary. Watch live  
Catalan independence referendum: Region votes overwhelmingly for secession from Spain  
Wolfgang Tillman's Anti-Brexit poster campaign with a poetic touch to exhibit at #BeazleyDesignsoftheYear | See more  
Strange to see so many people who think Crimea's 2014 referendum was a sham supporting the Catalan vote this morning. 
Flash (1): market value of Catalan govt bonds UP after referendum (interest rate down) showing INCREASED confidence in Catalonia! 
Given how much grief I’ve got for accepting the referendum result, this is pretty amusing  
Smack in the middle:"SAVE SCIENCE KILL BREXIT"Fantastic march. Huge thanks to all organisers,marshalls and GM Police #StopBrexitManchester 
#Spain's risk premium continues to rise as Catalan referendum could trigger snap elections in Spain. Ruling PP governing on minority admin.  
A brutal takedown of the government and Brexit by the great @acgrayling  
Now you understand why @MBuhari tag peaceful Christian/Jewish #IPOB terrorist,just because they call for Referendum but we're resolute. @UN 
No Boris. Police brutality is not ok and condemning it is not difficult, regardless of the legality of the referendum.  
Brexit must happen faster! Delay sparks fears of NO TRADE with new partners, expert warns  
The @britishchambers are right - the incompetent handling of #Brexit by the Government is harming the economy.  
Remember: the Uber Unionists claim a Scottish referendum without Westminster agreement would be "illegal". 
Catalan referendum: 'Police threw us aside … and more vanloads arrived'  
"Hey, let's set up a Twitter account to stop Brexit. What will we call it?"   
90% of #Catalans who voted in the referendum on Sunday are in support of #independence. But violence broke out as police clashed with voters 
'No going back: Catalonia and Spain's relationship is broken'. My article for @RTEBrainstorm on the referendum:  
The Spanish Prime Minister said there was "no referendum" in Catalonia yesterday and police acted "serenely" #catalanreferendum 
'@ZacGoldsmith slams "insane" comment from EU figure who claimed Catalan referendum was "coup against Europe".  
Liam Fox promises he will easily sign 40 free trade deals "the second after" Brexit.  
People across the political spectrum against this #Brexit madness. Not just "lefties" like tabloid rags say. #StopBrexitManchester 
Photos highlight huge differences between EU-Catalonia referendum and Russia-Crimea referendum -  
Tory: How do we get some headlines that don't mention our actual policies?Mundell: Let's urge the SNP again to not a hold a referendum.  
My advice to Corbyn: you're not going to be able to help anyone until you first call a halt to the national act of self harm that is Brexit. 
Monarch Airlines is a victim of Brexit, which caused the collapse of the pound. How many of the hundreds of thousands affected voted Leave? 
Why Boris is worried Exc: UK officials believe May "leaning" to convergence model (within parameters) post Brexit.  
After hearing from range of experts, @UKandEU Citizens’ Assembly on Brexit backed free movement & single market membership  
Alternatively, Brexit's taught us that it's more more worrying when the public do trust media so riddled with vested interests and cronyism. 
#CPC17 @PhilipHammondUK It's not uncertainty disrupting economy but Brexit itself. To *remove the cloud* revoke A50.  
Brexit: Let people change their minds, says ex-Tory health secretary - Evening Telegraph  
New report by law firm @bakermckenzie & Oxford Economics: Hard Brexit will trigger £17bn annual fall in UK manufacturing exports @thetimes. 
UK manufacturers fear hard Brexit; Government blamed as Monarch fails – business live  
.@FraserNelson:“Boris is talking about good things that can come from Brexit”There are no good things.#r4today 
Catalonia’s referendum shows why Spanish politicians are among the least trusted in wealthy democracies  
It's the "how long is a piece of string?" approach to leaving the EU. Totally unacceptable to millions of Brexit voters.  
brexit  
#Monarch selling return flights to European destinations for 30 quid and go bust .... but, hey let's blame #Brexit  
Monarch a huge casualty of Brexit falling pound. Project Fear turns into reality. 
Fox plays down UK aspect of  Bombardier because he knows it shows how post-Brexit UK-US trade would run. Thread. 1  
Anti-Brexit marchers tell Mrs May and her cabinet ‘bollocks to Brexit’ -  
Any SNP Catalonia referendum observers see the count(s)? Seem to have happened v quickly under difficult circumstances. Credible? 
Liam Fox warns EU it will 'harm its own people' by failing to start post-Brexit trade talks  
Brexit latest: The EU having no power to intervene in Spain proves that the EU has too much power to intervene in member states. 
Everyone in #Catalonia is going on strike after police violence at referendum  #GeneralStrike 
Why the independence referendum in Catalonia turned violent.  
David Rowe (after Goya) on police violence at the Catalan referendum – political cartoon gallery in Putney  
Also interesting from interview Hammond acknowledging there is already some negative impact on economy from Brexit uncertainty 
Perhaps the first of many #Brexit casualties - working people paying a high price for an argument between two wings of our ruling class!  
Pakistan throws support behind Iraq govt, opposes Kurdish referendum  
'@LiamFox: Up to 40 Brexit trade deals will be ready to roll. Britain's global future!  
"We all know it would be a difficult time" - P Hammond. No the Brexit Leave Liars - Davis, Johnson, Fox - sd it would be easy @AdamBCC 
The Tories have been gaslighting us about Brexit for a while now, says @Bonn1eGreer. But the clock is ticking. 
No foot dragging Theresa’ Jacob Rees-Mogg claims Brexit deal could take DECADES. Threaten to Leave Xmas no progress!  
Critics of Brexit are used to this. They've all had their patriotism questioned, almost daily. Doesn't even touch the sides anymore. 
Brexit is theological. Ministers are now bitterly divided about whether an undefined "transition" must last 24 or 30 months. #r4today 
Hammond is essentially saying #Brexit will damage Britain so let’s put it off as long as we can @BBCr4today 
.@sidlowe explains the Catalan referendum, Barca's decision to play and what it was like at the Camp Nou. WATCH:  
Tired of hearing that Brexit 'uncertainty' is damaging to business.It's the *certainty* that Brexit is folly that is damaging to business. 
We should be under no illusions. The devaluation of the £ following the #Brexit vote is a direct contributing factor to #Monarch's demise. 
BBC news last night showed ant-Tory demo without mentioning Brexit or showing any EU flags - the lengths they must have gone to. Pathetic 
Another welcome party! Shame the @BBCNews failed to spot it! 2nd item on German news. Why is the BBC so biased against anti-Brexit protest?  
Brexit is a timebomb  The UK left should embrace its EU allies 
Monarch collapse results partly from Brexit-caused weak £, since many of their costs were in $  
Weird how @theSNP are obsessed with an illegal referendum in Spain but seem to ignore the one here in 2014  
BBC is behaving in an extraordinary way: it hardly mentions the Manchester anti-Brexit demo, & when it does, says it was not about Brexit:  
Now #openaccess: Paper by @Nickf72 @martinmckee et al on likely impact of #Brexit on UK health / NHS. Grim reading. 
At this hideously early hour I'm about to interview deputy PM Damian Green for @ConHome at Tory conf. We'll talk Boris, Brexit + hangovers 
Catalan referendum: Catalonia has 'won right to statehood' - BBC News  
If there is one thing more disgraceful than Rajoy's reaction to Catalonia's independence referendum then it's BBC's coverage of it 
Seeing Tories in Manchester I realise the real dereliction of duty is not theirs but Labour's for backing them on Brexit & offering no hope. 
Banks expect their Brexit moving bills to reach $500 million each, sources say  
V poor @BBCNews #Monarch goes bust due to #Brexit crashes £ value. Tell people what they voted for. @EK_EuropeanMove @Labour4EU @grahambsi 
Violent crackdown on Catalonia independence referendum. Today’s cartoon by Ramses Izquierdo:  
True. I have always been surprised by the lack of EU news in British media before brexit. Nobody cared to know anything EU. It shows now.  
Strange how the #Brexit demonstrations have received more coverage in the press and on the TV in Europe than in the UK. #ToriesControlMedia 
#Brexit is a tragedy, made worse by an incompetent PM. But the real tragedy is having an opposition leader as wedded to Brexit as the gov. 
Failure was to find a peaceful path, regardless of the status of the referendum or opinion on Catalan independence. Now everything is worse.  
If no referendum took place yesterday, can the Spanish Government explain what its police was trying to stop? #CatalanReferendum 
Should #TheresaMay sack #BorisJohnson?#Brexit #MayDUP #StopBrexit #Brexitshambles #4EU #Boris #ToryConf #ToryPartyConference #Manchester 
Pep Guardiola reveals what he thinks of the Catalan referendum  
How efforts to stop Catalonia's illegal referendum spiraled out of control  
Listening to @joannaccherry cherry on GMS. Brilliant. Got the true story of Catalonia referendum across and refused to allow BBC propaganda. 
#r4today #Monarch collapse due to falling pound. In other words, because of #Brexit. I wonder how many customers voted Brexit? 
While trying to stop Catalonia's disputed independence referendum, police clashed with pro-referendum supporters  pic.twitter.com/pubVB8i1cr 
@Conservatives' #Brexit's first major bankruptcy: #Monarch's revenue was in £ while all its costs were in US$. Thanks #Leave 
Catalan leader: Referendum paves way for independence from Spain after a vote marred by violence  
Catalonia's 'kangaroo referendum' leaves Spain in poisonous gridlock [My piece for @POLITICOEurope] 
The Prime Minister has confirmed that Brexit is a step towards irrelevance  
Catalonia's government says 90% of more than 2m people who voted in its referendum favoured independence  
Thousands protest against Brexit and austerity in Manchester  
Catalan referendum: preliminary results show 90% in favour of independence  
BREXIT:Yet with barely 18 months before UK officially quits the EU in March 2019, the Government hasn't made a single decision.  
BREXIT:EU have made it abundantly clear they will never let UK leave its clutches with a deal which sees us thrive and prosper alone.  
Catalonia votes to LEAVE Spain as 90 per cent say 'Yes' in referendum  
The Conservatives must, like Boris, stay true to the Brexit most Tory voters & members want, or face electoral oblivion if they betray them. 
When total #Catalonian referendum vote is givenIt excludes uncounted papers lying in police vansStolen from the largest polling stations 
Ripples from Catalan referendum could extend beyond Spain  
Iraqi Government: Talks with Kurdistan will take place after canceling the results of the unconstitutional referendum. 
The Guardian view on Catalonia’s referendum: the Spanish state has lost  
Catalonia’s referendum shows why Spanish politicians are among the least trusted in wealthy democracies  
A hard Brexit could sting the U.K.'s auto, tech and health sectors  
Was that the same fascist dude cameron asked to interfere with Scotlands referendum by telling us we couldn't be in eu if 'yes' ?!?!?! 
We never lost democracy or sovereignty while in EU. This from the Government’s own Brexit White Paper. But never let truth get in the way...  
NOW #MONARCH GOES BUST!One of Britain's largest #airlines @Monarch is reported to have ceased trading, apparently put out of business by the government's #BREXIT and the massive fall in the value of the #Pound since the #UK's #EU #Referendum  
Many people in the UK failed to vote to stay in the EU never dreaming Brexit could ever happen.Please make sure you vote YES!  
Catalonian referendum violence plunges EU into crisis as '90% of voters back independence'.  
Let's see....£31m....NO...£62m on Big Ben£363m on Buck Palace£1bn to stay in government£10bn GIVEN to homebuyers£3m on Chinese Trawlermen£8m on pensions ad£9m on factless brexit leaflet#CPC17 
Right.  #Bitcoin actually sponsored the referendum. The CEO told me.  
'Yes' wins Catalonia independence referendum with 90% voting to split from Spain as 800 hurt during day of violence  
Voting is not illegal in Catalonia; however calling this referendum, without any procedural guarantees, WAS both illegal and a sham 
#CatalanReferendum voting slip yesterday: "THIS IS AN ILLEGAL REFERENDUM BUT I WON'T STAY HOME WHILE MY PEOPLE ARE BEING BEATEN UP. "  
The Spanish prime minister said: 'There was no referendum. What we have seen was a mere dramatisation'  
1. The way it looks to me now is that our fate is sealed. No deal Brexit. 
Ugly scenes have erupted in Catalonia following the region's attempt to hold a referendum for its independence from Spain. #9News 
5th biggest #UK #AIRLINE @Monarch collapses, largely due to #Brexit crashing the #Pound#Holidays #Travel #Aiports@HolidaysTravel  
Catalonia referendum: Violence as police block voting  
Catalan referendum: Catalonia has 'won right to statehood'  
Why the Conservative Party deserves to die #Brexit #CPC17 
The government has responded to petition calling for SECOND EU referendum and this is what they had to say  
@IEBCKenya  chairman must be appointed according to Article 250(2) of the constitution. JAP can't amend the constitution w/o a referendum 
Catalan officials claim referendum victory in Spanish vote that left hundreds injured  
How FC Barcelona, Catalonia’s largest institution, backed Sunday’s unofficial referendum on independence  
Catalan leader urges #EU to respond to human rights violations during #referendum 
Catalonian referendum overwhelmingly yielded yes (90%) because they are discriminated against in provision of services. Kenya there! 
I'm in awe that people who are ignorant enough to think Russia caused the Catalan referendum have the confidence to publish an opinion on it 
There are fears that Spain's efforts to stop the Catalan referendum have only fuelled the separatist movement  
Catalonia's referendum has provoked a constitutional crisis. No matter what, fixing Spanish unity will be difficult  
Hundreds injured as Spanish police beat up referendum voters in Catalonia.  
SPAIN: Catalonia Officials Declare Landslide 90% Vote For Secession After Violent Referendum [VIDEO] -  
The Washington Post: "Chaotic, violent referendum in Catalonia shows landslide support for secession from Spain"  
Catalan referendum: preliminary results show 90% in favour of independence  
While trying to stop Catalonia's disputed independence referendum, police clashed with pro-referendum supporters  pic.twitter.com/RBMEZsppvX 
The euro was down in Asia trading after the Catalonia referendum broke decidedly in favour of independence  
Why the independence referendum in Catalonia turned violent.  
Catalonia declares landslide win in independence referendum marred by violence  
Catalan police in tears as they shield referendum voters from Civil Guard! #Spain #CatalonianReferendum #Catalonia 
Blackpool Gazette calls the Manchester march an anti-Brexit protest☞ County police horse leads anti-Brexit protest  
Catalan referendum: Catalonia has 'won right to statehood' #CatalanReferedendum 
Netanyahu scoffs at Erdogan's claim that mossad behind Kurdish referendum  
Catalonia 'wins right to statehood', following contentious referendum marred by violence:  
I can’t comprehend the Catalonia referendum brutality by police, but this is once again relevant  
#AP10Things: How Trump undercuts his secretary of state; Spanish police injure over 800 during Catalonia referendum.  
Referendum results, in graphic form.  
Mass general strike called in Catalonia after referendum violence | Metro News  
Amazon de-hosted the Catalan government ("Generalitat")\s new voting system, according to Spanish newspaper El Pais (anti-referendum, Madrid based) , forcing it migrate elsewhere, in a cyber-war conducted against it by Spain's military police, the Guardia Civil, or Civil Guard.  
I wonder how the Catalan referendum would turn out had Spain simply done nothing. 
Catalan chief: 90% voted for independence despite violent referendum crackdown, so region should split   
Everyone in Catalonia is going on strike after police violence at referendum  via @MetroUK 
Is there a referendum coming up any time soon on taxpayer subsidies for a new NFL stadium? If so, it could interesting fast. 
"The referendum does not comply with the constitution, which was overwhelmingly approved throughout Spain, including Catalonia," says one. 
Truth About Kurd and Catalan Referendum For Independence, Disgusting UK Prime Minister Exposed:  via @YouTube 
But the march was called Stop Brexit! :P 
Secretary of State Rex Tillerson said the US does not recognise the independence referendum in Iraqi Kurdistan  
There are growing fears that Spain's crackdown on the Catalan referendum could fuel support for it  
#Catalonia calls #EU to sanction #Spain for referendum violence  
THREAD...doesn't look good 4 the UK but it has been evident 4 a long time that even lead politicians have little understanding of #Brexit.  
Hundreds injured as Spanish police beat up referendum voters in Catalonia.  
Maybe Remainers could do more to move the anti #brexit argument into food and agriculture. Why? Because this sector is particularly 1. 
The Guardian view on Catalonia’s referendum: the Spanish state has lost 
Spain is where lots of gammon-faced #Brexit bigots retire to so I'm fucked if I'm going to upset our core vote. #CON17 
Our five most read articles on the Catalan independence referendum  
Thousands rally in Madrid's La Puerta del Sol square in solidarity with people of Catalonia as Spanish police crack down on referendum vote.  
Rajoy says there was no #CatalanReferendum. Exactly same ploy from Kiev/Ukraine officials about Donbass referendum. 
Turnout in Catalonian independence referendum was about 42%  
Sadiq Khan is calling for a second Brexit referendum - could it happen?  
BBC News - Catalan referendum: Catalonia has 'won right to statehood'  
Republicans keep saying the election was a referendum on the Supreme Court. Hillary Clinton won 3 million more votes than Trump. 
Over 840 people injured in Catalonia during referendum: Catalonia regional government  
Better headline: Today's independence referendum in Catalonia not recognized by Spain's PM. 
Brexit is not about transient economics it's about who governs Britain, trade will continue with EU with/without tariffs . 
Most of the people who don't want independence didn't go to vote, since it is a referendum that is of no use to being illegal. 
Scotland had a legal referendum. The majority said No. No rioting. Nice and (relatively) civilised. 
brexit 2 the globalist totalitarians wont let you leave 
Who wants to be ruled by a state like this?The Guardian view on Catalonia’s referendum  #catalanreferendum 
Iraqi Military Moves To Take Control Of Kurdish Borders After Independence Referendum: The Iraqi military is m..  
Bombardier row is a cautionary lesson in the folly of Brexit  
Referendum fake news... 899 injured people also fake news?  Democracy, freedom of speech also fake news? Viva Catalunya #EUEXIT 
Yes, he's Catalan. I heard him being interviewed earlier. He did it to see if referendum had the minimum democratic guarantees, clearly not 
Because of Catalan/Spain events today, suddenly everyone is an expert on Quebec separatism & the 1995 referendum... #FindCanadaOnTheMap 
Stunning results in today’s referendum  
Brexit Before and After; How did the world economies fare? #MakeoverMonday #40For40 @TriMyData @VizWizBI  
'Yes' to #Catalonia: 90% vote to leave Spain in independence referendum boycotted by opponents  #CatalanReferendum 
international observers confirm, there was a referendum and people overwhelmingly voted for independence 
British newspapers claiming against supossed violence in Cataluña, just because they need a weeker UE to deal with after Brexit 
Catalunya is pro refugees and wants to be part of the EU, if you guys compare this to Brexit then you are stupids. 
Unions, Catalan associations call for regional Tuesday strike in wake of referendum crackdown   
Fox bullish about agreeing trade deals before end of Brexit transition  
Catalan ombudsman urges Council of #Europe to respond to violence at #referendum #Catalonia 
Top story: The Guardian view on Catalonia’s referendum: the Spanish state has l… , see more  
I don’t have to explain to an unelected Lord why I was speaking at a pre referendum rally about democracy.  
3000 new civil servants hired,300 lawyers - all for Brexit+ more to come. What a waste, when teachers fired, nurses+docs urgently needed 
Labour demands Brexit studies release  
Labour will use Opposition Day to put what it says is a binding vote forcing DEXEU to release 58 Brexit impact studies to Commons Committee 
BBC News at 10. I understand they want to make Brexit seem positive but “China would rather deal with UK than EU” lies and bullshit. 
Labour bid to force vote on revealing Government's Brexit papers  
AWOLNATION has gotten more career play out of one mediocre song than anyone in recent memory. Sail was like 6 years ago. Unreal. 
Brexit fails to dent UK as a top place to do business  
The Tories have got rid of 20,000 police officers and hired at least 6000 Brexit officials.Taking back control!Of Whitehall! 
#Brexit threatens the NHS, one of our prized assets. Let's #StopBrexit and save it. #FinalSay 
Weeks late but welcome! #Brexit  
If only all Uni lecturers were this brave!Anyone with half a brain can see Brexit is SHIT.Now we need them all to speak out! #StopBrexit pic.twitter.com/PZlGsyVudC 
Labour to force Tories to release the Brexit studies to the Brexit select committee for scrutiny before partial publication.  #StopBrexit 
Labour is using an obscure rule to force Tories to reveal the impact of Brexit 
The Govt withholding these Brexit studies is undemocratic. To make informed decisions on Brexit legislation MPs must have access to them  
How bad is Brexit? An MP just compared it to a plane crash  
The UK's Brexit secretary has admitted that an exit deal will 'favour the union on things like money'  
Wednesday's FT: "Fears ‘no-deal’ Brexit will trigger need for 5000 extra border staff" #bbcpapers (via @hendopolis) 
No fan of Trump but you get to choose a different President in a couple of years. Brexit would undo 40 years of peaceful integration. 
The Government says it’s almost impossible too stop Isis attacks Stop letting them in Might help 
Wel, Tricia, how about explaining it to voters? It was an illegal referendum you were supporting. 
Thread on Brexit's Big Lie; that patriotism and europhobia are the same thing  
he looks like the guy in the brexit porno who plays trump  
Maybe it Woz @TheSun that finally shifted #MicheleBarnier into gear  #Brexit  
Institute of Economic Affairs says clean #Brexit may provide more certainty for UK businesses than protracted talks   
For sale: one #Brexit, wheels falling off, loads of miles on the clock  
Labour bid to force Davis' dept to reveal #Brexit impact papers. #StopTheCoverUp 
70 to 200k finance job losses in London in event of no deal #Brexit. That's people's lives and homes. All to pursue a far right agenda. 
Labour demands Brexit studies release  
The situation in #Catalonia cannot be settled without a real referendum like in Scotland. And #Spain will have to respect the result. 
People voted Leave to make their lives better.Brexit won’tLet’s take the £120bn bill and spend it on them instead.In the real world. Now. 
"Theresa May faces ‘binding vote’ to force release of 58 secret studies on Brexit's economic damage"  
Turns out May's Brexit plan for a "Canada plus" deal is a minefield and we would have to honour existing EU free trade deals. #StopBrexit 
The @WSJ is writing fiction about events in Catalonia. Ignoring the referendum, declaration of independence, Catalan government. 
Brexit is as patriotic as were Burgess and McLean. #stopbrexit 
BREAKING: Brexit studies go to vote tmrw, MPs of all parties shld do the right thing+vote to publish @HackedOffHugh 
We’ve wasted half a billion on Brexit bureaucracy already. Let’s spend it on the NHS instead. #StopBrexit.   
BREAKING: Vote on #BrexitReportsAncient Parliamentary procedure cld force May to release secret Brexit studies  
Could someone please print the following on the side of a bus "£600 million spent on a no-deal #Brexit, let's spend it on the NHS instead." 
Fair weather 'patriot' Farage says he will quit Britain if #Brexit is a disaster. Rat fleeing the sinking ship.   
What a lot of jobs Brexit's creating in the public sector. What a lot of jobs it's terminating in the private sector.  
Seen the list of the 36 Tory Sexcases about 20 times tonight.Still haven't seen the Brexit impact studies... 
Is there still anyone who can swear to God and hope to die and say Russia has had absolutely nothing to do with either Mr Trump or Brexit? 
The wage bill for 5,000 customs officers (at £18,500 per year) will be over £92m a year. Britain can't afford Brexit. #StopBrexit 
Brexit logic: We don't like the EU because of the bureaucracy, then we recruit 8,000 officials to prepare  
We’ve seen no action taken on war criminals, Panama papers,Corp tax avoiders, paedophiles, brexit liars, corruption so don’t expect anything  
Happy news on the bot we identified in Texas talking Brexit with @Nigel_Farage Even if it has to be one at a time, it works. 
FINANCIAL TIMES: Fears ‘no-deal’ Brexit will trigger need for 5000 extra border staff #tomorrowspaperstoday 
More likely: "We're not showing you how bad Brexit is, because Scotland, N. Ireland and probably Wales would leave." 
damage caused by Brexit and hostile immigration policies, this witch-hunt may just herald the reputational end, as it were, for UK HE. 3/3 
Unilateral guarantees to EU citizens are required by human rights law, said @DimitriosGian at the House of Lords today. #Brexit  
We haven't even left yet and Brexit is costing us a fortune. We could be spending the money on the the NHS instead. #StopBrexit 
Farage went on an anti-semite rant recently about the US politics. The entire #Brexit campaign was built on racism and ignorance of facts 
Vote Leave suggested Britain paid £350 million a week to the EU. It appears to be half that  
Brexit fails to dent UK as a top place to do business   
Today we gave evidence @UKHouseofLords NERC Select Committee - discussing Local Wildlife Sites, #Brexit and nature, data on habitats & more  
Up to 5,000 staff will be hired by HMRC next year to prepare for Brexit  
It's been a bad day all round for Brexit.  
IF  Davis QUIT the *cheek chappie* Dell Boy persona - & retired gracefully - we MIGHT get some sensible action on #BrexitLike cancelling it 
Spain (Catalonia), GESOP poll:Independence ReferendumYes: 53 (+6)No: 47 (-6)#Catalonia #Spain #Catalan 
The referendum was the catalyst and not the cause of #Kurdistan Region's current crisis.#Iraq. My latest. 
#Brexit poses risks to NHS acknowledges @Jeremy_Hunt. Dr & nurse recruitment, less ££ and delayed access to drugs  
Spain (Catalonia), GESOP poll:Status Referendum Question 2006-2017Independence gains support. #Puigdemont #Catalan #Catalonia 
Spain (Catalonia), GESOP poll:Status ReferendumIndependence: 40%State in federal Spain: 27%Status Quo: 27%...  
Good editorial by @GeorgeOsborne in @standardnews on Brexit impact studies: 'the choice facing Downing St is simple: publish or be damned' 
Dear @Daily_Express, you are mistaken. We become British citizens to fight #Brexit in any way we can and vote against it.Yours, #EUcitizens 
Tory MP tells me: ‘Releasing Brexit impact reports would only cause distress. Like watching Air Crash Investigation while on a plane.’ 
My "Brexit Is Cancelled" Gif Is Ready  
The Catalan crisis adds to Gibraltar’s Brexit concerns—Spanish nationalism’s surge would come at awkward time for UK 
MEDIA RELEASE: Referendum rejection profoundly disappointing, constitutional reform must advance #auspol #auslaw @LCAPresident 
Today @CommonsHealth formally called for the 4 impact studies relevant to health prior to our inquiry into Brexit & health 
David Davis admits Brexit deal will probably favour EU – video  
Good to see politicians with the courage of their convictions, acting in accordance with their beliefs, hopefully working to stop Brexit.  
This is interesting.Concentrating on just the figures. How comes Arron Banks spent so much more? Can he spare it? Was it his?#Brexit  
Britain should take Ireland's approach to referendums and rerun #Brexit vote because of damage it is likely to cause  
Just wait for Brexit to hit ...  
everyone loves brexit duck  
The Virginia's governor race is traditionally seen as a referendum on a president's first year in office  
Alison nails it again.Harvey Weinstein's behaviour over the last 30 years was a deliberate attempt to divert attention away from Brexit.  
Farage poses as a patriot. So why were Steve Bannon's Breitbart employees volunteering (possibly illegally) for UKIP during the #Brexit ref? 
Warwick Uni professor presents "Brexit is s**t" slide at lecture #StopBrexit 
The Catalan crisis adds to Gibraltar’s Brexit concerns  
The EU has infiltrated Britain's universities and made them part of its propaganda machine  #Brexit 
When will Puigdemont accept that an EU of member states won't listen to Catalonia - especially not after Brexit?  
Each shift goes further from Ref promises. What was once Soft = no Brexit. Hard = Soft. No deal = Hard.  And now no deal = 'basic deal'!  
For sale: one Brexit, wheels falling off, loads of miles on the clock | John Crace  
The #Brexit referendum was perverted by foreign interference. Please sign and RT this petition #StopBrexit 
UK's payment to EU last year was around half the amount some Brexit advocates claimed during referendum, agency says  
The BoE says 75,000 jobs could be lost as a result of Brexit. Do you believe them? #FarageOnLBC 
Who can have any confidence in Brexit  when the primary evidence appears to be being suppressed?  
Some ppl asking, “What happens if parliament votes to reject Brexit deal but Article 50 window almost closed?” Here’s my view...1/ 
Do you mean....they...they... lied...? #Brexit  
David Davis admits Brexit withdrawal agreement 'will probably favour the EU'  
Brexit means a bigger, not a smaller state - a bitter irony for libertarians.  
"...the more than half a billion pounds that HMT has already committed for Brexit preparations"  
The failure to publish the Brexit impact studies is one of the most shocking abuses of government secrecy I can remember  
Clegg going to Brussels to " discuss" Brexit? Bit like me turning up at my last job and poking my oar into the running of things. POINTLESS 
Very interesting. Always felt a connection between #Brexit win and #Trump; sliver of a margin;  hot and cold-running Russian bots; slogans.. 
Brexit is already costing the U.K. government £660 million  
Strong message on #Brexit & Human Rights...Equalities and Human Rights Commission - First Minister of Scotland...  
Gov will hire up to 8,000 extra staff and spend more than £600million preparing for a no-deal #Brexit it emerged today. That is money wasted 
The Brexit impact studies belong to the British nation and they must be released  - here's the full list.  
My new piece on Iraqi #Kurdistan, and how the disastrous miscalculation with the independence referendum came about, in #theAtlantic.  
Remember, in the referendum, when the Leave campaign said Brexit would end up benefiting the EU at the expense of the UK? No? Me neither...  
Last night @Nigel_Farage wrote to Michel Barnier demanding a meeting on behalf of all Brexit voters. Read it here:  
First large-scale poll after October 1st referendum shows clear preference for Catalonia’s independence   
We know that the Brexit 'files' must be published, any party that wishes to conceal the truth needs to be held to account for this inanity.  
EU want to accelerate Brexit talks. Shame they wasted a year with silly posturing.  
New Brexit minister wanted to scrap EU workers’ safeguards for agency employees and pregnant women  
Brexit. Let’s talk about how Brexit will destroy the British farming industry.  
Brexit can be stopped at the last minute but let's not risk taking it that far. Now is the time to #StopBrexit 
Dress up as “Brexit” this HalloweenVia @solsikke66 pic.twitter.com/llTI2YyNcn 
Let's face it #brexit is just national self harm.  
After Brexit, we will be unconstrained by EU regulations when dealing with non-EU countries. We can and will set and supervise our own. Expect a thriving financial services industry in London, as we handle more business from China, India, Africa, Latin America and South East Asia 
John Humphrys admits Brexit stunned “out of touch” BBC bosses  
Leaver Andy thinks our 14 Overseas Territories need to stand on their own two feet after Brexit. He sees no colonial responsibility at all.  
Hold a second referendum, says Irish minister. Referendums are advisory or snapshots at a point in time. #StopBrexit 
An attempt to intimidate universities and threaten academic freedom, published in major national newspaper, is a suitably scary theme for Halloween. It proves again that Brexit is a threat to democratic values.  
UK placed Commonwealth citizens above EU citizens in the ref. It even placed them above UK expats in EU. That in itself was an act of Brexit 
So much red tape & bureaucracy created by #Brexit UK insurers being burdened whilst rest of EU gets hassle free single market benefit  
RETWEET if you Love the Queen and Brexit and FOLLOW everyone who RETWEETS and LIKES  
We've found the slogan for the side of the bus in Referendum 2.  
Tens of thousands of media commentators can no longer work after a brain parasite reduced their vocabulary to BREXIT & RUSSIA, tragic really  
Support for independence in Catalonia has increased since the referendum. #Democracia  via @naciodigital 
David Davis just publicly admitted what we're all thinking about Brexit  
I want to go on Halloween dressed up as Brexit. How do I make this happen? Ideas? 
Brexit where we trade with the EU under WTO rules is no Hallowe’en nightmare  
Why are the ‘Brexit’ files being concealed?1. If they damn Brexit the people should know2. If they don’t prove it 
Someone like Nigel seeking affirmative action (positive discrimination) not for oppressed minorities, but for a disproven ideology.#Brexit  
Looking forward to @MollyMEP's talk on Brexit & the Environment at Penryn Campus tomorrow!  
The Brexit Tories hiding the truth from parliament and the people. The only conclusion is that Brexit is bad for Britain. #StopBrexit 
David Davis on the Northern Ireland border, says if Brexit means new trade tariffs: "we've got a real problem." 
Here ya go, Nige. Specially for you. #Brexit Degree.  
The costs of Brexit far outweigh any contribution we make to the EU, infact they illustrate just how valuable EU membership is.  
Watch live as @DavidDavisMP answers EU Cmttee questions on #Brexit negotiations:  
Half a billion gone - just gearing up for Brexit.Didn't say that on the side of the bus.#Brexit Reality 
4. They all worked together on Brexit and the bulk of Brexit Fake    News in the U.K. comes from...Breitbart pushed by Russian botnets... 
#Brexit has plunged EU nationals in the UK into uncertainty and insecurity, says @DrHJLewis  
.@BorisJohnson is talking shit about science post #Brexit. Much more politely said by @ryanezmunoz @Scientists4EU  
Government to recruit 8,000 officials as part of preparations for no-deal Brexit 
Nick Clegg, Ken Clarke and Lord Adonis met with the EU's chief Brexit negotiator Michel Barnier. Do you think they're undermining Brexit?  
Brexiter inadvertently reveals how important EU is to UK science- we are a powerhouse of Science in the EU, Brexit will smash that.  
Who cares about a has been? He represents nobody accept himself and his puppet masters. Most people don't want his hard Brexit. #StopBrexit 
From last night - consistent with party policy, Keir Starmer and Jeremy Corbyn, here are my red lines on Brexit:  
Iran seen as winner after Iraq's Kurds lose referendum gamble  
Why was this decision not made the day after the referendum?  Sadly it does not shock me that this dysfunctional gov did not act sooner  
BLAME GAME: Immigrants are driving down the wages of good, hardworking British prostitutes. Hard Brexit NOW.  
This could also hand MPs the power to unpick key elements of the #brexit deal by trying to amend the legislation  
So much for hard Brexiteer claim UK was shackled to an EU rotting corpse! If only Cameron had delayed Brexit Referendum by 2 years!  
I'll be speaking about the potential for a no-deal "nightmare on Brexit Street". Come along and join the discussion! #LSEBrexit 
John Redwood's Brexit advice - buy a Morgan.  
BBC news' economics editor Kamal Ahmed has insisted London will “flourish” after Brexit  
Never giving up until Brexit is cancelled. Nothing else is good enough. 
We've put together these 'Bogeymen of Brexit' masks for you to print out for Halloween - . Tweet us if you use them! 
This book is Russia/Trump/Brexit/Assange 101.Read it and the world right now will make sense. What’s next even more so.#AlternativeWar 
The government hired 3000 people to be ready in time for Brexit  
Stuck for a last minute #halloween costume for trick or treat tonight? My 4 Brexit masks are now available free here  
With PM @RobertFico & gov in Bratislava. United EU27: sooner we agree on orderly withdrawal, earlier will start discussion on future #Brexit  
I just hope the "Rebels" got to make the point that nearly half the electorate don't want the Tory Brexit. It's time to #StopBrexit 
TOOK YOUR TIME! Barnier finally admits EU is ready to SPEED UP Brexit negotiations  
EP liberal leader and Brexit coordinator @GuyVerhofstadt responds to Puigdemont's appearance in Brussels: 'He left Catalonia in chaos and devastation.' 
Lord Darling on Brexit: "I ask myself time and time again - why are we doing this to ourselves?" 
MPs demand Theresa May releases secret reports on Brexit dangers to UK economy  
Brexit: Whitehall gets 3,000 new staff as planning ramps up  
Bizarre that a huge lie told as a crucial part of a referendum is completely tolerated and in no way treated as casting doubt on the process  
I studied EU Law. It's written down. It's solid Fact. I studied these facts long before Brexit was even a discussion 
11/~ But who else? Did someone think it could influence Tory Brexit strategy/Cabinet makeup? ENDS 
Vote Leave promised #Brexit would create more money for the NHS, not for hiring thousands of new customs officers  
My question on why UK silent on important British connection in U.S. investigation into Russian subversion of their election & Brexit  
Everyone who Brexit impacts should be allowed to see the Brexit impact studies.Which is everyone.  
.@M_AndersonSF will be hosting 'Protecting Human and Equality Rights from Brexit' in the Balmoral Hotel on Thurs from 9.30am to 1.15pm  
A ‘bare bones’ Brexit trading under WTO rules is no nightmare  > @julianHjessop on latest #IEABrexitUnit briefing 
"I am receiving numerous messages to get on with Brexit and keep to the March 2019 deadline to leave" @johnredwood 
Lalalalalala...I'm not listening. Brexit doesn't exist in my part of the multiverse. I'm still in utter denial that it is going to happen.  
Germany is, as predicted, showing a pragmatic approach to post-Brexit EU-UK relationship.  
So this is letter story in a nutshell. What it means is that, yet again, @The3Million are being abused for Brexit 1/  
“Jeremy Corbyn to meet top EU Brexit negotiator Barnier in Brussels” 
Interesting Brexit intervention from Jeremy Corbyn. Will be nice for Mr Barnier to talk to a British politician that turns up. @DavidDavisMP 
And the average age of Corbyn, McDonnell, Ken Clarke, Soubry and co who want to overturn the referendum? 
So Brexit  
Don't be too sure all older people oppose repeal. Many of us opposed it in 1983 and every referendum since #repealthe8th #TonightTV3 
“What a good time to get out” - Iron Maiden’s Bruce Dickinson on Brexit #newsnight pic.twitter.com/txZvd03wxG 
Corbyn is ALSO in Brussels tomorrow meeting Barnier et al.#NewsnightV interested in what he has to say #BrexitUK bein' a hung Parl an'all 
Time to say NO BREXIT #publishthe50 #finalsay 
Please help if you can, Govt are refusing to release studies which describe the effect Brexit will have on our lives. We need to know.  
It doesn’t matter what your politics are, a no deal Brexit is a batshit Brexit. Get @jeremycorbyn in Number ten. pic.twitter.com/qxWWEazsXK 
Jeremy Corbyn is about to meet the top EU Brexit negotiator and says he's ready to lead talks  
So Sarwar votes with Tories on Austerity and Leonard with Tories on Brexit. #TrueSocialists 
Largely missed in UK coverage of #Brexit neg:UK wants to take away rights of EU citz & isn’t backing down - this is not acceptable to EU27  
Disappointed @LabourRichard voted with the Tories to trigger article 50. Look at the mess we're in with Brexit #Anas4leader #scotnight 
How much longer can punch drunk Tory party carry on?Withdrawal bill 300 amendmentsUC shamblesBrexit negotiation shambles#NoConfidence 
Note: Khanaqin is majority Shia Kurds, but they are nationalist, overwhelmingly voted for indepdence in the last referendum.  
Tomorrow @jeremycorbyn will meet Michel Barnier & several EU Prime Ministers to discuss Brexit. The country needs another General Election. 
Corbyn addressss the nation: "My Brexit, too, will be rubbish. But not quite as rubbish as theirs."  
Corbyn's had enough, he's stepping up into his role as PM elect, going to EU tomorrow to sort out Tories shambolic Brexit negotiations 
When @JeremyCorbyn goes to speak to the EU tomorrow, which #Brexit position will he be taking with him???  #TheCorbynCon 
If you’re a commentator, agency, politician or journalist and you’re publicly talking up a no deal Brexit you should be ashamed of yourself. 
Brexit got conversion rates all mad  
Patrick Minford, Roger Bootle and Edgar Miller support this letter. A clean Brexit will boost our economy by £135bn/7% of GDP. pic.twitter.com/I1WswWNjkS 
Corbyn reiterates criticism of No Deal "no-deal Brexit would be a bad deal for Britain, threatening jobs/living standards & our neighbours" 
Can UK unilaterally revoke #Article50? Its options for each answer to that, in a flow diagram. #brexit  
Corbyn says that he is ready to take over from Government's "ever more damaging ... Brexit bungling" 
Leader of Opposition @jeremycorbyn going to Brussels too. He will be meeting 3 EU Prime ministers & chief Brexit negotiator @MichelBarnier 
Britain thinks Germans care about Brexit — they don’t  
"Brexit. It won't be Armageddon." #ThingsNotOnTheBus 
Short, clear, accurate on why Brexit talks are stalled, by @RCorbettMEP. Share with your “politics? yawn!” friends.  
Brexit Tories banging on about a sovereign Parliament then running away from votes and ignoring Parliament’s decisions are shameless frauds 
Preparing for #EUCO. Britain has a bright future post-Brexit and this Government is working towards a good deal for British and EU citizens  
The Tory Govt is on the ROPES !*Universal Credit roll out*EU Withdrawal Bill delayed by 300 amendments*Brexit negotiations 
Jeremy Corbyn to meet top EU Brexit negotiator Barnier in Brussels  
Here’s a Crazy Thought: Why Not Just Give Up on Brexit? Quite...US take ...spot on... via @intelligencer 
An EU transition deal is a dangerous diplomatic fiction. Britain is walking into a trap  #Brexit 
Jeremy Corbyn will travel to Brussels tomorrow to meet the EU's chief Brexit negotiator and the President of the European Council 
MUST by @ccaryl in the @washingtonpost: "The great Catalonian cyberwar" sobre els atacs d'Espanya per evitar el referèndum."One can only hope that the Catalonian cyberwar does not mark the start of a new illiberal era among Western democracies". 
Brexit was sold by lies and is now cloaked in secrecy. It adds up to an attack on our democracy, writes @MollyMEP  
EU migrants coming to UK over next 18 months can stay for good after Brexit, officials concede #Premium 
Since arriving in Lake District yesterday, only 5/100 people I’ve met in hospitality are from UK. Brexit is going to totally screw tourism.  
We’ll keep our peanuts then!  - Walk now! : '€20bn is peanuts!' EU leaders ramp up Brexit row before summit  
40 banks and financial institutions are planning to relocate  from the UK to Frankfurt because of Brexit,  There is a easy fix - stop Brexit 
Yes! Hard Brexit (UKGov plan) is an extreme position in comparison to a soft Brexit (EEA/EFTA/CU). Don't let no deal rhetoric normalise it!  
A hard Brexit would be catastrophic, Ireland's ex-PM Enda Kenny says  
I see your tune and raise you:Que sera, seraHow bad will a brexit beA future destroyed you seeQue sera, seraDoesn't need to be  
Quick recap for the foul-mouthed brain-donor libtard gimps:Brexit won.Trump won.And Alfie kicked your saggy arses.#ThreeStrikesYoureOut 
10 reasons ‘no deal’ Brexit would be bonkers @InFactsOrg 
UK: EU Membership Referendum, Survation poll:RemainLDEM-ALDE: 83% (+10)LAB-S&D: 68% (+5)SNP-G/EFA: 65% (+4)CON-ECR: 30% (-1)#Brexit 
UK: European Union Membership Referendum, Survation poll:RemainScotland: 67%London: 59%Northern Ireland: 54%Wales: 52%England: 50% 
UK: European Union Membership Referendum, Survation poll:Age: 18-34Remain: 69% (+5)Leave: 31% (-5)#EURef #EUreferendum #Brexit 
I am hearing that a new Brexit-related legal challenge will be launched tomorrow.Stay tuned! 
"Brexit vote and election of Trump have given people a license to become more vicious in their attacks"  
7 She and I were both on a @britishfuture panel that recommended the UK offer unilateral guarantees to EU27 citizens after Brexit. 
These are the nightmare scenarios we could see if Brexit happens without an EU deal  
It's getting harder to imagine that Britain is run by the party of Churchill and Thatcher   
This programme about the berry pickers fearing Brexit is heartbreaking. Scotland voted 62-38 to stay in Europe. Absurd what’s going on! 
Waste zillions of time and effort on #Brexit for zero reward whilst the #NHS crumbles. Shocking 
I'm not accepting the result of a gerrymandered referendum. #Brexshit 
Today's column redux: No need for fire-and-brimstone Brexit prophecies, just test leavers against their promises.  
"Taking back control" resonated with Leave voters - see this:  A short thread on this topic:#StopBrexit #Brexit /1 
Better still Mr Corbyn @jeremycorbyn, urge ALL MPs to cancel Brexit before millions are made worse off. #publishthe50 #finalsay 
The nightmare scenarios that could happen if there's no Brexit deal  
We voted to recommend referendum after 34 years of 8th, progress! but need to take issue out of constitution entirely 
Love what this paper has become since it started. No longer exclusively about Brexit, either.I'd say that even if I wasn't in it. I hope.  
London doesn't need EU membership for its investment industry to carry on booming  #Brexit 
British troops on the Irish border. There is no happy ending there. That is a blatant prelude to further troubles. Brexit madness.  
“they also think British politics is so unstable, concessions at this stage are premature” And so…? #brexit  
.Forcing Brexit on NIRaising possibility of British army at Irish border& NOW threatening direct rule?#EndBadly 
Just 42% of EU nationals expect to stay in London as asset managers after Brexit, poll says  
UK's poorest families will gain from Brexit due to cheaper food imports, report says - Farming UK News  
It has taken 34 years to get this far. 150,000 lonely journeys, silenced women, stigma and fear. Time to move to a referendum #8Committee 
Impatience over Brexit is rising and Britain's leadership is turning on itself  
Indeed. Imagine there was a main opposition party that actually stood for something other than Brexit ... how amazing that would be ...  
October saw the tipping point, it's essentially just those who followed UKIP/BNP & the hard core now. By year end it'll be just the lunatics 
Brexit heaps more upheaval on retailers, with Sainsbury's announcing 2,000 job cuts  
."Opinion polls are showing the public has NOT rallied behind Brexit. If anything, it is edging AGAINST Brexit" 
It's time to stop repeating to ourselves why Brexit is bad and start working on realistic ways to stop it. 
Scrap Brexit & devote the time & energy to, I dunno, education or something. Teaching people not to hate those who look or sound different. 
Breathtakingly arrogant for party of government to turn its back on Parliamentary #UniversalCredit vote. Bodes ill for #Brexit scrutiny 
Wait... you WHAT? After all this  pleading for Brexit because of supposed urgency for new trade deals... you now say we don't need ANY?   
Another airline sets up a UK subsidiary to guarantee operating flights in the UK after Brexit.  
If the gov’t says this vote wasn’t binding can I remind  them that neither was the EU Referendum! #UniversalCredit @CCHQPress #Brexit 
.If we Brexit, we LOSE our EU rights to compensation for cancelled flights!. 
Devastating stuff: Britain thinks Germans care about Brexit — they don’t  
Result: Tá 15, Níl 3, Staon 2. #8committee has recommended that Article 40.3.3 NOT be retained in full. It WILL recommend a referendum. 
Brexit: Time to practise democracy:'If a democracy cannot change its mind, it ceases to be a democracy.’  
If the referendum was weighted by how many working years a voter has left there would be NO BREXIT.  Young people robbed #YouthBrexitReport 
#Brexit:1 year, 161 days just over 4 hours until the UK leaves the European Union. It cannot come soon enough. 
UK’s high value added manufacturing industry, once the envy of the developed world, to be taken out back & shot by Brexit. #wetoldyouso 
Thornberry: Labour will not accept a no-deal Brexit  
Brexit worries are causing paralysis for British companies, advertising lobby says  
Hard Brexit will cost 5,000 Rolls-Royce jobs in Derby, say union chiefs 
Hungarian airline Wizz Air announces it will set up a UK subsidiary in order to guarantee it will be able to keep operating flights in the UK after Brexit.  
#Brexit CHAOS  is the PRICE we're paying for an ill timed - ill judged - ill informed Referendum.ALL because Cam couldn't manage HIS party. 
SIGN our petition if you also think British people must have a say if they do not like the #Brexit deal   
Talk of a 'no deal' Brexit is normalising hard Brexit. My latest blogpost just up:  
Brexit Lemmings jumping off the cliffs of Dover as Bozo the Clown Benny Hill salutes the £100M Royal Yacht Britannia  
Now 5,000 Rolls Royce Jobs at #Derby under threat by #Brexit while #labour sit on their hands.How many more people will have to lose out? 
Brexit for me means a united, accepting and welcoming Britain that remains open to a globalised world #YouthBrexitReport 
The Spanish @guardiacivil begins to call in directors of media outlets that published the #referendum #1O advert. #PressFreedom? #Catalonia 
Very important all of us get behind leaving the EU & make the most of the opportunities that lie ahead. #YouthBrexitReport #MyBrexit #Brexit 
British young people worried Brexit will increase inequality & intolerance #YouthBrexitReport @LSENews @mylifemysay  
Very interesting meeting of the @APPGCatalonia 2 hear reports of referendum observers & discuss the current democratic impasse in #Catalonia 
A new group was convened by @LiamFox today to ensure business is regularly consulted on post-Brexit trade policy  
Brexiters main reason for Brexit is that they can’t stand people from other places coming to the UK to do the jobs they don’t want to do. 
Reasons no-deal #Brexit is bonkers (3/10): Planes grounded as UK drops out of Open Skies system. 
Poll after poll are now showing a consistent majority against #Brexit. MPs, please take note...  
As the @thetimes sees the resumption of Brexit talks....  
Labour: Theresa May's Brexit strategy 'in paralysis' amid legislation delays  
Thank you Stop brexit destroying lives in UK   
Brexit: Airline passengers won't be guaranteed compensation for cancelled flights after UK leaves EU.  
Digging for victory while we post armed guards at the border.  Brexit is turning into Dads Army. 
Good. Brexit Bill is one of the most undemocratic pieces of legislation ever tabled. Not that Brexiters give a shit. 
The reality is you can't honestly be on the offensive on the economy while also being compliant on Brexit  
#Brexit will die its inevitable death. I’m angry about the damage done in UK and about the wasted time and resources for the entire EU. 
No deal must mean no Brexit. 
Israel discusses results of Kurdistan's referendum with Russia  
“Give me what I want or I’ll shoot myself!” Excellent summation of Government Brexit strategy from @RCorbettMEP 
The UK is obsessed with Brexit. Most Germans couldn't care less.  
I received this response to my email urging the release of the Brexit impact studies  
There's no legal impediment to Special Designated Status for the north of Ireland within the EU  #Brexit  
Bombastic Brexit vanity has delivered nothing of value, simply more uncertainty and infighting. While the UK weeps.  
Well there you go. Germany wants a free trade deal with the UK post #Brexit. You can add services to your list Fraulein,  were not daft.  
Brexit all boils down to EU Freedom of Movement for Workers. Accept it, and our problems go away. Reject it, and we leave without a deal. 
A No Deal Brexit wouldn't be "fine", it would be disastrous. Here are just some of the consequences if the UK crashes out of Europe:  
Every day it is becoming clear that the terms on which Brexit was sold are impossible to deliver.  
Outside parliament, a Mexican tourist joined a team of flag wavers. Horrified at trump & brexit, she called it the same movement #StopBrexit 
Can't be said often enough. Brexit  seen in Germany as self-inflicted, senseless pain.  
Outside parliament today. 'only the rich can afford brexit' #StopBrexit 
Before the Referendum I told Remain campaigners their slogan should be "vote leave to make the lawyers rich".   
The Brits thought Brexit would divide Europe and stir debates in EU countries. Instead, no one cares. 
A hard Irish border after Brexit would threaten peace agreement, ex-PM Enda Kenny says  
Clinton RESENTS Brexit because a) she doesn't understand what the EU is & b) it led to a Trump victory! Watch HERE  
"Brexit must be agreed by end of year" - we do not see this happening because Brexit is not best for the UK  
A hard Brexit would be catastrophic, Ireland's ex-PM Enda Kenny says  
Despite the angry reports blaming Brexit, the only thing that is clear is that there is little proof either way  
Referendum was *not* instance of democracy. Vast majority of voters were not only uninformed, but misinformed to extent of being deceived. 
Remember when people thought the Brexit referendum would settle the European question once and for all? 
The Brexit Negotiations: make or break? Join the #LSEBrexit debate 2/11 w/ @sarahobolt @plegrain @JohnRentoul @LSEEI  
Brexit is not a political issue in Germany, regardless of what the UK thinks  
Is there anything British voters want less than a brand new anti-Brexit 'centrist' party?  
Brexit Britain can do a rapid trade deal with Australia, its governmentconfirms. Australian High commissioner Alexander Downer slammed the EU as 'preposterously  protectionist' and said its Common Agricultural Policy had been 'hugely damaging'.  
'No Deal' is good enough for most of the biggest economies in the world - why not for Brexit Britain?  
10 reasons ‘no deal’ Brexit would be bonkers - by @InFactsOrg:  
Superb piece by @RCorbettMEP on why no Brexit deal can deliver on the promises made by Leave campaigners: 
Brexit deadlock means time is running out fast for businesses  
Idiotic comment. We’ve spent 40 years engaging commercially, institutionally and socially within the EU. #Brexit will harm us profoundly.  
What if Britain crashes out of the EU with no Brexit deal? A once-longshot concept now seems plausible.  
Brexit Minister Steve Baker says it's possible to move Brexit date from 29/3/19: "It could be by mutual negotiation that the date changed." 
Hey, brexiiters: elitist unelected lawmakers are going to kill your precious #brexit. Because that's how our democracy rolls.   
#BRExit is going to devastate Blair's "third sector". All sorts of European QUANGO/fake charity board jobs are going to be lost. 
#Brexit is in part a result of dreadful inequalities in UK. The Westminster system does not work for most and needs to be reformed radically  
Gerry Adams challenges Taoiseach on Good Friday Agreement referendum position  
A free and fair referendum should be respected regardless of the outcome.  
He's a bureaucrat! Greek debt crisis expert Yanis Varoufakis SHREDS Barnier's Brexit plan  
This also reads like a Brexit Granddad checklist.  
Our @Adamstoon1 @EveningStandard on Cabinet unity over Brexit  
German Foreign Ministry drafts plans for comprehensive trade deal w/ Brexit Britain - some se㎱e at last from Europe.  
Our research w/ @LSEnews finds "young people are concerned about the impact of #Brexit on multi-ethnic communities"  
PB - referendum should be on simple binary question for or against repeal. Legislation is the Oireachtas' job #8Committee 
Did it ever cross your mind that @POTUS is dismantling Obama's Globalist policies to save us from ending up like devastated Europe? #Brexit  
Absolutely right @Keir_Starmer > "there are now serious questions about whether Theresa May can deliver Brexit":  
WATCH: May slams Labour’s plan to accept a Brexit deal at any price  
Lot of people getting excited about German government doc as though surprise Germany wants to carry on trading post-Brexit. Here is key bit  
President #Putin speaks over phone w/ @netanyahu, discusses Syria, Iran, results of referendum in Iraqi Kurdistan  
Brexit is devaluing £, increasing costs and causing potential base rate/mortgage payment increases. I've asked BoE how we stop evictions.  
The time has come for Theresa May to tell the nation: Brexit can’t be done. | Alastair Campbell  
It's clear there is no majority in Parliament or the country for the extreme Brexit this government is pursuing.  
Many say this all is happening cause of the independence referendum but I believe it would happen regardless.Not this quick though. #kirkuk 
How Brexit is already destabilizing science throughout Europe   
Cornwall voted for #Brexit. In effect, voting to stop £476 million of EU funding to tackle poverty and boost growth in the county.  
We've launched an anti-Brexit centrist political party by mistake  
The two central political facts are:-Brexit is a disaster and it's 100% ToryTories cannot be trusted with the economy - except for the 1% 
COMMON SENSE: Germany is pressuring the EU to enter into 'comprehensive free-trade accord' with UK post-Brexit. 
Boost for UK as leak reveals Germany is keen to cut a Brexit deal and Hungary warns EU not to take a hard line on …  
In this obvious metaphor for BrexitSpiders= Eurosceptics in Tory partyMan= CameronBlow torch= ReferendumHome= UK  
'@PhilipDaviesUK: Labour's Brexit position amounts to a capitulation. He's not wrong!  
"I've come here to strangle Alsatians and stop Brexit and I'm all out of Alsatians"  
A call for Referendum is not a call for war -----Benjamin Maduka Credit: Naija . com @Amaka_Ekwo 
Boris Johnson really hates it when you share this pic of him in front of the #Brexit #BusOfLies, folks... 
As Change Britain Chair Gisela Stuart has said, it is wrong of the EU-funded OECD to call for Brexit to be reversed 
Sainsbury's is cutting up to 2,000 jobs and Brexit is putting online retailers off Britain  
'Business wants to avoid a cliff edge': @BusinessEurope 'extremely concerned' with slow pace of #Brexit negotiations  
Siri, show me an obvious metaphor for Brexit.  
Why do people keep mixing up 'Brexit' and 'Breakfast'? @IanBlackfordMP fell victim at #PMQs 
 @IanBlackfordMP calls on @theresa_may to reveal Brexit analysis showing Scotland will be worst hit. Sign petition  
The nightmare scenario that could happen if there's no Brexit deal  
Lack of information again provided in #PMQS re Brexit plan is yet further betrayal of majority of UK who now want no part of it #StopBrexit 
Reversing #brexit would have a "positive" impact on the economy. Experts speak out. Time to withdraw Art 50. 
Labour's 'any price' Brexit policy lacks an ounce of common sense @PhilipDaviesUK tells @theresa_may at #PMQs 
Brexit plan 'in paralysis' with ministers set to delay EU withdrawal bill  
A short thread on education levels and support for #Brexit. It is clear that better education correlated with voting to #Remain. /1 
The Brexit Bill has just been delayed  
The Conservatives know if they don’t Brexit they are finished. The only remaining question is: can they make it to the bell in March 2019? 
a man called Jeremy accidentally started a political party but then resigning within 24 hours is the Peep Show Brexit special we never got 
another huge fall in unemployment in the last quarter another sign the economy has not fallen off a Brexit cliff 
BREAKING NEWS: Theresa May appoints new Brexit strategist  
Airline passengers won't be entitled to compensation for cancelled flights after Brexit  
Query: What do you think will be in place on (current) Brexit Day 29 March 2019?On the basis of available information today. 
Venn diagram of the membership of James Chapman's anti-Brexit party "The Democrats" and Jeremy Cliffe's anti-Brexit Party "The Radicals".  
PM: Labour and SNP rejection of a no deal means that they will accept a Brexit deal at any price #PMQs 
WATCH | Bill Clinton mocks Brexit voters in yet another example of the Establishment not giving a shit about the views of ordinary people. pic.twitter.com/dp8qNKBGtt 
Fascinating piece by @JamesBlitz on the practicalities of Brexit  
Everyone who knows Özil says the same. Trust them over Brexit pundits.  
#PMQs shows how Brexit is damaging the Tory brand: economic illiteracy of this obsession of 'the party of business' is impossible to hide. 
Brexit could trigger next financial crisis warns stock exchange chief - we are better in the EU  
Corbyn says government is bungling #Brexit, asks how Theresa May has "the nerve" to claim economy is strong #PMQs  
PM is so weak ‘of course we don’t want ppl to lose jobs’ but happy w disastrous no deal Brexit scenario -will result in precisely this #PMQs 
Sometimes I lie awake at night fearing that I will one day say breakfast instead of Brexit. 
Brexit = taking back control of our laws, borders, money & trade #CleanBrexit 
Brexit has made it far harder for the Tories to claim "economic credibility" - one reason for Corbyn's win today. #PMQs 
Breakfast or Brexit? MP gets tangled up #PMQs  
Once again the Prime Minister refuses to answer what will be the cost of a no deal Brexit scenario. #PMQs 
Ian Blackford; the latest victim of the curse of saying breakfast instead of brexit. Thoughts and prayers with him. #PMQs 
Theresa May really scraping the barrel today. Tories out of any semblance of credible responses. Economy weak,Brexit a shambles. Mess #PMQs 
Day by day the Brexit milk turns sourer. If we have changed our minds about Brexit, who can stop us having a #FinalSay? 
Week after week, May could and should be on the rack over Brexit. Yet Jeremy Corbyn barely mentions it #PMQS 
Can I point out that the last year's fall in real wages was caused by #Brexit £ depreciation - something caused by *both* #pmqs 'leaders'? 
"No matter what Brussels says or does...no matter how many companies announce plans to move workers from the UK to new EU headquarters, [Brexit] hardliners cannot get it out of their heads the idea that if they bully their way towards the wire, the EU's nerve will crack."  
Not all bad things can be blamed on Climate Change. Thank God for Brexit. pic.twitter.com/LIeAG47NQm 
The usual rules of negotiating don’t apply in the #brexit negotiations :  
No clear sign that negotiations will progress to trade & transition - the entire Brexit process in danger of collapse. Tory #BrexitShambles 
Government Pushes ‘Barry’s Or Lyons?’ Referendum To 2021  
.@caoilfhionnanna launches @DoughtyStPublic legal advice on Brexit & NI in @Europarl_EN 'Brexit not compatible with B/GFA'. #Brexit  
David Davis gets a Machine gun as his pistol is no longer adequate to shoot all the Messengers bringing bad #brexit news  
Withdrawal Bill delayed, again. No trade talks w/ EU til Dec. No trade deals til 2020s. When did Govt last meet one of its Brexit deadlines?  
Any #Brexiteers mention this during the campaign?Thought not.#Dover-#Brexittext-via @TimForde 
This letter contains a useful list of MPs who are entirely deluded about Brexit negotiations.  
The four architects of "No Deal" #BREXIT smile as they leave 10 Downing Street  
This cannot be repeated often enoughAt best they were optimistically making it up as they went along - more likely they liedEither way, mislead the public and I think makes narrow result in advisory referendum irrelevantDo what's best for country - Remain  
If you were in any doubt Brexit could go very badly for the environment, here's a useful update for you  
(For the record, I just deleted some polite Brexit-related tweets cos I know abuse was imminent, & I don't have the hide for it at the mo.)x 
Official source tells me there is just 'not enough political agreement yet'-this puts Brexit legistlation timetable under massive pressure 
Thank you @SkyNews @adamboultonSKY #AllOutPolitics show for covering our #YouthBrexitReport for co-published by @appg_brexit @LSEnews  
Reminder: Many Brexiters, especially the older ones, are willing to sacrifice the welfare of their family on the altar of #Brexit#Remain 
Will Brexiteers finally admit the EU referendum caused hate crime? asks @JuliaRampenMM 
Remarkably hard-hitting speech fm @PhilHoganEU, showing frustration w lack of UK clarity & neglect of #Irish border issue in #Brexit debate.  
Current status of EU citizens' right to stay, 481 days after the referendum  
Hillary Clinton claims to 'respect' the choice on #Brexit. Yet her tour suggests sheer contempt. #NotThePresident 
Important message to Parliament: No #Brexit better than No DealPlease get real and start talking sense before it's too late 
Bollard to Brexit #stopbrexit 
Yet more evidence of a post-Brexit reverse domino-effect. Europeans choose unity over division. #IamEuropean 
Home Office say immigration control starts 29 March 2019 'Brexit Day' newcomers must register upon arrival, Army maybe deployed at border. 
Reverse #Brexit with second referendum to save your economy, OECD tells UK  
#Corbyn holds the key to Britain's future, which if he continues to support Brexit, he will trash. #Labour has some thinking to do! 
A superb article by @campbellclaret on the ongoing shambles of #Brexit.Worth reading & sharing. 
Danish MP Kenneth Kristensen Berth has said that Brexit will automatically force Denmark to reconsider its own EU membership. pic.twitter.com/PH01JlpzDd 
Tusk pens letter to EU leaders BEGGING them to align against UK on Brexit as cracks appear  
 The richest countries in the world just told us to reverse brexit.... I'd listen to them. 
Norwegian Centre Party Leader Trygve Slagsvold Vedum MP advised us just before we voted in our referendum: "Britain should be brave and cut free from the EU". pic.twitter.com/GcqWxqcdPS 
Why our voices must be heard. Blog by @UnlockDemocracy on the fundamental importance of the #withdrawalBill  #Brexit  
Let us be clear. Any “moderate” Tory who would work with Labour to subvert Brexit is a traitor.  
.@BrexitLawNI team here in force with @BillofRightsNI delegation to @Europarl_EN at launch of legal advice on NI, the EU and #Brexit  
After Brexit the UK will need to renegotiate 759 treaties. Scotland only needs to rip up one! #ScotRef 
2. That same strong French farmer lobby will be actively used against them after Brexit. There is no good news for them 
1. French farming lobby is so strong they do well under the EU and that gets a good deal for UK farmers that won't be replaced after Brexit 
'UK must pay as much as possible, as long as possible!' Poland's outburst on Brexit bill  
“How to Stop Brexit” by @Nick_Clegg is intelligent, well-informed, well-written and UTTERLY convincing. Strongly recommended. 
Here's our full guide to how a breakdown in Brexit talks could cause chaos in Britain  
Officially supporting #Brexit EDLAFDBNPUKIPKKK (Trump) ISISLe Pen’s Front NationalGeert Wilders’ Party For Freedom#StopBrexit 
11. Most waiters in Britain are EU migrants who face doubts about their futures  
Northern Ireland Secretary appears to have literally no clue what he will do re Irish border in a no deal Brexit scenario 
'The OECD was part of Project Fear before the referendum - they’ve never been very good at forecasting' - @JLongworthLML on @bbc5live 
This bill is a disaster for #wildlife! Is this the kind of change people who voted 'leave' really wanted?  #brexit 
If we did decide to overturn Brexit, we would be pushing at an open door back into Europe -  
OECD is an organization set up by 35 members (including UK) dedicated to economic development. #Brexit might just be its business too.  
This is the line you hear most from Europe's capitals on state of Brexit talks (via ): 
Imagine there was a UK referendum on end-of-life care for elderly people. 1/ 
£9000 A year tuition fees, incomes squeezed, the wrong economic policy & a disastrous #Brexit. The Tories have got it all wrong. #voteSNP. 
Even OECD, a puppet of Brussels having received hundreds of millions in grants, concedes economy will grow without a Brexit deal 
For Theresa May, the Brexit news only gets worse  
BBC’s hissy fit over #Brexit bias research PROVES it has something to hide  
I'm pessimistic about chance of reversing #Brexit, but reaction is recently so shrill it gives me hope. Do they sense a turning of the tide?  
Forget all previous Brexit showdowns. Yes, even that discussion with Uncle Dave. This is the one we didn't even know we'd been waiting for.  
Scenes from #Catalonia's independence referendum. Full report here  
and here's a draft of the EU referendum that will finally stop my party banging on about Europe  
Bill Clinton MOCKS Brexit voters and teases them for 'not knowing what they voted for'. Perhaps but unlike Clinton we know where cigars go ! 
ONS data today reveals Brexit squeeze still hitting hardworking families' pockets as wages stagnate behind inflation  
A thread in which another leaver withdraws support for Brexit. His reasons are clear & precise & should be compelling for other leavers.  
Conseller @raulromeva: "On the 1st of October 2,262,424 Catalans cast their vote in a referendum, in which 90,09% backed independence." 
The Leave politicos overpromised, lied and misled. If they can’t deliver a better deal than we have now, of course Brexit is off. #FinalSay 
Hate crimes soared in parts of the U.K. after Brexit  
The rapporteur of the Spanish Constitutional Court nullifying the Catalan Referendum law was PP MP in Congress for 17 years. No separation of powers in Spain @TimmermansEU. 
Brit Govt simply don’t have a clue on #Brexit they’ve created a monster & it’s eating them alive. Ireland must be protected from such lunacy  
Talks on the UK–Switzerland post-Brexit relationship are underway, according to the Swiss Federal Council.  … pic.twitter.com/GX8MSZFmND 
In Brussels for packed day of Brexit meetings ahead of EU Council meeting on Friday: Including busy session with our Labour MEPs on arrival. 
'Swiss people support the Brexit' — Lukas Reimann MP, Switzerland. pic.twitter.com/vuv5zhPr1I 
Great event @warwickuni by @LibDems,  #economics and #politics societies. Packed out to discuss #Brexit. #Students worry about their future. 
On the plus side this week there are more Brexit articles in German media. On the minus side they're all about the UK heading for disaster 
. @VinceCable is right. David Davis is continuing the government's policy of using #Brexit to attack our democracy.  
I'll be speaking to BBC Sussex at 9:50 on why we need a second referendum on Brexit and the impact Brexit will have on our economy 
Yes please @jeremycorbyn do demand the government release the Brexit studies. We need to know  
An anglosphere trading zone minus the USA is too small to make a difference for the UK, but the alternative is domination by the US.#Brexit 
Young people 'bemused, angry, and resentful' about Brexit  
We had 25,000 bollocks to brexit stickers arrive yesterday. Now only 12,000 left. All profits to remain.  
Everyone should see Hillary Clinton take down Brexit and Donald Trump in 90 seconds  
This Brexit thing is already proving to be a real success isn't it.  
The case for stopping Brexit continues to grow -  #StopBrexit #ExitFromBrexit 
This week in Brexit metaphors  
64% of manufacturers recruit EU nationals as they have an insufficient number of UK applicants  #EURef #Brexit  
Too close to home Nigel? How's those trips to the Ecuadorian embassy going eh @Nigel_Farage ???? 
Brexit Britain can do a rapid trade deal with Australia, its government confirms  
What the OECD are criticising, very specifically, is #Brexit an identical policy of both Labour and Tory!!  
You can’t support Catalunya’s secession movement if you were horrified by Brexit  
Brexit could trigger next financial crisis, warns head of London Stock Exchange  
Shocking surge in homophobic hate crime reports since Brexit vote, we know racism has rocketed too   
Tory MP Jms Duddridge: 'no deal my preferred choice to achieve fast, clean & boring Brexit'. Not boring for ppl whose lives it wd devastate  
London's most talented asset managers may flee after Brexit, survey suggests  
@albawhitewolf even made the Italian press, raising anti brexit awareness in Brussels  
Tory MP: No Deal would be my preference for fast and clean Brexit  
Katie’s Mum says there’s £490bn Brexit hole in Britain's finances, nearly half a trillion pounds. That’s a lot isn’t it, Prime Minister?  
" But things were about to take a turn for the worse....."Brexit looking more and more like an episode of "Air Crash Investigation" 
OECD (Org for Economic Cooperation & Development) say that reversing Brexit would have significant +ve impact on UK economy #StopBrexit 
Brexit, October 2017: German satirists taking the piss out of Britain (pretty fun this! And they know their stuff)  
'@JamesDuddridge: No Deal would be my preference for fast, clean Brexit. Let's get on with it!  
The #OECD is only stating the obvious. Calling off #Brexit would be good for the economy. Shot down by Brexiters as 'EU-funded'. Pathetic. 
Kurds paid heavy price for silly referendum; now want Barzani to step down  
Can we just 'April fool' it? Or is it too late??? #Brexit  
Are you interested in statements by individual MPs/Lords w/ claims like "not one job will be lost" or "there will be no downside to Brexit"?  
After five rounds of #Brexit talks, David Davis runs out of bluster  
I think if we’d known how much fun it would be watching Remoaners become more & more unhinged we’d have voted for #Brexit earlier.  
Why is anyone surprised that the Brexit talks are stalling? The EU has arrogantly imposed an impossible process that could never, ever work. 
New Ipsos survey reveals the many Brexit factions  
Young people 'bemused, angry and blaming older generations for Brexit', new report finds  
Brexit must be agreed by end of year to avoid firms fleeing abroad and causing new financial crisis #Premium 
At #PMQs @jeremycorbyn, demand Govt release of the Brexit studies.@UKLabour ability to scrutinise & hold to account is inhibited without. 
"Why isn't there a major party that opposes Brexit?""ᴴᶦ""Why are the only options Labour or the Tories?""ᶜᵃᶰ ᵃᶰʸᵇᵒᵈʸ ʰᵉᵃʳ ᵐᵉ" 
Carney Reveals Europe's Potential Achilles Heel in Brexit Talks  
How Brexit without an EU deal could create chaos in everyday life  
With evidence of a failing Brexit, who needs prophecy? | Rafael Behr  
#Joining EU was logical step for post-imperial UK and recognition of declining importance. #Brexit is a futile attempt to reverse history  
#JRM4PM #Brexit #EUBrexit will REDUCE food, wine and clothes costs by 20% - Rees-Mogg fires back at Remainers  
Surely we have reached the point with #Brexit when someone in authority can tell the British people how it is going to make life better? 
Brexit: cabinet split as Amber Rudd says no-deal ‘unthinkable’   
#Brexit effect£490bn wiped off UK's wealth.Foreign ­investment in UK falls from £120bn surplus to £25bn deficit.   
Breaking: Section of DExEU's regional Brexit impact assessment leaked.  
Do you want more autonomy from Rome? A referendum asks Northern Italians. They'll likely vote yes, then what?  
A Brexit Trojan Horse with a gob like a slit in a pie.  
If the Tories can't cope rolling out a single benefit change like Universal Credit, how are they going to cope with Brexit? 
Conservative activists in Fresno try to get a referendum on the ballot to block California's 'sanctuary...  
London's asset managers could start to lose top investment talent after Brexit, survey says  
The richest countries in the world just told Britain to reverse #Brexit or destroy the economy  
Britain isn't at war with the EU. It's at war with itself  
We need to see the secret Brexit studies now, not just as part of prosecutions in 4 or 5 years.#Remain 
Lemmings jumping off the cliffs of Dover as Bozo the Clown Benny Hill salutes the £100M Royal Yacht Brexit Britannia  
Cold self sabotage Brexit, Teereza and DDavis a case study in gargantuan gruel grotesque carnival inside UK’s head  
If the electorate had been told the truth that is now emerging every day then there would have been a landslide AGAINST #Brexit#r4today 
Oops ...EU infrastructure bank warns of Brexit hit to UK  
Thar Brexit Brain Drain's Gonna Be BIG !!!  
A Corbynite Britain would be a worse calamity than a no-deal Brexit  via @Telegraph 
One ref to rule them all,One ref to find them,One ref to bring them all,And in the Brexit bind them.  
‘The City has a "well established" model of cross-border cooperation, which needs no intervention after’ Brexit  
The Tory government seem to be deliberately running down NHS.  Post referendum exodus of EU staff only make things worse. 1/n #r4today 
This has been one of @scotgov ‘s long standing fears.@GOVUK wants to reduce vital environmental protections #Brexit  
we have no cards in our hand at all. . .just begging and bluster . . .#NotInMyName #Brexit #exitBrexit #StopBrexit now! 
NZ First to announce it is submitting itself to a binding public referendum on what it should do.... 
Here’s a Crazy Thought: Why Not Just Give Up on Brexit?   | via @intelligencer 
The COURAGE of John McCain in opposing Trump really shows up The Cowardice of UK Labour and Tory Politicians on Brexit.  
Barzani has been thinking to secure a seat for his son, the referendum was partially to stregenthen the succession line. But backfired. 
Except that it wasn't Iran. Iran took advantage (as did Turkey). This was Abadi seeking to survive politically after referendum. US okayed.  
#Brexit will REDUCE food, wine and clothes costs by 20% - #Rees-#Mogg fires back at #Remainers  
No deal? A messy Brexit would cost U.K. families $345 a year 
ALERT:MASOB #UWAZULIIKE SE GOVERNORS FG..TO KILL ON 11/18 PUT IT ON IPOB TO BLOC REFERENDUM … 
Zealots put their blinkered ideology above all else, including the economy. The #Brexit mindset  
We have officially filed Request for Title and Summary For Proposed Referendum  
'We feel broken. The referendum was catastrophic...Our Kurdish leadership was supposed to think of the consequences'  
Brexit: the fantasy of the "no deal" - it doesn't even mean what they say it means ...  #Brexit.  
At worst, this is a no deal brexit. I'll leave this here as a reminder of what that would mean. 17/17  
Are voters really turning against #Brexit? The polling evidence suggests we could be at a tipping point  
The richest countries in the world just told Britain to reverse Brexit or destroy the economy | By @Rob_Merrick 
I wonder what possible motive the OECD would have for stating that reversing Brexit would boost the UK economy?  
Up against strong opposition, this must be a contender for the title of stupidest unforced error made by UKGov in Brexit negotiations 1/  
You know, @JKenney, Equalization is NOT a Constitutional issue. Can't use a referendum. This is yours & Harper's Equalization deal.#ableg 
Anyone who doesn’t understand what is happening with UK mentality on Brexit really needs to watch this  
Given the historical injustices they've suffered, it's hard to admit.  But the Kurds (or Barzani at least) really blew it with the referendum.  
Amber Rudd says that a no-deal Brexit is ‘unthinkable’. She is, alas, wrong  
We’ve lost more in the 16 months since  the #Brexit vote, due to #Brexit, than we paid in during previous 44 YEARS of EU membership. 
Brexit will destroy the UK economy and be used as an opportunity by the parasites to steal what is left #NHS and the next generation will look back and ask 'why did you let it happen' 
The #OECD has received a grand total of £85,173,454.91 from the #EU since 2007! IMPARTIALITY??? NO chance! #BBC #SKY #NEWS #BREXIT #UK #EU 
Carole Malone on Sky says a European think tank suggesting a 2nd Brexit referendum has 'no right' to an opinion .Arrogance, sound familiar ? 
‘While all eyes look to Brexit, our NHS is about to collapse’ @guardian @pollytoynbee 
Brexit will be like every other crazed scheme: promoters will blame lack of requisite zeal in implementation, rather than inherent flaws 
45 years since royal assent of 1972 European Communities Act; due to 69 Labour MPs like John Smith who defied whip & would now reject Brexit pic.twitter.com/aeJCuGD1Wq 
#OECD: '#Brexit should be reversed'. The OECD has received more than £85m from the #EU since 2007! #BBC #SKY #ITV #NEWS #UK #TORY #LABOUR 
Commentary: How money will divide Europe after Brexit  
Brexit: Dad's Army episode. Don't tell him Pike!  
The Berlin bureau chief of @TheEconomist has launched a new Stop Brexit political party...  
'extra 1,200 immigration caseworkers to register 3m EU nationals'; so that's where 'Brexit dividend' going, not NHS  
The BBC hates Brexit so much it has four times more pro-EU guests on its flagship politics shows than Leave backers  
#Brexit Stop trying to stop Brexit everyday.!! Ken Clarke, Chuka Umunna,  Alastair Campbell. And the rest of the bloody bores. Yawn Yawn.  
If only @jeremycorbyn had not facilitated this Mr Starmer @Keir_Starmer. Time to start saving the country by vigorously opposing Brexit.  
International silence on Iraqi forces retaking of disputed territories is tacit approval. Shows how much goodwill KRG lost with referendum 
Recognition at last of havoc #Brexit & Withdrawal Bill are set to wreak on environmental laws, & of our amendments  
Trust this: The City is screaming. The  @Telegraph  has to act like they're in the real world. Or else they look REALLY REALLY BAD.#Brexit  
Cabinet split is the permanent headline. It’s also the biggest risk to Brexit negotiations.   
So come on then...let's do it & put this damaging #Brexit nightmare behind us... give us a #finalsay on divorce deal with a #Remain option 
"Our farmers are unable to find labour this year, never mind post-Brexit" #stopbrexit#brexitwontwork 
Taoiseach - On #Brexit : You can’t have the benefits of being a member of a club if you don’t obey the rules and you won’t pay the membership fee.  #SpotlightNI 
Just when we thought the British establishment couldn't be more lost and confused in this unholy Brexit mess....  
Quelle surprise, Farage now laying into the 'globalist' OECD for daring to challenge his ludicrous Putinesque vision of a broken Europe. 
Great debate & challenge @Rene_Cassin JW3 tonight. Put me through my paces on human rights, Brexit & the state of politics!  
Wondering what went wrong with #Kurdish referendum and aftermath?  Resending my article @lawfare 
Sure, Brexit talks are complex with 1000 of strands. Trouble is UK is failing with the very first item#stopbrexit 
With evidence of a failing Brexit, who needs prophecy? | Rafael Behr  
All the Trump and Brexit feckhead chat could stay on OLD Twitter. Over on NEW Twitter we'd just be having the craic 2/3 
Read this thread.  And remember it next time you read the Economist's bs Brexit analysis  
Welcome to the world of the Brexit fantasists. An observation from the Guardian. The fact is  Britain is better off in the EU. #StopBrexit 
We were promised a lot by the Leave mob. They overpromised and haven’t delivered. Brexit is savaging ordinary British workers. #FinalSay 
Theresa May aka Mrs Bean and her Brexit Backwards Express. Watch video - Made in Germany  
Cam played Russian roulette with the UK in a bid  to slap down his crazy EU-hating rightwing  plus @Nigel_Farage  He lost. WE  pay#Brexit  
Get ready for a no deal Brexit  
So called “project fear” was more right than wrong. There’s nothing to be gained by lying to ourselves. We must reconsider Brexit. #FinalSay 
Brexit is like a penis. The harder it gets, the more likely it is you'll end up getting screwed. 
LIKE & RETWEET.You won’t win anything. But YOU will help us popularise the demand for a referendum on Irish Unity. #UnityRef  
Another item for the Brexit Public Inquiry Commission  
"Look, it will at least fall short of Armageddon, ok?" is not the Brexit we were promised.  
Huge splits are threatening to emerge at the top of Government over the possibility of a "no-deal" #Brexit  
never thought I'd say it about our @BBC but ashamed that they have taken such a biased approach to #Brexit. #StopBrexit today! 
Why doesn’t #BBCNews mention that a reason for higher #inflation is devaluation of £ after #brexit referendum?Call 03700100222 to complain! 
If I had £1 for every Leave voter admitting that rising inflation was linked to Brexit I'd have zero £. 
Prices rising, pound fallen, wages static, house values down. But fear not Brexit Boris is shoving the ship of state down the slipway. 
Alastair Campbell: Brexit Is Now Undeliverable - LBC @LBC  #stopbrexit 
The Great Brexit bake off. Where you tell all your suppliers to feck off, dig yer ain tatties, make scones and say everything's wonderful. 
Army could be deployed to protect the border if Britain leaves the EU without a Brexit deal  
This just to sayI have looked upthe WTO ruleson plumsthat you were probablysaving for a hard BrexitThey're the sameas the EU'sLol  
Time running out for Brexit transition deal, Bank of England warns  
We only want referendum not war - Nnamdi Kanu's co-defendant begs in court  
Complacency here mind-boggling: "business will leave b/c of #Brexit anyways so then we can just walk away w/no deal"  
To help our gov negotiate the best Brexit deal & break the deadlock I think we need to be boycotting all EU produce! 
Amber Rudd contradicts David Davis and says no Brexit deal would be 'unthinkable'  
Fuk off. I'll never support Brexit and I'll always think those that support it r dickheads. Go away & take your uk ruination policy with you  
Remotely interested in a possible new anti-Brexit party with transformative social-liberal policies? Email "I'm in" to: radicalsuk@gmail.com 
After five rounds of Brexit talks, David Davis runs out of bluster | John Crace  
Cabinet chaos: Amber Rudd brands a no-deal Brexit "unthinkable" while David Davis insists it must remain an option.  
It’s the ministers who know how bad #Brexit is going to be and *still* keep schtum that should really be ashamed. Why? Just why? 
Peter Brookes on how well Brexit negotiations are going for the Government - political cartoon gallery in Putney  
EXCL: @vincecable @LibDems calls for post #Brexit protection for #steel industry  #SaveOurSteel #LibDems 
I feel the same and constantly think sbout giving up tweeting about Brexit. But I keep buggering on, just a bit longer. 
Do you want more autonomy from Rome, referendum asks Northern Italians? They'll likely vote yes, then what?  
"The idea that Brexit, Trump and sexual assault are all linked is baffling and insulting": @Tom_Slater_ debating @zoesqwilliams on @SkyNews 
First we had Brexit, then came Trump, and now @LiamcBakes is out of Bake Off! #GBBO 
Brexit BLOCK: Rudd ready to rollout ARMY to help man borders in event of 'no deal' with EU  
A new referendum or change of government leading to the UK staying within the EU would have a "significant" positive impact on growth @OECD 
Worst decision since Brexit #gbbo 
All this cobblers about 'high' inflation due to #Brexit. Due to BOE policy it's been rising since Feb 2015, 16 months before #Brexit vote.  
Ireland may say Brexit talks can only move on there's a guarantee about its border  
The Conservative Party approach to Brexit is easier to understand if you assume they're a team on the Apprentice. 
We now go live to #Brexit#GBBO 
Remain = Sane"Reverse Brexit with second referendum to save your economy, OECD tells UK"  … 
Remainers, please remember that when Brexit collapses it will be entirely our fault.  
What. A. Shambles. As Brexit talks stall, there is not even a consistent Tory view on No Deal. #NoConfidence 
No Deal Brexit + Slashing Tariffs = Reduced Prices  
Hardliners will howl with rage but most of the UK will welcome it if May is honest about Brexit’s awful consequences  
BAe 2000 jobs cut Vauxhall 400 Sainsburys 2000 Monarch 21006500 UK JOBS LOST IN 10 DAYSA 'Jobs First’ Brexit'Whose-Job's-First-To-Go?' 
Brexit ‘is the gold standard against which all turbo-charged shitshows of the future will be measured and come up wanting’ @tompeck  
The Home Sec disagrees today with Brexit sec on “No Deal” outcome.And then we get THIS.UK,you are doing a good job of pissing off Ireland.  
No. I wanted to understand why you're still supporting Brexit. That thing you never talk about.  
Even though they were warned about the consequences numerous times prior the vote, the Brexit penny is now finally dropping for many.  
A Parliamentary debate will be held 11 Dec on proposed referendum on the final Brexit deal. Would you be willing to ask your MP to support?  
With evidence of a failing Brexit, who needs prophecy? | Rafael Behr  
We have a Brexit policy?  
Some call this thread by my colleague delusional but I fully support delusion as the best alternative to Brexit. Hope has to start somewhere  
Shameless Nick Clegg accuses Brexiteers of 'industrial scale fibbing' in anti-Brexit rant  PISS OFF NICK CLEGG 
Deal or no deal? Amber Rudd and David Davis are at odds over whether the UK could leave the EU without a deal as Brexit talks stall  
Richard Tice - "Unless we get some progress in the next couple of weeks, literally two or three weeks, we are off. Off and leave." #Brexit  
The time has come for Theresa May to tell the nation: Brexit can’t be done | Alastair Campbell  
We've seen living standards, investment, the pound & growth all fall. Time for Brexit to fall.  via @PoliticsHome 
We're excited to announce @ElspethHoskins as our latest addition to the MLMS team leading @Appg_Brexit. Welcome to the team Elspeth   
Today Tories cheered when minister denounced MPs who went to Barca during recess to observe Catalonia referendum. Tomorrow....  
Hi @pdegrauwe! You argue  Catalan secessionism, as Brexit, is the result of "identitarian and nationalist drives". Well, these are facts:  
'Stopping Brexit could avert a disaster for Britain’s economy'  
From #ProjectFear to #ProjectBollocksBrexit will be 'like in the Blitz', the (EU funded) OECD warns UK  
And if you think the above is far-fetched, you should read the British government's current Brexit "policy". 
In the past hour all anti Brexit. 100% remoaner guests.These last few days have been a coordinated attack on Brexit by msm networks.  
UK told to 'reverse Brexit' by richest countries in the world  
The establishment are playing a huge part in conditioning us to accept a Brexit in name only. We must ensure we are fully out the EU 290319! 
Brexit is really starting to piss me off 
If this government really believes in democracy then it should give us the right to have a say on the finale deal on brexit. #StopBrexit 
Interesting intra-family rivalries inside Barzani, Talabani family, Nechervan vs Masrur & Bafel vs Qubad: we saw this in referendum & Kirkuk 
A second referendum that reverses Brexit would have a positive impact on the UK economy, a global think tank claims  
Great insights from Tony Connelly @tconnellyRTE on dangers & opportunities of Brexit this eve at launch of his new book 'Brexit & Ireland' pic.twitter.com/IJyYgGXxI0 
No, they predicted economic Armageddon if Brexit HAPPENED, which it hasn't yet. But the mere prospect is damaging the economy already.  
If we can trade fine with #EU on WTO terms, why do Brexiters think it is so vital to seek trade deals with others? #Brexit #logic 
Let's keep things simple. Just stopping Brexit would be a lottery win for Britain. We'll then need perhaps a decade to rebuild trust.  
Bill Clinton says some people who voted for Brexit not fully aware of consequences. Says co-operation always better than isolation. 
Lazy Casper Schmeichel couldn't be bothered to jump to save the free kick last night. Hard Brexit Ben Hamer would have jumped for it even if it meant landing on his mum's face. Hard worker  
As every sound Brexist knows, Remainers are entirely to blame for Brexit, and for wrecking Brexit. 
Iraqi PM: Kurdistan referendum is over, belongs in the past  
Chris Grayling wants the UK to grow its own food after Brexit – start planning your cabbage patches now   
With the right strategy a Britain that ditched Brexit this year could be running the EU - the world's largest economy - within 18 months. 
Brexit: David Davis and Amber Rudd contradict each other on 'no deal' – video  
Gonna have to wait twenty years to see files on #Brexit negotiations pile up. Might be my last book before retirement. Could be a belter. 
If Britain wants to turn the economy around and avoid economic disaster it just has to reverse Brexit. It's that simple. Time to #StopBrexit 
Liam Fox, 2020: 'See? Brexit wasn't so bad'.  
The time has come for Theresa May to tell the nation: Brexit can’t be done | Alastair Campbell | Opinion  
OECD: "a second referendum to reverse Brexit would give a “significant” boost to the UK economy"  via @yahooNewsUK 
Brexit: Foodbanks - for the many, not the few#publishthe50 
The Guardian view on the Brexit talks: it’s the economy, stupid | Editorial  
Reverse Brexit with second referendum to save your economy, OECD tells UK @Labour4EU #StopBrexit 
Britain poorest families would be the worst hit if there's no Brexit trade deal  
Petition: House of Commons vote on whether Brexit should be cancelled 
The EU funded OECD want a second referendum. They should stop meddling in our politics.  
'Cos that worked so well last time!The Irish border is reason enough to #StopBrexit, let alone the cost of #Brexit & damage to our standing  
"What's happened is that Brexit has brought your eyebrows down, and that has largened up your forehead"  
37.42% of eligible electors supported Brexit.38.47% of eligible electors supported Catalan independence. 
The OECD says reversing Brexit would boost the economy. @Nigel_Farage gives his unmissable reaction live from LA 
This tweet now in sketch form: "The Tory Brexit negotiating position? S*** on the cake then threaten to eat it."  
Great read by @CampbellMacD on how the #Kurdish referendum backfired 
So the UK has "lost" £469 billion since Brexit. That's more than ALL the net membership fees we've ever paid to the EU!Gone in one year.  
Truth is, fella, that if things had gone well, I might have got behind brexit. But it hasn't. So I can't. 
Tried FT for first time in yonks. It really is an unreadable anti Brexit whingefest. Advocacy by overrated pundits masquerading as analysis 
Brexit working out great so far   
Catalan government's referendum law declared void and two separatist leaders detained  
Imagine we’ve gone 4-4-2 at the Bernabeu. Proper Brexit football. 
We continue to consult widely on Brexit. We are listening to businesses across the UK. We are writing down what they say. Very carefully. 
Must-read by @DeadmanMax on Kirkuk, KDP, Peshmerga, Kurdish referendum & other #Iraq matters that media gets wrong: 
My god Nigel. I thought you'd never come round. But yes #Brexit is depressing. And jeopardises our security efforts. Bravo for the u turn  
Finally! As I keep saying, It’s all about the money. Think we didn’t make a Brexit plan? The EU didn’t either. #budgetblackhole 
Tory Brexit strategy. Tories have nothing to bargain so they goad EU & then label them as the boogie man to appease right wing supporters.  
The OECD also suggested halting/reversing Brexit - clearly what Labour should back as the best for the UK economy.  
Britain's economic prognosis is grim – it may be time to consider reversing Brexit  
#Brexit is not all about the economy. It's about not being consumed into a United States of Europe, ruled by people we didn't elect and can't get rid of 
I think Brexit is far, far worse than Suez. It's a much bigger step down in Britain's political strength, and a big loss of relative wealth. 
The illegal referendum is over, its results invalid and belongs in the past. We call for dialogue based on Iraq’s national constitution 
The Spanish authorities brought in thousands of police officers in the run-up to the independence referendum  
The OECD are experts who use facts and evidence. They’re therefore irredeemably biased against brexit. 
."Flip-side would be a BOOST to UK growth expectations IF the Brexit decision was reversed"By @CliffTaylorIT 
Things the OECD doesn't blame for our weakening economy: "Remoaners". Things the OECD does blame: Brexit. 
Lord Bamford (JCB), Sir James Dyson (Dyson), Christopher Nieper (David Nieper), Tim Martin (Wetherspoon), Luke Johnson (Patisserie Valerie and others), John Elliott (Ebac) and numerous other UK business people support and welcome Brexit. The reason? We'll thrive when it occurs. 
HAMMOND: #DUP tell #TheresaMay the Chancellor needs to back #Brexit or his position becomes 'untenable'. About time!  
Home office refuses to rule out soldiers patrolling UK borders in no deal Brexit  
Not sure it's even as is sadly portrayed here - the UK is split deep within, family against family, friend against friend. Cursed Referendum  
key data. The green line is ‘do you think Brexit will make you worse off?’ Blue = better off. The mood is turning  
#EU27 ministers discussed the state of play of Brexit negotiations & the relocation of the #EUagencies #EBA #EMA  
Time for some military discipline and a Granite Brexit approach at the city. 0500hrs rise for the players, hill running at Bradgate Park and wallop any lazy foreign players out of the club. I'm ex-forces, know what I'm on about 
Nice to see this work in print. Beyond Brexit: the impact of leaving the EU on the youth work sector @annettecoburn59 @UofGEducation 
WATCH: @Keir_Starmer warns Tory ministers about the seriousness of the current deadlock in Brexit negotiations. RT if you agree  
#Merkel: #Boris is blocking #Brexit by refusing to pay a larger bill. Angela, you've had £500bn+ since 1973 Have you not squeezed us enough?  
Those who keep pushing Brexit in the face of the undeniable reality that it's catastrophic are the traitors & treasonors  
Widely retweeted, but the anger coupled with deep understanding here is quite something. No deal is beyond dire. #Brexit  
Advice to #OECD - change the record. We've heard all this before. Time to think of upsides to #Brexit.  
On 26 Sep @acgrayling delivered a devastating critique of #Brexit at @CanterburyCCUni. Pictured with Amelia Hadfield @CCCUCEFEUS @grahambsi 
2nd referendum IS democratic. Democratic votes aren’t binding forever, after voters dead. Election every 5 years allows change of mind. 
Brexit latest  
Part of the plan?Boris and chums are looking increasingly isolated as OECD says Brexit will be a disaster 
The Treasury has rejected call for a second EU referendum by the OECD which says it would significantly benefit the UK economy. 
The graveytrain leaving platform 10 is heading to oblivion driven by a laughing May with a carriage full cronies BREXITShambles 
Why is it we can get a report on #Brexit from the #OECD but not the one that's been produced by our own government @DavidDavisMP? 
It has become a Council ritual. She speaks. Nobody responds. She leaves the room. The 27 talk about Brexit over cake and coffee 
A "no-deal" Brexit still feels unlikely until you remember most thought Brexit was. 
Brexit is becoming greatest national humiliation since Suez.Even after there is a deal, the memory of this pathetic pleading will linger.  
City lobbyists demand a Brexit deal.  They need to prepare for the reality that the EU isn't interested in one.  
No, a Paris based EU funded Quango just told UK to reverse Brexit. They can stick it.  
Taking back control for @IKEAUK means putting up prices by 3% because of #Brexit & complaining about @theresa_may negotiating incompetence 
BBC News - No-deal Brexit requires a general election, Carwyn Jones says  #itvnews 
Well the OECD seem to know what the impact of Brexit would be @DExEUgov - want to refute? #BrexitReports 
You refer to Brexit. A concept voted for by 17.4 million people as poison, and then question her moral compass.I'm guessing "irony" is not a concept within your vocabulary? 
When @BBCNormanS said on @BBCRadio4 just now that #Remainers have given up calling for a 2nd Referendum he doesn't speak for us. #StopBrexit 
Brexit Britain: Things can only get worse... #StopBrexit 
Bill Clinton: Brexit impact may only just be dawning on some Leave voters  
Time running out for Brexit transition deal, Bank of England warns  
.@JolyonMaugham doesn't like my Brexit stance so he thinks it's just fine for his fans to tweet that I & *MY 10 YEAR OLD DAUGHTER* are Nazis  
Brexit fears are having an impact on new car sales in Europe  
Exactly. An advisory referendum with no super majority, leave campaign funded with dodgy foreign money, 3 million plus who've paid tax here denied a vote. Only 37% of electorate voted for Brexit, 26% of the entire population.Reasons to ignore the referendum are almost endless. 
Carry on Catherine standing up for for us all and against the madness of Brexit!#libdems .@catherinemep 
Lost jobs, £ through the floor, businesses going, inflation rocketing, everyone poorer-Brexit is just lies & broken promises.  #FinalSay 
The consequences are becoming clearer. The case for us to have the #finalsay on Brexit gets stronger every day.  
Of course there should be a 2nd referendum. People are entitled to change their minds.Just like Theresa May and Boris Johnson did.  
Yay! There's a Stockport for Europe! . Let's push back on this story that the north is pro #Brexit @LeedsEurope @Mcr4EU @ChesterfieldEU 
I'm afraid the Brexit poison has corroded her moral compass. 
More social issues featured in the #JustLikeYou lyric video include Brexit, sexual assault & protesting police brutality/racial inequality.  
One correction to this article. It was the UKGovt who said 2002 Gibraltar Referendum was illegal & "eccentric". Later they backed down 1/2  
Don’t panic Brexit Britain the future is here..OHCanada, Mexico to firmly reject US NAFTA proposals  
The case for protecting the economy by reversing Brexit is getting stronger by the day - @JoSwinson #ExitFromBrexit 
Votes for Brexit much more correlated with dissatisfaction with financial situation than age or anything else  
Amber Rudd says Brexit without a 'deal' (i.e. without paying a gigantic ransom) is "unthinkable"; it's about time she started thinking. 
A 'no deal' Brexit means a hard border & higher cost of living here. Theresa May needs to catch a grip -@ClaireHanna  
Imagine you woke up tomorrow and Brexit had been cancelled.Now translate that feeling you have into consumer & investment confidence. 
Brexit hits European car sales!Nothing to do with German car makers cheating on exhaust emission tests by installing secret software resulting in billions in fines & legal fees making it one of the most expensive corporate scandals in history.#Brexit #EU 
Brexiters claimed #Brexit would lower food prices. Their argument is flawed. Meanwhile inflation is at 3%. 
This is and has always been the crux of #Brexit #StopBrexit 
Brexit evidence mounting we need to do what David Davis once justified: “If a democracy cannot change its mind, it ceases to be a democracy” 
Alastair Campbell tells LBC he has come to one simple conclusion: Brexit is simply undeliverable  
The influential OECD said the deadlock in the exit talks now threatened a “disorderly Brexit”, with severe consequences.  
Really interesting @OpenEurope event. Three imperfect but viable models, each with their own strengths and weaknesses, weighed up. Incredible to think we're still doing this, with no answer in sight, 15 months after the Brexit vote though. 
Things That Brexit IsXenophobic Self-DestructiveIll informed Irrational Immoral DefeatistDivisiveChaotic Permanent Stoppable 
Officialy recognised flag?We also have our own anthemWe are a countryWe are kashmirisWe demand referendum#KashExit#KashmirRejectsIndia 
Political decision to reverse Brexit would have "significant" positive impact on UK economy, says leading think-tank  
Loving how the Leave trolls on twitter are insisting that these 35 OECD members know nothing about Brexit economics   
No thanks. I love my country & wouldn't want to be part of anything that's going to cripple it. You voted for it, you own it! #Brexit  
NO way! @theresa_may confirms NO second referendum after OECD calls for another vote on Brexit  
OECD says reversing Brexit would boost our economy. Once facts are clear, people must have final say with chance to #ExitFromBrexit 
Amber Rudd calls Brexit without a deal 'unthinkable'  
Just recently, Dominic Raab MP said a rise in hate crimes since Brexit was down to changes in the way hate crimes are recorded #C4News. 
Will London tech still attract foreign capital post-Brexit? Hear from our international experts 16 Nov  @HereEast 
I agree and slowest growing country in the Eu is the UK....that is what the lunatic Brexit vote has done!  
44) friends and allies. The #referendum has now completely blown up in the face of its author. Even if the KDP tries to put all the blame >> 
My joint statement with @Feorlean following @epc_eu and @WalesGovernance event on #Brexit  
43) #Barzani’s downfall is his own doing—he set himself up for it by pushing this #referendum forward against the advice of his closest >> 
These are the traitors undermining Brexit by the day yet Theresa May keeps them in high office   
Shadow Brexit Secretary @Keir_Starmer says "only fantasists and fanatics talk up no deal". 
While the whole country is in turmoil over Brexit, we have a Government fighting among themselves. End #Brexit NOW!  
'Chemistry has no nationality' – read reflections on Brexit from our president John Holman 
SHOCKINGLY sick #Tory #Brexit Withdrawal Bill scraps most environmental protections outright  
Government must end the complacency, stop pandering to the Tory right, and put the jobs and the economy first in Brexit negotiations. 
Have you changed your mind on #Brexit? Please vote and retweet for a big sample 
Pleased to speak at @epc_eu @WalesGovernance event on #Brexit and the devolved administrations alongside @wgcs_finlgov & @cathycgh 
》OECD warns UK to abandon Brexit》The 35 OECD members are ALL countries UK's desperate to trade with after Brexit》Can't UK take a hint?  
Since the referendum, compared to the rest of the world the UK's GDP has significantly slowed.  
Today's OECD report makes for alarming reading, and emphasises the need for the government to put the economy first in Brexit negotiations. 
Despite Brexit  
My latest Brexit rant for @guardianopinion. Hope I won't lose too many British friends over it... #BrexitReality 
Genuine question to those in London: faced with economic slump & rising hate crimes are "liberal Leavers" reconsidering the case for Brexit?  
Dear Bill (+ loser wife)Us #Brexiters like #deplorables showed your kind the door.Live with it!#Clinton #Brexit 
The richest countries in the world just told Britain to reverse Brexit or destroy the economy  
.@stormontweets Such nauseating arrogance over Brexit from Clinton. 
Disappointed that despite calls from over 150 MP's and threats of legal action @DExEUgov still refusing to publish Brexit impact assessments  
Now it's official. The WHOLE WORLD thinks Brexit is mad!☟Reverse Brexit with 2nd ref to save economy OECD tells UK  
Get Pearson in, Nugent back up front, bin off the foreigners and play hard brexit football. 
If the govt doesn't like what the OECD or Resolution Foundation reports say about Brexit, it should publish the impact assessments it's done to prove them wrong   
.@ChukaUmunna slams the Government's chaos after Davis & Rudd contradict each other over a no deal #Brexit  
While all eyes look to Brexit, our NHS is about to collapse. Insightful commentary on the NHS from @pollytoynbee 
Just weeks after holding a disputed independence referendum, Kurds are retreating in Iraq  
Top think tank tells Britain: Reverse Brexit with a second referendum to save the UK's economy  
Don’t worry #Brexit will be fine. Boris and David Davis know more about economics than  the OECD. #SaidNoOneEver 
‘Beyond Brexit’: @annettecoburn59 and @SineadGormally explore the impact of leaving the EU on youth work 
hard argue against brexit influencing this - it validated nasty views & emboldened some people to act on them?  
May wants to take the floor at EU summit dinner on Thursday to explain Brexit policy to fellow leaders, senior official says 
.@joswinson - “The case for protecting the economy by reversing Brexit is getting stronger by the day." 
We are losing our place in the world at the top table because of Brexit. Brexit is damaging Britain. Time to stop the rot and #StopBrexit 
Suggestion that those with different views on Brexit "joined forces with terrorist sympathisers" is a new low - even for this MP  
This is extraordinary - does the EU know that army cannot be ruled on its only land border with UK post Brexit? Ireland/Northern Ireland?  
WATCH Tory Brexit splits resurface as Amber Rudd says 'no deal' outcome is 'unthinkable' 
I have never known the country more divided. And whatever happens now, it will take many years for these divisions to heal, and it is a tragedy - quite apart from the catastrophic damage that Brexit will cause. A disgrace indeed. 
We have a PM who thinks seeking to test the legality of a govt action in court is subverting democracy. Fascists think like that. #Brexit  
British police force to Ban White Men from Recruitment Workshops Through ‘Positive Discrimination’  via @Your Brexit 
UK EU citizens very concerned our own government has no care for our or other EU citizens rights We need help to stop this Brexit madness 
Q. Wasn't Mervyn King the fool who was calling for hard Brexit or WTO 10 months ago?A. Yes he was.  
Many Britons believe that there is no such thing as a successful #Brexit - or is it that we no longer count as belonging to the 'people'? 
Home Office top civil servant tells MPs he can't rule out using soldiers at UK borders if no Brexit deal but "absolute last resort" 
A disgrace that Conservatives from the PM downwards are peddling such blatant and damaging lies. The country is not united behind #Brexit.  
Scrap Brexit to rescue UK’s flagging economy says OECD  
Far from being unthinkable, a no deal would be my preferred to achieve a fast, clean and boring brexit. The sooner we get on with it the better. #brexit 
Austria's new leader rejected the EU orthodoxy on Brexit says @asabenn 
Home Office Permanent Secretary Philip Rutnam says it would be unwise to rule out using troops to police the borders in a no-deal Brexit. 
#Brexit Negotiations reach a crucial stage.Long range photo reveals David Davis throttling Jean-Claude while Theresa moves in for the kill.  
#London Is Still Top #FinTech Dog And The Industry Wants It To Stay That Way  @pymnts #insurtech #brexit #VC 
EU makes clear to Britain it wants more concessions in Brexit talks  
Amber Rudd says it's "unthinkable" that EU citizens will be asked to leave UK after Brexit but repeatedly refuses to absolutely guarantee it 
Man who said voters were too thick to vote in EU referendum thinks we should hold another EU referendum.  
If Brexit Govt really wanted "Brexit at any cost" they'd have paid that divorce bill v fast to ensure they got onto the trade stage #Muppets 
On the day the @resfoundation revealed the true cost of No Deal, let's remind ourselves of how Liam Fox predicted Brexit would all be going.  
This. Right after the Brexit vote when everyone was running around in shock, Merkel was instrumental in forming EU27 unity we see today.  
2nd referendum but not too soon. Wait for more young voters & when full extent of trainwreck is even more obvious. Need two-thirds majority 
Food prices are set on the international markets six months in advance. That's why it took so long for the Brexit effect to work through.  
Brexit could cost UK £40 billion by 2019 and £400 billion by 2030. Put that on the side of a bus.#Brexit #OECD 
Home Secretary Amber Rudd says it wd be "unthinkable" to have No Deal  on Brexit. 
Many farmers apparently voted for Brexit.They have a powerful voice.They should tell their MPs they've changed their minds, if they have.  
Parliament WILL debate #2ndref. Right that people have a chance to reverse historic #Brexit mistake.  #FinalSay 
Wow. Amber Rudd tells the Home Affairs Committee a no deal Brexit is "unthinkable". Not sure some Tory colleagues are so certain. 
The #Brexit scare stories are designed to sap our national self-confidence & promote the ludicrous idea that we are lost without Luxembourg 
Vauxhall, Mini, now Toyota says Brexit threatens UK production  
Every day more and more chaos and uncertainty from brexit - no deal means not just economic headaches but security ones too..  
WATCH: @CarolineLucas is absolutely right to say that the Gov should give the Commons a meaningful vote on Brexit talks. Please RT:  
Do you believe Reversing #Brexit would boost economy? @OECD says OECD RETWEET & VOTE #yourvoice 
Major leave campaigners now saying #brexit turning into a disaster and me wondering when were the odds ever in favour of that not happening? 
The truth about the job losses at Ellesmere Port.  #Brexit  
The richest countries in the world just told Britain to reverse Brexit or destroy the economy  
Recent BBC Newsnight segments include videos on "white dominance" & Brexit handing control to "ill-informed voters".  
EU diplomat describes Theresa May as seeking"magic solutions" during her dinner in Brussels  …#Brexit #StopBrexit /1 
.@heidi_mp challenges David Davis on whether the UK will remain members of EU regulatory bodies, such as the Medicines Agency, after Brexit  
The Latest: Spain's top court officially rules that Catalonia's disputed independence referendum was illegal.  
Yes, it'll be entirely my fault that Brexit negotiations fail. I'll be delighted to take all the credit!  
Davis Davis accuses Brexit critics  of "talking down the economy" 
Taleemi Referendum 2017Students’ Demands:1. Modern,Progressive & Uniform Edu System 2. Increase in edu budget #EducationalReferendum 
Catalan referendum law ‘violates supremacy of Constitution, national sovereignty and unity of Spanish nation’ –court  
Er, who's going to break it to John McDonnell that Labour voters voted Leave too and his party's own manifesto backed Brexit in June...?  
OECD says reversing Brexit would significantly boost our economy. British people must have choice to accept final deal or exit from Brexit 
DUP fined by @ElectoralCommUK for taking illegal donation during Brexit Referendum - but we're not allowed to know details. More to come.  
Reminder: Referendum voters were grossly misinformed about the main issues. No mandate for a #Brexit built on lies!#StopBrexit #Remain 
PM May's search in Brussels for "magical #Brexit solutions" My thoughts:  
MEP: International community must stand up for Catalan people and ensure #1Oct referendum respected  #LlibertatJordis 
No. Any opinion on #Brexit yet? 
Gove excited that Hard Brexit’ll let us sell more pigs ears to China. There’s big money in that racket. 
People arguing about stopping Brexit miss the point. Isn't about reversing the referendum. Now also about reversing the general election. 
Shadow Chancellor: OECD "fearful of what a Tory Brexit could mean" after think tank said reversal of Brexit would be "positive" for economy 
The Government is marching us headfirst towards a #brexit disaster. Time to unite against this recklessness:  
Brexit unites many of those who bypass the truth, act surreptitiously, attack the judiciary, undermine Parliament & tolerate intolerance.  
"We need to drop the nonsense about no deal," Labour's Keir Starmer says of Brexit talks  
Spain just declared Catalan referendum law void   
Spain's Constitutional Court declares Catalan referendum law void  
Carney: UK banking system needs to be resilient to withstand Brexit scenarios that are "relatively unlikely and certainly ill-advised" 
OECD which receives millions in funding from the EU & got its post-EU ref forecasts wrong tells us to reverse Brexit  
If OECD cannot see blocking Brexit would have awful consequences for political consent that would cause economic harm it has lost the plot. 
Except that the blue sky politics thinkers on the Brexit side still don't get the politics driving the EU-27.  
When OECD tells you to reverse Brexit or suffer the dire consequences then it’s time to take the experts seriously 
BREAKING: Spain's Constitutional Court declares Catalan referendum law void  
in my mind, #Brexit is the greatest step toward freedom and #democracy that this country has made since the defeat of the Nazis.  
OECD: reversing #Brexit would hav positive impact on UK economy. Care to publish 50secret reports and prove going ahead is even better? No?  
After Theresa May's dinner in Brussels showed no sign of a breakthrough, is it time to admit Brexit can't be done?  
Everyone should see Hillary Clinton take down Brexit and Donald Trump in 90 seconds  
The rich who are funding Brexit don't care about the poor that who will be hit hardest by Brexit. It's time to #StopBrexit 
BBC News - Reversing Brexit would boost economy, says OECD  
A new report says Brexit means "serious economic uncertainties that could stifle growth for years to come” in the UK  
The frontline soldiers of the Brexit civil war look like they haven’t got above walking pace in twenty years.  
Carney: Brexit is opportunity for UK to sign trade deals and reshape regulations exclusively tailored to UK interests and the UK economy 
The OECD has been damning of the Tories’ bungling of the Brexit negotiations - @johnmcdonnellMP 
Haha, yeah you tell em Julia! Who needs those pesky experts eh? We can  watch the economy collapse instead, as long as we are free from the  'tyranny' of EU wealth creation and trade.Brexit is bonkers. 
After the OECD report we need to put a 2nd Referendum and staying in the EU back on the agenda @ChukaUmunna 
Companies leaving UK, 3% inflation, Sterling plummeting. FFS what more evidence do you need that Brexit will be a disaster if it happens? 
OECD says reversing Brexit would boost economy  
Vince Cable dismisses David Davis's 'absurd' plea to suspend MEP who voted against opening post-Brexit trade talks  
Huge, why aren't people listening, inflation up again, interest rates to go up and now this, Brexit is destroying our economy wake up  
Since the #Brexit vote has weakened our pound, prices have soared at their fastest rate for half a decade  
This really is quite something: reversing Brexit would have a "significant" positive impact on the UK economy, according to OECD  
So The EU funded OECD Say Reversing Brexit would help the (Their) economy.. They would say that,wouldn't they..  
The richest countries in the world just told Britain to reverse Brexit or destroy the economy  
If Brexit is reversed "the positive impact on growth would be significant" @OECD 
If it's this bad - which we know it is - a 2nd Referendum is too risky. MPs need to do their job in parliament  
Free trade with Australia in 15 MONTHS: Australia poised for ‘quick’ Brexit deal 
OECD: 'Significant positive impact' on economy if Brexit stoppedIt is now crystal clear we need to #exitfrombrexit 
Now the OECD says that reversing Brexit would boost U.K. economy. With inflation at a 5-yr high, the time has come to halt this folly 
On point of order @joannaccherry says SNP did not send “official observers” to an illegal referendum demands an apology from ministers 
The next time someone shouts down the idea of a second referendum or reversing Brexit remind them of this quote from the OECD #StopBrexit 
Government rejects calls from OECD to reverse Brexit for the sake of the economy 
Also downgrade in UK credit rating, drop in EU nurses. But JHB & the rich, #brexit elite aren't affected. Only ordinary people get hurt. 
OECD: 'Brexit should be reversed'.In other news, the OECD has received more than £23m from the European Union since 2007.  
So the @OECD and @BankofEngland sounding warnings on Brexit outcomes - its April 2016 redux, but this time on day inflation hits 5 year high 
. @BillClinton compares Brexit to people deciding they can't stay together as they had row then only realising implications later 
Governor Carney says if there is a "material change in circumstances" (ie No Deal) on Brexit negotiations could change Bank of Eng forecasts 
Would Labour cough up €100 bn for the #Brexit bill? “I think they would… invertebrate jellies!” blasts Foreign Secretary @BorisJohnson 
Brexit could wipe £40bn off the economy in 18 months, experts warn  
Govt says "there will not be a second referendum" after OECD said a vote that reverses Brexit would have a "positive" impact on the economy 
If Boris is stopping May overpaying for Brexit then good for him. We don’t have to pay anything.   
The Brexit squeeze caused by the falling pound is getting worse, and it is hitting the poorest families hardest  
Our @Adamstoon1 @EveningStandard on the Brexit talks latest  
Reversal of Brexit would boost UK growth says OECD  
1/ Very illuminating from Finnish foreign minister Samuli Virtanen. When asked if May's weakness at home is a problem for the Brexit talks: 'It is and that's one of the things that makes the situation on the negotiating process a bit difficult... 
Want to get richer? Reverse Brexit! (OECD Report: ). 
OECD: UK economy would be boosted significantly if Brexit doesn’t happen  
The only way to de-legitimise Brexit is to have a first referendum on the facts. Public opinion is suggesting we should do that soon.  
OECD predicts £40bn wiped off UK economy by 2019, recommends 3rd Ref  #Brexit 
Reversing #Brexit with a second referendum would have a 'positive' impact on economy, OECD claims  
Hate crime has increased by a third in the year since Brexit. And we say:  
OECD: …and because weak productivity regions are most reliant on EU funds, Brexit may exacerbate that regional inequality  
When the former Vote Leave chief says Brexit is a disaster then you know things are going seriously wrong. It's time to #StopBrexit 
I didn't vote leave for financial reasons - neither did anyone I know A second referendum would be an utter joke  
OECD: higher inflation (caused by Brexit devaluation) has reduced real incomes  
The richest countries in the world just told Britain to reverse Brexit or destroy the economy  
Brexit could wipe £40bn off the economy in 18 months  
OECD: a disorderly Brexit would lead to "sovereign ratings downgrades" and "business investment would seize up."  
#BREAKING: Reversing Brexit with a second referendum would have a 'positive' impact on economy, OECD claims  
I think #TheresaMay's dinner went something like this last night..."I WANT MY #BREXIT!"#StopBrexit #BrexitShambles #StopBrexitNow 
Every single one of the OECD's sources predicted economic Armageddon if we voted Brexit. And they've all been proved wrong.  
Meeting the challenges of Brexit: #UK shd maintain close ties w/EU, implement policies to productivity  OECD report 
Brexiters will tell you Brexit isn’t to blame, but change of def etc. Well, I certainly know that I’ve never received abuse before Brexit...  
Keep close to the EU after Brexit or face long-term decline, OECD warns UK  
Brexit “cd stifle growth for years to come” says OECD. Press release:  
UK GDP growth has slowed considerably since the referendum, compared to EU/rest of developed world  
Be under no illusions Brexiters, there are now some very real & profound forces trying to stop Brexit - @telegraph  
Brexit reversal would boost UK growth, says OECD  
My @ feed full of sudden statistical experts who just *know* that there's been no actual increase in hate crimes post-Brexit vote. 
Thinking Brexit hadn’t made much difference to the UK economy? @OECD would beg to differ. Here follow a few charts from their latest report: 
The richest countries in the world just told Britain to reverse Brexit or destroy the economy  
Brexit inspired fall in the £ leads to rising inflation & real incomes falling while the Govt sits on the sidelines.  
The government acts as if a slim advisory referendum majority has given it the divine right of kings with regard to #Brexit. #StopBrexit 
OECD says reversing Brexit vote wd give  significant boost to economy 
Central banks failed to create inflation via massive QE experiment. Brexit has achieved the goal of modest inflation!  
Thanks to #Brexit inflation is now up to 3%. But that won't bother the triple lock Brexit supporting pensioners.  
Good news that a new study has shown that London will remain the ‘Fintech Hub’ of Europe after Brexit 
That widely reported @resfoundation report was spun negatively against #Brexit  
Duped?We spent 43years being lied to deceived and conned into every single EU treaty for no benefit whatsoever!#GreatDeception#Brexit  
123k signatures! The Commons debate approaching! Let's keep the final deal referendum petition rolling!#Brexit 
A massive kick in the teeth for working people whose benefits or wages are capped. Brexit is making you poorer - and it will get worse.  
Brexit poses an ‘extreme risk’ to our basic ability to feed ourselves. Don’t ignore the warnings, writes @MollyMEP 
There was surely never a better example of turkeys voting for Christmas than Wales & the #Brexit referendum  
UK's food security at risk from #Brexit. Could foodbank Britain turn into hungry Britain? My piece in @LeftFootFwd  
The Brexit squeeze is getting worse and hitting the poorest hardest. Chancellor must end benefits freeze  
This is so ridiculous. Not only is Davis intervening wrong, but the EP has to approve the final #Brexit deal! UK needs allies there.  
EU NHS staff leaving. 96%* reduction in EU nursing applications. Brexit. Great idea.  
We have kicked the manhole cover off the top of the sewer with our Brexit anti-immigration bullshit narrative.  
Merkel: Boris is blocking Brexit by refusing to pay a larger bill.Angela, you've had £500bn+ since 1973. Have you not squeezed us enough?  
New polling data suggests people may be starting to think Brexit was a mistake.  
Good to meet with @GuyVerhofstadt again in @Europarl_EN  to discuss #Brexit.  
What you are seeing in the EU negotiations over #Brexit is what happens when you give people power who cannot be removed. Tony Benn was right.  
NO DEAL: Republic of Ireland's Taoiseach warns EU to take "hardline" approach with Britain in Brexit negotiations.  
Theresa May's Government Fears Imminent Collapse Of Brexit Negotiations  
Look. The reason that Philip Hammond rejects preparing for a No Deal Brexit is he wants an Any Deal Brexit. His veneer is thin. 
Dominic Cummings, Chair of Vote Leave, now saying Brexit is becoming a disaster.  
Who’s to blame for Brexit’s fantasy politics? The experts, of course | Aditya Chakrabortty  
UK hate crimes surge on Brexit and militant attacks  
She doesn't shout about it, but the EU27's remarkably united stance on Brexit since June 23 2016 is mostly Angela Merkel's achievement.  
Lab saying "no deal" Brexit unacceptable cos they want to embolden Brussels to offer a crap deal then try to stop Brexit. Dishonest politics 
Worrying this. Regardless of your views on Brexit, we should salute the work of EU nationals in our NHS. 
Juncker calling the shots - again!Jean-Claude ORDERS new Austrian leader to form PRO-EU government...This could get very interesting!#Brexit #EU 
"The fall in the pound since last year's Brexit vote has helped to push up inflation..." to 3% - BBC News report   
David Davis writes important Brexit update for Private Eye  
Jacob Rees-Moog foresees a world of Penny Farthings, Ricketts, Child workers and the sublimation of women  #Brexit  
Dear Brexiters,This is what 48% looks like. You didn't even have a mandate from the referendum, and you certainly don't now.Regards,Tom  
Good to see the message going far and wide.I do like a 'most viewed/shared' slot. BREXIT CANNOT BE DONE MAY KNOWS IT  
No it doesn't. There's no evidence whatsoever that Brexit vote caused any rise in hate crimes. But, you know, facts.  
Anyone who campaigned for Brexit based on immigration, the blame for this lies at your door. You emboldened racists.  
‘Substantial’ fine linked to DUP’s secret Brexit donors - Day 2 of #brexitdarkmoney series from @openDemocracy 
The best way to stop more economic damage being done by the Brexit vote is for Govt to keep us in the Single Market & Customs Union /5 
Report warns prices will soar if Brexit is a No-Deal. This wil hit the poorest hardest. This is not better than a 'bad deal' #BrexitShambles 
If we get Brexit right, we can do great things. We can seize the opportunity to build a Britain that is stronger, fairer & more prosperous  
Spain's Guardia Civil searches emergency call center in Catalonia for recordings from October 1, the day of the referendum 
Great thread. Extraordinary that @johnredwood and many others who have been arguing for Brexit for years don't know these basic facts.  
The gap between inflation and wage rises grows, again. Did people really vote Brexit and Tory to bed worse off? It seems so 
Great letter. Imagine if Blair had called for the sacking of MEPs who challenged the 1975 referendum result?  
The big spike on this Home Office hate crime chart is July 2016, just after the EU referendum campaign  
Just sayin', but actually *my* Brexit paper is more cited than both! RT if you've cited me!  
Duplicitous drivel from @DanielJHannan. The EU is looking after the interests of its members. We have idiotically lost that benefit.#Brexit  
Hate crime soared after Brexit vote in biggest leap since records began 
The absolute shit shower of vanity which is a ‘no-deal' Brexit just casually starving the poorest citizens.  
Let's not pretend Brexit didn't embolden racists. It emboldened the bastards around 30%.  
• U.K. inflation data• Consumer prices  3%• Highest rate since 2012• Food is big factor 
The 'myth' of a spike in hate crime made real. Brexit let the ugly slimy things crawl out from underneath their rocks.  
.@resfoundation: Lower income households  would be disproportionately affected by a ‘No Deal' Brexit https://t.co/c3bo8LhGqf?amp=1  
Meeting at #Luxembourg with Baroness Anelay Minister of State  at the Department for Exiting the European Union  #Brexit #GAC 
This says it for some of Leavers. Britain's most important post-war decision and they cry "woooooo!" like it's a fair ground ride!#Brexit  
May's Brexit gambit leaves Brussels mystified  
I don't know if you guys in EU realise just how evil the Tories are. They aren't working in the country's interest.#Brexit = right-wing coup  
The #Brexit affect. Unleashing hate on our streets. Making xenophobia, racism, homophobia and islamophobia acceptable. IT IS NOT! 
Inflation climbs to 3% in September but don’t worry say the Brexit idiots - we voted for this.  
BBC News - 'Europe will bend rules for NI' on Brexit - Varadkar  
UK Gov refusing to publish Brexit impact assessments. Why? Public deserve to see them. Support @BestForBritain campaign to publish reports. 
"Remember all that stuff you voted for? Well, turns out Brexit can't deliver any of that but we must press forward because you voted for it"  
#gmtv Alistair Campbell shouting & screaming,no one believes you. Out trying to derail Brexit all the time go away.17 million voted leave.  
Anyway, more expert analysis later - @oecd first UK report since referendum... before the trolls start - pre-ref GDP forecasts = pretty good  
Despite your constant attempts to undermine UK negotiating position, you can't vote against 'no deal Brexit'. It's absurd, think it through.  
Brexit Britain can do a rapid trade deal with Australia, its government confirms  
What about official EU sources? What forward looking statements have they made about economic effects of Brexit? For the EU? And for us? /7 
What statements have been made about how well Brexit is going (eg the fruits of our trade deals) from official UK sources? /6 
Yes we’ve been disappointed by @UKLabour’s rhetoric - a ‘jobs first’ Brexit is a bit like a ‘books first’ library closure! 
Passive aggressive minions memes from 2014 were the embryos of the racist fake news articles that created Trump and Brexit  
#Brexit Tories Negotiations So far  
NEWS! Shock as Theresa May’s warmth and casual charm fail to break Brexit deadlock  
The time has come for Theresa May to tell the nation: Brexit can’t be done | Alastair Campbell  
Brexit an immensely complicated legal process that shld require our top, top people. Instead we have these Tory clowns... We're all doomed..  
While all eyes look to Brexit, our NHS is about to collapse  
No love for the EU Institutions, but Leavers like me need to accept #Brexit isn’t going well and has potential for catastrophe. 
As Brexit talks continue, Theresa May does everything in her power to avoid a hard border between the UK and Ireland  
We need to see the Brexit impact studies because we are the people who will be at the bottom of the impact crater. It’s our livelihoods. 
Fuchs on #r4today: 'germany would like the UK to stay in the EU'. #brexit is not inevitable. If we want to stay, then we can. 
Brexit definitely going to happen, says Michael Fish  
Supplementary: it helps to think of Brexit as a religion, it shares many of the characteristics. I'm a survivor of fundamentalist religion. 
May and Juncker agree to accelerate efforts on Brexit | Germany & France accused of stalling to squeeze cash from UK  
From Juncker-May statement... If you put a para like this into a 1-page declaration then you have really nothing to say. #Brexit #Deadlock 
What would the rest of Europe actually think if we reversed Brexit?  
Hard Brexit would cost ten times the divorce bill it is meant to avoid. UK prosperity? Brexit wrecks it    
Looking forward to Theresa May et al also described as 'separatists' over Brexit. 
No deal could and should mean No #Brexit (via @InFactsOrg) 
WATCH: @piersmorgan applauded for ‘shredding’ Alastair Campbell in explosive Brexit row ‘Good to see him squirm!’  
Editor of @LeaveHQ gives his perspect be on a 'no deal' Brexit. Absolutely ridiculous that this is even being talked of as a serious option  
Then Labour shouldn’t have handed the Tories an unfettered Article 50 activation then. Consequences are a bugger aren’t they #brexit  
With the Fun Boy Three - Boris Johnson, Liam Fox and David Davis - running Brexit the UK risks crashing out of the EU with no deal.  
Today's @thetimes cartoon #TheresaMay #Brexit #Ophelia  
£490bn gone thanks to Brexit looks like this:  
Why France and Germany are making a Brexit no deal more and more likely: 
German politician on @BBCr4today  tilting me towards hardest possible Brexit. UK give us the money first, then you see what you get. 
Humphrys trying to blame EU for Brexit shambles, forgetting it was us who decided to leave & us who has ballsed up negotiations. #r4today 
John Humphries  tone to this European politician on #brexit is incredible. UK gov in microcosm: Angry, not listening, irrational #r4today 
Interesting discussion sparking a reflection on what makes apparently intelligent people close their minds and lie to achieve Brexit. 1/  
Another superb thread... triggering Art.50 without a plan was reckless. Proper Brexit would take 10 years - but we are in a tabloidy rush.  
Catalonia’s "political prisoners," #Brexit and much more on Europe's front pages this morning  
Remember this statement: Parliament - not a referendum - is sovereign. And Parliament has never voted ‘Leave the EU.’ Watch this space!  
#Brexit transition deal likely to be too late for some London banks, says @TheCityUK  via @reutersHuwJ 
You say Brexit! And I say Brexit? You say Brexit!! and I say Brexit?? Brexit! Brexit? Brexit!! Brexit?? Let's call the whole thing off... 
Alastair Campbell tells LBC: "The awful truth is that Brexit is undeliverable. In the timeframe we have, it cannot be done."  
A 'no deal' Brexit would be a disaster, not for those advocating it, but for my constituents and millions of people.  
Why do Remainers think it odd Labour voters didn't vote Tory in GE to "give the mandate" for Brexit, when Labour promised to deliver Brexit? 
"New figures leave UK weak in Brexit talks" - A look at reality behind the headline : 
I don't want to "make a success" of Brexit any more than I want to make a success of repeatedly slamming my balls in my car door. 
May's Brexit gambit to get Juncker onside against Berlin/Paris leaves Brussels mystified. My story with @herszenhorn 
Time is running short for a Brexit deal that will allow the free movement of medicines  via @business 
I've been thinking about this, from @bbcnickrobinson, about the BBC's role on Brexit. /1  
The KRG independence referendum lit the fuse for the Kirkuk confrontation.  Now high time for serious dialogue.   
No deal Brexit would ‘cost millions of families more than £500 a year’  
What would a 'No Deal' Brexit scenario mean for trade tariffs and prices? Increases across the board if we revert to WTO rules  
"Cambridge Analytica worked on behalf of pro-Brexit Leave campaign" should be of interest to the @ElectoralCommUK  
'No-deal' Brexit likely to hit low-income families hardest  
Who’s to blame for Brexit’s fantasy politics? The experts, of course | Aditya Chakrabortty  
The war on Brexit is a war on democracy | Brendan O’Neill | spiked  
Forget Brexit. The EU's nightmare is Austria's lurch to the Far Right.   
_Why, oh why did they vote for Brexit? New evidence• @voxeu 
A Brexit no deal would hit millions of British families, major new study warns  
I wrote a thread dissenting from view that Oliver Norgrove deserves praise for criticising John Redwood & speaking out against hard Brexit.  
So brexit will hit poorest worst. More poverty =more homelessness. Something has to give: benefits freeze, UC, this?  
Brexit Britain can do a rapid trade deal with Australia, its government confirms  
Advertising Association warns of Brexit talent loss with 'Great Advert for Britain'  
'No deal' Brexit will cost millions of families £500 a year says report  
While all eyes look to Brexit, our NHS is about to collapse | Polly Toynbee  
Never think for a minute that what is happening now is due to the referendum. This all was planned before.#Kurdistan 
Thanks England. You voted for Tories, repeatedly, we didn’t. You voted for Brexit, we didn’t. Your votes are ruining the UK, national debt almost £2 trillion! Next time, please support our wishes to leave #ScotRef 
‘Plan for NO DEAL’ Leading economist Roger Bootle says Hard Brexit doom is ‘NONSENSE’  
Migrant raped young girl on a riverbank just weeks after getting his first refugee paycheck.#DACA #Brexit #MAGA 
Good job Brexit, good fucking job, awesome fucking job, top, fucking top!  No need to read the impact assessment for the NHS. #publishthe50 
Brexit can’t be done, we are too integrated with Europe.  If Brexit is done we end up disintegrated and paralysed.  
Turnout for Australia's postal survey (67.5) so far is bigger than:- US election (55.7)- Irish ssm referendum (60.52)- UK election (65.4) 
Ofnadwy / appalling to see Catalan leaders imprisoned following their independence referendum. Political prisoners in Europe. Shameful.  
'No-deal' Brexit likely to hit low-income families hardest  
Who’s to blame for Brexit’s fantasy politics? The experts, of course. My col  
Junckers contribution to #Brexit 
Farage blasts Hillary Clinton for blaming election loss on Brexit & says she may run again  
Jobs-first Brexit? There's no such thing, says Unite (). 
No deal? A messy Brexit would cost U.K. families $345 a year 
The value of Brexit transition deal is "disappearing by the day"  
Laurence Olins of British Summer Fruits, “Our farmers are unable to find labour this year, never mind post-Brexit.”  
Iraqi Former Ambassador to US Lukman Faily on #Kirkuk: All of this came because of the Kurdish referendum.  
'We could STAY in the EU' Tory Brexiteer @PeterBoneUK   skewers Remainers for TRICKING Brits on Brexit  
Lab would tell a car salesman"I am going to buy a car, no matter how bad it is and I will pay whatever you ask for it."#Brexit@AMDWaters 
The time has come for Theresa May to tell the nation: Brexit can’t be done | Alastair Campbell  
Hate crime prosecutions fell last year, despite an increase in incidents after the Brexit referendum  
"Fall of #Kirkuk shows referendum leading to less, not more authority for Kurds in #Iraq" - WSJ 
Being anti-brexit in the US is so nice. Everyone hears my British accent and is like "so why did they leave the EU? Seem pretty dumb to me". 
Might be too late.This is 2019 for a big bank. Leave, and a lot  people lose their jobs: drivers; local businesses; staff etc.#Brexit  
This week's @BigIssue has got a Butcher Billy cover. Malcom Tucker and Alan Partridge discuss about Brexit with @Aiannucci as guest editor 
a "missing" £500 billion is more than a "financial shock"if any truth in it, it spells disaster (plus a Brexit will reduce UK to penury) 
Constitution Art 140 (2) says the Fed Govt must hold referendum 2 determine future of Kirkuk & all disputed territories. Now 10 yrs late  
Uncertainty over Brexit transition 'could put 75,000 City jobs at risk'  
'No deal' Brexit will leave poorest families £500-a-year worse off, claims report #NoConfidence 
I got to see these #GatewoodGators tonight when we were sharing referendum information in a couple of our neighborhoods.  
This is exactly what brexit is about. Greedy elites stuffing their pockets away from proper scrutiny. I've always said the man's a shit. 
#StopBrexit before Brexit breaks Britain #finalsay 
"Investors tend to shun divided countries. Britain needs to tread carefully." 
Britain's a divided nation coz #Manchester #Yorkshire of course #Scotland want independence. Very same people say "#Brexit's wrong" #Madness 
What will be DUP #Brexit position after the Airbus-Bombardier C merger ?  
But as with all Brexit, far worse for UK than EU. 
I love the YouTube videos showing all the Hillary supporters crying. I'll have to see if there's similar videos for #Brexit. #GoodTimes 
I felt that way until Brexit, which is so dangerous that I joined the Lib Dems. 
and that's not factoring in likely drop in £ re Euro. Could well be .80 to a euro come Brexit day, a monster devaluation of UK. 
So the BCNDP need another year to consult on ubër, but roll out referendum rules without a single public hearing. #flawgic #bcpoli 
We are being sold out by EU agent Theresa May, whose aim is a Brexit postponed for years, which if it can't be reversed, will mean nothing. 
Hard border in Ireland and the planes won't fly....consequences of a no deal Brexit. Severe fisk of Chris Morris' piece.  
The time has come for Theresa May to tell the nation: Brexit can’t be done  
Most of people in UK don't want to be in federal EU,in Euro or EU army.They want their own laws, less immigration. Got it?It's called#Brexit 
Interesting that May and Juncker agree #Brexit negotiations should 'accelerate'Less messy when we reach the cliff edgeif we're going fast 
Watch this to see how racist violence in the UK  is off the charts in areas that voted leave, have turned into racist hell holes #Brexit  
Andy likes to huff and puff. But he'll be a good sheep to get his proportional rep referendum. His foot stomping is almost comical. 
Subverting #Brexit through EU Army deal bringing us closer to EU, powerless to resist EU once we don't have an Army.#NoBrexit#NoDemocracy 
In your dreams. Brexit is making no difference because the MAJORITY prefer the UK to the EU. 
Could it possibly be an early Brexit device to ensure the Brits get shafted in both ends ?  
Hillary Clinton warns Britain on potential trade deal with Trump, says Brexit was won by ‘big lie’  
New post: Cable Plummets On Report Brexit Talks Headed For “Catastrophic Breakdown” If No EU Compromise  
A messy Brexit would cost U.K. families $345 a year  
Brexit is something I really don't understand. 
Wld surprise if some weren't given relentless biased remain media -vety & propaganda. False Brexit spin yest re £490b ONS data a classic eg 
EU, UK agree on need for speed in Brexit talks  
I've been screaming no to the Kurdish referendum from day, wallah i knew things were just going to go downhill 
The arrogance of the political elite trying to force a fantastic brexit on us is staggering. Demand a verdant brexit! 
Brexit is 12695 hours away. #brexit 
'No-deal' Brexit likely to hit low-income families hardest 
Shame it wasn't her neck   

